
<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20392 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar025___94034" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-025 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  22 March 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> TAIWAN </F>
<H3> <TI>   Japanese Academic Sees Tough PRC Policy on Taiwan </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Japanese Academic Sees Tough PRC Policy on Taiwan </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   OW2203083794 Taipei CNA in English 0713 GMT 22 Mar 94 </F>
<F P=103> OW2203083794 </F>
<F P=104>  Taipei CNA </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

<F P=106> [By Sofia Wu] </F>
  [Text] Taipei, March 22 (CNA) -- Beijing could toughen its 
policy toward Taiwan if the People's Liberation Army (PLA) gains 
the upper hand in post-Deng Xiaoping power struggles, a Japanese 
scholar said here Tuesday [22 March]. 
  Akio Takahara, an assistant professor at Omilin University 
in 
Tokyo, said during a seminar on Mainland Chinese affairs that 
maintaining an international climate favorable for the 
mainland's economic development and pursuing national 
unification are the two pillars of Beijing's foreign policy. 
  Takahara noted that Deng Xiaoping's personal reputation has 
been a major force preventing the nationalist PLA from 
interfering in Beijing's foreign policy. 
  However, with Deng aging and his influence declining, the 
call for hardline foreign policy has been mounting within the 
PLA, he said. 
  Takahara added that some 100 active-duty and retired 
mainland 
military officers wrote to Chinese Communist Party (CCP) 
Secretary-General Jiang Zemin and paramount leader Deng last 
June, asking them not to yield to American pressure on 
diplomatic affairs. 
  Last August, Takahara said, a group of retired senior PLA 
officers and members of the CCP's Central Military Commission 
also issued a joint statement urging Beijing authorities to 
harden policy toward the United States. 
  In response to those calls, Beijing's Politburo, while 
reiterating a moderate line in dealing with the United States, 
declared a "four no's" policy -- no confrontation, no 
provocation, no evasion and no fear -- in handling diplomatic 
affairs last September. 
  Takahara observed that Deng has supported a moderate stance 
toward the United States partly because he feared that a rift 
between Beijing and Washington might push America closer to 
Taiwan. 
  Takahara said after Deng dies, the hardline faction in the 
PLA will very likely have a greater say in Beijing's 
decision-making. By then, he predicted that the 
"Taipei-Beijing-Washington" relations triangle may change 
greatly. 
  The mainland affairs seminar, which opened Monday, is being 
sponsored by National Chengchi University, with more than 100 
Taiwan and Japanese scholars participating. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20393 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar025___94001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-025 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  30 November 1993 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> POLITICAL </F>
<H3> <TI>   Party Building Faces Contradictions Under Market Economy </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Party Building Faces Contradictions Under Market Economy </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94CM0240A Nanjing NANJING DAXUE XUEBAO: ZHEXUE SHEHUI KEXUE 
BAN [JOURNAL OF NANJING UNIVERSITY: PHILOSOPHY AND SOCIAL </F>



<TEXT>
SCIENCES EDITION] in Chinese No 6, 30 Nov 93 pp 80-82 
<F P=103> 94CM0240A </F>
<F P=104>  Nanjing NANJING DAXUE XUEBAO: ZHEXUE SHEHUI KEXUE 
BAN [JOURNAL OF NANJING UNIVERSITY: PHILOSOPHY AND SOCIAL </F>

SCIENCES EDITION] 
<F P=105> Chinese </F>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Zhu Xiaoshi (2612 1420 4258) NANJING RIBAO </F>
newspaper office: "Cursory Analysis of the Special 
Contradictions Faced by Party Building Under the Conditions of 
Market Economy." Responsible editor: Sun Ye (1327 0396)] 
  [Text] The resolution of the 14th CPC National Congress to 
the effect that establishment of the socialist market economy 
shall be the target of the reform indicates that China has 
entered a new phase in its transition from the highly 
centralized system of planned economy to market economy, a 
system abounding in vigor and vitality. Energetic pursuit of 
the new forms and new tasks of developing the socialist market 
economy entails the need for our party to deal with 
circumstances and conditions that are different from those of 
the past. As a consequence, party building will have to face 
extremely complex and very special contradictions. The urgent 
and effective resolution of these new and particular 
contradictions is of important theoretical and actual 
significance for the strengthening of party building, for the 
enhancement of party guidance, for the socialist modernization 
with Chinese characteristics, and for the development of all 
undertakings of reform and opening to the outside world. 
  First Contradiction: The contradiction between the complex 
composition of the party membership and society, on the one 
hand, and the unanimous call for progress by the party 
membership, on the other hand. 
  The political party is the organization and political 
representation of the class; the composition of the party 
membership is directly and closely related to the particular 
economic structure of the society and to the class and strata of 
this society. As China is now developing a market economy and 
establishing this new system of market economy while it is still 
at the initial stage of socialism and possessing only backward 
and unevenly developed productive forces, the realities of 
China's situation demand, objectively, the development of a 
pluralistic economic structure, where the system of public 
ownership and distribution according to work are the primary 
constituents and where other economic sectors and distribution 
methods are supplementary. With the advances in China's reform 
and the extended existence and common development of pluralistic 
economic components, changes in China's economic structure will 
become more widespread and thoroughgoing. The complex changes of 
the economic structure will naturally result in changes in the 
component members of China's society and particularly in the 
composition of its strata, and it will furthermore, to a certain 
extent, have an effect on the economic composition of the party 
membership. For instance, in the actual present-day economic 
life, changes have already occurred in the economic relations of 
some party members, as some party members have distanced 
themselves from the original public ownership economy, are 
engaging in individual economy, private-run economy, or 
foreign-financed economies. There are others who are engaged in 
individual and other kinds of economies who are now joining the 
ranks of party members. If we compare the complexity of the 
present social composition and economic relations of party 
members with the artificially changed production relations prior 
to the Third Plenary Session of the 11th CPC Central Committee, 
the much too early elimination of nonpublic ownership economic 
sectors and the social composition of party members with the 
corresponding conditions of the unitary economic structure of 
the public ownership system (ownership by the whole people, 
ownership by the collective) and the unitary class and strata 
structure (workers, peasants, intellectuals), the situation now 
certainly appears not as "pure" and "simple" as in the past. We 
have to affirm that the complexity of the social composition and 
economic relations of party members has adapted to the nature 
and condition of China's socialist force at the present stage. 
However, due to the special circumstances and specific 
influences of different economic relations, it was not possible 
to prevent that some party members--though with the precondition 
of uniformity of basic standards and demands for 
progress--engender certain divergences with regard to the extent 
of their political consciousness, awareness of the social 
stratification, value concepts, and methods of actions to be 
taken. The Chinese Communist Party is the vanguard of the 
Chinese working class; the demands of the party and those of 
each party member are essentially identical. The Party 
Constitution prescribes: Members of the CPC are vanguard 
fighters of the Chinese working class. They are imbued with 
communist consciousness, they must serve the people 
wholeheartedly, must be ready to make any personal sacrifices, 
and must dedicate their lives to the realization of communism. 
In view of the complex social composition of the party 
membership under the conditions of market economy, a problem 
that we are now faced with and that must under no circumstances 
be ignored, a problem in matters of party building, is how to 
bring onto one denominator the exemplary role and the particular 
demands of party members in the different economic sectors, and 
how to achieve conformity of their actual actions in their 
various individual economic activities, a conformity with the 
prescribed standards of party membership. A related problem is 
how to set up and run party organizations in different economic 
sectors and to develop the functions of their particular 
specialties so that they may also conform with the demands of 
the party organization. This too has to be carefully explored in 
actual practice. 
  Second Contradiction: The contradiction between the 
complexity of the party-masses relationship under the conditions 
of market economy, on the one hand, and the fundamental identity 
of party and masses interests, on the other hand. 
  The Chinese Communist Party is the faithful representative 
of 
the interests of the Chinese people of all nationalities. The 
lofty ideal of every member of the CPC is to serve the people 
wholeheartedly, without regard for special personal interests. 
Precisely because this is so, the party has always maintained 
flesh-and-blood ties with the masses during the protracted 
periods of revolution and construction, and has evolved the 
excellent tradition and working style of relying on the masses 
and closely linking up with the masses. As we are presently 
energetically promoting the socialist market economy, we must 
push on with the liberation and development of the productive 
forces, impel all-round progress in society, and bring happiness 
and prosperity to the masses. On a foundation of this kind, the 
relationship between the party and the masses is bound to become 
even closer. However, the energetic development of market 
economy, especially in its initial stages, may manifest some 
complex relationships between party and the masses. This has 
easily led to many contradictions between the party and the 
masses, as well as between party cadres and the masses, 
contradictions that are characteristic for the market economy, 
and it is these contradictions that have generally manifested 
themselves particularly openly and visibly. 
  The party-masses relationship is after all one of interests, 
and its fundamental demand is that the party faithfully 
represent, and make every effort to realize, the interests of 
the broad masses of the people. Enduring, stable, and close 
party-masses relations are built on a certain objective material 
basis and on the foundation of common interests, and these 
comprise present vested interests as well as also the pursuit 
and expectations of future interests. Reform, opening to the 
outside world, and market economy have stirred up much 
enthusiasm and creativity among the broad masses, to increase 
economic production and to strive for prosperity. In the 
practical execution of the reform by the entire party and the 
entire society, material interests and economic interests have 
become the important problems that have now most of everyone's 
attention. Development of the socialist market economy is, of 
course, apt to bring immediate and long-term benefits for all, 
including party members, but it is not possible to provide these 
benefits simultaneously and equally for all, some will still 
temporarily remain without certain benefits. Especially during 
the initial stage of the developing market economy, when certain 
of its aspects have not yet matured and perfected, it is 
particularly difficult to avoid that certain contradictions will 
show up with regard to material benefits, and this can, in turn, 
become the cause of increasing dissatisfaction and louder voices 
of discontent among the masses. If it were the case that all of 
us party members, especially party members who are cadres in 
leading positions, would lack the mass viewpoint, would have 
inflated selfish desires, would misuse powers for private gain, 
show unhealthy tendencies, or even be party to all kinds of 
corrupt practices, this would with certainty aggravate the 
contradictions among the masses and add to the conflicts with 
the masses. Development of the market economy is bringing with 
it certain complex circumstances that affect the party-masses 
relation. They demand of us that we earnestly and effectively 
set about the task of party building in all its various aspects, 
and that we energetically explore how to utilize, under the new 
situation, the mechanism of the market to harmonize and resolve 
the contradictions in mentalities and in ways of doing things 
within the party-masses and cadre-masses relations. We must 
also, one step further, consolidate the flesh-and-blood ties 
between the party and the masses. 
  Third Contradiction: The contradiction between the 
complexity 
of inner-party contradictions under the conditions of market 
economy, on the one hand, and the unity of party ideology and 
party organization, on the other hand. 
  As the vanguard contingent of the working class, the party 
is--like everything else--an entity consisting of complex 
contradictions. Inner-party contradictions reflect the objective 
realities of society, as these contradictions manifest 
themselves in different forms under different conditions. The 
inner-party contradictions under the new situation manifest 
themselves roughly in the following three respects: 
  First, contradictions of ideology and political 
consciousness. This refers mainly to various divergences in 
ideology and political consciousness engendered by the sharp 
collision and confrontation of new and old thoughts and 
concepts, and of the new and old modes of thinking, among party 
members during the period of China's social remolding. This 
remolding progresses from seclusion to opening up, from natural 
and semi-natural economy to commodity economy, and from the 
planned economy system to the system of socialist market 
economy. It is an inevitable trend of conflicts involving 
inner-party ideological and conceptual contradictions that they 
will adapt to the demands of the new ideology and new concepts 
of socialized large-scale production and market economy 
development. They will gradually take the place of the old 
ideology of small-scale production methods combined with the 
planned economy system. With intensified development of market 
economy, and the continuous manifestation of its superiority, 
there will gradually be no more market for those "Leftist" or 
rightist things. However, we must not overlook the fact that as 
a consequence of the intensified reform and the broadening of 
opening to the outside world, the value concepts of members of 
the CPC may become exposed to assaults from Western pluralistic 
value concepts, and may be invaded by various decadent feudal 
and bourgeois ideologies, which may make it difficult to 
maintain a high degree of ideological uniformity throughout the 
entire party. 
  Second, contradictions in the course of practice. The 
development of socialist market economy is placing a new task 
before the members of the CPC. It requires liberation of minds, 
seeking truth from facts, opening up new paths and creating new 
things, study of the new situation, resolving new problems, 
creating new experiences, and setting up a new system. The 
difficulties of accomplishing this new task in the course of 
actual practice can well be imagined. It will of course entail 
large contradictions and problems, and be the cause of many 
differing opinions and differing outlooks in the work to be 
performed. Under these conditions, it will certainly be 
difficult to keep the entire party altogether in step. 
  Third, contradictions of inner-part interests. The Party 
Constitution prescribes that party members must accept the 
interests of the party as the uppermost concern in life. The 
individual interests of every CPC member must unconditionally be 
subordinated to the interests of the party and the people. The 
party organization, on the other hand, must also be solicitous 
of and show consideration for the individual interests of the 
party members; this is a fundamental rule for the settlement of 
contradictions involving inner-party interests. Reform has set 
in motion an interest-promoting mechanism among the people, a 
mechanism working for liberation and development of productive 
forces, and the long-suppressed individual-profit consciousness 
has become liberated among all members of the society, including 
the members of the CPC. Now, the individual interests of party 
members are indeed also prominently put forward for due 
consideration, and are frequently, publicly, and "sensibly" 
arrayed on par with the interests of the party and the people. 
In the past, some party members would have been ashamed to bring 
up openly demands for consideration of individual interests, but 
now they dare discuss and put forward such demands. They even 
dare to "haggle over prices," and in some cases even create 
certain "confrontational" situations in questions of inner-party 
interests. Contradictions between individual party members, on 
the one hand, and the party and the people, on the other hand, 
are fundamental factors that actually -- under the conditions of 
market economy -- adversely affect the cohesion within the 
party, and its attractiveness and fighting strength. If these 
contradictions are therefore not effectively resolved, it will 
be impossible for the party to maintain a high degree of unity 
in ideological, political, organizational, and operational 
respects. It will then also be impossible to shoulder the 
leadership responsibilities for reform and opening up and for 
the socialist modernizations. Under the new situation, the 
complexity of the inner-party contradictions not only increases 
the difficulties for party building, difficulties that have to 
be overcome within the body of the party itself, it also 
provides party building with an enhanced impetus for efforts to 
resolve the internal contradictions and for continuous 
self-perfection and self-development. 
  In this new historical era, the circumstances the party 
finds 
itself in and the tasks to be shouldered by the party have 
greatly changed. Due to these changes the party has to face many 
new complex situations and new problems in ideological, 
political, organizational, and in working style respects. The 
new reality demands of us that we must abide by the fundamental 
political line of the party, that we must uphold the principle 
of having the party control its party members and strictly 
administer the party, and that we strengthen and improve party 
building. The task that is presently most important and pressing 
is in the sphere of ideological buildup. We must give utmost 
attention to the party's theoretical buildup, and, with the 
party's theoretical buildup as nucleus, we must strengthen the 
party's entire ideological buildup, making an effort to arm the 
entire party through the buildup of socialist theory with 
Chinese characteristics. As to the organizational buildup, our 
objective must be to enhance the party's centralized, unified 
leadership, to strengthen democratic centralism, to perfect the 
leadership system and the mechanism of the party's internal 
political life. As to the build-up of the party's working style, 
we must make close linkage of party and masses the fundamental 
concern, must correctly deal with the internal contradictions of 
the people, and resolutely control negative, decadent phenomena, 
reducing them to their lowest level. Through strengthening and 
improving party building and by directing our efforts to 
enhancing the governmental and leadership qualities of the 
party, we shall place the party, which will then have assumed a 
completely new attitude, at the front line of reform and 
modernization. It shall become a party with courage to reform to 
reform, a party imbued with vitality, a strictly disciplined, a 
just and honest party, that will select worthy and capable 
people to fill positions, and a party that will be eminently 
effective in its service to the people. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20394 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar025___94002" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-025 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  24 January 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> NATIONAL AFFAIRS, POLICY </F>
<H3> <TI>   Commission Researcher Forecasts 1994 Economy </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Commission Researcher Forecasts 1994 Economy </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94CE0368A Beijing GUANLI SHIJIE (MANAGEMENT WORLD) in 
Chinese No 1, 24 Jan 94 pp 50-53 </F>

<F P=103> 94CE0368A </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing GUANLI SHIJIE (MANAGEMENT WORLD) </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Li Zhongfan (2621 1813 0416) of the State </F>
Commission for Restructuring the Economic System, and editor 
Wang Yun (3769 5366): "Analysis and Forecast of 1994 Development 
of the National Economy"] 
  [Text] In early 1992, after Comrade Deng Xiaoping spoke on 
his southern tour, China's economic development entered a new 
stage of rapid development, prominently expressed in the 
following five aspects: The first is the rapid growth of the 
national economy and a large increase in the wealth of society. 
The second is an obvious upturn in economic performance. The 
composite economic performance of enterprises, on the basis of 
the 6 percentage point improvement in 1992 over the previous 
year, also clearly improved in 1993. The third is the 
breakthrough achieved in price reform. With the economic life of 
society rather stable, the prices of 80 percent of means of 
production and 90 percent of means of subsistence have been 
freed up. The fourth is the initial improvement achieved in the 
industrial structure, concentrated in the rather rapid 
development of tertiary industry, especially the soaring 
development of railroads and highways. The fifth is the rapid 
expansion of the opening to the outside, in the the broadening 
of the scope, as well as the use of foreign investment and the 
development of foreign trade, we have achieved great results 
universally acknowledged. Practice proves that Comrade Deng 
Xiaoping's speech was completely accurate. If we only 
conscientiously implement the spirit of his "speech," 1994 will 
be another year of rapid development for the national economy. 
We have conducted a rather scientific proof of this. Based on 
the economic model already established, we have calculated 
eighteen programs of the 1994 macroeconomic arrangement and 
after analyzing and summarizing them, we believe that despite 
the fact that there are several contradictions in the economic 
development, prospects are optimistic and it is totally possible 
to achieve rapid development. 
  I. Guiding Thought of the Macroeconomic Arrangement 
  Based on 1993 macroeconomic performance and proof of the 
feasibility of the 1994 macroeconomic arrangement, we believe 
that the guiding thought for the 1994 macroeconomic arrangement 
should be to continue to concentrate on improving economic 
performance, stress increased enterprise vitality and conversion 
of operating mechanisms, maintain the overall stable growth of 
newly added credit, and move the national economy toward more 
normal systemic circulation. At the same time, we should 
appropriately control the growth of overall investment in fixed 
assets of the whole society to ensure a basic balance in overall 
supply and overall demand in the whole society and 
correspondingly adjust the structure and continue to slant 
policy toward development of the transportation and energy 
industries and improvement in farmers' income. 
  II. Appropriately Control the Growth of Overall 
Investment in Fixed Assets of the Whole Society 
  In the last two years, investment in the fixed assets of the 
whole society has grown very rapidly. In 1992 the growth rate 
was 37.6 percent and the investment rate (the ratio of 
investment in fixed assets of the entire society to gross 
national product (GNP)) was 31.6 percent. In 1993 the growth 
rate is expected to be about 40 percent and the investment rate 
37 percent, thereby causing the average annual growth rate for 
the five years between 1989 and 1993 to rise to about 20 percent 
and the average annual investment rate to reach about 30 
percent. Without a doubt, the rapid growth in fixed asset 
investment has driven the rapid development of the national 
economy. In the two successive years 1992 and 1993, the growth 
rate of the GNP reached as high as 13 percent, causing the 
average growth rate for GNP for two successive years for 1989 to 
1993 to reach 8.54 percent. Obviously, with the rapid growth of 
fixed asset investment in these two years, the investment rate 
has essentially been restored to normal and rapid economic 
growth has essentially been formed. On this basis, we believe 
that fixed asset investment growth should be appropriately 
controlled in 1994. It should not exceed 20 percent, taking 
15-81 percent [as written] growth as appropriate. That is, 
controlling total investment in fixed assets of the whole 
society at about 1.25 trillion yuan to 1.3 trillion yuan, a 
nominal increase of 15-18 percent over the previous year. 
Discounting the price factor, the actual increase would be about 
3-6 percent. And the investment rate would be about 34 percent, 
a drop of approximately three percentage points from the 
previous year. This way the essential balance of overall supply 
and overall demand could be maintained for the whole society and 
the sustained rapid development of the national economy could be 
maintained, causing the GNP to increase by about 11 percent over 
the previous year. 
  The important thing is that while controlling the growth of 
overall investment, we decide to adopt measures to improve 
investment performance. In sum, we must adopt three important 
measures: The first is to make state enterprises truly become 
principal investment bodies responsible for their own profits 
and losses. The second is that new starts be linked to 
completion of construction and going into operation, the 
investment rate be improved, and the growth of new starts be 
controlled. The third is that, in accordance with industrial 
policy, differential interest rates be implemented on bank loans 
for fixed asset investment projects. 
  III. Continue to Maintain Overall Stable Growth of 
Newly Added Credit 
  To maintain the rapid growth of the national economy, based 
on the decline in the economic performance of state enterprises, 
the obvious increase in "triangular debt," and the difficulty of 
economic operations in the last half of 1993, while 
appropriately controlling overall investment in fixed assets of 
the whole society, newly added credit must be increased to a 
rather great extent, so that the systemic circulation of the 
national economy can operate normally. When determining total 
newly added credit, we must consider three factors: the first is 
the growth of the national economy; the second is changes in the 
prices of means of production and means of subsistence; and the 
third is the operating needs of the socialist market economy. 
So, in determining total newly added credit, we cannot simply 
indiscriminately apply the formulas of the past. According to 
our calculations, total newly added credit in 1994 should be 
between 560 billion yuan and 650 billion yuan, a growth rate of 
22-25 percent, roughly equivalent to the average growth rate 
from 1984 through 1988. We should soberly consider that if the 
scale of newly added credit is too low, it will not be adequate 
to alleviate the current difficulties in economic operations and 
could quite possibly cause great damage. 
  It is important that while increasing overall credit, we 
must 
pay attention to improving credit performance. We must adopt 
four measures: The first is that in total newly added credit, we 
must increase the ratio of circulation funds loaned to make 
current enterprises operate smoothly. The second is that, in 
accordance with industrial policy, we implement differential 
interest rates and adjust the credit structure to unify the 
credit structure with the investment structure. The third is to 
fully utilize domestic and foreign funds by flexibly applying 
such means as interest rates, bonds, and stocks and raise a 
large amount of domestic and foreign funds. If we can reach 500 
billion yuan (including savings), it would be a great victory. 
The fourth is by rapidly establishing a new financial order that 
meets the demands of the socialist market economy system and 
permitting short-term interbank loans and various ways of 
raising funds, to make funds fully efficient. 
  IV. Consolidate and Develop the Results of Price Reform 
and, Accurately Identifying the Opportune Time, Resolutely 
"Merge" Exchange Rates 
  In the last two years, price reforms have achieved a 
breakthrough, freeing up 90 percent of means of subsistence 
prices and 80 percent of means of production prices. The "dual 
track" price system has nearly been merged into a "single track 
system" based on market prices. This reform should be considered 
worth the cost, a 12-13 percent rise in the retail price index 
for all of society in 1993 and maintaining a corresponding level 
in 1994. On this basis, we advocate totally merging petroleum 
and coal prices in 1994 with an approximate affect of about 1 
percentage point on the retail price index, and we forecast that 
the retail price index for the whole society in 1994 will be 
11-12 percent. So, we can say that a rational price system 
meeting the needs of the socialist market economy is essentially 
formed. 
  Quite obviously, a rational price system demands a 
corresponding rational exchange rate system. So, we already have 
the basis for "merging" the exchange rate and should not miss 
the opportunity to adopt decisive measures and implement 
"merging" the exchange rates. 
  The current issue is whether merging the exchange rates 
could 
trigger large price increases. Our research indicates that 1994 
price increases would not be triggered by excessive demand or 
material shortages. The main reason that they would rise still 
would be the combined manifestation of the chain reaction from 
the rationalization of comparative prices formed in accordance 
with market mechanisms after prices are freed up. The 1994 
retail price index for the entire society (11-12 percent) is 
calculated based on the above determination. So, the merging of 
the exchange rates should not have an obvious affect on the 
retail price index for the entire society. 
  V. A Rather Large Increase in Citizen Savings Driven by 
Adjustments in the Interest Rate 
  We once again emphasize that, based on China's national 
characteristics, credit is currently an important means of 
controlling economic operations and an important channel for 
banks to accumulate funds. The situation since reform indicates 
that the savings of urban and rural residents are a principal 
source for banks to accumulate funds. In the past five years, 
they have averaged approximately 70 percent of the year's newly 
added credit. Obviously, stable growth in the savings of urban 
and rural residents is an important factor in the stable growth 
of the economy. So, we must adopt effective measures to cause 
citizen savings in 1994 to return to the average levels (30 
percent) of the last ten years. The most effective measure is 
promptly taking the initiative in adjusting interest rates in 
accordance with overall price levels to keep the interest rate 
on citizens' savings 2-3 percentage point above the retail price 
index for the entire society. That is, in 1994 interest rates on 
citizen savings should at least be adjusted up to about 13 
percent, striving to have newly-added citizen savings reach 
about 450 billion yuan, making up 70-80 percent of newly added 
sources of credit funds. So, total newly added currency can be 
held within 200 billion yuan, an approximate increase of 34 
percent over the previous year and roughly equivalent to the 
average increase from 1984 through 1988, extremely significant 
for the rapid stable growth of the national economy. If we 
analyze the average currency growth rate for the last six years 
(1989-1994), the growth rate is only 25 percent, still 
approximately eight percentage points lower than the 1984-1988 
currency growth rate. Its affect on inflation is not clear. 
  VI. Continue To Slant Policy Toward Development of the 
Transportation and Energy Industries and Increasing Farmers' 
Income 
  In 1994, including 1995, a focus of the macroeconomic 
arrangement will be helping to accelerate the resolution of the 
"bottleneck" affecting the rapid, sustained, sound development 
of the economy in the 1990s. That is, we should implement policy 
slanted toward development of the transportation and energy 
industries and increasing farmers' income. In developing 
transportation, we should ensure that before the end of 1995, 
ensuring quality and quantity, we will complete the construction 
of the Beijing-Kowloon Railroad and achieve regular service and 
railroad transportation totals reaching 1.7 billion tons. The 
key to raising farmers' income is opening up farmers' avenues of 
employment. Not only must we put forth greater effort to develop 
rural enterprises, but we also must formulate preferential 
policies for converting the rural labor force to other 
industries. At the same time, we must further publicize science 
and technology on a greater scale and with higher goals and more 
strongly support and promote the effective "Spark Plan" and 
develop the rural information industry and effectively guide the 
farmers in developing production and striving for a rather 
obvious increase in farmers' net income, with the actual growth 
rate in the annual income reaching 5 percent or more. 
  VII. The Key Is To Improve the Economic Performance of 
Large- and Medium-sized State Enterprises 
  Enterprises economic performance is the basis for the 
performance of the entire national economy. Sustained, rapid 
development of China's economy must be based on constantly 
improving economic results accomplished by enhancing the 
vitality of enterprises, especially large- and medium-sized 
state enterprises and improving their economic performance. 
Since the Third Plenum of the 11th Party Central Committee, 
several effective and bold experiments have been made in this 
respect and remarkable results have been accomplished. In sum, 
we believe that the following few points are extremely important 
for enhancing enterprise vitality and improving their economic 
performance: 
  1. The aim of reform is to free up and develop productivity. 
Enterprises are the creators of social wealth and are productive 
forces. Therefore, the beginning and the end of all reform 
should be helping to enhance enterprise vitality and improve 
economic performance. Macroeconomic controls should conform to 
and serve this goal. We must conscientiously and resolutely 
implement the policy that "the central link in reform of the 
entire economic system focussed on the market is enhancing 
enterprise vitality, especially enhancing the vitality of large- 
and medium-sized enterprises under the ownership of the whole 
people." All thinking and measures that are divorced from this 
central point fail to grasp the main point and even run counter 
to intensification of reform. 
  2. In the 1990s, the guiding thought for intensification of 
enterprise reform still should be resolutely implementing the 
proposal made by Comrade Deng Xiaoping in May 1992 when he was 
inspecting Capital Steel, that "we can only take the approach of 
relaxing. Turning on the water raises fish well." We believe 
that this is an incisive summary of more than ten years of 
enterprise reform and indicates the direction for further 
intensifying enterprise reform. 
  3. Creating an environment of fair competition has become an 
important component of intensifying enterprise reform in the 
1990s. First, according to the principles of the market economy, 
tax burdens should be generally equal for all enterprises, 
including "partially or wholly foreign owned" enterprises. Here 
we should point out that the tax burdens of state enterprises 
should gradually move closer to those of "partially or wholly 
foreign owned" enterprises, rather than "partially or wholly 
foreign owned" enterprises emulating state enterprises. 
  4. More than ten years of practicing enterprise reform has 
proven that no matter what form of management state enterprises 
practice, they must first determine the relationship between 
state and enterprise responsibilities, rights, and benefits. 
This demarcation of responsibility, rights, and benefits 
essentially is the demarcation of social property rights based 
on the public ownership system. Making it explicit that state 
asset legal person property rights are carried out by 
enterprises and the ownership of the assets ultimately falls to 
the state is the essential content of the contract management 
responsibility system as it has developed up to now. It is 
compatible with such forms of management as stock systems and 
limited liability companies. On this basis, the management form 
of state enterprises can be diversified and gradually 
standardized. 
  VIII. Forecast of Principal Indicators of the 1994 
National Economy 
  On the basis of the guiding thought and main points given 
above, after rather detailed proof, we have selected one out of 
the 18 plans for macroeconomic arrangement that we believe is 
rather feasible. The results of its principle forecasts are as 
follows: 
  1) Input Total fixed asset investment for the entire 
society: 
1.25 trillion to 1.3 trillion yuan; total newly-added credit: 
560 billion yuan to 650 billion yuan. 
  2) Output 1. Production GNP growth: 10-11 percent. National 
income growth: about 10 percent. Growth in total value of 
industrial output: about 19 percent; growth in total value of 
agricultural output: about 4 percent; growth in total grain 
production: about 1.7 percent. 
  Output 2. Market and prices growth in total social commodity 
retail sales: 20 percent; increases in social commodity retail 
prices indices: estimated at 11-12 percent. 
  Output 3. Banking and finance Urban and rural resident 
savings: growth 30 percent, new increases will be about 450 
billion yuan (driven by adjustments in the interest rates and 
ensuring that it is 1-2 percentage points higher than price 
indices). New increases in currency circulation: growth 29-34 
percent, increased amount 170 billion yuan to 200 billion yuan. 
Finances: revenue increase 12.6 percent; expenditure increase 
11.2 percent. Financial deficit about 27 billion yuan, making 
up approximately 4.8 percent of treasury expenditures. 
  Output 4. Foreign trade and use of foreign investment total 
imports and exports will be about US$224.6 billion, an increase 
of about 16 percent. Actual foreign investment used 
approximately US$36.9 billion, an increase of approximately 34 
percent. Foreign firm direct investment approximately US$27.6 
billion, an increase of about 46 percent. 
  Output 5. Urban and rural resident livelihood Total employee 
wages: increase about 18.6 percent. Growth of farmers' annual 
per capita net income: 9 percent; Growth of bank wage 
expenditures: 25.2 percent. 
  It can be seen that the above plan is directed at the 
problems existing in 1993 economic operations, giving prominence 
to credit increases to start normal operation of systemic 
circulation of the national economy and appropriately control 
the the growth of the scale of investment to ensure a basic 
balance in overall supply and overall demand, to orient the 
national economy in the direction of sustained, stable, rapid 
development. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20395 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar025___94003" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-025 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  24 January 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> NATIONAL AFFAIRS, POLICY </F>
<H3> <TI>   Forecast of Consumption Market for 1994 </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Forecast of Consumption Market for 1994 </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94CE0366A Beijing GUANLI SHIJIE [MANAGEMENT WORLD] in 
Chinese No 1, 24 Jan 94 pp 79-82 </F>

<F P=103> 94CE0366A </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing GUANLI SHIJIE [MANAGEMENT WORLD] </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by You Caixiang (1429 1752 7449) and Li Qingyuan </F>
(2621 1987 0337), of the Ministry of Domestic Trade's Unified 
Planning Office; edited by Jiang Dongsheng (5592 2639 3932): 
"A Projection of China's Consumer Goods Market for 1994"] 
  [Text] I. The Impact of China's Macroeconomic Climate 
On Our 1994 Consumer Goods Market 
  The rapid growth of China's national economy and our 
improved 
macroeconomic climate in 1993 added to our overall national 
might and stamina, laying a solid foundation for economic 
development and market prosperity in 1994. We are here 
presenting a detailed analysis of the impact of our 
macroeconomic climate on our 1994 consumer goods market. 
<H5>  1. Our Demand Climate </H5>
  1. Investor demand. Investor demand has always played a 
decisive role in China's economic development, with the years of 
larger investment bringing faster economic growth rates. While 
our rapid economic growth in the first half of 1993 was driven 
largely by investment-adjusted growth, too rapid investment 
growth with too much construction also causes many problems, 
particularly a decline in investment efficiency. In light of 
this, the state will base its actions in 1994 on maintaining an 
appropriate growth of investment scale, by tightening its 
regulation, control, and management of overall investment and 
credit. Meanwhile, it will speed up investment reform and 
strengthen investment restraint forces, so that investment 
subjects can make their own decisions, be liable for their own 
risks, and act less blindly. So in 1994, our investment demand 
will grow slower than in 1993, with funding sources invariably 
somewhat tighter than in 1993, arbitrary exceeding of investment 
plans down sharply, and overall investment growth clearly lower 
than in 1993. We project our 1994 investment growth at about 20 
percent. 
  2. Consumer demand. Since the 1980s, China's consumer 
demand has increased yearly, with steadily upgraded consumer 
concepts and more stable, higher consumption quality. Our 
overall consumption level is now in a transition stage from 
"having enough food and clothing" to "being comparatively 
well-off." In which case, will consumer demand decline in this 
stage? And will our consumer goods markets "slump"? 
  First, we will briefly analyze the causes of our two 
most-recent economic "overheatings" and market "slumps." At the 
end of 1988, in order to control economic overheating and 
inflation, the state took "brake-slamming" steps, such as 
cutting back capital construction and tightening credit, as well 
as ones, such as raising savings interest rates and adding a new 
color-TV consumption tax, which lowered the average increase in 
incomes from 1988's 22.2 percent to 12.6 percent by 1989 for 
city dwellers, and from 1988's 17.8 percent to 10.4 percent by 
1989 for rural residents. In addition, price increases 
gradually receded, increasing the wait-and-see consumer mindset 
of holding onto money, which resulted in a national market slump. 
  Our wave of market panic-buying in 1988 and our 
exceptionally 
brisk market sales in the first half of 1993 were caused mainly 
by the above abnormal factors, resulting in consumer-mindset 
anxiety. There were two particular points: 1) as investment and 
currency put into circulation grew too quickly, causing waves of 
price increases, residents were clearly affected by inflation; 
2) interest rates were lower than price rises, with declining 
exchange rates and negative growth in savings efficiency, so 
that the awareness of coming inflation strengthened in advance. 
This resulted in a large-scale phenomenon of purchasing and 
advance consumption as a hedge against inflation. 
  It is thus obvious that both our economic "overheatings" and 
market "slumps" were caused mainly by either too lax management 
or too tight regulation and control of our macroeconomic climate 
by the state, causing too much investment, price, interest rate, 
and exchange rate volatility. But once effective steps were 
taken to return these factors to normal, our consumer goods 
market stabilized quickly. 
  Second, consumer confidence is up. The "Resolution on 
Certain Issues Involved in Establishing a Socialist 
Market-Economy System" passed by the Third Plenary Session of 
the 14th CPC Congress set our basic direction of developing a 
socialist market economy, sharply raising the enthusiasm of the 
people throughout China to intensify reform and speed up 
development, and enhancing consumer confidence at all levels. 
An example of this was the bottoming out and pickup in rolled 
steel futures trading in Suzhou in late November 1993, showing 
that consumers had seen the coming good trend. Meanwhile, the 
center has taken a series of regulation and control steps to 
ease inflation and stabilize the RMB value and exchange rate, 
which will promote stable market-economy development, stabilize 
consumer confidence, and eliminate the phenomena of advance 
purchasing or holding onto money with a wait-and-see approach. 
  China's overall consumption is now in a transition stage 
from 
"having enough food and clothing" to "being comparatively 
well-off." In the world's developed countries, this stage was 
one of consumption expansion, in which markets could not 
"contract" sharply without special circumstances. So in 1994, 
China's market-economy establishment will be even more full of 
vitality, with consumption standards and quality developing to 
higher levels. 
  Third, purchasing power is growing quickly. Beginning in 
1993, the state raised the wages of employees in administrative 
organs, for a projected annual increase of more than 28 billion 
yuan, which will correspondingly drive up wages for employees in 
enterprises and institutions. Meanwhile, 1994's tax-sharing 
system and internal enterprise reforms will help to arouse 
enterprise and individual initiative, correspondingly raising 
employee and individual income. This, in addition, the normal 
capital-increase factor, means that our employee incomes will 
grow more in 1994. In the fall of 1993, we had a better 
harvest, with farm and sideline industries growing very quickly, 
purchasing-fund payments better than in previous years, and 
peasant income rising steadily, which brought the beginnings of 
a rural market pickup. In 1994, the state is going to sharply 
raise purchasing prices for farm products, such as grain and 
cotton, as well as improving fund-payments in one step, so that 
peasant income will continue to grow steadily. In addition, 
peasant income from business, such as township, construction, 
and tertiary industries, will rise sharply. It is projected 
that overall cash incomes will grow a record of more than 20 
percent in 1994. 
  Fourth, we have a huge market-consumption potential. China's 
major consumer-goods market is our rural market, which accounted 
for 51.9 percent of our retail commodity sales in 1992. While 
this rural-market ratio has been declining in recent years, its 
consumer potential of 800 million peasants is enormous. For 
instance, our rural household power-usage rate is very low 
which, in addition to lower purchasing power, is due to the 
following two factors: 1) water and power are in short supply 
at high prices; 2) highway construction, communications and 
transportation, and after-sales service are lagging. But as 
peasant income rises and rural infrastructures are improved, 
peasant consumer demand, including that for large durable 
consumer goods, is bound to take a quantitative leap. 
  So our 1994 consumer-goods market demand will not "shrink," 
but rather will tend to grow. 
<H5>  2. Our Supply Climate </H5>
  1. Industrial production. Through some decades of 
development, China has established a quite complete industrial 
system, with a strong manufactured-goods production capability. 
In recent years, our industrial production has continued to 
advance at a higher rate. Meanwhile, through several years of 
structural adjustment and market-oriented reform, enterprises 
are more able to change track and retool, with a faster rate of 
product renewal and exchange, and additional effective supply of 
manufactured goods. An analytical ranking of the supply and 
demand of over 530 manufactured goods in recent years shows that 
the varieties in short supply are declining yearly, with their 
ratio down from 1991's 6 percent to 4 percent by 1993, while 
commodities in long supply or where supply and demand are 
basically balanced are increasing steadily. Our markets 
essentially no longer suffer from commodity shortages due to 
production-capability problems, so that our market goods supply 
is fully ensured. 
  2. Agricultural production. As our output of farm 
products, such as grain, cotton, and edible oil, has been 
fluctuating for two consecutive years, their 1994 production 
and market condition remains not optimistic. This is due 
mainly to: 1) The price scissors between industrial goods and 
agricultural products have grown steadily in the last two years, 
dampening peasant cultivation initiative. In addition, all sorts 
of development zones and urban construction projects have been 
crowding out cultivated land, so that our area sown to farm 
products is in a declining trend. 2) Our 1994 yields of grain, 
cotton, edible oil, meat, and sugar are all down to varying 
degrees, which will have a sharp impact on 1994 market supplies. 
The center is paying great attention to this, having taken a 
series of steps to expand agricultural production, and going to 
sharply raise purchasing prices for staple farm products, which 
will certainly increase peasant income. These steps will 
arouse peasant initiative to a certain extent, promoting 
agricultural-production growth. In short, while 1994 will 
bring slighter tighter supplies of staple farm and sideline 
products, with higher prices, it will not see large-scale 
shortages. 
  3. Communications and transportation. In 1994, as no new 
railway arteries are being put into operation, our transport 
capacity will not be clearly higher, with communications and 
transportation remaining a sharp "bottleneck," and our transport 
shortage being about the same as 1993's at over 20 million tons, 
continuing to limit our national economic development. 
  In summary, analyzed from areas such as our 1994 
macroeconomic climate, our market supply and demand state, and 
our consumer mindset, our 1995 [sic] consumer goods market will 
grow steadily, with no recurrence of sharp slides or market 
slumps. 
<H5>  II. The Impact of Economic Reform on Our 1994 Consumer Goods </H5>
Market 
  In 1994, the state is going to conduct significant tax, 
banking, investment, and foreign trade reforms, which will be a 
major step in speeding up the establishment of our new socialist 
market economic system, and will be of key significance in 
making our national macroeconomic regulation and control system 
sounder, and in promoting sustained and steady national economic 
growth. These significant reform steps will also have a positive 
impact on our consumer goods market. 
  1. Tax-revenue system-reform. Our most important 1994 
reform will be the implementation of a tax-sharing system, in 
which our current local revenue package [lump-sum] system will 
be changed to separate collection for each taxable item based on 
clarifying central and local tax categories and administrative 
jurisdiction, with the establishment of separate central and 
local tax systems, to change the current steady drop in central 
revenues and weakening macroeconomic regulation and control 
capability, in order to ensure a steady increase in central 
financial might. 
  This tax-sharing system will have positive impacts on 
markets. 
  A. It will help to reduce fiscal deficits and ease 
inflationary pressures. In recent years, the "separate revenue 
systems" have caused a steady drop in central revenues, with the 
central ratio of all national revenue down from 1981's 57 
percent to 38 percent by 1992. These yearly growing central 
fiscal deficits and annual revenue overdrafts from the central 
bank have sharpened inflationary pressures. State-planned 
priority construction projects are often not completed on 
schedule due to limited financial might and funding shortages. 
Statistics show that the fund-shortage rate for China's 
priority construction projects is now about 30 percent, leaving 
the construction of key domestic infrastructures lagging far 
behind our national economic development needs, with sharper 
"bottleneck" limitations, and blocked commodity circulation. 
So the tax-sharing reform will gradually increase central 
financial might, reducing deficits and easing inflationary 
pressures. 
  B. It will help to weaken local protectionism, to speed up 
commodity-circulation development and the formation of a 
nationally uniform market. One of the defects of the separate 
revenue systems is that they reinforce local protectionism. 
Duplicate construction by all areas makes economic structures 
too similar, and rampant local protectionism obstructs 
commodity-circulation development. So tax sharing will 
strengthen central regulation and control capability, while 
weakening local protectionism, as well as strengthening local 
concepts about the overall situation, while ensuring the 
implementation of national industrial-development policy. 
  C. The imposition of a uniform tax rate will contribute to 
equal competition among state, collective, and individual 
commerce. As to state-owned commerce, the new tax system will 
lower the overall tax rate for state-owned commercial 
enterprises from the current rate and somewhat reduce aftertax 
profit payments to the state, playing a positive role in 
lightening the burden on state commerce, adding accumulation, 
increasing sales, improving the state of unequal competition 
with private and collective commerce, and gradually reversing 
longstanding losses. 
  2. Financial-system reform. This reform's priorities will be 
to ensure that the central bank exercises an independent 
monetary policy, by strengthening its overall regulation and 
control of the money supply, in order to maintain currency 
stability; to separate policy banking from commercial banking, 
in order to overcome the current financial chaos caused by 
specialized banks being responsible for both functions; to 
develop plural-equity nonbank financial institutions, credit 
agencies, and all sorts of investment, insurance, and securities 
companies, in order to gradually set up an open and orderly 
money-market system. These financial reforms will contribute as 
follows. A) They will help to stabilize the value of the 
currency. Our overall money-supply damper will use the method 
prevalent in developed Western countries of independent 
central-bank regulation and control, which will help to change 
our past state of repeated credit expansion due to the policy 
factor, elminate the system factors that induce inflation, 
stabilize our inflation rate at a lower level, and thus preserve 
stability of consumer mindset over a longer term. B) They 
will help the banking sector to clarify obligations, by 
separating policy from business. The policy bank will aim at 
breaking even or earning tiny profits, to exercise state policy 
operations, while commercial banks will be liable for their own 
profits, losses, and risks, to prevent unchecked credit 
activities. C) They will contribute to the establishment of a 
developed money market. Through valid forms such as financing 
and borrowing, enterprises will expand their funding sources, 
which will ease the longstanding fund shortages of circulation 
enterprises, to enhance enterprise operating flexibility. 
  3. Investment-system reform. This will be mainly the 
establishment of investment-restraint mechanisms for enterprise 
corporations, so that investment subjects make their own 
decisions and are liable for their own risks. This will help to 
change the past situation of disregard for qualifications, 
competition to start projects, and unchecked expansion of the 
investment scale, to put enterprise investment scale and 
structure on a scientific and feasible basis, as well as 
ensuring that investment subjects and commercial banks are each 
liable for their respective risks, in order to ensure investment 
economic efficiency. As these investment-restraint forces are 
gradually established, there will be no recurrence of the real 
national investment scale exceeding plans to reach 350 billion 
yuan as in 1993, with elimination of the vicious system-cycle of 
investment impulse and expansion--leading to a sharp rise in 
investment-product prices--causing consumption expansion and 
price rises--resulting in retrenchment, to maintain stable 
market development. 
  4. Foreign trade system-reform. This will involve mainly 
putting the official exchange rate on track with the 
market-conversion rate, expanding enterprise foreign-trade 
operating authority, eliminating the method of foreign trade 
enterprises turning over foreign exchange to the state either 
with or without compensation, abolishing import licensing, 
reducing quota restrictions, and gradually lowering tariffs. 
These reform steps will contribute as follows: A) They will 
help to further speed up our opening to the outside world, 
expanding our foreign trade, and bringing into full play the 
supplementation and regulation role of international and 
domestic markets. B) They will help to promote the merging of 
international and domestic markets, improving the current 
isolation of domestic-trade enterprises from the international 
market, helping to resolve the current conflict of manufactured 
goods being in long supply with some products being 
slow-selling, and helping domestic-trade enterprises to 
understand international trends to reduce import costs, in order 
to make domestic markets more prosperous and brisk. 
Market-converted foreign exchance now accounts for 80 percent of 
our foreign-exchange usage. As this has become the key means 
of foreign-trade operation for domestic enterprises, the 
merging of foreign exchange onto a single track will not have a 
sharp impact on ordinary consumer goods prices. Rather, as 
tariffs will be lower, it will help to lower imported-commodity 
prices to promote consumption. 
<H5>  III. A Consumer Goods Market Projection for 1994 </H5>
  Based on this overall analysis of our 1994 macroeconomic 
climate and our economic-system development, China's consumer 
goods market will maintain a stable-growth trend, neither 
"slumping" nor "overheating." 
  1. Commodity sales will remain overall stable. We project 
1994 retail commodity sales of 1.6 trillion yuan, up 20 percent 
from 1993 and, adjusted for inflation, up a real approximately 7 
percent. This includes retail sales for consumer goods of 
1.455 trillion yuan, up 21.5 percent, and for agricultural 
capital goods of 145 billion yuan, up 10 percent. Our rural 
markets will continue in a rebound trend, with some briskness in 
the midst of general stability. 
  2. Prices will rise considerably. The rapid rise in prices 
in 1993 will have a considerable lagging impact on 1994 prices. 
Meanwhile, there will be more upward price adjustments in 
1994, with more force, in addition to spontaneous price-rise 
factors, so that we project that our 1994 retail commodity 
prices will rise less [sic] than in 1993. 
  3. By commodity category: a) Food commodities. Overall sales 
will be more stable. Staple farm products, such as grain, 
cotton, edible oil, meat, and sugar, will be in general short 
supply, with prices up considerably. Sales will be 
increasingly brisk for new foods that suit comtemporary 
lifestyles, characterized by convenience, fast, nutritional, 
and health foods. b) Clothing commodities. All clothing sales 
will be brisk, mostly of medium grade, with sales of expensive 
clothing growing steadily, but markets for cheap clothing 
increasingly narrow. Sales will remain brisk for all sorts of 
Western clothing, T-shirts, jackets, wool, and woolen textiles, 
with better sales of new and distinctive styles. 
Outer-clothing sales will be comparatively stable. Sales of 
knitted cotton goods will gradually improve due to low prices, 
practicality, and higher demand by low- and middle-income 
consumers. c) Daily-use commodities. Sales will be stable but 
slack at lower prices for expensive large durable consumer 
goods, such as color TVs, refrigerators, and washing machines, 
due to a high urban-household use rate, more production than 
demand, lower import tariffs, and sharp market competition, 
while air conditioner sales will be stable but rising, with 
consumers choosing more brand-name household appliances. Sales 
will be brisk for smaller household-appliance market goods, such 
as humidifiers, electric heaters, water heaters, oil and smoke 
intake fans, microwave ovens, and home computers. Sales will 
continue to flourish for interior-decoration items due to 
commercial-housing development. Cosmetics and detergents will 
see quite brisk sales, with volume stable but rising. 
  4. Income levels will widen, with consumer pluralization 
tending to grow clearer. In recent years, income levels have 
been increasingly widening. Statistics show that there are now 
over 2 million high-income families throughout China with 
incomes of more than 100,000 yuan a year. This disparity is 
predicted to grow somewhat in the short-term. Urban consumers 
will continue to seek out brand-name, excellent, new, and 
specialty commodities, with a prominence of one-step consumer 
behavior, commodity consumption fields expanding, and no 
recurrence of the phenomenon of rivalry to buy a few 
commodities. Rural consumers will generally seek out mostly 
cheap and practical goods, with their consumption ratio 
continuing to rise for clothing and daily-use commodities, and 
consumption levels and structures for families in developed 
regions increasingly approaching those of urban residents. 
  5. Purchasing power diversification will continue to grow. 
Spending in 1994 will continue to grow for noncommodity items, 
such as housing, health care, insurance, education, tourism, and 
recreation; the steady growth of stock and bond markets will 
absorb a lot of money; banks' high-interest-rate policy will 
make savings continue to rise steadily. The pluralization trend 
in the consumer spending structure will grow more conspicuous. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20396 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar025___94004" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-025 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  28 January 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> NATIONAL AFFAIRS, POLICY </F>
<H3> <TI>   Roundup Views Potential GATT Impact on Economy </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Roundup Views Potential GATT Impact on Economy </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94CE0357A Beijing JINGJI LILUN YU JINGJI GUANLI [ECONOMIC 
THEORY AND BUSINESS MANAGEMENT] in Chinese No 1, 28 Jan 94 </F>



<TEXT>
77-80, 29 
<F P=103> 94CE0357A </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing JINGJI LILUN YU JINGJI GUANLI [ECONOMIC 
THEORY AND BUSINESS MANAGEMENT] </F>

<F P=105>  Chinese </F>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Wang Hongxing, affiliated with the Construction </F>
Bank of Hengyang City, Hunan Province: "A Roundup of Discussions 
of Return to GATT and the Chinese Economy"--edited by Xing 
Bochun] 
  [Text] I. The Impact of the Return to GATT on 
Enterprises of Our Country and Measures To Deal With It 
  A. Challenges Enterprises of Our Country Will Face 
  1. Under the principles of the elimination of quantitative 
restrictions and of trade liberalization, it will be necessary 
to limit the use of, or eliminate such things as quotas and 
import and export licenses; as a result our country's import 
system will undergo significant changes. Our country has 
committed herself to reduce the use of import licenses by 
two-thirds and to terminate the import regulation tax within the 
next three years; eliminating and reducing nontariff barriers 
are certain to weaken our country's trade protection measures. 
(Footnote 1: The Legal Rule Formulation Office of the Legal 
System Bureau of the State Council, "The Great Significance of 
the Return to the GATT to Our Country's Economic Life," JIAGE 
LILUN YU SHIJIAN Apr 93) All this will result in our country's 
enterprises facing a harsher external environment for business 
operations. 
  2. "The resumption of GATT membership" may make consumption 
structure mature too soon, a development which may hamper the 
upgrading of China's industrial structure. In the 1980s, the 
strong disruptive effects and demonstration effects produced by 
imported durable consumer goods constituted the factor which 
induced industrial structure to become more based on light 
industry. To improve the overall quality of the economy and 
increase overall national capabilities so as to create a solid 
foundation for achieving the strategic objectives for the middle 
part of the next century, China must immediately start efforts 
to upgrade her industrial structure, and must change her 
industrial structure from centering on heavy industry into 
centering on light industry. With regard to this issue, China is 
faced with the likely negative effects produced by "the 
resumption of GATT membership." "The resumption of GATT 
membership" will inevitably result in substantial increases in 
imports. After "the resumption of GATT membership," with the 
weakening of trade protection, China's consumer goods market, 
especially the market for large, durable consumer goods, will 
become a place of competition among the signatories. According 
to forecasts, once foreign durable consumer goods are imported 
in large quantities, urban consumption first of all will be 
stimulated. A contradiction will therefore emerge: On the one 
hand, the upgrading of industrial structure requires that mainly 
the capital- and technology-intensive industries, chiefly heavy 
and chemical industries, be developed, and those industries need 
a great deal of capital input; on the other hand, the main 
sources of capital formation in China now are residents' savings 
and fund raising of various forms, but the upgrading of 
consumption will siphon off a substantial part of residents' 
savings. Thus the upgrading of industrial structure can be 
hampered by inadequate capital formation. (Footnote 2: Zhao 
Lingyun, "Four Major Challenges Posed by the Return to the GATT 
on the Chinese Economy," GUOJI JINGMAO TANSUO Jan 93) 
  3. The exporting of competitive products is very likely to 
cause antidumping problems. Under the GATT's general principles, 
the signatories may adopt tariff protection policies against 
imports. After "the resumption of GATT membership," our country 
can use this method to protect domestic infant industries; 
Western developed countries can also use this method to restrict 
exports from our country. This will be a major problem our 
country will face in regard to exports after "the resumption of 
GATT membership." It will be difficult to set appropriate prices 
for some of our country's products which sell well on the 
international market; as a result such products are prone to be 
subjected to antidumping tariffs imposed by developed countries 
in order to restrict imports from China. Such a development can 
adversely affect competitive exports from our country. (Footnote 
3: An Furen, "The Impact of Joining the GATT on Our Country's 
Economy and the Challenges Our Country's Economy Will Face As a 
Result," CAIJING WENTI YANJIU (Dalian) Jan 93) 
  4. The expanding of the scope of protection of intellectual 
property rights will result in some domestic enterprises paying 
high licensing fees. As some developed countries are 
significantly superior in the areas of science and technology, 
techniques, name-brand trademarks, artistic and literary works, 
computer software, etc, expanding the scope of protection of 
intellectual property rights is doubtless in accord with the 
wishes of those countries. As enterprises of our country will 
have to incur a great deal of expenditures on many patent 
licenses and purchase patents from Western developed countries 
legally, there will be increases in their production costs and a 
decline in the competitiveness of their products on the 
international market. (Footnote 4: Yang Pengcheng, "The Impact 
of the Return to the GATT on the Business World of Our Country," 
QIYEJIA TIANDI Jan 93) 
  5. Under the condition of the granting of market access, the 
technology-intensive, capital-intensive, and knowledge-intensive 
products of our country will face the challenge posed by the 
fierce competition from manufactures imported from foreign 
countries. For a long time, under the protection of high import 
tariffs, our country has followed the import substitution 
strategy with regard to technology-intensive, capital-intensive, 
and knowledge-intensive products, neglecting the introduction of 
foreign things and giving excessive emphasis to having things 
produced domestically. Consequently, some technology-intensive, 
capital-intensive, and knowledge-intensive products and 
industries of our country, such as passenger cars, electronic 
products, chemical products, and high-grade textiles and the 
industries producing those products, are not competitive on the 
international market. After "the resumption of GATT membership," 
disruptive impacts of imports on the domestic market will be 
unavoidable because of the reduction in administrative 
intervention and the opening of the domestic market. According 
to estimates, after "the resumption of GATT membership," there 
will be direct disruptive effects on industries whose output 
value accounts for approximately one-third of the total value of 
industrial output. If the degree of connectedness between 
industries is also taken into consideration, the prospective 
impact should be considered to be very extensive. (Footnote 5: 
Chen Jiaqin, "The Impact of the Resumption of GATT Membership' 
on Our Import and Export Trade and Measures To Deal With It," 
GUOJI MAOYI Sep 93) 
  B. Measures Our Country's Enterprises Should Adopt To 
Deal With the Impact 
  1. Several measures to improve the quality of our country's 
products so as to make them more competitive. a) Do a good job 
of selecting pillar industries and leading products, bringing 
about the progress and improvement of all industrial products. 
In view of realities in the world and in our country, it is 
proper to consider making the microelectronic and information 
industries the pillar industries of our country, making 
energetic efforts to support them and develop them on a priority 
basis, linking them up with the information system, automation 
system, and machinery industry system, and making applications 
in the hundreds of thousands of enterprises of our country. Such 
developments will be certain to speed up the technological 
progress of our country's enterprises and improve enterprises' 
management standards, thereby fundamentally resolving the 
widespread problems of poor product quality, small product 
variety, high costs, and low output in enterprises. b) 
Accelerate enterprise reform, completing the thorough 
transformation of enterprises' operating mechanisms as soon as 
possible. The basic condition for making enterprises transform 
their operating mechanisms is the transformation of enterprises 
into actors engaged in market competition. First, separate 
government from enterprises and have enterprises truly acquire 
the statuses as commodity producers and business operators and 
as market actors. Second, it is necessary to build and perfect 
the domestic market as soon as possible, making the domestic 
market a unified, open, and comprehensive market based on fair 
competition. Finally, make enterprises enter the market, 
thoroughly transforming their operating mechanisms. All this 
demands that accelerated supporting reforms of the systems 
regulating foreign trade, finance, materials, investment, 
prices, technological renovation, foreign exchange, etc., be 
carried out, so that after the transformation enterprises' new 
operating mechanisms can be used in practice and play their 
role. c) Accelerate the development of new products, using 
high-quality new products in efforts to occupy and expand 
market. First, it is necessary to form "scientific 
research-development-production complexes" in backbone 
enterprises or enterprise groups, directly turning achievements 
of scientific and technological research and applied 
technologies into new physical products, and carrying out mass 
production of those products. Second, with regard to the 
approach to new product development, it is necessary to mainly 
depend on one's own research, and to use technology introduction 
and technological cooperation as supplementary means, combining 
the two approaches. Lastly, carry out the technological 
transformation of enterprises on the basis of revolving around 
the development of new products and variety development. d) Make 
active efforts to adopt international standards so as to 
increase the international competitiveness of our country's 
products. The standards of products reflect the technological 
standards, labor quality, and management standards involved. 
Moving our national standards toward international standards as 
fast as possible and making enterprises directly adopt 
international standards have also become urgent tasks. e) Reform 
enterprises' wage system, making employees more inclined to care 
about product quality. On the one hand, educate employees on 
quality in a more vigorous manner, and raise employees' quality 
awareness; on the other hand, have wages linked to product 
quality. (Footnote 6: Liu Mingshun, "Several Measures to Improve 
the Quality and Competitiveness of Our Country's Products After 
Our Country's Resumption of Her Status As a GATT Signatory 
Member," BEIJING SHANG XUEYUAN XUEBAO Mar 93) 
  2. Change enterprises' organizational form, so as to make 
them capable of competing with foreign enterprises. a) Organize 
enterprise groups, so as to make it easier to give play to 
overall strengths, to create returns to scale, and to stimulate 
fund accumulation and vertical and horizontal financing; in 
addition, group economic activities are equipped with huge 
fund-gathering capability and multiple fund-gathering channels, 
a fact which is conducive to the concentration of production and 
funds. Enterprise groups are capable of organizing and 
conducting researches regarding the development of new products, 
and are therefore able to proceed with technological renovation 
and transformation. Enterprise groups are capable of taking 
risks and competing with foreign companies, and are therefore 
both more capable of attracting foreign capital and capable of 
developing abroad. Currently, our country's enterprise groups 
are small in scale. Local governments should emancipate their 
minds, and break down vertical and horizontal barriers; they 
should adopt policies tilted in favor of enterprises with 
potentials and good prospects and invigorate those enterprises 
on a priority basis, and should merge small and medium-sized 
enterprises with low efficiency and concentrate funds on using 
technology to tap their latent capability. b) Adopt the joint 
stock system. The joint stock system is tied to socialized large 
production. The joint stock system clarifies ownership rights 
over assets, so that enterprise employees' status as masters 
will become explicit and concrete. For now, correctly leading 
residents to move toward stock and bond trading so as to turn 
consumption funds into production funds also constitutes an 
effective way to increase funds. (Footnote 7: Wang Chuanrong and 
Li Huimin, "A Preliminary Discussion of How Some Enterprises of 
Our Country Should Meet the Challenge Posed by Joining the 
GATT,'" SHANDONG CAIZHENG XUEYUAN XUEBAO Feb 93) 
  3. Effectively use a flexible tariff system or differential 
tariffs to protect national industry. At present, for developed 
countries, tariffs no longer constitute a powerful means of 
trade protection, but developing countries can still protect 
their domestic industry very effectively by using the flexible 
tariff system approved by the GATT. While lowering the overall 
tariff level, it is necessary to adopt flexible differential 
tariffs in view of the differences in the level of technological 
development of different industries and the differences in the 
competitiveness of different products of a given industry. It is 
necessary to carry out little or no reduction in tariffs applied 
to industries and products which are being developed 
domestically, such as products of the electronic, chemical, and 
medical supply industries. It is proper to substantially reduce 
the tariffs applied to industries and products with regard to 
which our country enjoys rather high technological standards and 
is very competitive, such as textiles, clothing, light industry 
products, and toys. (Footnote 8: She Jianzhi, "The Advantages 
and Disadvantages of Our Country's Return to the GATT and 
Measures to Deal With the Issue," JINGJI WENTI Feb 93) 
  4. Conscientiously study and consult various countries' 
successful experience regarding nontariff trade-protection 
measures, in an effort to develop our national industry. a) 
Government's necessary intervention in international economics 
and trade is indispensable; b) endeavoring to maintain a low 
restriction on market shares of imports; c) in order to prevent 
being controlled by foreign enterprises, some countries prohibit 
foreign enterprises from carrying out any direct investment in 
some sectors; d) enforcing strict technological standards and 
safety and health laws and regulations; e) support provided by 
the fiscal and financial policies of the government; f) the 
policy of having things produced domestically; and g) organizing 
customs unions and free trade areas, thereby exercising trade 
protection based on having blocs of states serving as the actors. 
  5. Seek better conditions for entering the international 
market and for acquiring advanced technologies by making use of 
the GATT. At the present moment, to different extent all the 
major developed industrial countries are imposing conditions or 
restrictions on giving our country the most-favored-nation 
treatment, imposing discriminatory quantitative restrictions on 
our country, applying unjustifiable antidumping measures against 
our country in an inappropriate manner, and controlling 
technological exports to our country. After "the resumption of 
GATT membership," our country can try to gradually eliminate 
those discriminatory trade conducts and barriers under the 
relevant provisions of the GATT. (Footnote 9: Yang Taishan, "The 
Impact of the Return to the GATT on Our Country's Enterprises," 
QIYEJIA (Wuhan) No 23, 92) 
  6. Organize production and marketing in accordance with 
international rules and practices. In the process of taking part 
in the international division of labor in a comprehensive 
manner, our country's enterprises should observe international 
practices. For example, they should pay attention to compensated 
use, special-purpose use, and regional and scope restrictions in 
regard to the introducing, utilizing, and purchasing of patents, 
trademarks, copyrights, etc. Enterprises should clear up matters 
of intellectual property rights involving foreign works, 
technologies, trademarks, and patents which they are now 
copying, reproducing, or use without compensation. As another 
example, those enterprises which have long been competing on the 
basis of low prices should analyze their products' share of a 
given market and their price ratios to comparable foreign 
products; if the share is too large, it would be necessary to 
try to reduce the concentration, for otherwise such a situation 
can cause damage law suits and antidumping investigations. 
(Footnote 10: Zhou Saiqin, "The Impact of the Resumption of GATT 
Membership on Our Country's Industry," JINGJI WENTI TANSUO Mar 
93) 
<H5>  II. The Impact of the Return to the GATT on Domestic Prices </H5>
in Our Country and Measures to Deal With It 
  A. Impact on Domestic Prices in Our Country 
  Some comrades believe that "the resumption of GATT 
membership" will have a large impact on the general price level 
on the domestic market. From a short-term perspective, prices 
will decline on the domestic market. With the accelerated reform 
of our country's foreign trade system, tariffs are gradually 
becoming the main means of regulating imports and exports. With 
the further opening of the domestic market, high-quality, 
low-price products from the international market are more likely 
to enter the market of our country, thereby bringing about 
decreases in prices of comparable domestically produced 
products. On the other hand, as required by the GATT, our 
country's tariff level had to be appropriately lowered, and as a 
result selling prices for some imports on the domestic market 
will decline. All this will help alleviate supply and demand 
contradictions, and will thus suppress inflation, thereby 
contributing to effectively maintaining relative stability of 
the general price level on the market. From a long-term 
perspective, it will be more difficult to maintain the basic 
stability of the general price level on the market. a) Under the 
traditional system, our country has been a low-price country. 
After the resumption of GATT membership, the domestic price 
level will move toward the price level on the international 
market, leading to price increases. b) With the economy becoming 
more externally oriented, the supply and demand relationships on 
the international market and the resultant price fluctuations 
will both directly affect the supply and demand balance and 
prices for materials in our country. c) With the reform of the 
foreign exchange system, downward exchange-rate adjustments' 
role of encouraging exports and inhibiting imports will be 
strengthened; increases in purchasing prices for goods for 
export will bring about some increases in prices for comparable 
goods sold domestically. Therefore it is necessary to establish 
a new set of effective mechanisms for suppressing inflation. 
(Footnote 11: Sun Quan and Zhang Xianbin, "The Impact of the 
Resumption of GATT Membership' on Domestic Prices and Measures 
to Deal With It," JIAGE LILUN YU SHIJIAN Apr 93) 
  Some other comrades believe that after "the resumption of 
GATT membership" the domestic general price level's basic 
tendency to increase amid general stability will be determined 
by the following several situations. a) Price increases caused 
by the expansion of the scope of market regulation of prices 
will be hampered by such factors as the opening of the domestic 
market and the intensification of market competition. According 
to estimates, after the scope of market regulation of prices is 
expanded, prices for energy and raw materials will rise to some 
extent, and prices for factors of production will also rise, but 
because of competition the manufacturing sector will be forced 
to absorb such price increases; thus prices for manufactures and 
consumer goods can remain basically stable, and the domestic 
general price level will not be markedly affected by the two 
factors. b) Import tariff concessions and the downward 
adjustments of renminbi [RMB] exchange rates are also two 
mutually constraining factors. c) The price-raising effects of 
protection of intellectual property rights will also be 
cancelled out by the acceleration of technological progress. 
Consequently, after "the resumption of GATT membership," the 
domestic general price level will neither fall substantially nor 
rise substantially. It will show a tendency to rise amid general 
stability. (Footnote 12: Zhang Qian, "A Preliminary Analysis of 
the Impact of the Resumption of GATT Membership' on the Domestic 
General Price Level," GUOJI MAOYI WENTI Jun 93) 
  According to another view, in the process of development as 
well as reform and opening up, an economically backward country 
will see large increases in its price level, or even 
hyperinflation. As far as international factors are concerned, 
the spread of international inflation into a country represents 
a necessary law. It can spread through many means such as 
foreign trade, foreign capital, foreign debts, and exchange rate 
devaluation; it can also spread from the coastal regions to the 
hinterland. As yuan may not be taken abroad, international 
inflation can spread to the country, but domestic inflation 
cannot spread abroad. All this shows that in the process of 
opening up, our country's price level will inevitably rise until 
it is the same as the price level on the international market. 
By increasing the openness of our country, "the resumption of 
GATT membership" is certain to accelerate the rising of domestic 
prices. (Footnote 13: Yang Fan, "The Impact of the Return to the 
GATT on Prices in Our Country," GUOJI MAOYI WENTI Feb 93) 
  Some comrades have also analyzed the defects of the 
traditional price system. As they have pointed out, except for a 
few commodities, the international and domestic price systems 
have been basically disconnected for a long time; "the 
resumption of GATT membership" will surely have disruptive 
effects on the domestic price system. First, in terms of the 
price level, the lowering of tariffs and the reform of the 
domestic tax and fee system will result in the price level 
falling somewhat; but reforms regarding the dual-track yuan 
exchange rate system and the foreign-exchange distribution 
system will lead to increases in the domestic price level, and 
especially the further downward adjustment of yuan exchange 
rates will result in increases in prices for goods for export; 
enterprises will spend more on debt serving, resulting in 
increases in costs, and the purchasing prices for goods for 
export will also rise accordingly; increases in fees for 
foreigner-related services will also bring about increases in 
some related fees. Second, there will be further adjustments of 
price structure. Prices for some goods which are too high or too 
low domestically will gradually move toward prices on the 
international market. With the development of international 
service trade and because of the demand of the development of 
tertiary industry in our country, service fees will be 
substantially increased. (Footnote 14: Ma Song, "The Impact of 
the Resumption of GATT Membership on Prices in China and 
Thoughts on Measures to Deal With It," JIAGE LILUN YU SHIJIAN 
Jun 93) 
  B. Price Reform Measures Which Should Be Adopted To 
Deal With the Impact 
  1. In accordance with the demands of the socialist market 
economy, accelerate the transformation of the price-forming 
mechanism and establish a pricing mechanism based mainly on 
market regulation of prices. In the future, on the one hand, it 
is necessary to supplement and perfect the pricing measures 
regarding the production materials, light industry products, and 
agricultural products for which prices have been decontrolled, 
truly giving enterprises the right to set prices; on the other 
hand, gradually decontrol, in batches and by stages, prices of 
products which are suitable for being decontrolled and of which 
conditions for decontrolling are basically ready, such as prices 
for grain and some production materials as well as fees for some 
social and business services. (Footnote 15: Gao Tiesheng and 
Zhang Xuehong, "The GATT and Price Reform in Our Country," 
JINGJI LILUN YU JINGJI GUANLI May 93) 
  2. Accelerate and deepen price reform. a) Accelerate the 
price reform related to prices for imports and exports. b) 
Accelerate the price reform related to factors of production, so 
as to stimulate the flow and factors of production and the 
growth of the factor market. Especially, it is necessary to 
accelerate the reform of prices for input of factors of 
production relating to imports and exports. c) Accelerate the 
reform of tertiary industry prices. d) Introduce market-economy 
countries' effective pricing methods and principles which are 
conducive to market competition, and reform the pricing methods 
and principles which do not meet the demands of international 
competition and a market economy. e) On the basis of referring 
to practices in market-economy countries, establish and perfect 
our country's socialist-market-economy system of the state's 
macro-level price administration, regulation, and control. f. 
Enhance the investigating and research involved in the price 
decisions made by enterprises, especially large- and 
medium-sized enterprises, strengthen enterprises' internal price 
management, give emphasis to the gathering of price information, 
train price workers, etc. (Footnote 16: Ma Song, "The Impact of 
the Resumption of GATT Membership' on Prices in China and 
Thoughts on Measures to Deal With It," JIAGE LILUN YU SHIJIAN 
Jun 93) 
  3. Transform the function of price work, and improve price 
management, so as to meet new demands. a) Broaden the horizon, 
and emancipate the mind; establish the concept of large market 
and the concept of the international market; and enhance the 
analysis of dynamics of the international market, and study the 
links between the domestic and international markets and the 
impacts of the domestic and international markets on each other, 
making such analysis and study one of the preconditions for 
handling price work. b) Perfect price laws, regulations, and 
methods, reduce direct administrative intervention, and use laws 
and policies to regulate enterprises' pricing behavior and to 
guide the functioning of the market, so as to make sure that the 
situation is in accord with internationally followed principles. 
c) Guide efforts to establish industrywide price consultation 
organizations, which will coordinate the respective industries' 
prices for imports and exports. (Footnote 17: Sun Quan and Zhang 
Xianbin, "The Impact of the Resumption of GATT Membership' on 
Domestic Prices and Measures to Deal With It," JIAGE LILUN YU 
SHIJIAN Apr 93) 
  4. Complete the price reform mainly consisting of price 
deregulation as soon as possible. As a comparison of the price 
structure of our country's products with that of the 
international market would show, prices for industrial products 
and capital-intensive products of our country are too high, 
whereas prices for primary products and labor-intensive products 
of our country are obviously too low. In terms of our country's 
tariff structure, our country's nominal tariff rates for 
industrial products and capital-intensive products are high, 
whereas our country's nominal tariff rates for primary products 
and labor-intensive products are low. After the return to the 
GATT, it will mainly be tariffs on industrial products in the 
high tariff category and with values higher than on the 
international market that will be reduced; on the markets for 
such important industrial products as automobiles, machinery, 
and electric appliances, domestically produced products will be 
easily replaced by foreign goods. However, prices for primary 
products such as crude oil and coal are lower than international 
prices; thus, after "the resumption of GATT membership," those 
products will flow to the international market in large 
quantities, thereby aggravating the situation of short supply on 
the domestic resource market. Therefore, to take the initiative 
in meeting the challenge posed by "the resumption of GATT 
membership" to domestic industries, it is necessary to carry out 
the price reform mainly consisting of price deregulation, so as 
to increase as much as possible the time difference between the 
decontrolling of prices and the lowering of tariffs. In this way 
it will be possible both to give full play to prices' role in 
allocating resources and guiding production and consumption, and 
to mitigate the disruptive effects produced by the substantial 
weakening, caused by the reduction in nominal tariffs, of the 
protective effects of actual tariffs on industrial products. At 
the same time, alleviate the pressures created by tariff 
concessions on our country's industry by appropriately lowering 
RMB exchange rates some time later. (Footnote 18: Cai Sifu, "The 
Challenge Posed by Tariff Reductions to Our Country's 
Industries," ZHONGNAN CAIJING DAXUE XUEBAO Feb 93) 
<H5>  III. Challenges Posed by the Return to the GATT to Our </H5>
Country's Foreign Trade System and Measures To Deal With Them 
  A. Challenges Posed by the Return to the GATT to Our 
Country's Foreign Trade System 
  1. Increases in imports will result in enterprises facing a 
more complicated external environment. After "the resumption of 
GATT membership," with the granting of large tariff concessions 
and the weakening of nontariff barriers, the degree of openness 
of the domestic market will suddenly increase; this will 
inevitably result in increases in imports, thereby producing 
huge disruptive effects on the external business environment for 
various domestic enterprises, especially state-owned 
enterprises. Such changes in environment will center on three 
issues: a) because of imbalances between imports and exports 
caused by increases in imports, maintaining a 
balance-of-international-payments equilibrium will become a very 
prominent issue; b) changes in conditions for importing goods 
and in the composition of imports will further prompt and 
stimulate the adjustment of consumption structure, thereby 
affecting the structure of the economy as a whole and the 
equilibrium of aggregate demand and supply, and thus adopting 
effective measures to prevent a new round of inflation of 
consumption demand will also become a practical issue; and c) 
under the condition in which market access is granted, foreign 
goods will squeeze into and occupy markets in our country, 
thereby posing severe challenges to the development of domestic 
industries, especially the machinery and electric product 
industries. All this will undoubtedly create new destabilizing 
factors in the macroeconomic environment. (Footnote 19: Wang 
Shiyuan, "The Return to the GATT and the Reform of the Economic 
System of Our Country," JINGJIXUE DONGTAI, Mar 93) 
  2. The return to the GATT will produce disruptive effects on 
our country's foreign-trade management system. After "the 
resumption of GATT membership," the import management system 
will certainly be greatly simplified, and tariffs and nontariff 
barriers will certainly be reduced. The foreign-trade management 
system based on state commands and highly monopolized state 
control will be transformed into a foreign-trade management 
system based on enterprises' decentralized, independent import 
and export operations. The decentralization of foreign trade 
operations may result in efforts to export domestically produced 
products by competing in lowering their prices, a behavior 
detrimental to the trade interests of the nation. (Footnote 20: 
Li Changcai, "Opportunities and Challenges Presented by the 
Return to the GATT," JINGJI DONGTAI Feb 93) 
  3. The impact of "the resumption of GATT membership" on the 
import and export system. Currently signatories to the GATT 
believe that our country's trade barriers are excessive, a 
situation far from meeting GATT requirements. Therefore, it is 
necessary to further relax foreign exchange control, lower 
tariffs, reduce the scope of the use of import licenses, improve 
import administration and policy transparency, reduce the scope 
of plan-based management of foreign trade, grant greater 
autonomy on foreign trade operations to foreigner-involved 
enterprises, and reduce or eliminate means of subsidy such as 
export-related tax refunds. Foreign trade enterprises will also 
encounter competition from exporting enterprises at home. Thus, 
the existing foreign trade system has to be reformed accordingly. 
  4. The impact of "the resumption of GATT membership" on 
foreign trade revenues and expenditures and on the value of the 
currency. As some goods from our country are not competitive 
internationally, they cannot be exported in large quantities to 
earn foreign exchange, whereas foreign goods will pour into the 
market of our country unimpeded; as a result there will occur 
balance-of-payments deficits, forcing our country's yuan to 
devalue and yuan exchange rates to decline. Such a development 
will also produce a situation unfavorable to securing foreign 
loans, resulting in increases in borrowing costs. (Footnote 21: 
Yang Wenyan, "The Impact of the Resumption of GATT Membership on 
Our Country's Economy and Measures to Deal With It," JINGJI 
WENTI May 93) 
  5. It will be difficult to complete the fundamental reform 
of 
the foreign trade system within a short period of time. From a 
long-term perspective, the benefits "the resumption of GATT 
membership" will give our country will be fundamental in nature. 
In the near term, there will be a time lag in many areas of work 
in our country. The sudden transition from the old to the new 
system will cause some confusion in economic life, and the 
impact of the reform of the foreign trade system on other parts 
of the economic system can be described as a situation in which 
a slight move in one part may affect the situation as a whole; 
it is absolutely impossible to complete the reform in a short 
time. (Footnote 22: Li Shousheng, "A Preliminary Analysis of the 
Resumption of GATT Membership' and the Issue of Access to the 
Chinese and U.S. Markets," GUOJI MAOYI WENTI Sep 93) 
  B. Measures on Foreign Trade and Economic Relations Our 
Country Should Adopt To Deal With the Challenges 
  1. Further reform and perfect our country's existing foreign 
trade system. a. With regard to the export system: First, it is 
necessary to reduce plan-controlled goods as much as possible; 
with regard to large-volume investment goods with impacts on 
state plans and people's lives as well as goods with bearings on 
the national strategic interests, it is necessary to determine 
the specific facts and conduct measurement on specific things in 
an effort to achieve rationalization. Second, there should be 
transparency with respect to the procedures, modes, and methods 
governing the application for export licenses; give every 
enterprise qualified for application the right to be informed of 
all the aspects of the system and the procedures involved; 
simplify the elaborate procedures, reduce costs, endeavour to 
make things scientific and standardized, and reduce management 
loopholes as much as possible. At the same time, carry out 
competitive auctions, so as to increase returns on exports, 
thereby safeguarding the overall returns for the country. Third, 
further perfect foreign-trade enterprises' mechanism of 
shouldering independent responsibilities for profits and losses. 
Fourth, actively form all kinds of partnerships and joint 
ventures across the sectors and carry out all kinds of 
shareholding, mergers, and buy-out across the sectors, grant 
more production enterprises or enterprise groups the right to 
engage in import and export foreign-trade operations, and 
further diversify and decentralize foreign trade actors, so as 
to make it possible to take part in international competition in 
an effective way. b. With regard to the import system, the 
reform principles should be: establish a functioning mechanism 
which is mainly based on tariff regulation and based on having 
nontariff regulation serving as a supplement, which is 
characterized by a rational tariff level and an appropriate 
tariff structure, which contains the competition element to an 
appropriate extent, and which protects infant industries; on the 
basis of referring to the experience of some developing 
countries (areas) on structural reform and in view of the 
demands of the development of our national economy and the 
adjustment of our country's industrial structure, formulate 
annual mandatory and guidance plans on the entire country's 
imports, with the main objective being to facilitate the 
optimization of industrial structure; and, while protecting 
national industry, it is necessary to select newly emerging 
industries which are playing an important role in the 
development of the national economy and enjoy advantages in 
terms of development. (Footnote 23: Nie Wenlong, "Statements 
Made Before Our Country's Return to the GATT," DANGDAI CAIJING 
Jun 93) 
  2. Transform the function of government, further enhance the 
transparency of our country's foreign trade policy, and regulate 
foreign trade in accordance with the law. Under the condition of 
a socialist market economy, enterprises are legal entities 
carrying out business operations; government's function is 
mainly to carry out planning, coordination, supervision, and 
services, so as to create a good external environment for equal 
competition among enterprises, but government should not 
interfere in enterprises' business activities. At the same time, 
it is also necessary to emphasize that giving play to the 
market's role as the basic mechanism of allocating resources is 
not tantamount to relinquishing the state's macroeconomic 
regulation and control. (Footnote 24: Chen Jiaqin, "The Impact 
of the Resumption of GATT Membership' on Our Import and Export 
Trade and Measures to Deal With It," GUOJI MAOYI Sep 93) 
  3. Establish and perfect enterprises' mechanism of operating 
in accordance with international practices. First, deepen 
enterprise reform and transform enterprises' operating 
mechanisms. In considering issues, it is necessary to link up 
the functioning of the domestic economy with international 
economic circulations and to link up the domestic market with 
the international market; and it is necessary to focus on 
resolving the issue of carrying out business operations in 
accordance with the laws of movement of the international market 
and international practices. Proceeding from realities, 
establish joint-stock economic conglomerates in which foreign 
trade enterprises will serve as leaders and which are based on 
trade-industry, trade-agriculture, and trade-technology 
integration, or joint-stock economic conglomerates in which 
large backbone production enterprises will serve as leaders and 
which will be based on industry-trade, industry-agriculture, and 
industry-technology integration; take the initiative in actively 
participating in marketing activities on the international 
market; make enterprises turn into carrying out production and 
business operations in accordance with the standard system, 
market demand, price levels, marketing practices in the area of 
international trade; include such internationalized-operation 
targets as those on the amount of foreign exchange produced by 
exports, costs for earning foreign exchange, the rate of foreign 
exchange retrieval, and the amount of foreign exchange remitted 
in the system of targets used in enterprise accounting, so as to 
ensure the sustained, steady, and high-efficiency development of 
foreign trade. Second, actively develop market internationally, 
and promote the diversification of foreign trade. The main 
problem in our country's foreign trade is that the relevant 
market abroad is small, with around 90 percent of the exports 
being confined to such regions as North America, Hong Kong, 
Macao, and Europe. Such a situation is very far from meeting the 
demands of the development of the situation at home and abroad. 
In accordance with the principles of combining economic 
relations with trade, of unified planning, of exploiting 
strengths, and of rational distribution, closely combine export 
trade with such activities as the utilization of foreign 
capital, labor service cooperation, building projects on the 
basis of contracts, and overseas investment; create new 
breakthroughs in regard to purchasing and marketing channels, 
fund raising, market development, and approaches to business 
operations; gradually form a functioning mechanism of economic 
and trade activities which is based on a situation in which the 
economy stimulates trade, in which trade brings along the 
economy, and in which domestic and international elements are 
joined, forming a combined a force; enhance the performance of 
many functions such as sales promotion, fund raising, 
introduction of foreign things, exploratory efforts, 
coordination, service, and information; and promote the 
diversification of foreign trade. (Footnote 25: Lu Xinde, "A 
Brief Discussion of the Linking Up of Our Country's Domestic 
Market With the International Market," SHANDONG CAIZHENG XUEYUAN 
XUEBAO Feb 93) 
  4. Establish and perfect laws and regulations on imports, 
and 
replace the existing administrative regulations of various kinds 
with laws, so as to enhance the transparency of our country's 
foreign trade policy. Therefore, it is necessary to formulate 
and enact our country's Foreign Trade Law, Antidumping Law, and 
Antisubsidy Law as well as market protection measures as soon as 
possible. As the day of our country's final resumption of her 
GATT signatory status is drawing near, our country is faced with 
the prospect of foreign products pouring into the domestic 
market. As soon as preexisting administrative measures are 
terminated, they must be replaced with relevant laws to provide 
protection so as to help customs offices protect national 
industry; otherwise there will be inestimable harms to the 
implementation of the state's industrial policy and the 
development of the national economy. (Footnote 26: Li Weicheng 
and He Jing, "The Reform of Our Country's Import System and the 
Development Trends of Imports in the 1990s," GUOJI MAOYI Dec 92) 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20397 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar025___94005" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-025 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  14 February 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> PROVINCIAL </F>
<H3> <TI>   Price Rises in 1994 Forecast </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Price Rises in 1994 Forecast </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94CE0370B Beijing ZHONGHUA DISAN CHANYE BAO in Chinese 14 
Feb 94 p 2 </F>

<F P=103> 94CE0370B </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing ZHONGHUA DISAN CHANYE BAO </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Zhang De (1728 1795): "How Much Will Prices Rise </F>
This Year"] 
  [Text] An authoritative national agency predicts that the 
main features in the price situation in 1994 will be about the 
same as during the past two years, namely high economic growth 
and price reforms will continue to be the main causes of price 
rises. 
  The source predicts that the 1994 price index will remain 
generally the same or be slightly lower than in 1993. An 
approximately 13 percent rise is predicted. This means that it 
will not be less than two digits, and will not very likely 
exceed 15 percent. If the economic growth rate is nine percent, 
this will not have too strong an impact on economic life. So 
long as no great ups and downs occur in the operation of the 
economy, the degree of increase in prices will be tolerable. 
  Persons concerned feel that there are more favorable factors 
in the price situation in 1994 than in 1993. The situation may 
be looked at from the following several angles: 
  First, the intensity of price reform has diminished. The 
degree and range of decontrol of prices for both means of 
livelihood and means of production is already substantial in 
China's pricing system. Although some price reform measures may 
continue to be inaugurated during 1994, the effect will be less 
than in 1993. 
  Second the degree of opening of China's markets to the 
outside world will continue to expand in 1994. This is 
particularly true of means of production markets. To a certain 
extent, this will help international market resources keep in 
check the overly high degree of rise in means of production 
prices, thereby stabilizing China's markets. 
  Third, the situation in means of livelihood markets suggests 
continuation of a pattern of supply being greater than demand. 
This will help hold down price rises attributable to panic 
buying, and it will also help restrain cost-driven currency 
inflation. 
  Conversely, unfavorable factors may also appear in the 
following several regards: 
  First, a fairly large amount of currency was issued in 1993, 
and forecasts call for no marked weakening of this trend during 
1994. This may exert a certain amount of demand pull on market 
prices. 
  Second, prices of transportation, energy, and raw and 
processed materials have risen greatly during the past two 
years, spurring a rise in costs, thereby increasing market 
pressures in 1994. 
  Third, the merging of the two different exchange rates in 
1994 may give rise to price rise factors to a certain extent. 
  Fourth, main agricultural products are in relatively short 
supply today. Prices of staple and non-staple foods may exhibit 
a rising trend in 1994. 
  Overall, the overall price level in 1994 will be limited by 
overall social supply and demand and the market environment. If 
the double digit economic growth rate of 1993 is to be 
maintained, the government will have no choice but to increase 
credit. Reportedly, a finance and banking conference decided 
that all banks in the nation must rigorously control total 
credit in 1994 at below 4.5 trillion yuan. This total may not be 
exceeded. 
  The state has made control of currency inflation and 
maintenance of sustained, steady, rapid, and healthy economic 
development its economic development plan for 1994. It was on 
this basis that a few days ago the State Council stated the 
present need to intensify macroeconomic regulation and control, 
increase control over prices, and not permit prices to rise at 
will. Otherwise, not only will the standard of the living of 
both city and countryside residents be hurt, but this could 
trigger overall instability. 
  Given the not insignificant current "inflation rate," there 
is ample reason for having confidence that the nation's existing 
macroeconomic regulation and control measures will be effective. 
This is because the forecasts of an authoritative source 
suggests that the income of Chinese residents used to pay living 
expenses will still be higher than the degree of rise caused by 
currency inflation. 
  However, it is hoped that this result can be realized. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20398 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar025___94006" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-025 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  1 March 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> FINANCE, BANKING </F>
<H3> <TI>   New Tax System Now Under `Normal Operation' </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    New Tax System Now Under `Normal Operation' </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94CE0389B Beijing JINGJI RIBAO in Chinese 1 Mar 94 p 2 </F>
<F P=103> 94CE0389B </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing JINGJI RIBAO </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Ding Jianming (0002 1017 6900): "The First Two </F>
Months of the New Tax System"] 
  [Text] Beginning on 1 January 1994, China has fully 
reformed our industrial-commercial [business] tax system, with 
the new substance being mostly the flow and income tax systems. 
As the new tax system has now been in effect for nearly two 
months, all areas are reporting that it has successfully entered 
a state of normal operation, having made a basically smooth 
transition. 
  Since the NPC Standing Committee approved the new individual 
income tax law on 30 October 1993, the State Council has 
published interim regulations on the six taxes of value added, 
consumption [excise], business, enterprise income, land value 
added, and resource. By now, except for the detailed 
implementation rules and regulations for the land value added 
tax, the application regulations and detailed application rules 
and regulations on the other of the six tax categories have been 
published and put into effect. Most recently, the State Council 
has issued another circular, deciding to abolish the rural 
market transaction, livestock transaction, cooking oil special, 
bonus, and wage reconciliation taxes, and to devolve authority 
to lower administrative levels for the animal-slaughtering and 
banquet taxes, showing that the major substance of China's 
overall tax-reform plans, particularly the reform measures on 
key tax categories, is in full effect. Revenue reform is the 
focus of China's current overall related reforms, with tax 
reform being the "priority focus" of revenue reform. This smooth 
implementation of the new tax system is providing solid grounds 
for the accelerated establishment of China's socialist market 
economy. 
  As this tax reform is comprehensive, overall, and structural 
reform, involving an adjustment of the interests of every 
enterprise and individual, it is harder, more full of conflict, 
and subject to great risk if not done well. The Party Central 
Committee and State Council have paid great attention to this 
tax reform, with the State Council leadership personally guiding 
the work and repeatedly providing key instructions. To ensure 
the smooth implementation of this tax reform, tax department 
cadres and employees at all levels have done much work. 
Beginning in October 1993, tax organs at all levels have 
conducted training work in many forms for the large numbers of 
tax cadres and enterprise factory directors, managers, 
accountants, taxhandlers, and even sales and purchasing agents, 
ensuring that the majority of tax cadres and enterprises 
recognized the importance of this tax reform, so that they could 
basically grasp its key substance and operating essentials. 
  In addition to the great attention paid to this tax reform 
by 
the Party Central Committee and State Council, it has also 
received much attention and support from the leadership in all 
areas and sectors. Many key leaders of provinces, cities, 
autonomous regions, and sectors gave speeches publicizing the 
new tax system and asking their subordinates to cooperate in its 
implementation. At the "National Tax Publicity Day" activities 
organized by the State Administration of Taxation [SAT] for 23 
January, hundreds of thousands of tax cadres and enterprise 
accountants took to the streets under the guidance of the local 
Party and Government leadership, publicizing the tax laws and 
seeking public advice. Meanwhile, in order to implement well 
the new tax system and promptly resolve all issues, the SAT 
intensified its command and control. During the nearly two 
months since the beginning of the year, the SAT sent out over 60 
documents and faxes of all types, as well as holding two 
national telephone conferences for tax bureau directors above 
the county level, conveying the pertinent spirit and demands 
directly to grass-roots tax bureaus, thus ensuring national 
accessibility to government decrees. 
  Tax-reform success will be shown by several very important 
signs: whether it touches off price volatility and sharp rises; 
whether it brings stable growth or decline to revenues; whether 
it causes much disorder through the counterfeiting of 
value-added-tax special invoices and the exploitation of 
filled-in invoices to evade taxes; whether its impact on 
production is positive or negative. 
  --As to its implementation in the last two months, the most 
concerning price problem is not sharp price volatility or rises 
due to tax reform. While the consumption tax was misunderstood 
by some for a time as an additional tax added onto prevailing 
commodity prices, thus causing brisk sales of commodities, such 
as home electronics, publicity and explanation brought this 
disturbance to a very quick end. And after the value-added tax 
went into effect, while some misunderstood the 17-percent 
non-price tax as an additional 17 percent on top of the original 
tax-inclusive price, repeated explanations and additional joint 
checkups with concerned sectors by tax organs essentially 
cleared up and rectified this matter. 
  --Revenues remain in a high-growth trend. By 20 February, 
national business-tax revenues had reached 40.7 billion yuan, up 
27.3 percent from the same period in 1993. 
  --The implementation of the new tax system has not generally 
had a negative impact on production and circulation, with 
industrial production remaining in a state of rapid growth. 
Data from the State Statistical Bureau for January show our 
national industrial output value at the township level and above 
at 290.3 billion yuan, up 33.2 percent from the same period in 
1993. While the widespread implementation of the value-added 
tax caused certain problems for a time for small-scale taxpayers 
and production operations, the tax sector took very quick and 
effective steps to improve this situation, solving the problems. 
  --The value-added-tax special invoices were all distributed 
before 1 January, with no major problems in any links, such as 
printing, delivery, sales, or use. Moreover, we made 
improvements in light of realities in areas such as 
invoice-column design, invoice size, and anti-counterfeit 
markings and, according to enterprise request, added a 
seven-link style to the four-link style invoices. The SAT has 
also decided beginning on 1 May 1994 to use on a nationwide 
basis anti-counterfeit invoices printed uniformly by printing 
plants, to prevent counterfeit invoices. 
  It could be said that all public circles and most 
enterprises 
have responded well to the implementation of the new tax system. 
Foreign firms with investments in China do not have added tax 
burdens due to the the new tax system, which has cleared up 
their misgivings about it. 
  But it also needs noted that the new tax system has been in 
operation for less than two months, and that certain frictions 
will also unavoidably exist in the course of dovetailing the new 
and old tax systems. So SAT Deputy Director Jin Xin [6855 
9515] [former SAT director] told reporters the other day that 
the current results are merely initial, not yet enough to state 
that the implementation of the new tax system has been a 
complete success. As many new problems and conditions have not 
yet fully surfaced, we need to keep cool heads to promptly study 
and deal with all problems as they arise. 
  It should be emphasized that China's current tax reform is 
aimed at establishing a tax system suited to the needs of our 
socialist market economy, or one that conforms to both 
international practice and China's national conditions. Our 
reform guiding ideology is uniform taxation, fair tax burdens, a 
streamlined tax system, a rational division of powers, orderly 
distribution relations, and a standardized distribution form. 
While our reform plan was designed to adhere to the basic 
principle of maintaining the overall tax burden unchanged, the 
former tax-burden inequality means that the widespread 
implementation of the value-added tax will make it impossible 
for every taxpayer's vested interests to not be affected. This 
means that all will have to take the overall situation into 
account, by proceeding from overall and long-range interests to 
support the implementation of the new tax system, instead of 
driving prices up because the tax burdens of certain enterprises 
are somewhat heavier. It needs to be seen that as tax reform is 
the grounds for our establishment of a socialist market economy, 
so that the implementation of the tax reform and the achievement 
of its anticipated results will sharply speed up the pace of our 
establishment of a socialist market economy, a long-range view 
is of advantage to all. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20399 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar025___94007" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-025 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  7 March 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> FINANCE, BANKING </F>
<H3> <TI>   New Tax System Attractive to Foreign Investors </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    New Tax System Attractive to Foreign Investors </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94CE0391B Beijing ZHONGGUO SHUIWU BAO in Chinese 7 Mar 94 p 1 </F>
<F P=103> 94CE0391B </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing ZHONGGUO SHUIWU BAO </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Dong Shukui: "The New Tax System Will Attract </F>
Even More Foreign Business Investors"] 
  [Text] Since the start of reform and opening up, our 
country has all along used two tax systems governing 
domestically funded enterprises and foreign-funded and foreign 
enterprises respectively, levying separate taxes on them. In 
regard to turnover tax, the uniform industry and commerce tax 
was levied on foreign-funded and foreign enterprises in 
accordance with the Provisions for the Uniform Industry and 
Commerce Tax of the People's Republic of China (Draft) which was 
adopted in principle by the 101st meeting of the Standing 
Committee of the National People's Congress [NPC] in 1958 and 
which was promulgated and put into effect on a trial basis by 
the State Council. On the other hand the product tax, value 
added tax, and business tax were levied on domestically funded 
enterprises in accordance with the relevant draft tax 
regulations promulgated and put into effect on a trial basis by 
the State Council in 1984 with the NPC Standing Committee's 
authorization. 
  In 1993 our country comprehensively reformed the industry 
and 
commerce tax system, promulgating provisional regulations on the 
new value added tax, consumption tax, and business tax. At the 
same time, the fifth meeting of the Eighth NPC Standing 
Committee decided: "Beginning on 1 January 1994, the provisional 
regulations on the value added tax, provisional regulations on 
the consumption tax, and provisional regulations on the business 
tax promulgated by the State Council will be applicable to 
foreign-funded enterprises and foreign enterprises," and "the 
Provisions for the Uniform Industry and Commerce Tax of the 
People's Republic of China (Draft) will be abolished at the same 
time." In this way turnover taxes levied on domestically funded 
enterprises and foreign-funded and foreign enterprises have been 
unified. This reform is sure to play a positive role in 
enhancing economic exchanges between our country and other 
countries, in expanding the opening to the outside world, in 
utilizing foreign capital to a greater extent, and in promoting 
the development of foreign-funded enterprises. The new tax 
system has created a favorable taxation environment for foreign 
business investment in China. 
  1. Levying a uniform value added tax, consumption tax, 
and business tax has evened out tax burdens on domestically 
funded enterprises and on foreign-funded enterprises. The 
uniform industry and commerce tax rates for 94 of the 141 
industries and product categories subjected to the previous 
uniform industry and commerce tax were higher than the rates of 
the product, value added, and business taxes levied on 
domestically funded enterprises; in some cases the differences 
were substantial. For instance, in the case of beer, the uniform 
industry and commerce tax rate was 40 percent, whereas the 
product tax rate was only 25 percent; in the case of cotton 
yarn, the uniform industry and commerce tax rate was 23-26 
percent, whereas the previous value added tax rate was 14 
percent, with an effective tax burden of around 5 percent; in 
the case of electronic watches and quartz clocks, the uniform 
industry and commerce tax rate was 20 percent, whereas the 
previous value added tax rate and the part-of-price tax rate 
were 14 percent, with an effective tax burden of around 5 
percent. In addition, some industries granted tax-break 
preferences to domestically funded enterprises; for instance, 
domestically funded flour mills and feed-processing plants were 
completely exempted from taxes, whereas foreign-funded flour 
mills and feed-processing plants had to pay a 10-yuan or 5 
percent uniform industry and commerce tax. After the reform of 
the tax system, the value added tax, business tax, and 
consumption tax are levied on domestically funded enterprises 
and foreign-funded and foreign enterprises in a uniform manner, 
thereby eliminating unfairness in tax burdens. 
  2. Tax burdens created by most of the products produced 
by foreign-funded enterprises have been reduced or remain 
unchanged. According to a survey of 1,253 enterprises in 
Beijing, Tianjin, Shanghai, Guangzhou, Xiamen, Wuhan, Qingdao, 
and Dalian, tax burdens on 70 percent of the enterprises have 
declined somewhat or remain unchanged after the tax reform. The 
products which create reduced tax burdens mainly include: beer, 
refrigerators, air conditioners, vacuum cleaners, videocassette 
recorders, electronic clocks and watches, wrist watches, 
electric fans, cigarettes, alcohol, etc. 
  3. The value added tax has eliminated the previous 
uniform industry and commerce tax's problem of duplicate 
taxation. A common feature of the previous industry and 
commerce tax and the new value added tax is the levying of tax 
on every phase of production and business operation. That is, if 
a commodity has to go through the production, processing, and 
marketing carried out by five independent enterprises before 
finally entering consumption, taxes will be collected five 
times. However, the previous uniform industry and commerce tax 
was levied on the total sales revenues; the more phases of 
production, processing, and circulation a commodity has to go 
through, the heavier the tax burden will be. The value added tax 
is levied only on the value added at each phase; the amount of 
tax burden created by a commodity is directly related to how 
much value has been added, but is not significantly related to 
the number of phases of production, processing, and circulation. 
This is conducive to the specialization, coordination, and 
socialization of production. 
  4. Conducive to foreign-funded enterprises' production 
of products for export. In order to encourage the entry of 
their own countries products into the international market and 
to enhance the competitiveness of their own countries' products 
on the international market, most countries follow a no tax 
policy toward products for export. Since the start of the 
opening to the outside world, our country has all along followed 
a policy of exempting exports produced by foreign-funded 
enterprises from the uniform industry and commerce tax. As the 
uniform industry and commerce tax was levied on the total amount 
at each phase, it was not clear how much tax on raw materials 
used for producing exports was collected; consequently exports 
had to be exempted from the final round of taxation. The 
provisional regulations on the value added tax promulgated in 
December last year stipulate that the tax rate for exports be 
zero. It is also stipulated that "in exporting goods for which 
the applicable tax rate is zero, taxpayers may apply for the 
refund of tax paid on the exports at taxation agencies on a 
monthly basis by showing the relevant certificatory documents 
such as customs declaration forms, after going through customs 
formalities for exports." That is: there can be a refund of the 
value added tax collected at all the phases, from that of raw 
materials to that of finished products, which exports have to go 
through. The implementation of this policy will doubtless 
enhance the competitive position of products produced by 
foreign-funded enterprises on the international market, and is 
therefore conducive to foreign-funded enterprises' production of 
products for export. 
  5. Foreign businesses' vested interests related to 
their investments in China will be protected. The idea 
behind the design of this round of reform of the tax system is 
that reform should neither increase burdens on enterprises nor 
reduce the state's fiscal revenues, keeping the overall tax 
burden at the preexisting level. Nevertheless, because of 
changes in the structure of the tax system, simplification of 
tax rates, and reform of the arrangement regarding the phases on 
which taxes are levied, a small number of foreign-funded 
enterprises will still see increases in their tax burdens 
despite the fact that tax burdens on most foreign-funded 
enterprises will be reduced or remain unchanged. In order to 
ensure that foreign-funded enterprises will not suffer 
economic-interest losses because of the reform, the Eighth NPC 
Standing Committee has decided to adopt appropriate measures to 
resolve the problem of likely increases in tax burdens on 
foreign-funded enterprises. That is: if their tax burdens are 
increased because of the change into levying the value added 
tax, consumption tax, and business tax, those foreign-funded 
enterprises which were approved and established before 31 
December 1993 may receive the refund of the additional amount of 
tax paid because of the increase in their tax burdens for the 
approved period of operation, after their relevant applications 
are approved by taxation agencies; they may receive such tax 
refunds for a maximum period of five years. A value added tax in 
kind and, under the existing regulations, the mining-area use 
fees will be levied on the crude oil and natural gas recovered 
by offshore oil-exploiting enterprises, but the resource tax 
will not be levied on them for the time being. The value added 
tax rate will be 5 percent. 
  6. The foreigner-involved tax preference policies 
formulated by the state since the start of reform and opening up 
will, in principle, all remain unchanged. The Income Tax on 
Foreign-Funded Enterprises and Foreign Enterprises Law of the 
People's Republic of China adopted by the NPC in 1991 will still 
be applied to foreign-funded enterprises and foreign 
enterprises. A reduced income tax rate of 15 percent will be 
applied to enterprises in the special economic zones and 
foreign-funded production enterprises in economic and 
technological development zones; a reduced income tax rate of 24 
percent will be applied to foreign-funded production enterprises 
in coastal open economic regions and open cities; foreign-funded 
production enterprises will be exempted from the income tax for 
two years, and will enjoy an income tax rate which is reduced by 
half for three years, beginning in the year in which they start 
to make profits. All the preferential policies on the enterprise 
income tax will continue to be followed. 
  With regard to turnover tax, the preferential tax policies 
regarding the uniform industry and commerce tax which were 
formulated by the state previously, such as those of exempting 
machinery, equipment, and parts imported by foreign-funded 
enterprises within the confines of the total volumes of 
investment from the import-phase turnover tax, of exempting the 
raw materials imported for the purpose of producing exports from 
the import-phase turnover tax, and of granting tax preferences 
to the bonded zones, will all be continued. 
  All this shows that the new tax system has not increased tax 
burdens on foreign investors but rather created a fair, relaxed, 
and favorable taxation environment for foreign investors, and 
that thus it is sure to induce even more foreign businesses to 
invest in our country. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20400 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar025___94008" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-025 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  5 February 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> FINANCE, BANKING </F>
<H3> <TI>   Active Gold Markets Need Guidance </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Active Gold Markets Need Guidance </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94CE0389A Beijing ZHONGGUO MAOYI BAO in Chinese 5 Feb 94 pp 
1, 3 </F>

<F P=103> 94CE0389A </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing ZHONGGUO MAOYI BAO </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Gao Ling (7559 1545): "Gold, Lifting the Veil </F>
of Mystery"] 
  [Text] Taking a casual stroll along city streets, what one 
sees everywhere rising like bamboo shoots after a spring rain, 
in addition to sumptuous hotels and restaurants, seems to be 
numbers of resplendent gold and silver shops. Incomplete 
statistics for a large northern city show it currently having 
over 300 gold shops, with 100-plus more awaiting approval, 
presenting a phenomenon of more stores selling gold than rice. 
Moreover, most gold shops are located in "golden areas" on busy 
streets. 
  Gold, symbolizing wealth, luck, and well-being, is dazzling, 
fascinating, and intoxicating. We working people have a 
traditional and extreme fondness for it. Whenever we acquire a 
litle money, we want to buy gold. 
  Gold is actually a very common metal with quite widespread 
uses, being edible, spendable, and life-saving. It has long been 
seen as a special commodity that can be either worn as jewelry 
or invested as a hedge against inflation. During turbulent 
times of war and chaos, gold not only is a commodity that can be 
invested as a hedge against inflation, but even becomes at times 
a life-saving "amulet." And when this precious metal that 
sells for 120-150 yuan a gram was manufactured into exquisite 
and tiny pieces to appear on the banquet menu in our southern 
cities that were opened up first (according to "scientific 
research," eating gold helps to prolong life), its 
characteristic charm in China made it a great consumer marvel of 
the late 20th century. 
  In short, gold in China has a huge consumption volume which, 
according to statistics, was 250 tons in 1992, up 47 percent 
from 1991. While this volume was estimated to be dowm somewhat 
for 1993, at about 220 tons, there are still generally very 
optimistic prospects. The most recent information is that gold 
jewelry consumption for the first three quarters of 1993 was 920 
million yuan, with all of the growth focused in gold jewelry. 
Other data show China's gold demand at 350 tons, ranking first 
in the world. 
  But we must note that the sharp increase in gold shops and 
brisk sales of gold jewelry certainly do not mean that China has 
a sound and developed gold market. The facts are exactly the 
opposite, that China still does not have a gold market in the 
strict sense, and that it can only be rated as: 
<H5>  A Lopsided Market </H5>
  A gold market in the narrow sense means a trading arena with 
concentrated gold transactions and gold-coin exchanges. In a 
modern market-economy system, it is a key component part of the 
money market. Since the 1970s, the West has also seen the 
appearance of a gold futures market, with gold markets having 
become the key area in which Western countries apply economic 
means of macroeconomic regulation and control to economic 
operations, turning them to a certain extent along with stock 
markets into Western economic "barometers." 
  But in China, gold production, operations, and management 
have long been subject to our traditional planned-economy means, 
characterized by a high degree of planning, monopoly, and 
exclusion. Just like a beautiful lady, gold has been raised in 
seclusion and covered with a thick veil, leaving it with 
enigmatic mystery. As to output, the state issues orders of 
the highest secrecy that absolutely must be kept from the 
outside world. As to products, the PBC monopolizes buying and 
selling on behalf of the state, with noone allowed to encroach. 
And as to management, gold production, refining, and flow are 
managed by the three sectors of metallurgy, light industry, and 
banking, with the structural separation making coordination 
difficult. As our domestic gold market is divorced from the 
international one, our gold purchasing price is far lower than 
the international market price, while our gold jewlery sales 
prices are higher than international market prices, damaging the 
interests of both producers and consumers. 
  And as our gold prices are so off-track, this creates severe 
gold smuggling, with the state already concerned about runaway 
gold purchasing. In 1990, smuggled goods actually made up as 
high as 80 percent of our national sales of gold jewelry. He 
Naihua [0149 0035 5478], president of the China Jewelry 
Import-Export Corp, told the reporter that our 1992 domestic 
gold jewelry sales were about 300 tons, of which less than 40 
tons went through the official supply and marketing channel of 
state-designated banking institutions. The implications of 
this are obvious. By 1993, the sharp devaluation of the RMB 
touched off a storm of gold panic-buying in all areas, with gold 
prices rising again and again, and gold smuggling growing more 
rampant, causing the state huge losses. The "gold-mining fever 
in western China" described in some works confirms the gold 
smuggling. 
  So some people of insight are raising a cry of warning that 
gold must no longer be dissociated from markets, that our gold 
industry must be commercialized, and that the establishment and 
opening of China's gold market is so imperative that it brooks 
no delay! The sooner our gold market is opened up, the sooner 
the state will profit, without which financial reform will be 
incomplete, and we will be unable to shoulder the heavy 
responsibility of "GATT reentry." Some even ask, as the most 
precious commodity of grain has been deregulated, how long must 
gold wait?! 
  By now, our gold industry leadership, the public, and 
economists involved with gold have essentially reached a 
consensus on establishing and opening China's own gold market 
and that, as to terms, such as society, technical services, 
resources, and laws, the time has come and the conditions are 
ripe for an open gold market. So our gold market could be said 
to be: 
<H5>  Already "In Labor," About To Be Born </H5>
  An official at the State Administration of Gold Control has 
disclosed that while gold production in China has always been a 
special line, where opening to the outside world started later 
that in others, the policy of bringing China's gold market onto 
track with the international market is set. 
  In fact, the state has already taken definite steps to put 
China's gold market on track with the international one. 
  First, in September 1993, the state abolished its former 
style of fixed gold prices by administrative decision, changing 
to a new gold pricing system of floating pricing through market 
decision, or setting the domestic purchasing price 10 percent 
below the London market gold price, with selling prices the same 
as London gold prices, and domestic gold prices floating 
regularly. 
  The state has also eliminated its preferential policies for 
the gold industry, such as policy subsidies, low-interest loans, 
and tax exemptions, as well as requiring gold-mining units to 
pay for the use of geological prospecting data. 
  Our consolidation of RMB exchange and enterprise tax rates 
has also created a key condition for the opening to the outside 
world of our gold production. 
  Foreign firms have always coveted China's huge gold consumer 
market. Starting in 1994, China will selectively introduce 
foreign capital and technology to our goldmining. It is 
understood that dozens of companies in countries such as the 
United States, Canada, and South Africa, have made contacts with 
China's responsible gold sector, expressing interest in 
investing in Chinese goldmining. 
  The most secretive proposal is the news of the publication 
of 
our gold output, being a further signal about the opening of our 
gold market. But while this will lift the veil of mystery 
shrouding our gold industry, it will still be a case of "just as 
the frown leaves, other worries come to mind." The experts have 
new concerns, advising that: 
<H5>  We Must Not Turn Our Gold Market Into a "Petty Commodity </H5>
Market" 
  Gold in China is about to be withdrawn from the monetary 
field, to be "reduced to" a market commodity. The experts are 
concerned that due to the inevitable drive of profits, just as 
in the previous opening of certain other industries, the opening 
of our gold market might induce all areas to act out of their 
own local, narrow interests, with precipitate action, each going 
their own way, and the setting up of petty markets "with each 
king occupying his own territory," to disrupt our overall 
national market order. 
  The experts' concerns are certainly not overdone. In fact, 
private mining and smuggling have long since brought "stealth 
gold markets" to certain places. The most notorious of these 
was in the town of Ganwangzhen in Haicheng City, Liaoning 
Province, where peasant-mined and privately-bought gold was made 
into jewelry and sold, turning the "stealth market" into an open 
"secret." So the local government planned to establish a gold 
market there to "standardize private gold transactions, to bring 
them under government control." On 1 September 1992, the first 
private gold jewelry shop in Ganwangzhen opened to the sound of 
firecrackers. In a very short five months thereafter, 106 
goldshops applied for business licenses, with 76 going into 
business, of which 73 were private and the other three 
collective. The PBC head office reacted to this very quickly, 
issuing a circular to the Liaoning branch off the PBC on 28 
December 1992, declaring Ganwangzhen's actions to be illegal, 
and emphasizing that until state plans involving the opening of 
the gold market went into effect, no locality or unit could 
operate gold markets without authorization. After which, 
Ganwangzhen's gold shops not only did not decrease in number, 
but even increased somewhat. This also touched off a controversy 
within financial circles. 
  But in any case, gold is still not an ordinary commodity. As 
gold is also an international hard currency, with links to the 
foreign exchange market, China's gold-market model must be able 
to play a positive role in protecting our domestic economy, 
while also being subject to state macroeconomic regulation and 
control. As our gold-market transaction method is mainly 
futures contracts, certainly not barter of cash for goods, our 
establishment of gold markets must by all means not allow them 
to spring up all over, for one after another of "petty commodity 
markets." 
  The experts recommend that, based on current conditions, we 
should select one or two large cities in which to set up 
nationally standardized gold markets, with Shanghai undoubtedly 
being the first choice. Shanghai is China's largest gold-jewelry 
sales center, as well as striving to become an international 
financial-center city. As it is understood that Shanghai is 
establishing a trading center for gold and silver jewelry, 
gradually making the transition to a standardized gold market, 
it seems that there would not be too great doubts about choosing 
Shanghai for China's first established gold market. As to the 
other cities suited to the establishment of a gold market, the 
experts hold that an ideal site would be Guangzhou. It is 
understood that Guangzhou also has such plans, now studying the 
possibility of setting up a gold market. Other news is that in 
the plans for a financial street on Beijing's West Second Loop 
Road, a gold market has been included as one of its projects. 
  Other experts recommend the organization of a 
gold-transaction organ to train talent in and publicize 
knowledge about gold futures trading. We could set up 
independent gold exchanges in cities, such as Beijing, Shanghai, 
and Shenzhen. Gold exchanges should use a membership system, 
with members coming upon examination from banks, concerned 
entities, and individuals. 
<H5>  Pre-Birth Pangs </H5>
  While China's pertinent sector decided in September 1993 to 
reform our gold pricing system to put it on track with 
international gold prices, other news is that the 
gold-management sector has recently reemphasized the 
monopoly-control system for gold to rectify and improve gold 
markets in all places, stipulating that all gold produced by 
goldmines must be sold to the PBC. 
  Concerned figures point out that this step is the result 
mainly of the lag in the establishment and development of a 
state gold market. As there is not a state gold market, the 
state cannot regulate and contol gold markets, leaving gold 
trading in disorder, and creating a large gold drain and rampant 
improper trading behavior. In addition, as the relations among 
all parties have not yet been rationalized, an immediate 
transition to free trading would involve many unsuitable parts. 
All such issues are keeping the policymaking sector's policy 
orientation slanted toward retention of the monopoly-control 
system. 
  I hold that both the reemphasis on the monopoly-control 
system and the controversy over Ganwangzhen's gold markets are 
actually merely gold market "pre-birth pangs," and that gold 
will eventually have to be given access to standardized market 
trading. Insiders predict that by 1995, China's gold-monopoly 
management system will have been broken with somewhat. 
  Time will not wait, and the opportunity will not come again! 
From the 1990s into the early 21st century, the world economy 
will enter another period of sustained growth, setting off a 
fifth worldwide modernization tide. So whether we can establish 
a large international gold market will depend on the choices we 
make now. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20401 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar025___94009" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-025 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  14 April 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> INDUSTRY </F>
<H3> <TI>   Statistics on Output of Textiles in March </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Statistics on Output of Textiles in March </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   HK1404104094 Beijing CEI Database in English 14 Apr 94 </F>
<F P=103> HK1404104094 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing CEI Database </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Beijing (CEIS) -- Following is a list of the output 
of textiles in March 1994, released by the State Statistical 
Bureau: 


----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Item              |Unit              |3/94              |3/93              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Yarn              |10,000t           |44.99             |42.31             | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Yarn              |10,000pc          |250.37            |235               | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Cloth             |100m.m            |14.97             |15.21             | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Of:Pure cotton    |100m.m            |8.19              |8.89              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Chemical fiber    |100m.m            |4.95              |4.73              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Silk              |10,000t           |0.77              |0.70              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Silk fabric       |100m.m            |2.24              |2.29              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Woolen fabric     |10,000m           |2418.44           |2026              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Knitting wool     |10,000t           |2.86              |2.63              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Garment           |100m.pc           |3.08              |2.68              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 



</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20402 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar025___94010" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-025 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  12 April 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> INDUSTRY </F>
<H3> <TI>   March Gross Industrial Output Value Figures </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    March Gross Industrial Output Value Figures </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   HK1204130794 Beijing CEI Database in English 12 Apr 94 </F>
<F P=103> HK1204130794 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing CEI Database </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Beijing (CEIS) -- Following is a list showing 
China's total industrial output value in March 1994, released by 
the State Statistical Bureau: 


------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|                         |                         |(in 100 million yuan)    | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|                         |3/94                     |3/93                     | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Total                    |3409.04                  |2869.4                   | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Including:               |                         |                         | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Light ind.               |1617.43                  |1348.8                   | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Heavy ind.               |1791.61                  |1520.6                   | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|State firms              |1572.78                  |1584.2                   | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Collectively owned ones  |1327.65                  |1006.6                   | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Others                   |508.61                   |278.6                    | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Note: The industrial output value is measured in 1990s constant yuan.        | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 



</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20403 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar026___94015" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-026 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  7 February 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> TRANSPORTATION </F>
<H3> <TI>   Northwest Opening Passages to Outside World </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Northwest Opening Passages to Outside World </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94CE0376A Beijing ZHONGGUO XINXI BAO in Chinese 7 Feb 94 p 1 </F>
<F P=103> 94CE0376A </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing ZHONGGUO XINXI BAO </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Liu Kaihong (0491 7030 1347) and Liu Huaibing </F>
(0491 2037 0365): "Northwest Accelerates Construction of Major 
International Passages"] 
  [Text] Reform and opening up to the outside world have 
pushed the great Northwest, which in former times was closed and 
backward, toward the forward position of opening up to the West, 
rapidly putting five province's autonomous regions -- Shaanxi, 
Gansu, Ningxia, Qinghai, and Xinjiang -- on the track of 
economic marketization. The Northwest region, amid frequent 
contacts with the outside world, is determined to break through 
its "bottleneck" in traffic and communications, which are 
unsuitable for economic development, and accelerate the economic 
leaps of the five provinces and autonomous regions by gradually 
achieving unblocked road, railroad, and air transport and 
communications, thereby constructing a three-dimensional network 
of passages. 
  In railroad construction, the building of the Lan-Xin 
multiple-track railroad, in which the state has invested 3.9 
billion yuan, is expected to be completed ahead of schedule in 
1994. On it, within the borders of Gansu Province the 
Qingshanbao-Zongjiazhuang and Dongming-Jilin sections will be 
open to traffic respectively on 15 and 20 December. The 
important competent parts of the Asia-Europe Land Bridge that 
runs through parts of Shaanxi, Gansu, and Ningxia--the 65 
tunnels of the Baoji-Zhongwei Electrified Railway--have all been 
linked up. Furthermore, the plan to extend the Southern Xinjiang 
Railroad to Aksu will be finished in the Ninth Five-Year Plan 
period; after the Northern Xinjiang Railroad is formally 
incorporated in the the national railroad network, it will 
extend north to Karamay and Altay and south to Yining. When the 
time comes, the handling capacity for goods will be improved, 
threby promoting the economic development of the five provinces 
and autonomous regions in the Northwest. 
  In road construction, all of China's longest road--the 
Lan-Xin Road--has been blacktopped, making it a national 
second-grade road surface. 
  To change the situation in which it has few roads and a low 
road density, Gansu has put forward a plan for construction of a 
"double crisscross" road network, which is estimated to be 
completed in seven years from now. The rebuilding of the Gansu 
section of the Lan-Bao Road has been completed, and the vehicle 
speed per hous has been increased from the original 30 
kilometers to 80 kilometers. 
  To achieve as quickly as possible the "joining in the east 
and coming out at the west," Xinjiang has begun border post 
capital construction with the focus on building roads. Last year 
Xinjiang invested a total of 200 million yuan on building major 
international passages, and it will transform seven port roads, 
including (Baketu, Cui'enguosi, Alashankou), and (Tu'erduote). 
The expressway that goes from (Dahuangshan) through Urumqi to 
Turpan, for which the World Bank granted a loan of $115 million 
and for which there was a total investment of 2.3 billion yuan 
in Renminbi, and the total length of which is 285.5 kilometers, 
will be completed in the Ninth Five-Year Plan period. Up to now 
Xinjiang has built roads with a total length of 26,000 
kilometers, the longest in China; 53 percent of its 
open-to-traffic road surface is high grade or secondary high 
grade, which puts it in first position among China's autonomous 
regions. 
  The upsurge in development brought about by reform and the 
opening up to the outside world had spurred a considerable 
development of the Great Northwest Air Corridor. In this regard 
Urumqi will open domestic air lines to Wuhan, Kunming, Haikou, 
Shantou, Qingdao, and Ningbo, as well as Tacheng, Turpan, Hami, 
and Malan within Xinjiang's borders. Also, to fully display 
Xinjiang's geographical superiority, Urumqi will open direct 
passages to various places in the world: to the east, in 
succession opening air lines to Hong Kong, Tokyo, Seoul, 
Bangkok, and Singapore in East Asia and Southeast Asia; and to 
the west, in succession opening international air lines to 
(Aoshi, Bikshikaike), Moscow, (Shengbidebao, Ashihabata), Kiev, 
Minsk, Karachi, and (Shajia). With Urumqi as the center, 
Xinjiang has formed a network of 30 air lines linked to 19 large 
and medium-sized cities in China and to 11 cities and counties 
in the autonomous region, thereby becoming in China among all 
the provinces and autonomous regions the one with the most 
airports and longest air lines. In the Northwest region the 
Yinchuan He [river] East Airport will be newly built; the 
Lanzhou and Guohuang airports will be expanded; and the Xining, 
Yulin, Ankang, and Hanzhong airports will be rebuilt or expanded. 
  The post and telecommunications facilities of the five 
provinces and autonomous regions of the Northwest, under the 
concept of "great communications," have entered the completely 
new era of the satellite, microwave, optical cable, and 
programmatic control. With a total investment of 750 million 
yuan, the Xining-Lanzhou-Urumqi-Yining optical cable project, 
and the Turpan-Hetian, Urumqi-Yining, and Urumqi-Altay digital 
microwave projects, are being intensively constructed; and the 
large-, medium-sized, and small cities of Xi'an, Xining, 
Yinchuan, Lanzhou, Jiayuguan, Guohuang, and Urumqi have been put 
in the international direct broadcast exchange network. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20404 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar026___94016" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-026 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  26 March 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> AGRICULTURE </F>
<H3> <TI>   Jilin Reports Shortage of Beets </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Jilin Reports Shortage of Beets </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94CE0397L Changchun JILIN RIBAO in Chinese 26 Mar 94 p 1 </F>
<F P=103> 94CE0397L </F>
<F P=104>  Changchun JILIN RIBAO </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

  [Summary] In 1994 the planned beet area in Jilin Province 
is 900,000 mu. However, as of today, only 40 percent of 
contracts signed with farmers have been fulfilled, the beets 
produced will only maintain one-third of the processing capacity 
of sugar mills. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20405 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar026___94017" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-026 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  18 March 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> AGRICULTURE </F>
<H3> <TI>   Liaoning Rural Savings </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Liaoning Rural Savings </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94CE0397Q Shenyang LIAONING JINGJI RIBAO in Chinese 18 Mar 
94 p 1 </F>

<F P=103> 94CE0397Q </F>
<F P=104>  Shenyang LIAONING JINGJI RIBAO </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

  [Summary] At the end of February, rural saving deposits in 
Liaoning Province totaled 31.66 billion yuan. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20406 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar026___94018" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-026 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  28 March 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> AGRICULTURE </F>
<H3> <TI>   Guizhou Sets Goals for Livestock Industry </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Guizhou Sets Goals for Livestock Industry </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94CE0397P Guiyang GUIZHOU RIBAO in Chinese 28 Mar 94 p 1 </F>
<F P=103> 94CE0397P </F>
<F P=104>  Guiyang GUIZHOU RIBAO </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

  [Summary] Development goals for the livestock industry in 
Guizhou Province are: By the end of the Eighth Five-Year Plan to 
produce 900,000 tons of meat, 70,000 tons of eggs, 15,000 tons 
of milk, and 30,000 tons of aquatic products. The output value 
of the breeding industry will be 5 billion yuan (based on 1990 
constant prices), and account for about 30 percent of the gross 
value of agricultural output. By the end of the Ninth Five-Year 
Plan to produce 1,050,000-1,100,000 tons of meat, 100,000 tons 
of eggs, 35,000 tons of milk, and 50,000 tons of aquatic 
products. The output value of the breeding industry will account 
for over 35 percent of the gross value of agricultural output. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20407 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar026___94019" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-026 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  27 April 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> SOCIAL </F>
<H3> <TI>   Social Effects of Emerging `Nouveaux Riches' </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Social Effects of Emerging `Nouveaux Riches' </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94CM0232A Shanghai SHEHUI [SOCIETY] in Chinese No 110, Mar 
94 pp 4-6 </F>

<F P=103> 94CM0232A </F>
<F P=104>  Shanghai SHEHUI [SOCIETY] </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Xiao Wentao (5135 2429 3447): "The Social </F>
Effects of the Newly Emerging Stratum of Wealthy People and 
Relevant Reflections" -- Edited by Shen Guanbao (3038 7070 1405) 
and Li Ling (2621 5107)] 
  [Excerpts] Speaking of their positive effects, the 
emergence of a stratum of rich people demonstrates the most 
realistic aspect of the party's policy to have the people attain 
a state of prosperity and to advance toward a state of common 
prosperity and abundance for all. It is indeed a historical 
event of breakthrough nature. Not long after establishment of 
New China, the CPC had pronounced its move in the direction of 
common prosperity and abundance for all, and for this purpose 
had instituted its thoroughgoing reforms. However, due to the 
restraints of the traditional economic system and the influences 
of the absolute egalitarianism engendered by manual labor, also 
the additional vigilance against the social dichotomy of the Old 
China, it was never possible, in this question of how to achieve 
common prosperity and abundance for all, to at least arrive at a 
policy of allowing one part of the population gain prosperity 
ahead of others. To allow pluralistic economic components 
outside of the public ownership system and distribution patterns 
other than the one of distribution according to work had been 
absolutely taboo. The practice was that of the so-called 
"egalitarianism and indiscriminate transfer of resources" and 
"chopping off the tails of capitalism." Under these 
circumstances, it was impossible to allow one part of the 
population attain prosperity ahead of others, and it was even 
more out of the question to speak of common prosperity and 
abundance for all. Only after the Third Plenary Session of the 
11th CPC Central Committee did it happen that Comrade Deng 
Xiaoping for the first time put forward: "As regards our 
economic policy, it is my opinion that we should allow some 
districts, some enterprises, and some people to gain larger 
incomes and enjoy better lives ahead of others, because of their 
achievements attained in hard work and with great exertions... 
to make it possible for the Chinese people of all nationalities 
throughout the entire country to gain prosperity and abundance 
in a comparatively short time." We can therefore conclude that 
the emergency of the stratum of wealthy people, and the process 
that allows them to develop and grow in strength, is also part 
of the process of that would allow first a limited portion of 
the population to attain prosperity before others, and to delay 
to later days prosperity and abundance for the majority of the 
people, as this process is also the successful practice and 
vivid demonstration of the party's policy of achieving 
nationwide prosperity in due course. 
  We can also assert that by their emergency the stratum of 
wealthy people is setting an example for those that have not yet 
attained prosperity, and that they thereby are exerting a widely 
spreading stimulating influence. For the majority of China's 
citizens, coming from the traditional economic system, the 
decision to involve themselves in the treacherous ocean of the 
market economy requires not only an extreme measure of courage, 
but also that they undergo a process of a rather arduous 
apprenticeship. In this respect, those wealthy ones, who have 
courageously opened up new paths and who have swiftly raced 
ahead toward prosperity, are thus playing an exemplary role by 
their actually achieving wealth. They are setting an example to 
emulate and are thereby motivating and helping a growing number 
of others to advance too toward prosperity and abundance. 
  Looking at the negative aspects, there is first, that among 
the stratum of the wealthy people some got rich in unreasonable 
and unlawful ways. They either took advantage of loopholes of 
policy or acquired wealth illegally, which then directly stirred 
up confusion in the social distribution order and gave rise to 
serious injustices in distribution. Most conspicuous examples of 
such are: 
  One, some specially gifted and naturally talented people, 
such as star singers, star athletes, etc., although capable of 
providing people with spiritual products and spiritual 
enjoyment, or winning honors for their motherland, acquire huge 
wealth once they become famous. It makes people really wonder 
whether that is reasonable or legitimate. Then there are also 
loopholes in the country's taxation policy, all that has people 
inevitably consider such cases as incidents of inequitable 
distribution. 
  Two, with the development of private economy, a group of 
people came into being who primarily operated illegally and 
conspired to reap huge profits; these people were indeed 
successful in acquiring great wealth in this way in a short time. 
  Three, by the method of trading power against money, some 
appropriated to themselves large amounts of public property and 
caused many public assets to become lost. This is at the present 
time the most serious instance of injustice in social 
distribution. Their customary methods of misappropriations are 
mainly: 
  "Profiteering by means of undue official approvals to 
certain 
documents." Some people specialize in the resale of import and 
export licenses, and once a sale is successful, cash is diverted 
from the enterprises into their own pockets. 
  "Illegal profiteering by means of the price differentials" 
has some lawless elements take advantage of the dual-track 
pricing system during the period of change-over in systems. They 
exploit personal relationships, go by the backdoor, accept 
kickbacks, fraudulently sell parity-priced means of production, 
and shift most of the financial encumbrances on to the 
enterprises. 
  "Illegal speculating in real estate" has some people, 
relying 
on power or with the help of corrupt officials, buying up land 
at cheap prices, then drive up land price before they sell it 
again, deriving huge profits from such speculation. 
  "Speculating in shares" has some people take advantage of 
the 
fact that the management of the new stock markets is not yet up 
to standards, as they misuse public funds to speculate in 
personal stocks, transfer corporate stocks to individual 
persons, and there are also cases that before original issue 
stocks come into the market, they are privately shared out among 
related parties or placed in red gift envelopes and presented to 
certain people as gifts. 
  Second, some nouveaux riches, who had easily amassed great 
wealth within a short time, do not use it for investment in 
productive fields, but squander it wantonly and wastefully, 
creating an antisocial consumption that by far exceeds the 
present level of productive forces and seriously pollutes the 
general social atmosphere. In actual life, there are now many 
cases of rich men competing with each other in wealth, 
ostentatiously displaying their wealth, engaging in reckless 
gambling, visiting prostitutes, and using narcotic drugs. Even 
though these are not widely prevailing consumption habits among 
the stratum of the wealthy, these abnormal consumption 
phenomena--throwing money around like dirt and letting money 
flow like water--have already created an extremely bad 
impression among the general public. 
  Third, it is precisely these illegal acquisitions of wealth 
that have led to serious injustices in the distribution field, 
have fomented discontent among a considerable portion of the 
population, and have caused psychological instability of a 
societal character to appear. Although people's incomes and 
living standards have generally improved in the 10-odd years of 
reform and opening to the outside world, and people have a 
greater psychological tolerance than before, there is also this 
problem that must be faced squarely: The injustices in the 
social distribution that have occurred in the course of reform 
and opening up are felt as a daily increasing psychological 
pressure by many members of society. Due to these injustices in 
distribution, majority of personnel on wages and salaries, and 
the workers in agriculture feel that the disparity in incomes 
and the gap between rich and poor is much too large. They have 
the strong impression that they are being deprived. There is 
presently also the factor of the large-scale currency inflation, 
which is an additional direct threat to the consumption level 
and developmental demands of one portion of the population, 
making them feel that there is no moral justice as things are at 
the present time. This will inevitably lead to even greater 
discontent in an even wider circle of people, and will affect 
stability throughout the entire society. 
  Fourth, the process of irrational and unlawful enrichment of 
some of the nouveaux riches has emboldened more and more people 
to try to also get rich quickly by means that would violate law 
and discipline or would even constitute criminal acts. In the 
face of the new situation, with its rapidly growing economy and 
continuously rising social consumption, the huge wealth of some 
of those "moneybags," and their immense consumption, has already 
bestirred some people, irresistibly, not to take things lying 
down, but to rather think of ways and means to avail themselves 
of loopholes in the policy, working out all kinds of schemes to 
embezzle public property, and also some private property, or 
trying, overtly or covertly, to get high incomes to which they 
are not rightly entitled. What is particular cause for anxiety 
is that some people, to get rich quickly, will not shrink from 
boldly taking great risks and from even stooping to commit 
crimes. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20408 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar026___94020" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-026 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  3 February 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> MILITARY, PUBLIC SECURITY </F>
<H3> <TI>   Sino-Burma Border Security Problems </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Sino-Burma Border Security Problems </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94CM0247A Beijing RENMIN GONGAN BAO in Chinese 3 Feb 94 p 2 </F>
<F P=103> 94CM0247A </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing RENMIN GONGAN BAO </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by FAZHI RIBAO Correspondent Sun Chunying (1327 </F>
2504 5391), RENMIN GONGAN BAO Reporter Li Bingtian (2621 3521 
1131), and RENMIN GONGAN BAO Correspondent Sun Baoye (1327 1405 
0673): "Ten Years of Combat Readiness -- A Look at China-Burma 
Border Defense Work"] 
  [Excerpts] Peaceful Border Not So Tranquil 
  Historically, the Chinese-Burma border has been a peaceful 
and friendly boundary, the border peoples of both country 
intermarrying and going to market in both countries, and traders 
travelling back and forth. Following founding of new China, 
Premier Zhou Enlai visited Burma in 1961. In 1962, the two 
countries redemarcated the border, thereby laying a foundation 
for further development of friendly relations between the two 
countries. 
  The Yunnan section of the Sino-Burmese border runs for more 
than 1,900 kilometers without natural obstacles. The border line 
zigzags, border peoples living on both sides of it. In response 
to reform and opening to the outside world, and for effective 
maintenance of border security, the Yunnan border defense 
headquarters has decontrolled all that should be decontrolled, 
and controls what should be controlled. 
  On the Burma side of the Sino-Burmese border, the situation 
is complex. Numerous political forces co-exist, and they 
frequently fight with each other. 
  In November 1992, warfare broke out on the other side of the 
Sino-Burmese border. The Yunnan Border Defense Headquarters 
received an urgent report from the Lincang Border Defense 
Detachment. The border Defense Headquarters took immediate 
action, organizing forces to control the border situation. It 
captured the weapons of Burmese personnel who had entered 
Chinese territory, helped settle Burmese refugees, and 
maintained China's national honor. 
  During this military incident, more than 20,000 Burmese 
border people surged into Chinese territory. More than 1,000 
armed personnel of local nationality from across the border also 
fled into Chinese territory when they were defeated, carrying 
large amounts of firearms and ammunition with them. China's 
border defense units disarmed the more than 1,000 Burmese 
personnel who had entered Chinese territory following their 
defeat. All in all, border defense units confiscated 36 guns, 
1,085 shells, 1,003 small arms of all kinds, 194 cartridge cases 
containing more than 30,000 rounds, and 2,987 hand grenades. In 
addition, border defense troops sent out search detachments 
every day to search for weapons and ammunition that the Burmese 
personnel had dispersed in key sections of the border, and urged 
the return of more than 20,000 refugees who had entered Chinese 
territory. 
  Acting on instructions from higher authority, the border 
defense headquarters intervened actively in Burma, sternly 
pointing out that this conduct was an infringement of China's 
sovereignty, and explaining China's attitude about the 
maintenance of territorial sovereignty and the restoration of 
border order, forcing the other side to make an apology to us. 
The disarmed Burmese personnel and their families were safely 
sent back across the border. 
  In order to maintain national sovereignty and honor, and to 
ensure border stability, the Yunnan Border Defense Headquarters 
strengthened patrols and guards on the national boundary. It 
immediately halted illegal entry into and exit from China, and 
it cracked down on all criminal elements who violated the law. 
  With the intensification of reform and opening to the 
outside 
world, large numbers of traders from outside China have surged 
into this area, and the number of border people traveling back 
and forth has increased. Some border people trading post 
formerly located in villages far away from the frontier line 
have been moved to the national frontier, and the number of 
people entering and leaving through Chinese border exit and 
entry points has risen greatly. Some illegal elements who noted 
the complexity of the terrain along the China-Burma frontier 
also tried to sneak out of the country here to escape 
crackdowns. In order to maintain the prosperity of the border 
region and crack down on criminals, the Yunnan Border Defense 
Headquarters increased friendly cooperation with Union of Burma 
police organizations. Both sides held many discussions about 
joint crackdowns on criminal offenses, and the handling of 
border security issues. 
  One bureau level cadre in Yunnan used his official position 
to turn over to his son more than 3 million yuan of public funds 
to go into business. Surprisingly, not only did this 
spendthrift's business fail, but he also used the public funds 
for eating, drinking, whoring, and gambling. Later on, he 
escaped to Burma with the funds remaining. The Dehong Dai-Jingpo 
Autonomous Prefecture Border Defense Detachment provided the 
Burmese with this person's physical description, photograph, and 
hiding place. Very soon, the Burmese police returned this person 
to our border authorities, both father and son falling into our 
legal dragnet. 
  Through conversations, our border authorities also succeeded 
in obtaining the extradition from Burma of intelligence peddlers 
who had left China and were planning to sell Chinese military 
intelligence, thereby preventing a major disclosure of state 
secrets. Guo Tianming, the commander of the Dehong Dai-Jingpo 
Autonomous Prefecture Border Defense Detachment, said that "in 
order to escape a crackdown, some criminal elements in China 
devise means to sneak out of the country. The Dehong Border 
Detachment has succeeded in obtaining the extradition from Burma 
of several economic swindlers and criminals who escaped from 
China carrying public funds." 
<H5>  Strong Contingent Receives a Rousing Welcome </H5>
  A large tree farm stands in the Yunnan border region where 
Wenshan and Honghe prefectures meet. One fall, a gang of 
criminals banded together to fell this government timber using 
armed force. They drove away the local forestry bureau personnel 
and work came to a standstill. Slogans reading "Smash the 
Forestry Bureau" appeared here and there. Each day more than 30 
large trucks, each truck carrying more than 20 scoundrels, 
forcibly entered the tree farm to haul away timber in a display 
of swollen arrogance. At the time, the looting of state property 
and the destruction of state facilities also occurred elsewhere 
throughout the country. Consequently, the armed felling of 
timber in a state tree park in Yunnan gained the serious 
attention of State Council leaders who directed that Yunnan 
resolve this distant incident with all possible speed. After 
studying the problem, the Yunnan Provincial CPC Committee and 
provincial government ordered the Yunnan Border Defense 
Headquarters to send troops within 24 hours to designated sites. 
The Border Defense Headquarters urgently wired orders to the 
Wenshan and Honghe border detachments to deploy 300 crack troops 
along a line. At the same time, it ordered the Wenshan, Honghe 
and nearby border detachments on full combat alert. 
  The commander of the Border Defense Headquarters who was the 
deputy commander in charge of this action, Zhou Rupeng, and the 
officers and men of the Wenshan and Honghe detachments moved 
upon receipt of the first alert. Nineteen hours later, blockades 
were in place at all entrances into the forest area, and six 
guard units began to publicize policy and the law at their guard 
locations. Within three hours, they successfully controlled all 
vehicle entry into the forest area, and brought to justice the 
marauding criminals. The lunar New Year was fast approaching, 
but border defense officers and men worked together with 
forestry bureau comrades and forestry public security cadres and 
policy to rectify public order in the forest area. Zhou Rupeng 
and more than 300 border defense officers and men spent that 
lunar New Year in the forest area. Provincial CPC committee 
secretary, Pu Chaozhu, personally drafted a congratulatory 
telegram to comfort the border defense officers and men. 
Provincial CPC committee and provincial government leaders 
praised the border defense headquarters as a reliable, useful, 
mobile, and superb corps. 
  During July and August 1992, the Yunnan Border Defense 
Headquarters received orders to take part in a "tough crackdown" 
campaign in Pingyuan Prefecture, and it was responsible for an 
attack mission in combat. In order to reduce casualties, the 
headquarters made military deployments and conducted special 
combat preparedness training. Before dawn on 31 August, 20 small 
combat teams made up of border defense officers and men and 
public security cadres and police, led by border defense 
officers and men who were familiar with the terrain, entered 
designated areas under cover of darkness. At exactly 6:00 a.m., 
when a red signal flare went up, the 20 small teams 
simultaneously fell upon criminal elements rounding up a whole 
gang of criminals in one fell swoop. 
  The Pingyuan street campaign had been fought very well, only 
three of the officers and men of the border defense units 
suffering injuries, and no one killed. [passage omitted] 
  Virtually everyone knows that the Sino-Burmese border 
adjoins 
the world-renowned drug producing area, the "golden triangle." 
International narcotics peddlers use countless schemes to open a 
"China channel." Gun running and narcotic selling flow from the 
same source, causing a precipitous increase in the dangerousness 
of drug seizures. Trafficking in 50 grams of heroin is a crime 
punishable by death. In order to protect their lives and make a 
profit, drug peddlers may open fire and put up strong 
resistance. In 1993, Yunnan border defense troops fought 24 
battles with armed drug peddling gangs, winning every time and 
delivering savage blows to the swollen arrogance of the drug 
peddling gangs. On one occasion, Gao Guanglun, the headquarters 
commander, personally led officers and men on the investigation 
of a drug smuggling case. They fought skirmishes with the 
criminals for more than a month, finally rounding up in one fell 
swoop the criminals from outside China. They captured 11 
criminals and seized 30,000 grams of heroin, and HK$1.5 million 
and more than 400,000 renminbi in drug money. 
  In 1993, the Yunnan Border Defense Headquarters seized more 
than 755 kilograms of heroin and more than 743 kilograms of 
opium. It also captured more than 1560 army rifles, more than 
40,000 rounds of rifle ammunition, and nearly 4,000 hand 
grenades. In addition it confiscated more than 16,000 
pornographic recordings and pictures. It also seized some 
smuggled gold, platinum and precious stones. It freed more than 
100 women who had been kidnapped for sale abroad, and it tracked 
down and arrested more than 3,400 people involved in 500 cases 
of flight. 
  Deep Feelings Dissolved in Ruili Jiang 
  Reform and opening to the outside world brought 
unprecedented affluence to the vicinity of the border cities of 
Mangshi, Wanding, and Ruili. One high building after another has 
been built, shops and guest houses abound, and there is a 
dazzling array of goods. On the streets, a tide of people 
surges, and traffic is heavy. 
  "We control the border through a combination of manning 
particular points, setting up lines, and conducting patrols 
through the whole area. Border public security inspection 
stations have set up checkpoints on the main thoroughfares in 
the forward border control area. They use an all-weather on-duty 
system, and they have instituted a general vehicle search and 
verification to interdict criminal elements. Border work 
stations have increased armed patrols, roadblocks, and ambushes 
along the border to control the line. Border work (inspection) 
stations have also increased controls at entry points and on 
cross-border roads to maintain the arrival and departure order. 
Public security posts control society along the border. They 
have improved public order at public places such as stations and 
hotels, and control over the general population, the transient 
population, and the temporarily domiciled population, thereby 
forming a complete border defense control network." This is what 
Yunnan Border Headquarters commander Zhou Rupeng told us. 
  At the Simao Prefecture border line and in the triangular 
area where Vietnam, Laos, and Burma abut China, land and water 
routes are continuous, and there are numerous highways and 
ferries one may take to enter or leave China. These have always 
been places where smugglers, drug traffickers, and all sorts of 
criminals have sneaked in and out. Border defense detachments in 
these places feel that it is not enough to depend on border 
defense units to exercise control. We must take the approach 
of relying on the public to control the border. First, these 
detachments sent propaganda teams into village streets, fields, 
and hamlets along the boarder to conduct general indoctrination 
of the public to improve the public's consciousness about border 
control regulations. They used this as the first step in setting 
up public "border control teams headed by township and village 
cadres." For small roads away from villages, they sent guard 
teams to institute control. Thanks to these efforts, a fine 
situation of "three fews and three manys" emerged: the number of 
people leaving the country without having been inspected or 
registered were few, the number of people who submitted them 
self to border defense inspection were many; the number of 
foreigners entering China without permission to conduct 
activities was few, and the number of those entering and leaving 
through designated entry and exit points where they completed 
procedures were many; the number of people violating border 
control regulations were few, and the number abiding by the law 
and consciously supporting border controls were many. 
  The border defense officers and men not only discharge the 
heavy duty of guarding the border and protecting the country, 
but they also regard the area they garrison like their hometown, 
treat the people like their father and mother, and willingly 
accept the task of helping the public extricate themselves from 
difficult circumstances, escape from poverty and become wealthy. 
  The masses have begun to get wealthy. No longer need they 
worry about having sufficient food and clothing. They have also 
raised money for a joint border defense unit, doing all possible 
to help the border defense headquarters do its work well. Hence, 
one hears of case after case of joint police and people defense 
and criminals being caught. One young person who had a plan to 
flee from China by floating downstream on a raft was seized by 
the public in Guanlei Village and sent to the border defense 
work station. During the past several years, the public alone 
has caught more than 100 law breakers. 
  Who are the most beloved people in this western Yunnan 
region? It is those who guard the border and defend the nation 
who are worthy of this name. Through their own behavior, they 
have built a bridge that bonds them with the flesh and blood of 
the people. They practice "a common destiny, breathing with, and 
linking heart to heart" with the people. The breaking of many 
large drug trafficking cases in the southwestern border region 
has depended on the leads that the public has provided. [passage 
omitted] 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20409 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar026___94021" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-026 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  21 February 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> REGIONAL </F>
<F P=101> EAST REGION </F>
<H3> <TI>   Unemployment in Shandong Increases in 1993 </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Unemployment in Shandong Increases in 1993 </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94CE0409A Jinan DAZHONG RIBAO in Chinese 21 Feb 94 p 1 </F>
<F P=103> 94CE0409A </F>
<F P=104>  Jinan DAZHONG RIBAO </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article: "With Growing Numbers of Unemployed and Sharp Job </F>
Competition, Shandong's Job Prospects Are Not Optimistic"] 
  [Text] As enterprise operating forces are being converted 
and reform of our labor employment system is being steadily 
intensified, Shandong's urban job prospects for 1994 are not 
optimistic. 
  Shandong's grim job prospects for 1994 can be seen mainly 
in: 
1) The numbers of urban unemployed are growing. By the end of 
1993, Shandong had 236,000 urban unemployed due to structural 
conversion, up 54,000 from 1992 which, in addition to the normal 
increase in unemployment in 1994, will push our 1994 
unemployment above that of previous years. 2) The numbers of 
unemployed employees are up. Along with market changes and 
industrial structural adjustment, certain enterprises will go 
bankrupt or shut down, sharply increasing the numbers of 
unemployed employees in 1994. Meanwhile, the unemployed will be 
older and less able to find new jobs. 3) As reform intensifies, 
the urban-rural and regional limitations on labor mobility will 
be breached which, in addition to certain enterprises wanting to 
employ the rural workforce, will decrease the job opportunities 
for the urban unemployed. 4) Along with property rights system 
reform, industrial structural adjustment, and technological 
upgrading, the number of workers recruited by enterprises from 
society will be down from previous years. 
  Our unemployment problem will be solved mainly through 
economic growth. The sustained, rapid, and sound growth of 
Shandong's economy will create many favorable job prospects. 
While tertiary industries, township enterprises, and FIEs are 
growing particularly fast, all providing certain job 
opportunities, we will still have to rely mainly on jobseekers 
facing up to their situation, by correctly understanding our 
national employment policy, acting in line with market demand, 
and improving their own skills and increasing their competitive 
awareness to find jobs in line with their own qualifications. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20410 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar026___94022" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-026 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  19 February 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> REGIONAL </F>
<F P=101> EAST REGION </F>
<H3> <TI>   Shandong Promulgates Economic Regulations </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Shandong Promulgates Economic Regulations </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94CE0409B Jinan DAZHONG RIBAO in Chinese 19 Feb 94 p 1 </F>
<F P=103> 94CE0409B </F>
<F P=104>  Jinan DAZHONG RIBAO </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Li Yuhai (2621 3768 3189): "To Ensure the </F>
Establishment of a Market Economy and Promote Sound Economic 
Growth, Shandong Has Speeded Up Its Pace of Local Legislation, 
with the Shandong People's Congress Standing Committee Drawing 
Up and Ratifying 30 Local Laws and Regulations in 1993"] 
  [Text] Shandong's Eighth People's Congress Standing 
Committee has adapted to the needs of Shandong's rapid economic 
growth and establishment of a socialist market economy, by 
steadily speeding up its pace of local legislation, particularly 
economic legislation. Since its change of session in early 
1993, it has drawn up 14 local laws and regulations, and 
approved 16 local laws and regulations drawn up by the three 
cities of Jinan, Qingdao, and Zibo. 
  The establishment and perfection of socialist market economy 
operating forces has to rely on a corresponding market economy 
legal system for guidance, standardization, guarantees, and 
restraints. The Shandong People's Congress Standing Committee 
has steadily freed up its thinking and revamped its legislative 
concepts, making its prime mission legislative work, 
particularly economic legislation. Shandong People's Congress 
Standing Committee Chairman Li Zhen [2621 2182] [former Shandong 
Vice Governor] has repeatedly emphasized the need to adapt to 
the needs of rapid economic growth, by using the spirit of 
reform to do a good job of local legislation. The Shandong 
People's Congress Standing Committee, in order to build as 
quickly as possible the basic framework of a market economy 
legal system throughout Shandong, so that there will be laws to 
follow in the key areas of reform, opening, and economic 
development throughout Shandong, has held two local legislative 
symposiums, which specially studied the new situations and 
issues posed to local legislation by a market economy, and 
explored innovative legislative thinking under the new 
conditions. Based on extensive investigation and study, and 
numerous changes in their drafts, they set the Standing 
Committee's 1993 legislative plans and Shandong's five-year 
legislative program, acting in line with market economy 
development needs, by setting forth legislative items to provide 
for future legislative objectives and missions. 
  They first proceeded from Shandong's realities, by promptly 
drawing up local laws and regulations, such as the "Shandong 
Statistics Regulations," the "Management Regulations for the 
Qingdao Duty-Free Zone in Shandong," and the "Management 
Regulations for Shandong's Establishment of Project Bidding," to 
accomplish matters, such as standardizing market subjects, 
preserving market order, and tightening macroeconomic regulation 
and control, in order to promote sound market economy 
development. Directed at the "development zone and real estate 
fevers," they drew up and approved legislation, such as the 
"Shandong Regulations on the Sale and Transfer of Urban 
State-Owned Land Use Rights," and the "Management Regulations on 
Urban Real Estate Transactions in Qingdao City." To adapt to the 
needs of the rapid growth of reform, opening, and foreign 
investment throughout Shandong, they drew up and approved 
economic laws and regulations involving foreigners, such as the 
"Shandong Management Regulations on Economic and Technological 
Development Zones," the "Shandong Management Regulations on 
Enterprise Registration in Economic and Technological 
Development Zones," and the "Labor Management Regulations for 
Qingdao FIEs." 
  To improve legislative quality and make local laws and 
regulations more serviceable, the Shandong People's Congress 
Standing Committee conducted bold explorations in areas, such as 
reforming local legislative systems and procedures, and 
broadening legislative channels, which breached the local 
legislative fetters of "empirical maturation and policy 
finalization," to achieve legislative leadership and foresight. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20411 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar026___94001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-026 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  24 February 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> NATIONAL AFFAIRS, POLICY </F>
<H3> <TI>   Number of Domestic Enterprises Increasing Rapidly </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Number of Domestic Enterprises Increasing Rapidly </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94CE0346A Beijing JINGJI RIBAO in Chinese 24 Feb 94 p 1 </F>
<F P=103> 94CE0346A </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing JINGJI RIBAO </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by JINGJI RIBAO reporter Li Zhengping (2621 3630 </F>
1627): "Number of Domestic-Funded Enterprises Increasing Rapidly 
-- a Trend Shown by Latest Statistics From State Administration 
of Industry and Commerce"] 
  [Text] Even more eye-catching than the rapid increase of 
the number of enterprises with foreign investments in the year 
of 1993 which had just passed was the vigorous growth of various 
types of domestic-funded enterprises in China. The latest 
statistics compiled by the State Administration of Industry and 
Commerce shows that as of the end of 1993, the number of 
registered domestic-funded enterprises in China reached 7.287 
million, an increase of 1.465 million over 1992. The number of 
employees working for such enterprises in 1993 totaled 252.5 
million, a growth of 40 million over 1992. The registered 
capital of such enterprises in 1993 totaled 4,235.85 billion 
yuan, a net increase of 1,456.28 billion yuan over 1992. This 
was another year of rapid growth for various types of 
enterprises after 1992. 
  According to an analysis conducted by authoritative sources, 
domestic-funded enterprises showed the following characteristics 
in their development during 1993: 
  -- The number of new enterprises continued to grow, while 
the 
number of enterprises which canceled their registration was also 
on the rise. During 1993, the number of newly opened and 
registered enterprises in China totaled 1.834 million, an 
increase of 581,000 or 46.4 percent over 1992. Sichuan was the 
province which witnessed the greatest number of such enterprises 
-- 655,000. The number of such enterprises which canceled their 
registration was on the rise since the sharp drop in 1992. The 
number of such enterprises which canceled their registration 
reached 341,000 in 1993, an increase of 83,000 or 32.2 percent 
over 1992. Most of the enterprises which canceled their 
registration were in the fields of industry, commerce, banking 
and insurance. The increase in the number of enterprises which 
canceled their registration reflected sharp market competition. 
  -- The rate of growth for enterprises under joint management 
and those of other economic groupings remained high, while that 
for collectively owned enterprises in various townships was 
dropping. The rate of growth for state-owned and collectively 
owned enterprises was not rapid. The rate of growth for 
collectively owned township enterprises in 1993 dropped by 1.8 
percent, while that for enterprises under joint management and 
those of other economic groupings rose by 21 percent as compared 
with 1992. 
  -- All three major industries grew in general with the 
growth of the tertiary industry ahead of the other two. In the 
tertiary industry, scientific research and overall technical 
services saw the fastest growth of 84.9 percent. Growth in 
transportation and communications, post and telecommunication, 
banking and insurance was less remarkable. 
  -- As far as the ownership system is concerned, collectively 
own companies, those in joint operations and those of other 
economic groupings developed rapidly. The growth of state-owned 
companies was relatively slow. The number of state-owned 
companies totaled 383,000 in 1993, an increase of 78.1 percent 
over 1992. The number of collectively owned companies totaled 
602,000 and that of companies under joint operation and those of 
other economic groupings totaled 54,000, marking increases of 
139.8 percent and 157.6 percent respectively. If we view the 
share of these companies in all enterprises, these companies 
accounted for 19.6 percent of the total number of state-owned 
enterprises. They accounted for 11.7 percent of the total number 
of collectively owned enterprises, while they accounted for 30 
percent of the total number of enterprises under joint operation 
and those of other economic groupings. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20412 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar026___94002" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-026 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  21 February 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> NATIONAL AFFAIRS, POLICY </F>
<H3> <TI>   Retail Sales Registers Growth in 1993 </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Retail Sales Registers Growth in 1993 </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94CE0346B Beijing JINGJI CANKAO BAO in Chinese 21 Feb 94 p 2 </F>
<F P=103> 94CE0346B </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing JINGJI CANKAO BAO </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article Ding Ding (0002 0002): "Retail Sales Registered </F>
Highest Growth in 1993 -- Information from Ministry of Internal 
Trade"] 
  [Text] According to the latest information from the 
Ministry of Internal Trade, China's commodity market witnessed 
rapid growth and brisk vitality in 1993. The total value of 
retail sales reached 1,359.3 billion yuan in 1993, an increase 
of 23.6 percent over 1992, of which the total value of retail 
sales of consumer goods reached 1,223.7 billion yuan, up 26.1 
percent over 1992. This was the year of highest growth since 
1988. 
  A responsible comrade of the Ministry of Internal Trade 
pointed out that the entire commodity market was imbued with 
significant changes and that a large number of people were 
buying consumer goods of higher grades in 1993. 
  -- There are three stages of significant changes on the 
commodity market during 1993. The market was brisk in sales 
during the first half of the year with the rate of growth 
increasing by each month. The total value of retail sales during 
the first quarter of 1993 rose by 16.2 percent and that in June 
reached 28.4 percent as compared with the corresponding periods 
in 1992. The total value of retail sales fell since the 
beginning of the third quarter. It fell by 6.8 percent in 
September and 7.3 percent in October over the June figure. The 
total value of sales of consumer goods again rose since the 
beginning of November. The total value of retail sales in 
November 1993 rose by 22.9 percent and that of December by 35.3 
percent as compared with the corresponding month in 1992. 
  The gap between the total value of sales of commodities 
manufactured by enterprises of different economic groupings and 
in different districts had widened. The rate of growth of the 
total value of sales in coastal areas rose by more than 29 
percent, while that in inland provinces increased by 18 percent 
-- a difference of 11 percent. The rate of growth of the total 
value of sales in the urban market rose by 31.2 percent, while 
that at and below the county level increased by 19.5 percent -- 
a difference of 11.7 percent. In terms of economic groupings, 
the total value of retail sales of the state-owned economic 
sector rose by 18.9 percent, that of collectively owned economic 
sector by 16.4 percent, that of the joint ventures by 15 
percent, and that of the individual economic sector by 37.8 
percent. The total value of retail sales of the state-owned 
economic sector was 26.1 percent and 18.9 percent lower than 
that of the joint ventures and that of the individual economic 
sector respectively. 
  -- Urban and rural residents bought more consumer goods of 
higher grades. The urban and rural residents' income rose in 
general in 1993. They had notably bought more expensive consumer 
goods. They selected better food to eat, clothing of famous 
brands to wear and consumer goods of higher quality to use. They 
preferred nutritious and high-quality food which was good for 
their health. They consumed less staple food, while eating more 
non-staple food. In clothing, they cared new and fashionable 
styles and personal tastes. In consumer goods, they paid 
attention to famous brands, high-quality, extra functions and 
extra fine grades. They particularly loved to buy expensive 
durable consumer goods. 
  -- Most of the consumer goods are abundant in supply, while 
there was a shortage of farm and sideline products. According to 
a survey conducted by the Ministry of Internal Trade over 731 
varieties of commodities, 74 varieties of such commodities were 
in shortage, accounting for 10 percent of the total volume of 
commodities. This figures was 1.3 percent lower than that in the 
previous year. There is a slightly larger supply of manufactured 
goods for daily use than demand, and the supply of major staple 
and non-staple food is basically stable. However, the supply of 
commodities such as cotton, edible oil, sugar and pork was 
slightly tight. The main reason was that the output of cotton, 
rape seeds, sugar crops and other farm and sideline products 
dropped, and there were less hogs on hand. 
  -- Producer goods for farming are less marketable. However, 
there was a large-scale turn for the better at the end of 1993. 
The total value of retail sales of producer goods for farming 
reached 135.56 billion yuan, an increase of 5.2 percent as 
compared with 1992. However, the value of retail sales was 
actually down if price increases were taken into account. The 
total value of sales of chemical fertilizer dropped by 18.2 
percent, that of insecticide by 6.3 percent, and that of plastic 
films for farming by 24.9 percent. Tremendous changes took place 
on the market of producer goods for farming in December. The 
total value of retail sales of producer goods for farming 
reached 13.47 billion yuan during that month, marking an 
increase of 34.3 percent over the corresponding period in 1992 
and up nearly 30 percent over that in November. 
  -- Commodity prices rose on a fairly large scale. Residents 
were anticipating the price increases. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20413 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar026___94003" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-026 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  15 February 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> NATIONAL AFFAIRS, POLICY </F>
<H3> <TI>   Wu Jinglian on State Enterprise Reform, Shareholding </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Wu Jinglian on State Enterprise Reform, Shareholding </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94CE0429A Beijing JINGJI GONGZUO TONGXUN [ECONOMIC WORK 
NEWSLETTER] in Chinese No 2, 30 Jan; No 3, 15 Feb 94 </F>

<F P=103> 94CE0429A </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing JINGJI GONGZUO TONGXUN [ECONOMIC WORK 
NEWSLETTER] </F>

<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article in two installments by Wu Jinglian (0702 2417 </F>
8834), [executive director of] and researcher at the State 
Council Economic, Technological, and Social Development Research 
Center: "Reform and Incorporation of Large and Midsize State 
Enterprises"] 
<H5>  [30 Jan pp 12-14] </H5>
  [Excerpt] [passage omitted] 
  As to what constitutes a modern enterprise system, there is 
a 
sharp lack of consensus. Since the mid-1980s to the present, 
opinions on this have varied in an ever more confusing trend. 
While the current "Resolution" ["CPC Central Committee 
Resolution on Certain Issues Involved in Establishing a 
Socialist Market Economy"] explains the rules for a modern 
enterprise system, laying down the civil obligations of a 
company's overall corporate assets, which is a crucial 
breakthrough in reform theory and policy, each has his own 
formula as to what actually constitutes a corporate-assets 
system. So while we have made a great breakthrough, to a 
modern enterprise system, we need to clarify fully what this 
actually means. In brief, a modern enterprise system is a 
modern corporate system, which involves two essentials: 1) It 
is a corporate system, established on the grounds of a 
corporate-assets system. A corporation [legal person] is a legal 
concept in contrast to a natural [ziran ren] person, with a 
corporation being not a person, but rather an organization. 
Such an organization is an independent legal subject, with the 
same rights and obligations as a natural person, having the same 
civil rights and liabilities, and the ability to sign contracts 
and bring and respond to lawsuits. 2) It is operated and 
managed by a corporate-administered structure (in the West 
called administration, or control and management). The functions 
of controlling and managing an enterprise can be undertaken only 
by a natural person with awareness and will, while a corporation 
is an abstract concept without awareness and will, which can be 
administered only by a natural person governed by an 
organizational structure. This organizational-structure system 
is called by Western economists a corporate administrative 
structure. This structure is composed of the three parts of 
shareholder meetings, a board of directors, and an executive 
body (generally an executive committee of executive officers 
headed by the president [general manager]). Shareholder 
meetings entrust assets to the board of directors, which 
operates them through management personnel. This is the 
so-called "tripartite" system. Executive personnel are 
restricted by the board of directors, which exercises supreme 
decisionmaking power, as well as being restricted by shareholder 
meetings, which are the corporation's supreme organ of power. 
These two points are the most crucial features of a modern 
corporate system. [passage omitted] 
<H5>  [15 Feb pp 14-16] </H5>
  [Excerpts] In light of our experimental shareholding-system 
experience over the past decade, the establishment in China of a 
modern enterprise system, or a modern corporate system, has 
encountered several difficult problems. 1) The first difficult 
problem is the difficulty involved in property-rights 
demarcation. Changing our former system of nationalization to 
unify the whole country to a corporate-assets system involves 
ideological and technical difficulties, as well as the real 
difficulty of changing while considering vested interests. 2) 
The second difficulty is that involved in the process of 
establishing a corporate administrative structure. If we do 
not dovetail well our current cadre structure with a corporate 
administrative structure for companies, things will remain as 
before, making it impossible to establish relations of 
respective obligations and rights with mutual restrictions among 
shareholder meetings, boards of directors, and general managers. 
I once went to a foreign trade company, where I was told that 
cadres above the department level all needed higher-level 
authorization. This is not the case in a corporate 
administrative structure. 3) The third difficulty is how to 
deal with the historical-burden issues that have been unresolved 
for so long. Our historical burdens are mainly three: A) The 
loan problem, with execssive-debt operations unable to repay 
debts owed to banks. Debt burdens from previous contract 
periods are carried over and hung onto following contract 
periods, accumulating to the point where they are hard to 
resolve. B) Another is the social security matter, with social 
security actually being a type of savings. In our past big-pot 
system, social security costs were turned over to state revenue 
through profits and taxes, then converted to state capital for 
reinvestment, to form certain new factories. It should be 
pointed out that as part of current state-enterprise assets were 
established on the grounds of state liability to elderly 
employees, they should be returned to their ownership in a 
suitable form. Enterprises now conducting assets appraisals 
have not considered this part. So once social security is 
socialized and foundationed, former employees will not receive 
social security payments, which the state will be unable to 
assume either. C) In addition, there is the issue of an 
enterprise-run society. So we need to find ways to solve these 
problems. 
  The first problem is how to establish a 
public-ownership-dominated corporate-assets system. 
  1. How are former state assets to be converted to 
state-share 
property, and what agency will represent this share property? 
The State Council representation as stated in the "Resolution" 
is too abstract, and we will eventually need a very specific 
agency as executor. The poor resolution of this matter shows 
up as our corporate-system transformation not having "bosses" to 
take charge, leaving the "working" plant managers and factory 
directors in charge, which is called "role reversal." 2) Current 
state assets are generally all undervalued due to existing 
problems in our current assets-appraisal theory, such as some 
being assessed at original value, others at net value, and 
inaccuracies in fact even when assessed at replacement value. 
An enterprise's asset value should be based on its 
profitmaking capability. This, of course, involves certain 
difficulties, as our lack of a capital market makes evaluation 
hard. We do not have enough professional agencies to do this 
work, with these agencies subject to existing problems in 
assets-organization form. U.S. law stipulates that legal and 
accounting agencies may not run companies, at most being allowed 
to form partnerships, to have unlimited liability. While lawyers 
and accountants earn much money, once they make a mistake, they 
can lose a family fortune in paying for it. 
  I hold that our State Administration of State Property 
should 
assume a function similar to the German Trusteeship Office, 
acting as the representative of former owners, with all 
unconverted-system assets belonging to it, and it being in 
charge of the system conversion from state ownership to a modern 
corporate system. The system conversion could be done in a 
simple or complex way. The simple way would be after evaluation, 
to transfer state share rights to certain newly established, 
mutually competitive state holding companies. The complex way 
would be through auctioning, with the former bosses' 
representative (the trusteeship office) selling their share 
rights to other parties (holding companies). The money would all 
be transferred within national limits, with the purchasing money 
being provided by the state, and the sale money also having to 
be turned over to the state. The competitive process would 
make assets appraisals more accurate, bringing share prices 
nearer to real prices. This would differ from that in East 
Europe and the CIS, where the auctioning was to individuals, 
using instead a public-to-public approach, with this public 
being new property owners, such as holding and investment 
companies. While the "money" used in the auctioning process 
could also be separated from the existing monetary system, using 
stock-rights certificates as in East European countries, the 
stock-rights certificates would be issued not to individuals, 
but rather to newly established companies. 
  This is all about how to deal with the state-property 
problem 
in the incorporation, system-conversion process, or to resolve 
the matter of the part combined between the government as the 
public-ownership representative and enterprises. In which case, 
how to deal with the issue of debt-formed enterprise assets is 
actually also one of dealing simultaneously with overevaluation. 
All who have learned double-entry bookkeeping tenets know that 
assets = liabilities + capital, or assets - debts = net assets = 
capital. This takes care of the state-share part. But 
another problem is that it includes debt, some of which needs 
turned into stock rights, with bank debt becoming stock rights. 
So when evaluating assets, while it may seem that the 
evaluated assets equal overall capital, this is not so. 
  The money previously paid by former employees has turned in 
government hands into enterprise assets. So if this debt is 
not separated out in the current assets appraisals, where will 
these former employees go to get their money in the future? 
And who will be able to assume this debt? So while this part 
of state liability to former employees will certainly have to be 
separated out from assets in the incorporation process, who will 
it be separated out to? It will be given to foundations, with 
both stock rights and liabilities being given to foundations and 
stock rights being salable and purchasable, as they are a part 
of funds anyhow. 
  In addition, the current situaton of industrial and 
commercial enterprises being generally short of registered 
capital, so dependant on bank loans to get by, also needs 
resolved. This needs to be dealt with by the former owners' 
representative (as suggested above, the trusteeship sector--the 
State Administration of State Property). I hold that three 
methods based on respective circumstances can be used to deal 
with it: some assets have absolutely no impact, so should be 
appraised and sold. The remaining debt-formed assets could be 
dealt with in two ways: some could be maintained as bank debt; 
some bank creditor rights could be turned into bank stock 
rights, to become bank holdings. This would involve mainly 
whether banks chose the British-U.S. system or the 
German-Japanese one. While banks cannot hold stocks in the 
British-U.S. system, they all can in the German-Japanese one, 
with Japanese banks being the most important shareholder, called 
the host bank. While we currently do not allow banks to hold 
stocks, which is clearly stipulated in the current tightening of 
macroeconomic control, we need to decide which system we will 
finally choose. The current general trend in the U.S. is that 
not allowing bank shareholding is wrong. Of course, bank 
shareholding has its own problem, that if the holding capital 
funds are not separated out from bank credit capital funds, they 
may affect bank assets quality. So while allowing banks to 
hold stocks, bank working capital--loan capital funds, need 
separated from holding capital funds. 
  Once we accomplish the abovementioned two reforms to make 
stock rights of creditor rights, many new forms of public 
ownership will appear. 1) All types of social security funds. 
While their ultimate owners, beneficiaries, will be 
individuals, these individuals will be not decentralized, but 
rather joined together. Should such funds jointly established 
by many individuals be called public or private ownership? They 
are of course public ownership. The amount of such funds in a 
modern society is extremely large in scale. Shares held by U.S. 
pension and common funds make up over one-half of the capital of 
large corporations. 2) Bank shareholdings. Bank shareholding is 
the same in nature as mutual shareholding by other enterprises, 
in that if the bank itself has mostly public shares, its nature 
per se is the public economy. So after reform, the public form 
will no longer be the same, being mainly not public ownership, 
but rather publicly organized shareholding within definite 
limits by diverse representatives of all types. 
  A current view in academic circles is that corporate 
shareholding cannot solve the problem, as using one's own money 
differs from using others' money, so that it is only the 
division to the individual that makes shareholders pay attention 
to capital operations. I hold that this view is too simplistic. 
In the development of all countries throughout the world to the 
present, in no country has natural-person shareholding become 
dominant. Of the major countries with market economies, 
pension and common funds dominate in the United States and 
Britain, accounting for 60 percent, while other corporate 
shareholding dominates in Japan and Germany, in which banks play 
a great role. In Japan, over 70 percent of major corporate 
stocks are controlled by other companies. When in Tokyo, 
Geoffrey Sachs, a Harvard University privatization advisor to 
East Europe and the CIS, responded to questions in this area. 
He said that turning all large corporations into individual 
shareholdings is certainly not the ultimate aim of or ideal 
model for reform. But to break the state monopoly on property 
rights, the best method is to divide up the cards. Any 
division method can be used to cut the Gordian knot. Once 
divided, markets will naturally help to form a good structure. 
Decentralization from state monopoly to shareholding by every 
natural person is a transition, in which stock rights will be 
gradually pooled. I hold that if we can move directly from our 
current state to a corrporate system in which corporate 
shareholding dominates, supplemented by individual 
shareholding, this will minimize the social impact, not 
necessarily going through the individual transition. If a 
particular method is most efficient, more suited to our social 
ideals, and more publicly sustainable, what could be wrong with 
it? Of course, if we do not have the skills or are ineffective 
at making a smooth conversion from public ownership to corporate 
shareholding companies, economic development laws will force us 
to the detour of first dividing up public assets to individual 
pockets. This is because the establishment of a modern 
enterprise system is not subject to shifts of will, to operate 
in a conscious or guided way, but rather occurs spontaneously. 
In fact, state assets are now being converted every day, with 
many being shifted to individual pockets. Of course, we cannot 
say that the disintegration of the former public ownership to 
unify the whole country is necessarily a bad thing. "Erosion" 
is not judgmental, occurring in each case according to 
respective laws. But I am very concerned that the current 
erosion might cause social problems. This is because increasing 
numbers of people, particularly grass-roots comrades, perceive 
that public assets are flowing to those with power and 
influence, while they are becoming a so-called "nouveau-pauve 
class." A comrade who works in a central research institute 
tells me that if this goes on, three to five years will bring a 
tiny group of rich millionaires along with hundreds of millions 
of paupers. While this may be overdoing it a bit, we need to 
note that a large gap betwen rich and poor can touch off social 
and political problems. 
  If property and stock rights are not clearly delimited, 
corporate assets are not established, and these problems are not 
resolved, we will remain all eating out of the one big pot, with 
our management personnel not subject to the ultimate restraint 
of the owners, and a modern enterprise system impossible to 
establish. Even if we establish corporations, it will be 
impossible to operate them very well. As stated above, 
property-rights restraint is the ultimate restraint, without 
which things do not work, and even good management personnel 
turn bad in just a few days. [passage omitted] 
  The second incorporation difficulty is the conflict between 
our current personnel appointment and dismissal system and the 
establishment principles for a corporate administrative 
structure. The international standard for corporate 
organization is that the owners (shareholders) transfer assets 
to the trusteeship of the board of directors, which represents 
the shareholders in managing assets. While the board of 
directors has full decisionmaking power from general policies 
and principles to executive personnel, such as presidents, when 
there is dereliction of duty or betrayal of trust, any 
shareholder can take action against the board of directors. 
Boards of directors appoint chief executive officers [CEOs], 
including presidents and vice presidents, with it being 
alright at times for board chairmen to serve as presidents. 
While boards of directors in the United States generally meet 
once a month, they meet less often in Europe. The chief duties 
of boards of directors are to formulate general policies and 
principles and oversee CEOs, such as presidents. While these 
executive officers have obligations and rights, deciding 
everything from investment to production, they are also subject 
to strict restraints, basically in three areas: 1) 
product-market competitive restraints; 2) capital-market 
competitive restraints (the most recent studies have come to the 
conclusion that share price changes have little restraining 
impact, while takeovers and buyouts have slightly more); 3) the 
established most effective restraint is the management-market 
competitive restraint. Regretably, this is a market that we have 
not established. Should we choose managers from the management 
market or appoint them from the organizational or personnel 
sectors? I hold that as a corporation is not a government 
organization, but rather an enterprise, management personnel 
appointments should firmly follow international standards for 
the corporate system. A current concern is that without 
control, there will be no future political control, which is not 
necessarily so. For instance, in Singapore, while the ruling 
party controls the government very well, senior responsible 
appointments in large corporations are completely according to 
international practice, with government control of boards of 
directors. But to strengthen appointment of directors for 
all-government-funded corporations, the government has a 
bureau-level director-appointment commission, chaired by the 
finance minister, and whose first member is Deputy Prime 
Minister Li Hsien Loong. Appointments of subordinate-company 
directors is left to shareholding corporation boards of 
directors, with certainly no signs that this method weakens 
ruling-party leadership. Strengthening party leadership, by 
adhering to the people's democratic dictatorship, and separating 
the party, the government, and enterprises, are two principles 
adhered to by Comrade Deng Xiaoping. This matter needs 
discussion by all. 
  In addition, making stock rights out of creditor rights 
discharges certain burdens, while creating new forms of public 
ownership. This merits much attention. If the socialist system 
is to stand, it must recreate its property-rights system, so 
that it conforms to the property-rights socialization principle, 
while not being hampered by traditional public-ownership 
concepts. As how to establish a modern enterprise system 
grounded in the dominance of public ownership is a theoretical 
and policy matter of fundamental significance, it needs joint 
study by all. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20414 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar026___94004" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-026 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  30 November 1993 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> PROVINCIAL </F>
<H3> <TI>   Survey of 11 Enterprises in Anhui </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Survey of 11 Enterprises in Anhui </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94CE0345A Beijing GUOJI MAOYI WENTI [INTERNATIONAL TRADE 
JOURNAL] in Chinese No 11, 30 Nov 93 pp 59-63 </F>

<F P=103> 94CE0345A </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing GUOJI MAOYI WENTI [INTERNATIONAL TRADE 
JOURNAL] </F>

<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Chen Zhenji (7115 2182 1015) from Consulting </F>
Group on Technology and Trade of Ministry of Foreign Economic 
Relations and Trade and Tang Chuanfeng (3282 0278 6912) from 
University of Foreign Economic Relations and Trade: "Report on 
Survey of 11 Enterprises in Anhui"] 
  [Text] Enterprises are the main bodies of various economic 
activities. The development of enterprises, particularly the 
large and medium-sized ones, directly affect the growth of our 
overall economy and the realization of the "four modernization" 
program. Therefore, how to invigorate large and medium-sized 
enterprises is a major event of universal concern in the whole 
country. With regard to this issue, we carry out some 
investigation and studies in some prefectures and cities such as 
Hefei, Chuzhou, Wuhu and Xuancheng from April to May this year. 
We called on the leading comrades of the Anhui provincial 
committee on economic affairs and trading and the aforementioned 
prefectural and city committees in this connection, visited a 
number of factories and enterprises, tried to understand the 
situation in the development and analyze the existing problems 
of 11 plants and companies including the Chang Jiang Electric 
Appliance Group Corporation and the Hefei Fork Lift Plant, and 
held discussion meetings with relevant plant directors and 
managers. We now summarize the situation as follows: 
<H5>  I. Some Enterprises' Good Experience in Developing Themselves </H5>
  1. They attach importance to the role of science and 
technology in developing themselves. 
  Anhui is originally fairly backward economically and 
technologically. The scientific and technological standards of 
most of the factories and enterprises in Anhui are much lower 
than the world advanced level. Even compared with China's other 
provinces and coastal areas, Anhui also lags behind in the field 
of science and technology. This kind of situation has seriously 
hampered the development of some enterprises. After carrying out 
reform and opening up the country to the outside world, some 
enterprises in Anhui have realized the significant role of 
science and technology in developing themselves. In order to 
rapidly narrow the gap between their scientific and 
technological level and that of China's other provinces and the 
world, they have adopted the following measures: 
  a. They have imported and purchased a large number of 
suitable advanced technological equipment. According to a rough 
estimate of the resources of the 11 plants and enterprises, they 
have imported or purchased most of their technological equipment 
in China or from abroad. They imported 41 percent of such 
equipment from abroad, purchased about 38 percent of such 
equipment from domestic sources, and developed and manufactured 
about 20 percent of such equipment themselves. Naturally the 
import of technological equipment costs the enterprises a great 
deal, but it saves money in doing research and development. More 
important is the fact that it would save the enterprises the 
time in doing their own research and development and help them 
raise their technical and production standards within a short 
period of time. For example, the Hefei Fork Lift Truck Plant was 
built in 1958. It began to manufacture fork lift trucks from 
1963. Up to 1982, the annual output of fork lift trucks was 
still approximately 100, the production quality was low, and 
there were not many varieties. In 1985, this plant and the Baoji 
Fork Lift Truck Manufacturing Company joined efforts to import 
the technology in manufacturing Japan's TCMI-10T balanced 
diesel-engine fork lift trucks. After six years of hard work to 
assimilate foreign technology and develop painstaking technical 
innovations, the production technology of the plant had reached 
the world level of the 1980's, and its annual output of such 
trucks rose to 3,400. Right now, the plant has maintained the 
highest record in history in terms of production value, output, 
total volume of sales, taxes and profits, earnings in foreign 
exchange and other norms in the manufacture of fork lift trucks. 
It ranks top among all fork lift truck producing plants in the 
country. Another example is the Chang Jiang Electric Appliances 
Group Company (formerly the Chang Jiang Refrigerator Plant). 
During the period of the Sixth 5-year Plan, its name was changed 
to the Chang Jiang Electric Appliance Group Company. It had 
developed on the foundation of an outmoded iron and steel plant 
in 1984. At that time, its technology was backward, and it was 
short of funds at all times. Later, the company to import a 
refrigerator manufacturing technology from Italy with a loan of 
US$3 million. By importing and assimilating such technology, it 
had improved most of its manufacturing technology to the 
standards of the late 1980's. It had also added one more 
production line by improving the imported technology and relying 
on their own efforts. Right now, about 10 percent of its 
products are medium and high-level technology-intensive, while 
35 percent of its products are medium-level 
technology-intensive. It has also continuously raised its 
production efficiency. In 1992, its total output value reached 
552.7 million yuan with a per-capita output value of 105,600 
yuan. It turned over 36.08 million yuan of taxes and profits to 
the state during that year. 
  b. They have paid full attention to developing technical 
innovations. 
  Prior to reform and opening-up, the technological 
equipment of some of the enterprises in China remained outmoded 
in general, and their productivity low. Anhui was of no 
exception. In order to improve productivity of the existing 
enterprises, Anhui instilled new vitality into those old plants 
by encouraging "technical innovations." Let us take the Chang 
Jiang Electric Appliance Company as an example. Dissatisfied 
with the technical standard of the original production line for 
refrigerators, the company relied on its own technical forces to 
develop technical innovations on its existing production line, 
and trial-produced many new equipment such as the side panel 
production line, computerized thermometer production line, the 
bubbling production line and the painting production line. It 
modernized all its production facilities. Another example is the 
Tongling Film Plant. It had paid full attention to technical 
innovations since 1983. It imported a total of seven 
sophisticated production lines from Japan, Germany, Britain, 
Italy and other countries such as the induction foil production 
line, the inductionless foil production line, the metallization 
production line and the AC capacitor production line, and became 
the only enterprise in China's electronics industry, which 
produces "thin film--metallic film--thin film capacitor" by 
linking production, processing and marketing to form an 
integrated whole. Its advanced equipment and technology greatly 
helped improve production quality and productivity. Seven of its 
products won provincial prizes, while five of them won 
ministerial citations. One of its products won a national silver 
medal. It was rated as one the nation's Second Grade Enterprises 
in 1990. This old enterprise has many new features. 
  c. They have imported technology in the form of joint 
ventures. 
  By importing technology in the form of joint ventures, 
they have not only solved the problems of funds and technology, 
but also whipped up the enthusiasm of both sides of joint 
ventures which share profits as well as risks. Thus, production 
quality and economic performances of such joint ventures have 
been improved. For example, three companies including the Hefei 
Fork Lift Truck Plant and Japan's TCM Company established the 
Andong Casting Company Limited in 1990. It has gone into 
operation now. Its production quality accords with the demands 
of the Japanese market. Its products are popular in Japan, thus 
changing the situation whereas fork lift trucks were only being 
exported to markets in the third world. Let us take the Chang 
Jiang Electric Appliance Group Company as an example again. In 
recent years, it made use of its land, factory buildings, public 
utility facilities, the abundant local natural resources and 
cheap labor to attract foreign investments and set up more than 
10 Sino-foreign joint ventures and helped the advanced 
technology and equipment from foreign countries quickly play 
their role in increasing production and improving work 
efficiency. 
  2. They improve management and efficiency by relying on 
scientific management. 
  Strengthening management with a scientific approach 
involves all the departments in production and management. For 
example, the import, installation and testing of technological 
equipment and the opening of the market need management. It is 
necessary to manage personnel and financial affairs as well as 
material resources. Efforts must be made to control production 
quality and the distribution of profits. In short, only by 
managing the various activities of an enterprise with a 
scientific approach, will it be possible to help an enterprise 
develop itself and improve its production efficiency. All these 
enterprises which we had surveyed paid full attention to their 
work in doing scientific management through which they had 
improved their work efficiency to varying degrees. Their typical 
methods used are as follows: 
  The methods used by the Anhui Tire Plant are: A) Reform 
the management system and run the plant in a modern way; B) 
Improve its operating mechanism and its system of performance 
appraisal and clearly define the limits of the authority of the 
plant and each of its department and office; C) Improve its 
system of quality control and implement a system of veto power 
in this connection; D) Facilitate the flow of information for 
technology in production and for marketing, continuously develop 
new products and stop producing products that are 
technologically obsolete. The best way used by the Anhui 
Technology Import and Export Corporation in strengthening its 
management with a scientific approach is to link its efficiency 
with the benefits of its workers. As a result, it has whipped up 
the enthusiasm of all its workers and truly permitted its 
workers to participate in its management work. 
  The best way used by the Anhui Fork Lift Truck in 
carrying out scientific management is reflected in assimilating 
imported technology and improving upon it. A) It carefully 
studies the technologies to be imported, make good selections, 
and carry out its work well in negotiating and signing 
contracts. B) It also tries to get price quotations from 
different suppliers and ensures that the technology to be 
imported is not only suited to China's national conditions but 
also comparatively lower in price. In assimilating imported 
technologies, it has ensured the supply of funds and 
strengthened administrative work in this purpose. (This plant 
has set up an office led by the plant director for assimilating 
imported technologies and developing technical innovations.) C) 
It vigorously strengthens its work in improving imported 
technologies and introducing new ideas, and pays full attention 
to users' feedback on its products. It also tries its best to 
improve those parts and accessories which fail to satisfy the 
needs of the users. In the course of assimilating imported 
technologies, it has actively developed new products. During the 
past six years in which foreign technologies were imported, the 
plant had marketed 34 new varieties of fork lift trucks. 
  Methods used by the Quanjiao Diesel Engine Plant are as 
follows: 
  A) It builds its workshops with a standardized 
scientific design. 
  B) In allocating its building funds, it gives higher 
priority to workshops and lower priority to office buildings. 
(The construction of its office buildings was postponed three 
times, because the funds earmarked for the building of office 
buildings were used to build workshops. 
  C) In production management, it follows a path of 
diversification, and continuously develops new products. 
  3. They attach importance to the role of the market. 
  Although the market belongs to the sphere of commodity 
circulation, it plays a significant role in promoting 
production. Enterprises must obtain their new technologies and 
equipment from the market. They must also attract scientific and 
technical personnel from the market. They must test on the 
market their new products which they developed with the new 
technologies. The value of their products must be determined by 
the market, while the consumers also use the market to send in 
their feedback to the enterprises. In short, enterprises cannot 
separate themselves from the market. All the enterprises in 
Anhui which are well developed scientifically and technically 
take the market as a guiding factor and pay attention to the 
role of the market. Let us take the Hefei Fork Lift Truck Plant 
as an example. On the basis of the needs on the domestic and 
international markets, it has imported the necessary 
technologies and equipment, and assimilated and improved upon 
them. Within a short period of few years, it has developed more 
than 30 new models of fork lift trucks which are readily 
marketable. Its export market has been diverted from the 
low-priced markets in the Third World to the medium and 
high-priced markets in Western Europe, North America and 
Southeast Asia. The number of fork lift trucks exported to 
Western Europe alone accounted for 78 percent of its total 
amount of exports in 1992. In order to consolidate and expand 
its markets of sales, it has maintained ties with 16 companies 
in 11 countries abroad and set up steady sales channels. It is 
also making preparations to set up assembly plants and sales and 
service centers abroad. On the one hand, this is aimed at 
establishing a channel for export on a long term basis. On the 
other hand, it is also aimed at sending the information on 
foreign markets back to China and continuously producing readily 
marketable products. Again let us take the Chang Jiang Electric 
Appliance Group Company as an example. It has established an 
import and export department and set up offices in Hong Kong and 
other localities in charge of importing technologies and doing 
export work. All its products are market-oriented. It closely 
follows the needs of the market to change its models in order to 
satisfy the market demands. For example, the Anhui Tire Plant 
closely watches the famous brands on the domestic and foreign 
markets. It relies on its technologies to rapidly change the 
varieties of its products. Thus it is able to expand its market 
and continuously improve its efficiency. The total output value 
of the aforementioned three enterprises reached 1.15 billion 
yuan; and paid taxes and turned their profits to the state 
totalling 170 million yuan in 1992. 
  4. They pay attention to the role of professionally 
trained people 
  Men play a major role in the development of social 
activities and productive forces. They are indispensable in 
developing science and technology, managing enterprises with a 
scientific approach and opening up the market. Competitions in 
science and technology and in market are, after all, 
competitions for professionally trained people. Some enterprises 
in Anhui used favorable terms to attract professionally trained 
people; spend a great deal of money to train them; and 
respected, cherished and put them in various important 
positions. As a result, these enterprises have attained notable 
economic results and drawn benefits from their practice in 
cherishing professionally trained people. For example, the Hefei 
Washing Machine Plant was founded in 1984. At that time, it had 
only a handful of professionally trained people and poor 
production equipment. Its business was not so good. In 1986, it 
started to import technologies and equipment from Japan. 
However, it is necessary to rely on professionally trained 
people to make full use of advanced technologies and equipment. 
Only by doing so will it be possible to accomplish good economic 
results. Lack of professionally trained people means lack of 
technology. Thus, this plant made use of various favorable terms 
to attract professionally trained people and encourage them to 
work for the plant. The plant clearly spelled out the following 
favorable terms: 1) Housing will be provided to any college 
graduate during the first year when he or she is hired. His or 
her wage will be two grades higher than that offered by other 
plants. 2) The bonus issued to technical personnel is 20 percent 
higher than that to ordinary workers. These favorable terms had 
attracted a large number of professionally trained people. Right 
now, this plant has 211 technicians including 11 high-ranking 
technical personnel and 200 medium-ranking technical personnel, 
accounting for 0.5 percent and 10 percent respectively of the 
total number of workers in the plant. The total output value of 
this plant reached 230 million yuan and its per-capita output 
value totalled 140,000 yuan in 1992. It delivered profits and 
paid taxes to the state totalling 41 million yuan in 1992. The 
Hefei Fork Lift Truck Plant pays full attention to the training 
of qualified professionals. It sent out more than 100 people to 
Japan for training. When its cadres returned home from abroad, 
they brought back tools and reference materials instead of major 
home appliances. Another experience of the plant is that the 
training of qualified professionals must be three to four years 
ahead of schedule. Only by doing so, will it be possible to 
maintain a predominant position in technical management. 
Advanced technological equipment must be operated and handled by 
well trained technical personnel. Only by doing so, will it be 
possible to turn advanced technological equipment into actual 
productive forces and ensure the fine quality of the products. 
<H5>  II. Existing Problems in Developing Enterprises </H5>
  The aforementioned plants have different ways in developing 
themselves, while they too have their own problems. These 
problems are even more outstanding in other backward enterprises 
in Anhui. 
  A. There exist problems and difficulties in enterprises 
  1. There is a shortage of engineers and technicians, 
seriously affecting the technical developments in various 
enterprises. 
  The aforementioned 11 plants are enterprises with a 
comparatively large number of scientific and technical personnel 
in Anhui. However, the number of their scientific and technical 
personnel only totals 2,165, accounting for 7.9 percent of the 
total number of workers. The percentage of high-technological 
personnel is even smaller -- only 0.77 percent. This percentage 
is far below the requirement for a modernized enterprise. It is 
understood that the percentage of technical personnel in the 
total amount of workers is even smaller in other enterprises in 
Anhui. The shortage of scientific and technical personnel has 
made enterprises even more difficult to develop new technology, 
change new models, improve production quality and raise the 
added value of their products. 
  2. There are not enough investments in doing research 
and development work. This has seriously affected the 
enterprises' reserve strength for development. 
  In recent years, the aforementioned 11 enterprises spent 
14.224 million yuan each year on research and development, a 
mere 0.53 percent of their total output value and 4.28 percent 
of the amount of their profits and taxes paid to the state. As 
compared with some enterprises in the developed countries, they 
spend much less on research and development. Right now, the more 
technically advanced enterprise, the greater attention it pays 
to research and development. This kind of enterprise believes 
that investments on machinery and equipment only affect its 
immediate interests, but research and development will affect 
its future. If our enterprises pay little attention to research 
and development, they would have little reserve strength for 
future development. 
  3. There is a great shortage of professionals in foreign 
trade. This hampers the enterprises in dealing with the world 
market. 
  China has implemented the reform and opening-up policy, 
delegated power to do foreign trade to the lower-level 
organizations, and encouraged enterprises to do business on the 
world market. However, there is a serious shortage of 
professionals in developing economic relations and trade with 
foreign countries. There are not many professionals who know 
foreign language, foreign trade and rules and regulations 
involving foreign countries. Let us take intellectual property 
rights as an example. Some enterprises ignore the need to 
legally protect their own patents and trademarks when they sign 
contracts on importing and exporting patented technologies. When 
they try to open up the international market, they lack 
information. They only seek to achieve the goal of pushing their 
products out of China and lower their prices to compete with 
others without paying attention to economic results. This 
practice has prevented them from advancing toward the 
international market. 
  4. The enterprises are under poor management. 
  The main symptoms are: a) The enterprise's business 
targets are not so clear. A considerably number of enterprises 
still regard the fulfillment of production tasks as their goal 
without giving top priority to the enterprises' economic 
efficiency and long-term and short-term profits. With regard to 
imported technologies and equipment, they are unable to 
assimilate them and make them yield economic results. Some of 
the equipment and facilities are left unused for a long time 
after they have been imported. Investments are high, but the 
output is low. b) Workers' responsibility, authority and benefit 
are not clearly defined. The system of everybody eating from the 
same big pot still exists, and the enthusiasm of workers 
including technical personnel has not been fully aroused. c) In 
some enterprises, there are a large number of workers, but the 
amount of profits and taxes turned to the state remains low. The 
enterprises even suffer losses for several years running. This 
runs counter to what the market economy demands. Market economy 
demands that enterprises change the way they operate, become 
market-oriented, pay attention to economic performances and give 
full play to the role of science and technology, manpower, 
material and financial resources. 
  B. The external environment affects the development of 
enterprises. 
  There are many external environmental factors which 
would affect enterprise development, but the major ones with 
direct impact on enterprise development are as follows: 
  1. The procedure in importing technologies is too 
complicated. Enterprises demand that they be given more power to 
manage their own affairs in importing technologies and that the 
government organization in charge of the import of technologies 
perform more actual deeds and help enterprises solve specific 
problems in importing technologies. 
  2. Imports of technologies have often been duplicated or 
carried out blindly, wasting a great deal of foreign exchange. 
  3. Enterprises have not been truly given the power to 
manage their own affairs. The main symptoms are: a) Some of 
large and medium-sized enterprises do not have the authority to 
handle exports even now. They can only export their products 
through companies doing foreign trade. They do not understand 
the market abroad. Nor are they allowed to open up their market 
abroad. b) Even those enterprises with the authority to handle 
export business cannot take the initiative to export their 
products in accordance with the situation on the international 
market. If an enterprise fails to fulfill the task in exporting 
its products assigned by the higher authority, its authority to 
do export business will be revoked. c) There are too many 
restrictions for sending personnel to foreign countries. The 
procedure for examination and approval is too complicated, and 
its takes too long to go through this procedure. Restrictions on 
the use of funds approved are so strict that it is hard for the 
enterprises to adopt appropriate measures to keep up with the 
changes on the market. As a result, they often lose the chance 
of winning contracts. 
  4. The state fails to provide enterprises with a good 
environment for fair competition. For example, a) the 
Sino-Foreign joint ventures and cooperative and exclusively 
foreign-funded enterprises receive far more preferential 
treatments than ordinary enterprises. b) There are significant 
differences between the preferential treatments given to 
enterprises inside the development zone and those outside the 
development zone. c) The state treats enterprises which are 
included in the list of enterprises for technical renovations 
differently as compared with those not included in the list. 
Enterprises included in the list not only may obtain loans with 
preferential terms, but also may reduce or remit taxes. Those 
not included in the list not only cannot procure loans with 
preferential terms, but also must pay customs duties when they 
import machinery and production equipment. d) The dual price 
system is also an important factor leading to unfair competition 
among enterprises. 
  5. The rate of exchange for the yuan is too low, 
affecting the import of equipment from abroad. Although the 
lower rate of exchange for the yuan is conducive to expanding 
China's exports, it however increases the costs of imports and 
the enterprises' burdens in importing technological equipment. 
<H5>  III. Several Suggestions to Relevant Government Departments </H5>
  1. It is necessary to give enterprises greater authority 
to manage their export business; allow enterprises with 
favorable conditions to directly compete with others on the 
international market; and help them understand the world market 
and timely adjust their products and marketing and management 
tactics. Efforts must be made to ensure that enterprises with 
authority to handle exports truly have such power to export 
their products. Enterprises must have the power to decide 
whether they should export or not, what kind of products to 
export and the amount of their exports in accordance with the 
market situation. 
  2. It is essential to abolish the restriction on the 
minimum amount of goods that an enterprise must export. The 
practice of the government in giving enterprises assignments to 
export their products is actually a method of planned economy. 
It prevents enterprises from carrying out production and doing 
exports based on the principle of economic results. In order to 
fulfill their export targets, some enterprises have to export 
their products even at a loss, while others use yuan to purchase 
foreign exchange at a higher price so as to show the government 
that they have fulfilled their export targets. In order to guard 
against "poor business" in the next year, some enterprises 
deliberately kept their export figures low so that they might 
include these figures in the report when they really had some 
"bad years." In doing so, they would not likely lose their 
license to do export business because of their poor export 
business. Apparently, the aforementioned practice of some of the 
enterprises are erroneous. However, this is mainly because of 
the government decision to set export targets for the 
enterprises. Therefore, we must abolish the system of assigning 
a minimum quota for each enterprise to export its products, and 
truly permit enterprises to produce and sell their products 
according to the market situation. 
  3. It is necessary to simplify the procedure in 
importing technologies and that in examining and approving 
enterprises staff members's applications to visit foreign 
countries. The government department in charge of importing 
technologies must help enterprises do solid work and solve 
problems in importing technologies; and improve its services to 
the enterprises. 
  4. It is imperative to stabilize the exchange rate in 
order to maintain China's imports at the proper level. China is 
a developing nation with comparative low standards in science 
and technology. To moderately import advanced technological 
equipment to expand its scale in production is necessary in 
order to raise China's productivity and developing its economy. 
The yuan's rate of exchange with foreign currencies has a direct 
impact on the costs of imported goods. Therefore, only by 
stabilizing the yuan rate of exchange will it be possible to 
help enterprises import the right amount of technological 
equipment for themselves. 
  5. The government must create an environment for fair 
competition among enterprises. To develop a socialist market 
economy, we must do things according to market economic laws. 
Under no circumstances should we divide different areas and 
different enterprises into different groups, and work out 
different policies in dealing with each group. Efforts must be 
made to abolish the dual price system and fundamentally plug the 
loopholes with which some enterprises or individuals use to 
undermine the policies of the state. 
  6. It is necessary to improve measures in importing and 
exporting technologies. The import of technological equipment is 
conducive to helping enterprises develop their production. 
Efforts must be made to give preferential treatments to 
enterprises in terms of import duties and loans. The export of 
technological equipment is aimed at optimizing the product mix 
and raising the added value of China's exports. Preferential 
treatments should be given to enterprises which may retain a 
portion of foreign exchange for their own use and wish to 
procure loans in order to encourage exports. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20415 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar026___94005" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-026 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  7 February 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> FINANCE, BANKING </F>
<H3> <TI>   Financial Business Automation Develops `Rapidly' </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Financial Business Automation Develops `Rapidly' </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94CE0374C Beijing ZHONGGUO XINXI BAO in Chinese 7 Feb 94 p 1 </F>
<F P=103> 94CE0374C </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing ZHONGGUO XINXI BAO </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Xu beiying (1776 5563 4481): "Automation in </F>
China's Financial Circles Rapidly Develops"] 
  [Text] After making strenuous efforts for more than a 
decade, China has scored remarkable results in developing 
automation in its financial circles. The infrastructural 
facilities for automation in the financial circles have been 
increase in number. Right now, more than 150 sets of large- and 
medium-sized computers, over all 5,000 small- and 
super-microcomputers, nearly 70,000 sets of multi-user and 
single-user microcomputers, over 1,500 sets of computer-aided 
peripheral equipment have been installed for the use by various 
departments in China's financial circles. 
  With the rapid development of China's economy, the status 
and 
role of the financial circles have become more and more 
important, and there is higher demand for modernization. One of 
the important aspects is the use of electronic equipment. The 
strategic plan for to achieve automation in China's financial 
circles is as follows: preparations should be made during the 
Sixth Five-Year Plan, and the foundation laid during the Seventh 
Five-Year Plan. The scale for automation should be expanded 
during the Eighth Five-Year Plan, while the process of 
automation be completed during the Ninth Five-Year Plan. On the 
basis of this plan, China's financial circles have done a great 
deal of work. In addition to modernizing the equipment, a 
telecommunications network is gradually being built. The 
People's Bank of China is responsible to build the 
special-purpose satellite telecommunications network. It has 
already completed a main satellite earth station and 138 urban 
ground stations. In 1992 alone, the inter-bank system had used 
this network to handle more than 1.1 million transactions, 
totaling almost 1.2 trillion yuan. 
  Remarkable achievements have also been made in the 
development of software for automation in the financial circles. 
A large number of software packages have been developed and used 
for the nationwide electronic inter-banking system, the 
city-wide system for check and fund clearing, the system for 
accounting transactions, the system for handling saving 
accounts, the city-wide interbank system for automatic deposits 
and withdrawal, the nationwide inter-bank system for 
reconciliation of statements of account, the system for handling 
various statements and reports and the interbank ATM processing 
system. 
  As a component part of China's modern payment system, the 
nationwide automation system for offering stock price quotations 
is under construction. The center and all its branches of the 
system will be a part of the special-purpose satellite 
telecommunications network of the financial circles to 
automatically offer stock quotations and deliveries and handle 
account clearances on the stock market. 
  In addition, modern automated service centers in the 
financial circles are being added. The number of such automated 
service centers has reached 25,000, accounting for more than 20 
percent of the total number of service centers. Meanwhile, the 
number of credit cards issued by various banks has exceeded 
three million. Interbank ATM automatic deposits and withdrawal 
services are available in scores of cities. Various banks have 
also handled payroll and savings accounts on behalf of various 
government organizations and enterprises, collect utility bills 
and work as a part of the POS system [point of sales system]. 
  China's automation system in the financial circles has 
already yielded tremendous social and economic results, 
accelerated the circulation of funds, helped the central bank 
strengthen its macro-control and improved the services of the 
banking industry. Within the ten years from the present moment 
to the beginning of the 21st Century, China will establish an 
up-to-date magnificent system of payments. In the next three 
years, it is necessary to complete the nationwide main network 
of satellite telecommunications, the regional networks 
connecting all the major cities in the economically developed 
areas along the Chang Jiang River and the Huang He and along the 
coast, and the city-wide networks. Efforts will be made to link 
all the systems of fund clearance at all levels throughout the 
nation into a major network. Meanwhile, we must set up and 
improve all kinds of systems concerning information exchange, 
fund transactions and price quotations on stocks and bonds, 
inter-bank loans and foreign exchange control; gradually put 
these systems to effective use; and raise the overall efficiency 
of the automation system in the financial circles. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20416 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar026___94006" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-026 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  18 February 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> FINANCE, BANKING </F>
<H3> <TI>   Futures Market `Develops Well' </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Futures Market `Develops Well' </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94CE0374A Beijing ZHONGGUO XINXI BAO in Chinese 18 Feb 94 p 4 </F>
<F P=103> 94CE0374A </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing ZHONGGUO XINXI BAO </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by reporter Xie Yanjin (6200 1484 3160): "Futures </F>
Market Develops Well, as Its High Tide Swells at First Time"] 
  [Text] What is the situation in the development of futures, 
a new form of trading in China? Recently Mr. Lu Jian, President 
of the International Futures Brokerage Company Ltd, of China, 
expressed his view on this question. 
  China's futures market has successfully gone through the 
difficult stage from theory to practice after the founding of 
the Shanghai Metal Exchange and the Shenzhen Exchange in 1992. 
However, China's futures market in 1992 was far from being 
perfect. It is still in its embryonic stage. Only the year of 
1993 was the crucial year for development. During that year, the 
scale of the futures market had become much larger. The market 
had formed a network, covering various major cities throughout 
the country. Generally speaking, the development of China's 
futures market is as follows: 
  1. China's futures market is rapidly changing from spot 
trading and forward spot trading towards standard futures 
contracts. With the development of market economy, the share of 
futures contracts of the market is rapidly expanding. They serve 
as a definite supplement to the spot market. 
  2. The varieties of commodities on the futures market have 
considerably increased. When the Shanghai and Shenzhen stock 
exchanges were first founded in 1992, the goods for futures 
trading were only limited to nonferrous copper. In 1993, they 
included grain, petroleum, sugar crops and even standard futures 
contracts for treasury bonds. This had diversified the varieties 
of commodities on China's futures market. 
  3. As far as every futures exchange is concerned, there are 
considerable varieties of goods offered at various new futures 
exchanges which have opened their doors since the second half of 
1993. Let us take the Beijing Commodity Exchange as an example. 
Commodities offered at the exchange now include rolled steel and 
treasury bonds in addition to nonferrous metal. Even in futures 
exchanges which have been in business fairly early such as the 
Shanghai Futures Exchange, they have added rice, petroleum, 
diesel oil and others to the list of goods offered at their 
exchanges. This makes their offer of goods more diversified and 
comprehensive, and further expanded their scope of business. 
  4. From the point of view of market management, the 
membership of the futures exchange has also become more 
diversified. Most of the members of the futures markets in 
Shanghai and Shenzhen in 1992 were production units. The 
percentage of specialized brokerage companies in the membership 
rose in 1993. These specialized brokerage companies have played 
a significant role in helping China's futures market develop 
itself along the right track. For example, the International 
Futures Brokerage Company Ltd, of China has membership in the 
world's three famous futures exchanges only one year after its 
founding. This has winded up the history whereas China's futures 
trading has no place in the international futures market. Due to 
the tremendous growth of China's futures market in 1993, people 
often call 1993 the "Year of Futures." 
  China's futures market is able to make remarkable progress 
within a short period of more than a year because of its solid 
economic foundation. China had officially established its market 
economic system in 1992, putting 70 percent of the producer's 
goods and 90 percent of the consumer goods on the market. This 
had pointed out the important role of pricing signals. Prices 
were relatively stable when the system of planned economy held 
sway in the past. However, under the conditions of market 
economy, prices of many raw materials and commodities fluctuate 
a great deal in different seasons and years. Therefore, 
enterprises and peasants are faced with many incalculable 
factors in the market economy and greater risks as compared with 
the past. How can they avoid such risks? The only method to 
avoid such risks is to protect their profits by hedging. 
Therefore, the emergence and development of China's futures 
market is something inevitable. 
  After a year of rapid development, China's futures market 
has entered the year of 1994. That does not mean that the market 
has slowed down. Mr. Lu believes that 1994 remains the "year of 
futures." He gives the following three reasons: 
  1. After China enters the 1990s, it has maintained a high 
rate of economic growth. Its rate of economic growth is expected 
to reach 12 percent in 1993. It can still maintain a growth rate 
between 10 and 12 percent. Even if there will be some 
fluctuations in the next several years, such ups and downs would 
only affect the rate of growth. The overall trend will be 
characterized by a sustained growth. The development of the 
futures market is closely linked with the rate of economic 
growth, because economic growth means the expansion of 
investments and trading. Therefore, we may say that in 1994, 
China's futures market will still witness a year of growth and 
improvement in 1994. 
  2. In the course of macro-economic control during the second 
half of 1993, various enterprises once against suffered from new 
chain-debts. They owed each other money, scrapped contracts and 
cheated each other. Therefore, many production and supply and 
marketing enterprises incurred heavy losses in spot trading and 
forward spot trading. This was mainly because underground spot 
trading and the illegal practices in handling transactions. The 
system of open outcry, the signing of standard futures trading 
contracts and the system of floor trading have enhanced the 
transparency in doing futures trading and protected the prestige 
of all traders. Meanwhile, investors may engage in trading by 
paying a small amount of margin only. Thus, they may be able to 
control a large amount of commodities with a small amount of 
money. Moreover, the implementation of standard futures 
contracts has helped solve the problem of transportation for 
spot trading and made things convenient for the enterprises to 
do trading. Therefore, more production, supply and marketing 
enterprises have participated in doing futures trading since the 
beginning of 1994. This is an inevitable trend in the course of 
developing market economy. 
  3. Only when the futures market established in 1993 enters 
the year of 1994, will it be possible for all its members to 
play their role well. After a certain period, China's futures 
market is no longer able to meet the needs of its members in 
doing futures trading. From this point of view, the development 
of the 1994 futures market is a continuation of the progress 
made in 1993. 
  As a new event in the development of market economy, China's 
futures market is still faced with some problems at the present 
moment. 
  Currently, a considerable number of futures brokerage 
companies in China's coastal regions and some major cities in 
China's inland provinces, which have the experience of handling 
futures trading in Hong Kong and Taiwan, carry out fraudulent 
activities that run counter to the principle of open trading. 
For example, they often mislead their clients by providing them 
with wrong information, and make illegal profits. This had 
seriously harmed the interests of the investors. 
  Nevertheless, we must not doubt the future prospects of the 
futures market because of this. In order to further improve 
China's futures market, the relevant departments of the state 
must work out administrative rules and regulations and laws on 
futures trading, and make the control of futures trading a 
regular system and procedure. 
  In addition, it is necessary to set up a 
government-recognized authoritative association for futures 
trading and implement a membership system. Efforts must be made 
to enforce a system under which all futures brokers must take a 
standardized test to ensure their competency. Right now, the 
method has already gone into effect. 
  Consequently, it is expected that China's futures trading 
will take on a new look in the near future. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20417 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar026___94007" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-026 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  7 February 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> FINANCE, BANKING </F>
<H3> <TI>   Financial Markets Continue To Flourish </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Financial Markets Continue To Flourish </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94CE0374B Beijing ZHONGHUA DISAN CHANYE BAO in Chinese 7 Feb 
94 p 3 </F>

<F P=103> 94CE0374B </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing ZHONGHUA DISAN CHANYE BAO </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Xin Hua (6580 5478): "Flourishing Financial </F>
Markets -- A Sign of Initial Growth"] 
  [Text] China's financial market system has gradually taken 
shape since 1984. In general, it started from handling check 
discounts and later expanded its businesses to inter-bank loans 
and buying and selling of foreign exchange. The securities 
market emerged at a later date. Recently the satellite 
telecommunications network for the financial circles has been 
established. Right now, a total of 138 ground stations have been 
built. Each day, transactions exceeding 1.1 billion yuan in 
total have been handled by the network. A preliminary 
operational system for the financial market is composed of "two 
stock exchanges and one network" (The Shanghai Stock Exchange 
and the Shenzhen Stock Exchange and the nationwide information 
network for stock price quotations) and the money market, the 
securities market and the foreign exchange regulation market. 
<H8>  I. Money Market </H8>
  On the basis of different business scopes and various forms 
of financial assets, China's money market may be divided into 
the market of inter-bank loans, the market of short-term 
financing to various enterprises and the market of transferable 
certificates of deposit of large denomination. Right now, the 
market of inter-bank short-term loans is fairly active. 
  The main task of the market of inter-bank loans is to help 
banking institutions obtain short-term loans from each other to 
mainly make up the insufficient reserve funds for the deposits 
and the differences in check clearing and to meet the needs for 
fund circulation of a temporary nature. Since the reform of 
credit control in 1984, markets of different forms and scales 
have been set up in various localities throughout the country 
for inter-bank loans, preliminarily forming an inter-regional 
and inter-departmental financing network with the major cities 
as its bases. Meanwhile 120 money markets have been set up in 
Beijing, Shanghai, Tianjin, Shenyang, Xian and Wuhan to handle 
national and regional inter-bank short-term loans. In recent 
years, the amount of inter-bank short-term loans was about 300 
billion yuan each year. 
  The market of short-term fund-raising bonds was officially 
open to the public in March 1989 after experiments were carried 
out in this connection at the end of 1987. Banks and other 
financial institutions often sell such bonds on a commission 
basis for the various bond-issuing enterprises. A few of them 
have exclusive rights to sell certain bonds. At the end of 1992, 
the total value of such bonds had reached 17 billion yuan. 
According to the regulation, short-term fund-raising bonds 
issued by various enterprises are transferable right after they 
are floated. However, only a small amount of them are actually 
being transferred. 
  The issuance of transferable fixed-term certificates of 
deposits is limited to various specialized and multipurpose 
banks. Prospective buyers of the certificates are usually 
individuals and enterprises and institutions in urban and rural 
areas. Such certificates should be purchased with people's own 
money or the enterprises' or institutions' own funds. They are 
transferable on the market as soon as they are issued. 

<H5>    II. Securities Market </H5>
  Since China issued its treasury bonds in 1981, the 
securities market has rapidly grown with the continuous 
development of the economic system and particularly at a time 
when the enterprise system is changing from an unitary economic 
system to a share-holding one and the financial system is 
changing its practice of making up its deficits by taking out 
overdraft or borrowing from the banks to one of directly raising 
funds from the society. 
  The current situation shows: (1) There are many kinds of 
securities on the market. Right now, there are more than ten 
types of bonds including the treasury bonds, financial bonds, 
bonds for the state major construction projects, state 
construction bonds, special-purpose bonds, value-protected 
bonds, enterprise bonds and stocks. (2) The market of securities 
has begun to take shape. The total value of securities floated 
by the state totalled 50 billion yuan in 1988, more than 
doubling the value of securities issued in 1987. The total value 
of securities floated by the state totalled 115 billion yuan in 
1991, once again doubling the value of securities issued in 
1988. The total value of bonds and stocks of various kinds in 
China was close to 400 billion yuan Renminbi in 1992. In 1993, 
the state planned to issue bonds and stocks at a value 
equivalent to approximately half of the amount of annual savings 
of all the rural and urban residents in the country. (3) 
Securities are being issued in different forms. Some of the 
financial institutions do sales promotion themselves to sell the 
bonds they have issued, while some enterprises entrust other 
financial institutions to sell their bonds. Other enterprises 
adopted the method of free subscription while promoting the sale 
of bonds with administrative measures. The practice of 
apportioning people to buy state bonds has been abolished. (4) 
The issuance of securities has been made a regular system. The 
issuance of bonds and stocks has been carefully screened and 
approved each year and a tranche policy adopted to control the 
issuance of such bonds and stocks. 
  The situation of the stock trading market is as follows: 
(1) Right now, there are more than 1,200 securities trading 
departments in the country. There are markets for the transfer 
of securities in over 100 cities and secondary markets for 
selling and buying state treasury bonds in more than 60 cities. 
(2) The amount of trading on the securities market is sharply 
rising. The total amount of all types of securities on the 
market in 1990 was valued at 13.7 billion yuan, that in 1991 at 
15 billion yuan and that in 1992 at 200 billion yuan, of which 
the stock exchanges in Shanghai and Shenzhen play the most 
important role. In addition, the Nanfang Securities Company in 
Shenzhen works in concert with the Huaxia Securities Company in 
Beijing and the Guotai Securities Company in Shanghai. They 
stand like the three legs of a tripod, quickening the pace in 
forming a unified nationwide market for the selling and buying 
of securities. 

<H5>    III. Foreign Exchange Regulation Market </H5>
  Right now, the foreign exchange regulation market is 
rapidly expanding. According to statistics, the volume of 
business on China's foreign exchange regulation market in 1987 
totalled US$4.7 billion. This figure rose US$6.25 billion in 
1988 and US$13.1 billion in 1990. It reached as high as US$25.1 
billion in 1992, about half of the total amount of foreign 
exchange used to pay for China's imports in that year. This 
indicates that China has paid attention to using the market 
mechanism to regulate the supply and demand of foreign exchange. 


</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20418 </DOCNO>
<HT>      "jpcar026___94008" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-026 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  12 April 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> INDUSTRY </F>
<H3> <TI>   Bureau Issues Mar Light Industry Output Figures </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Bureau Issues Mar Light Industry Output Figures </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   HK1204130894 Beijing CEI Database in English 12 Apr 94 </F>
<F P=103> HK1204130894 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing CEI Database </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Beijing (CEIS) -- Following is a list of the output 
of China's light industry in March 1994, released by the State 
Statistical Bureau: 


----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Item              |Unit              |3/94              |3/93              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Bicycle           |10,000s           |376.57            |357.80            | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Sewing machine    |10,000s           |67.56             |71.41             | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Watch             |10,000            |2715.77           |768.15            | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Camera            |10,000s           |160.96            |42.48             | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|TV set            |10,000s           |244.59            |256.90            | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Color TV          |10,000s           |134.92            |118.99            | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Video recorder    |10,000s           |15.72             |5.00              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Radio             |10,000s           |242.97            |241.37            | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Tape recorder     |10,000s           |481.13            |226.57            | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Hi-fi             |10,000pc          |69.70             |19.09             | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Washing machine   |10,000s           |97.93             |72.66             | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Electric fan      |10,000s           |662.62            |617.88            | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Refrigerator      |10,000s           |71.26             |48.55             | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Freezer           |10,000s           |29.05             |32.18             | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Air conditioner   |10,000s           |50.84             |25.99             | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Vacuum cleaner    |10,000s           |15.19             |7.90              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Electric cooker   |10,000s           |133.97            |112.60            | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Sugar             |10,000t           |86.22             |128.27            | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Salt              |10,000t           |83.07             |78.99             | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Cigaret           |10,000c           |294.21            |293.58            | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Beer              |10,000t           |103.43            |100.28            | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Liquor            |10,000t           |44.39             |46.64             | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Canned food       |10,000t           |15.19             |14.06             | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Dairy products    |t                 |27422.95          |33214             | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Feed              |10,000t           |238.08            |282.52            | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Machine-made and  |10,000t           |133.75            |130.91            | 
|kraft             |                  |                  |                  | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Newsprint         |10,000t           |5.69              |5.17              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Relief Printing P-|10,000t           |4.71              |5.65              | 
|aper              |                  |                  |                  | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Synthetic Deterge-|10,000t           |19.39             |17.95             | 
|nt                |                  |                  |                  | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Daily fine alumin-|t                 |9132.92           |6388.00           | 
|ium products      |                  |                  |                  | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Plastic products  |10,000t           |56.06             |42.64             | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Farming film      |10,000t           |6.05              |6.41              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Notes: s -- set, pc -- piece, t -- ton, c -- carton, m pc -- million piece | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 



</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20419 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar026___94009" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-026 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  12 April 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> INDUSTRY </F>
<H3> <TI>   Bureau Issues Mar Main Chemical Products Output Figures </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Bureau Issues Mar Main Chemical Products Output Figures </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   HK1204131094 Beijing CEI Database in English 12 Apr 94 </F>
<F P=103> HK1204131094 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing CEI Database </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Beijing (CEIS) -- Following is a list of the 
output of main chemical products in March 1994, released by the 
State Statistical Bureau: 


----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Item              |Unit              |3/94              |3/93              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Chemical fiber    |10,000t           |21.57             |18.96             | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Sulphuric acid    |10,000t           |18.64             |15.02             | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Dense nitric acid |10,000t           |2.93              |3.94              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Soda ash          |10,000t           |48.99             |44.03             | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Caustic soda      |10,000t           |33.71             |33.15             | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Ethylene          |10,000t           |19.14             |18.02             | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Calcium chloride  |10,000t           |21.32             |20.38             | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Pure benzene      |10,000t           |7.76              |6.98              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Synthetic ammonia |10,000t           |202.79            |196.29            | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Chemical fertiliz-|10,000t           |198.58            |187.21            | 
|er                |                  |                  |                  | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|(Nitrogen)        |10,000t           |148.71            |139.24            | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|(Phosphorous)     |10,000t           |42.97             |45.97             | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|(Potash)          |10,000t           |2.02              |1.51              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Chemical pesticide|10,000t           |2.60              |3.00              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Paint             |10,000t           |8.23              |9.63              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Dyestuff          |10,000t           |1.48              |1.74              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Chinese patent me-|10,000t           |2.19              |1.98              | 
|dicines           |                  |                  |                  | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Tyre              |10,000pc          |543.05            |565.52            | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Synthetic rubber  |10,000t           |4.90              |3.86              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Film              |10,000m           |394.90            |759               | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|(Color film)      |10,000m           |316.30            |728               | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Plastics          |10,000t           |31.04             |29.55             | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Notes: t - ton, pc - piece, m - meter                                      | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 



</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20420 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar026___94010" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-026 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  13 April 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> INDUSTRY </F>
<H3> <TI>   March Statistics on Industrial Output Value by Area </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    March Statistics on Industrial Output Value by Area </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   HK1304105594 Beijing CEI Database in English 13 Apr 94 </F>
<F P=103> HK1304105594 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing CEI Database </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Beijing (CEIS) -- Following is a list showing the 
industrial output value by area in China in March 1994 released 
by the State Statistical Bureau: 


----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|                  |(Unit: 100 million yuan)                                | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Area              |3/94              |3/93              |Change Over 3/93 (| 
|                  |                  |                  |pc)               | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|National total    |3409.04           |2869.36           |18.8              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Beijing           |97.65             |81.49             |19.8              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Tianjin           |78.51             |69.17             |13.5              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Hebei             |128.24            |111.17            |15.4              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Shanxi            |56.60             |53.99             |4.8               | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Inner Mongolia    |29.63             |26.64             |11.2              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Liaoning          |181.87            |161.39            |12.7              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Jilin             |61.75             |58.04             |6.4               | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Heilongjiang      |82.49             |80.33             |2.7               | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Shanghai          |239.89            |210.08            |14.2              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Jiangsu           |519.38            |416.08            |24.8              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Zhejiang          |239.73            |194.06            |23.5              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Anhui             |96.38             |79.60             |21.1              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Fujian            |84.08             |65.48             |28.4              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Jiangxi           |61.23             |51.98             |17.8              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Shandong          |341.27            |243.23            |40.3              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Henan             |130.26            |107.45            |21.2              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Hubei             |138.16            |122.32            |12.9              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Hunan             |83.03             |76.48             |8.6               | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Guangdong         |341.98            |276.68            |23.6              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Guangxi           |61.70             |53.97             |14.3              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Hainan            |7.15              |7.17              |-0.3              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Sichuan           |162.97            |145.54            |12.0              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Guizhou           |23.16             |22.46             |3.1               | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Yunnan            |46.37             |41.87             |10.7              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Tibet             |                  |                  |0.02              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Shaanxi           |49.85             |46.76             |6.6               | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Gansu             |29.31             |28.87             |1.5               | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Qinghai           |5.73              |5.48              |4.6               | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Ningxia           |7.98              |7.51              |6.3               | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Xinjiang          |22.67             |24.07             |-5.8              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|"Note: Industrial output value in 1994 is measured in 1990's constant yuan.| 
|"                                                                          | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 



</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20421 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar026___94011" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-026 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  12 April 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> INDUSTRY </F>
<H3> <TI>   March Mechano-Electronic Output Figures </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    March Mechano-Electronic Output Figures </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   HK1204130994 Beijing CEI Database in English 12 Apr 94 </F>
<F P=103> HK1204130994 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing CEI Database </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Beijing (CEIS) -- Following is a list of the output 
of China's major mechano-electronic products in March 1994, 
released by the State Statistical Bureau: 


----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Item              |Unit              |3/94              |3/93              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Power equipment   |10,000kw          |137.13            |111.51            | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|AC motor          |10,000kw          |430.84            |508.12            | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Industrial boiler |ton               |4930.60           |6417.00           | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Machine tool      |10,000set         |1.86              |2.87              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Including:        |                  |                  |                  | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|NC machine tool   |set               |552.00            |873               | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Precision machine |set               |67                |130               | 
|tool              |                  |                  |                  | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Large machine tool|set               |320               |382               | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Automobile        |10,000            |12.55             |12.24             | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Including: Bus    |10,000            |0.77              |0.96              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Car               |10,000            |2.33              |2.00              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Truck             |10,000            |6.30              |5.52              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Motorbike         |10,000            |34.17             |24.91             | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Tractor(20hp/abov-|10,000            |0.51              |0.51              | 
|e)                |                  |                  |                  | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Small tractor     |10,000            |11.95             |12.07             | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Locomotive        |set               |88                |72                | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Including: Diesel |set               |68                |55                | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Steam             |set               |1                 |2                 | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Electric          |set               |19                |15                | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Passenger coach   |set               |206               |227               | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Freight wagon     |set               |3718              |2970              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Internal combusti-|10,000kw          |897.28            |1070.10           | 
|on engine         |                  |                  |                  | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Fishing ship      |                  |-                 |6                 | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Civil steel ship  |10,000ton         |23.86             |21.19             | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Computer          |set               |11                |20                | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Microcomputer     |set               |7058              |5769              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Color crt         |10,000            |112.95            |59.50             | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Program-controlle-|10,000 set        |77.01             |64.92             | 
|d switchboard     |                  |                  |                  | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 



</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20422 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar026___94012" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-026 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  23 February 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> INDUSTRY </F>
<H3> <TI>   Labor Productivity Improves in Nonferrous Industry </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Labor Productivity Improves in Nonferrous Industry </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94CE0352 Beijing JINGJI CANKAO BAO in Chinese 23 Feb 94 p 1 </F>
<F P=103> 94CE0352 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing JINGJI CANKAO BAO </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Reporter Yu Huiyin (7411 6540 7299)] </F>
  [Text] In 1933, the output of 10 types of nonferrous metals 
commonly used in China totalled 3.26 million tons, an increase 
of almost 10 percent over production for the previous year, and 
met its original quota of 3 million tons set for 1995 two years 
ahead of time. What is more outstanding is the fact that this 
was accomplished in face of organizational restructuring and a 
close to 10 percent reduction in the work force that was 
diverted. 
  The annual output of nonferrous metals in China grew from 
an annual output of 13,000 tons during the early years of the 
Liberation to almost a million tons annual output within 30 
years to reach its first step. During the next ten years, from 
nearly a million tons annual output, the industry grew at an 
annual rate of 7.5 percent to reach the second step marked by an 
annual output of 2 million tons. From the second step to the 
third step of 3 million tons annual output, the industry only 
took five years, growing at an annual rate of 10 percent. Not 
only did production show rapid growth, the supply of ore 
resources also continued to be structurally adjusted in 
accordance with market demand. When market demand was great, the 
output of aluminum (an abundant resource in China) rose from its 
already great proportional share of 31.2 percent of the 
nonferrous metals produced on the second step level to 38 
percent. Growth of its absolute output was so great that it had 
reached 1.22 million tons per annum. As the international market 
looked encouraging, the output of zinc, which is also assured in 
China, also rose from its proportional share of total output, 
from 20 percent to 23 percent. 
  China's nonferrous industry, as a "traditional" industry 
has the disadvantage of being a single industry utilizing too 
many workers. Last year the head office for the nonferrous 
industry diverted the work force in a move to reform the inner 
structure of enterprises by changing their mode of operation 
throughout the whole system to increase productivity. They 
obtained good results. According to statistics from last year's 
annual report on worker wages, the number of workers in the 
system under the head office in 1993 was fewer than the number 
for 1992 by more than 70,000, but productivity was increased by 
11.5 percent. Income per capita, after adjustment for inflation 
on goods sold, rose 7.85 percent over the previous year's figure. 
  After some study and discussion, the Xinan [Southwest] 
Aluminum Processing Plant separated 12 production subsidiaries 
and service units from itself. Reorganized and given a social 
orientation, these units were economic entities that served the 
plant at the same time. This move separated 2,473 persons from 
the parent plant. At another group of large enterprises 
including the Tongling Co., the Yunxi Co., the Guizhou Aluminum 
Plant, the Shenyang Ore Refining Plant, the Daqing Bureau of 
Mines, the Jiangxi Copper Company, the Lanzhou Aluminum Plant 
etc., work force diversion and new enterprise creation were 
coordinated, whereby the separated workers developed new kinds 
of start-up business entities. According to statistics from the 
838 economic entities completely separated from their parent 
companies, income from their operations last year grossed 2.7 
billion yuan, of which 100.8 million yuan was realized interest 
tax, and 90 million yuan was net profit. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20423 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar026___94013" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-026 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  10 December 1993 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> FOREIGN TRADE, INVESTMENT </F>
<H3> <TI>   Comparing Development Models for Tumen Jiang </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Comparing Development Models for Tumen Jiang </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94CE0387A Beijing SHIJIE JINGJI [WORLD ECONOMY] in Chinese 
No 12, 10 Dec 93 pp 27-31, 65 </F>

<F P=103> 94CE0387A </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing SHIJIE JINGJI [WORLD ECONOMY] </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Xia Youfu (1115 0645 1381) and Huang Xueqi (7806 </F>
1331 3825): "Comparing Development Models for Tumen Jiang"] 
  [Text] Development and cooperation in the Tumen Jiang 
region has been a much-examined and much-discussed topic both 
among countries in northeast Asia and at the United Nations 
Development and Planning [UNDP] in recent years. One can think 
of eight models for achieving development and cooperation in the 
Tumen Jiang region. To achieve the goal of development and 
economically vitalize the region and the entire northeast Asia, 
we must do a careful study, compare the various cooperation 
models, and select the best. The Tumen Jiang development region 
can be defined on three levels. On the first level is the Tumen 
Jiang small-triangle development zone, also known as TREZ, made 
up of a 1,000-square kilometer area of land including Jingxin in 
China, the southern Hasang area in Russia, and the Luojin and 
Xianfeng areas in North Korea. On the second level is the Tumen 
Jiang greater-triangle development zone, also refereed to as the 
Tumen Jiang economic development area [TEDA]. It is about 10,000 
square kilometers in area and includes Yanji in China, the 
greater Vladivostok economic region in Russia, and Qingjin in 
North Korea. On the third level is the Northeast Asia 
Development Area [NEARDA], encompassing northeast China (Jilin, 
Heilongjiang, and three banners and one city in Inner Mongolia), 
the Russian Far East, North Korea, South Korea, Mongolia, and 
Japan. This article focuses on cooperation models for the Tumen 
Jiang small-triangle development zone in hopes of identifying 
the best model to transform the region into an enormously 
powerful development magnet, which, in turn, would be the engine 
to drive the development of TEDA and NEARDA in the course of 
time through the ripple effect. 
  1. The Necessity and Criteria of Choosing the Best Model 
  1) Necessity a) Broadly speaking there are eight cooperation 
models for the development of the Tumen Jiang development zone: 
unilateral development zone, bilateral coordinated development 
zone, trilateral coordinated development zone, functional 
cooperation, multinational economic cooperation zone, management 
by a multinational consortium or multinational corporation, 
three-nation joint management, and UN administration. These are 
the objectives of developing the Tumen Jiang region. First, spur 
the development of the economy of the development zone; second, 
tap the zone's development potential, and fully exploit the 
complementariness of the resources of the various nations so 
that they are allocated optimally; and third, build the 
development zone into a powerful development magnet to fuel the 
development of northeast Asia as a whole. The several nations 
involved do not completely see eye to eye when it comes to 
development objectives. China hopes that a developed Tumen Jiang 
would power the economic take-off of its northeast. Russia looks 
to it to fuel the development of its Far East and lead the 
charge of its Asian Pacific economic and trade strategy. North 
Korea expects it to jump-start economic development in its 
several northwestern provinces. South Korea wants it to do the 
same for its eastern coastal area and hopes to make full use of 
the complementariness of its resources and captures the market 
in the region. Japan hopes that it will further the development 
of its western coast. It too expects to fully utilize the 
complementariness of its resources and corner the market in 
northeast Asia. As for Mongolia, it sees Tumen Jiang as another 
trade shortcut. Depending on the model we pick, these various 
objectives will be achieved to different extents. Hence we need 
to do a careful comparative study and select the one which would 
lead to the achievement of all these objectives. 
  b) The models also produce different results. Some yield 
short-term benefits. Others satisfy a limited number of national 
objectives. Yet others meet all objectives in the long haul. It 
is imperative, therefore, that the best model be selected. 
  c) The complexity of development and cooperation in the zone 
requires that we carefully choose the best model. The region is 
one of the most complex, most diverse in the world, as 
demonstrated by its 1) political complexity, 2) economic 
diversity, 3) legal complexity, and 4) managerial difficulty. 
  2) The Criteria of Model Comparison and Selection a) Conduct 
a qualitative evaluation of the models from the macro strategic 
high plane. The qualitative evaluation system should consist of 
six criteria--politics, economics, dissemination effect, its 
ability to attract foreign capital and technology, management, 
and law. 
  b) Carry out empirical research on the models through case 
studies, using international experiences. 
  c) Identify the model acceptable to all parties by 
conducting 
feasibility studies. 
  2. Defining Various Models 
  Depending on the closeness of cooperation among the various 
countries, the models can be divided into three broad 
categories: loose cooperation, semi-close cooperation, and close 
cooperation. 
  1) Loose-cooperation models Under a loose-cooperation model, 
China, North Korea, and Russia each set up a development zone in 
neighboring areas in the Tumen Jiang region. There is very 
limited cooperation in some fields, with each country creating 
its own comprehensive economic development zone characterized by 
loose cooperation. Specifically, the three nations each 
establish a comprehensive economic development zone in adjoining 
areas in the region. By fully exercising their respective 
sovereignty, the three nations each formulate their own policies 
to meet the requirements of their comprehensive zones. In 
particular, they decide on their own what preferential policies 
to offer to foreign investors. There is some form of low-level 
cooperation and coordination in some policy areas, but each 
nation has its own development zone management committee to run 
the zone. 
  Specific examples of a loose-cooperation model: Model A: 
unilateral economic zone. Under this model, China, North Korea, 
and Russia each set up an economic zone in neighboring areas in 
the Tumen Jiang region based on their own national interests and 
aspirations. They run the zones separately on their own and 
there is no well-defined cooperative relationship or 
coordination among them. Specifically China has created an 
economic development zone in Hunchun. To develop Siberia and its 
Far East, Russia has set up a free economic development zone in 
the Hasang area in Nahuodeka. To attract foreign capital, North 
Korea has also created a special economic zone on Hashan Island 
in Xianfeng Prefecture. They have their own development zone 
management committees. Each zone has its own regional 
development plan, a policy to attract foreign capital, and other 
policies. There is only routine trade among the three 
development zones, along with border trade and border trade on a 
very modest scale. Nor have the three nations taken joint 
measures to develop the local economy by drawing up an 
agreement, for instance. 
  Model B: Bilateral coordinated economic development zone. 
Under this model, the three nations each set up an economic open 
zone in neighboring areas in the Tumen Jiang region. China 
concludes a bilateral agreement with North Korea and Russia 
separately. There is a limited degree of coordination in policy 
matters as well as some cooperation in certain fields through 
the establishment of a bilateral coordinating committee, forming 
an economic development zone characterized by loose bilateral 
cooperation and coordination. Specifically, China, North Korea, 
and Russia each set up a development zone in neighboring areas 
in the Tumen Jiang region. China enters into a bilateral 
cooperative agreement with Russia and North Korea separately. It 
sets up a development zone ministerial-level committee with the 
two countries, again separately. The committee meets once a year 
to discuss major matters of coordination and cooperation. In 
addition, a bilateral coordinating committee is created to 
coordinate cooperative activities. Nevertheless, the major 
decisions are still made by each nation. The characteristic of 
this model is that ownership and the right to use are merged. 
Each nation retains absolute sovereignty. The basis of 
coordination is the bilateral agreement, yet no such agreement 
exists between Russia and North Korea. 
  Model C: Trilateral coordinated economic open zone. Under 
this model, China, North Korea, and Russia each set up an 
economic open zone in adjoining areas in the Tumen Jiang region. 
The three nations sign an agreement setting up a trilateral 
coordinating committee to coordinate policies and other matters 
to a certain extent, forming an economic open zone characterized 
by loose coordination and cooperation. Specifically the three 
nations each set up their own economic development zone and all 
three are parties to a coordination and cooperation agreement. A 
trilateral ministerial-level committee is set up, along with a 
trilateral coordinating committee to carry out coordination. 
What you have under this model is still loose coordination and 
cooperation. Ownership and the right to use have not been 
separated. The basis for coordination is a trilateral agreement. 
  2) Semi-close cooperation models 
  Under a semi-close cooperation model, the three nations each 
set up an economic open zone in neighboring areas in the Tumen 
Jiang region by exercising their sovereignty and cooperate more 
closely in certain fields or in the planning and development of 
the region as a whole. Specifically the nations each set up an 
economic development zone in the Tumen Jiang region, sign a 
trilateral agreement, and set up a three-nation 
ministerial-level coordinating committee and a three-nation 
coordinating committee. The three countries cooperate more 
closely in certain fields, in the formulation of some policies, 
and in the development of the entire regional economy. 
  Specific examples of a semi-close cooperation model: 
  Model D: functional cooperation. China, North Korea, and 
Russia each set up an economic open zone in neighboring areas in 
the Tumen Jiang region and sign an agreement under which they 
are to cooperate relatively more closely in some fields that 
will shape the long-term development of the whole region, such 
as communication and transportation, energy, environmental 
protection, tourism, agriculture, and tariffs. Specifically the 
three nations each set up their own development zone and enter 
into an agreement specifying the fields of cooperation. A 
ministerial-level committee and a coordinating committee are set 
up. In some fields, eg., transportation, energy, and 
environmental protection, a corporation is set up. In others, 
such as tourism, a promoting committee is set up. A number of 
preferential policies are adopted to attract foreign capital to 
finance development in the selected fields. Resources are 
allowed to circulate freely in the field concerned. 
  Model E: multinational economic cooperation zone. By 
exercising their political sovereignty, the three nations, 
namely China, Russia, and North Korea, sign a cooperation 
agreement setting up a unified multinational economic open zone 
and carry out relatively close cooperation on the economic 
front. Specifically, the three nations sign an agreement 
creating a multinational economic cooperation zone in adjoining 
areas in the Tumen Jiang region. A "Tumen Jiang multinational 
economic cooperation law," which must not violate the 
constitutions of the three nations, is adopted as the basic law 
of the zone. There is a single unified fiscal policy, tax 
policy, and monetary policy in the zone. Tariffs are unified. A 
free trade zone, perhaps even tariff alliance, is set up. A 
favorable investment climate is created to attract foreign 
capital and technology. Resources are allowed to circulate 
freely within the zone to take advantage of their 
complementariness. The market system reigns supreme within the 
zone. A three-nation ministerial-level committee exists to 
handle major matters. Underneath it is a multinational economic 
zone management committee, an executive body in charge of the 
unified planning, leadership, and management of the zone. 
  Model F: management by a multinational consortium or 
corporation. This carries the multinational cooperation zone 
model one step further. A multinational corporation leases the 
land use right to a piece of territory where the three nations 
abut one another, forming an economic development zone 
characterized by multinational cooperation through unified 
planning, investment, and management. Specifically a 
multinational economic cooperation zone is set up in accordance 
with an agreement. The multinational consortium or corporation 
leases the land use right to a piece of land in the Tumen Jiang 
region where the three nations abut, with ownership remaining in 
the hands of the three nations. When the land use right lease 
expires, it may be extended if necessary. A management committee 
exists to carry out unified planning and management. As far as 
tariffs are concerned, a free port policy is followed A number 
of other preferential policies are also offered. The leading 
industry in the multinational economic zone is banking and 
trade, with the zone ultimately becoming a banking and trade 
center in northeast Asia. This model is characterized by the 
separation of ownership and use-right, but the three nations 
still retain sovereignty. 
  3) Close-cooperation models 
  To fully achieve the development objective of the region, 
China, Russia, and North Korea sign a trilateral or 
international agrement setting up an integrated Tumen Jiang 
cooperation zone. They engage in close cooperation on issues 
relating to the zone's overall development. The cooperation zone 
is quasi-national in nature and practices political, social, and 
economic integration for an extended period of time (anywhere 
from 50 to 100 years, for stance). A case in point is Hong Kong. 
Specifically the three nations sign a trilateral or 
international agreement setting up an integrated cooperation 
zone. By adopting a "special law on the integration of the Tumen 
Jiang region," the legislatures of the three nations approve the 
establishment of an integrated Tumen Jiang cooperation zone for 
a set period of time (say, from 50 to 100 years) in order to 
develop the region. The zone is quasi-national in nature. It has 
a committee composed of the heads of government which meets 
regularly and handles major issues. There is also a development 
zone special management committee, an authoritative body in 
charge of the unified planning, leadership, and management of 
the zone. Special policies apply in the zone. While the 
territory of the zone belongs to the three nations, no nation 
can unilaterally exercise sovereign control over its portion of 
the zone during its predetermined duration. Resources can 
circulate freely within the zone. It is a free trade zone and an 
export processing zone. It is a tariff union as well as economic 
union. It is authorized to issue a freely convertible special 
zone currency and offers preferential incentives to attract 
foreign capital and technology. The zone also has a special 
assembly whose primary responsibilities are legislation and 
supervising the zone's administrative officers in the discharge 
of the latter's duties and functions. The zone's diplomatic and 
defense matters are handled through consultation. 
  Specific examples of a close-cooperation model: 
  Model G, three-nation joint management. The three nations 
sign a cooperation agreement setting up an integrated Tumen 
Jiang cooperation zone to effect political, economic, and social 
integration for a prolonged period of time. The zone is run by a 
mixed three-nation joint management committee. Specifically, in 
addition to the above description, the following points need to 
be noted. The three nations sign a trilateral agreement. A 
committee consisting of the heads of government of the three 
nations is set up. Also established is a special mixed 
management committee comprising representatives from the three 
nations to run the zone jointly. 
  Model H: UN administration. Under the auspices of the United 
Nations, the six [as published] nations of China, Russia, North 
Korea, Japan, and Mongolia sign an international agreement 
setting up an integrated special cooperation zone where these 
six nations abut one another in the Tumen Jiang region. A 
"special law on the Tumen Jiang integrated special cooperation 
zone" is passed by the pertinent legislative bodies and the 
United Nations is entrusted to be solely responsible for its 
administration. Specifically, under the auspices of the UN, the 
six nations sign an international agreement setting up an 
integrated Tumen Jiang special cooperation zone. The pertinent 
legislative bodies adopt a "special law on the Tumen Jiang 
integrated special cooperation zone" and authorize the UN to be 
solely responsible for administering it. The United Nations sets 
up a regional development special committee directly answerable 
to the secretary general. The committee selects experts to form 
a "Tumen Jiang experts management committee" to take charge of 
the zone's unified planning, leadership, and management. There 
is also a committee composed of the UN secretary-general, the 
executive director of the regional development special committee 
directly under the secretary-general, as well as the heads of 
government of the nations involved. The zone adopts special 
preferential policies to attract foreign capital and technology 
and issues a freely convertible Tumen Jiang currency. Its 
exchange rate follows the exchange rate of the special drawing 
rights [SDR's]. The distribution of interests and disputes 
arising therefrom are resolved by the United Nations and the six 
nations through consultation, with the United Nations holding 
the ultimate arbitration power. Diplomatic affairs are worked 
out through consultation. Territorial sovereignty remains in the 
hands of the three nations. Defense and public security 
responsibilities are carried out by UN peacekeeping forces. 
  3. Comparing the Eight Models 
  1) Model A Pros: Relatively amenable to realizing the wishes 
and aspirations of an individual nation. Extremely low initial 
exchange costs, which means that an economic open zone can be 
set up in no time. Legal and policy coordination can come about 
readily. 
  Cons: Cannot achieve the basic objectives of developing the 
region, fully exploiting the zone's absolute or comparative 
advantage, or bringing about the complementariness of resources. 
Economies of scale unobtainable. Large-scale infusion of foreign 
capital hampered by the political system, legal system, level of 
economic development and policies of the nation in question and 
other constraints. Hard to build up a lead industry. The fact 
that each nation solves its environmental and other problems on 
its own presents enormous difficulties. 
  In the real world, each nation has set up its own economic 
development zone, but only of a very elementary variety. Foreign 
capital is cautious about entering Russia what with its current 
political instability. It still has a long way to go before 
completing its transition to a market economy and its economic 
mechanism operates in a most haphazard manner, which gives 
foreign capital pause. The infrastructure in the Russian far 
east is backward and there is a shortage of managerial 
personnel. Foreign-funded enterprises already there cannot 
operate properly. The legal system is unsound and incomplete, 
with administrative orders often filling the void. The result is 
a high degree of unpredictability. Furthermore, the 
Russian-Japanese territorial dispute is an impediment to the 
large-scale entry of Japanese capital into the Russian Far East. 
Thus, domestic investment and the vitalization of existing 
relations alone will not be able to lift the economy of Russian 
far east and those of Asian Pacific nations to a higher level of 
mutually beneficial interaction. Among the various nations in 
northeast Asia, the North Korean economy is most backward and 
the least open. It has a tenuous economic relationship with 
Japan and began trade and economic ties with South Korea only 
two or three years ago. The channels of economic exchange and 
trade between North Korea and other nations are narrow and, to a 
certain extent, stagnant. Despite the establishment of an 
economic zone on Hashan Island, the possibility of attracting 
foreign capital on a large scale is extremely remote. China, 
too, has its own problems: a backward infrastructure, an 
incomplete legal system, inefficiency, and a shortage of senior 
managerial personnel. 
  2) Model B Pros: conducive to bringing out the 
complementariness of the resources of the two sides involved. 
Initial exchange costs low; good chance of reaching an 
agreement; may strengthen bilateral relations; may serve common 
economic interests through bilateral cooperation. 
  Cons: This model still falls short of achieving the basic 
objective of developing the region. Bilateral forces not enough 
of an engine to fuel the development of the region; the free 
circulation of resources is impeded, their complementariness not 
fully exploited; there is only limited complementariness between 
the resources of China and those of North Korea; cannot reap the 
benefits of economies of scale long term; the different 
interpretations of the institutions and policies of the various 
nations and different expectations about the future preclude a 
large infusion of foreign capital; immense difficulties in 
reconciling one system of law with another and one policy with 
another, and in coordinating the distribution of interests; the 
extent of economic cooperation within the zone is modest, 
complicating further development. 
  This model is fairly acceptable to the three parties. Thus 
far all three have made some move on this front. China and 
Russia, for instance, have set up a common market in a number of 
localities. 
  3) Model C Pros: marks the first step toward achieving the 
basic objective of cooperation and development in the zone; 
economies of scale much more substantial than under the previous 
two models; helps bring out the complementariness of resources 
to a large extent; helps improve relations among the three 
parties. Initial exchange costs also quite low, albeit they tend 
to go up subsequently. 
  Cons: hard to coordinate the laws and policies of different 
nations because of conflicting interests and because they are 
significantly different from one another; the zone is nothing 
more than a loose organization; lacking a legal basis for its 
actions as well as a powerful coordinating committee, it is not 
in a position to play an effective role or to attract foreign 
capital and technology in a big way; it has trouble developing 
into a development magnet and still falls short of achieving the 
objective of development. 
  In the real world, the three nations do find this model 
acceptable and now appreciate the importance of cooperation. 
They have taken some moves on the cooperation front as 
illustrated by their enthusiastic participation in the 
international conference organized by UNDP. 
  4) Model D Pros: helps spur development in some fields, 
taking the interests of the entire region as the point of 
departure; makes good use of the resources within those fields 
and puts their complementariness to work; can lead to economies 
of scale more extensively and is good at disseminating 
technology to the surrounding areas. It also succeeds in 
attracting a substantial amount of foreign capital; can promote 
trilateral relations further. 
  Cons: because of the presence of the complexity and 
disparities mentioned above, the field of cooperation cannot be 
readily broadened; initial exchange costs quite high; 
difficulties in coordinating policies and management; cannot 
guarantee the all-round development of zone. 
  It is within the realm of possibility to adopt this model to 
set the stage for further cooperation. The three parties are in 
the process of exploring the possibility of cooperating with one 
another in transportation (building a harbor) and environmental 
protection. Right now the foremost problem is conflicting 
interests. A case in point is harbor construction. In 1990 China 
proposed building a harbor on its soil. Under its plan, the 
first phase will consist of dredging the silt that has 
accumulated at the mouth of Tumen Jiang, estimated to be between 
1 and 3 million cubic meters. Along with rail construction, the 
project will cost about $2 billion. The second phase of the plan 
calls for the construction of a large harbor upstream at 
Hunchun, about 72 km from Fangchuan, that will handle 10,000-ton 
ships, at an estimated cost of $8 billion by the year 2015. 
North Korea, on the other hand, suggests that an international 
trade port be built within its territory, arguing that, first, 
Qingjin, Luojin, and Xianji are ice-free ports; second, unlike 
downstream Tumen Jiang, it does not have the problem of silt 
accumulation; and third, it is free from flooding and it costs 
less to use existing facilities. For its part, meanwhile, Russia 
has proposed that places like Boxiete and Vladivostok be 
developed first to spearhead the drive of opening up to the 
outside world. 
  5) Model E Pros: it tentatively accomplishes the goal of 
development and reaps the benefits of economies of scale; it is 
better able to attract foreign capital than the several 
preceding models and bring out the complementariness of 
resources. 
  Cons: initial exchange costs quite substantial; management 
and coordination still present enormous difficulties; South 
Korea, Mongolia, and Japan still unable to play their proper 
role. 
  Both China and Russia find this model acceptable. As a 
matter 
of fact, Chinese experts have proposed adopting this model. The 
main roadblock comes from North Korea. In 1984 North Korea 
introduced a limited open policy, which militates against 
expanding economic ties with other nations in the region, which, 
in turn, will necessarily hamper the formation of a cooperation 
zone in Tumen Jiang. 
  6) Model F Pros: can attract foreign capital; utilizes the 
strengths of multinational consortia and corporations when it 
comes to funding, technology, and management; short-term 
pay-offs substantial. Leads to considerable economies of scale. 
  Cons: High initial exchange costs. There is no guarantee 
that the objective of development in the zone will be achieved. 
Out of self-interests, the multinational consortium or 
corporation typically pursues short-term benefits while ignoring 
the region's long-term interests. It may cause the Matai effect. 
Transfer prices may get out of control. Macro-management 
presents great difficulties. The three nations are not up to the 
task. Special preferential policies are needed to create the 
investment climate to attract foreign capital, something beyond 
the capacity of the three nations. It is well worth our while to 
examine ways of ensuring the investors' interests. A banking and 
trade center is unlikely to materialize in the short run. 
Besides there is no guarantee this model will lead to the 
development of the region and other areas. 
  The adoption of this model must be made conditional on the 
implementation of Model E. Otherwise it simply will not work. 
  7) Model G Pros: achieves the goal of development; better 
able to utilize the complementariness of resources; achieves 
economies of scale in a big way; effective in attracting foreign 
capital; more harmonious relations among the three nations; 
internal institutional stability; easy to coordinate policies. 
  Cons: extremely high initial exchange costs; hard to 
reconcile the interests of the three nations and resolve their 
conflicts; the complexity and diversity of the region 
complicates the operations of the model in practice; management 
would have trouble keeping up. Model still fails to engage 
Japan, Mongolia, or South Korea actively in it. 
  It is extremely difficult to put this model into practice. 
The conditions are just not there in the real world. First, the 
issue of sovereignty. Arduous negotiations are necessary here. 
Second, the three nations' attitudes. North Korea finds the 
model unacceptable. China and Russia are more flexible but are 
still deterred by doubts about whether it can be properly run, 
about its ability to attract foreign capital on a large scale, 
and about its future and success from rushing to embrace it. Be 
that as it may, this model is one of cooperation at an advanced 
level that is well worth looking into. 
  8) Model H Pros: It can fully accomplish the objective of 
development and ensure the interests of all parties. It is 
effective in attracting foreign capital and technology in large 
quantities and reconciling the conflicts among the various 
parties. It is amenable to scientific management and can 
generate substantial social, ecological, and economic benefits. 
It is better suited to enable Japan, South Korea, and Mongolia 
to play their proper role. Under this model, resources can be 
truly complementary and we can effectively tap their potential. 
The region can serve as a strong disseminator of technology and 
gradually helps drive the development of northeast Asia as a 
whole, achieving optimal economies of scale. It also sets an 
example for other forms of multilateral cooperation. 
  Cons: It incurs hefty initial exchange costs and entails 
extremely tough negotiations. However, once the model is in 
place, all nations in northeast Asia will benefit from it 
tremendously. This is cooperation of a high order. Nevertheless, 
further reform of the existing UN management system is needed 
before it can undertake this monumental task. 
  The fact of the matter is that as an international 
authoritative body that is neutral, nonprofit, technical, and 
disinterested, the United Nations has consistently held high the 
banner of peace and development. It is a strong advocate of 
development. All nations recognize its organizational, research 
and development, managerial, and fund-raising abilities; its 
capacity for attracting, organizing, and putting qualified 
personnel to work; and its achievements over the past few 
decades. For this reason, it is the best candidate to play the 
administrative role. With the United Nations actively supporting 
and working hard on behalf of the development of the region, it 
is possible it may accept the role. Let us analyze the attitudes 
of the various nations. Russia has now adopted a policy of 
opening itself up across the board and is looking for a powerful 
engine to boost the development of all Siberia and its Far East, 
so it is expected to take a positive view. Since Deng Xiaoping 
toured south China and delivered a number of speeches there, 
China has opened itself further, emphasizing economic 
construction as the central task. As we see it, provided the 
territory belongs to China, provided UN administration can lead 
to the development of the Tumen Jiang region and fuel the 
development of the northeast as a whole, making China more 
powerful overall, China may support this model. And so will 
Japan, South Korea, and Mongolia. North Korea may well reserve 
judgment. But if other nations in northeast Asia support it 
unanimously and put in painstaking work, in the end North Korea 
will also go along with it. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20424 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar026___94014" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-026 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  23 February 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> LABOR </F>
<H3> <TI>   Reversal of Migrating Rural Labor </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Reversal of Migrating Rural Labor </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94CE0362B Beijing JINGJI RIBAO in Chinese 23 Feb 94 p 1 </F>
<F P=103> 94CE0362B </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing JINGJI RIBAO </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Two-part article by Tai Dewen and Gao Lu: "Speaking of the </F>
Reverse Flow in Season of Rising `Tide'--Dialogue on Reverse 
Flow Phenomenon in `Tide of Rural Labor'(Part Two)" -- Part One 
published in China JPRS Report CAR 94-025] 
  [Text] Don't Ask Him Why He Returned 
  Tai: Fairly many of the factors for "regressing" 
and starting an undertaking are connected with the traditional 
idea of bringing honor to one's ancestors. "A gale has risen and 
is sweeping the clouds across the sky; with more force 
throughout the country it sweeps people back to their native 
places." In the Han Dynasty, after Liu Bang had achieved success 
and gained fame, the first thing he did was return to his native 
place and show off. The traditional idea of bringing honor to 
one's ancestors is deeply ingrained in people's consciousness, 
and it influences their behavior. In the period of his work 
outside his native place, a peasant of Fuyang City learned the 
skill of making pickled vegetables. When he returned to his 
native place he took the lead in setting up the Huatuo Pickled 
Vegetable Plant. Its annual output value is now over 10 million 
yuan and its profit more than 10 million yuan. He has been 
selected to be a special representative of the city's CPPCC and 
NPC. 
  Gao: Objectively, the existing household 
registration system and land system, I'm afraid, are also 
important factors in the return to their native places by those 
who have engaged in trade or work outside their native places. 
The dual social structure, in which city and county are 
separated and which has been extant in China for a long time, 
although in recent years being made somewhat more flexible and 
being somewhat weakened, has fundamentally not changed. The 
peasants who went to cities to work do not enjoy the social 
welfare and insurance benefits that the city's staff and workers 
do; at present, one cannot obtain a permanent right to reside in 
a city soley by economic means. 
  Tai: Even if this precedent were to be set, one 
would have to pay the city's land-use fee, basic facilities fee, 
employment placement fee, and other economic costs; and they are 
very high and also constantly increasing. Our investigation of 
typical cases showed that, faced with the choice of paying a 
large sum of money to obtain the right of permanent residence in 
a city or using this money to return to one's native place and 
set up an enterprise, more than 90 percent of the people chose 
the latter. At the same time, in accordance with the existing 
land contract system, those who go outside their native places 
to work must pay taxes and fees in line with the contract. The 
idea that the peasants' land cannot be put out of cultivation at 
the same time also influences their desire to return. 
  Gao: Speaking of certain peasants who have 
returned to the "Yellow Earth" to continue to engage in 
agriculture, the state's support policies, e.g., raising the 
grain purchasing price, I'm afraid, is also an inducement that 
cannot be overlooked. 
  Tai: That's natural. If they could gain wealth by 
tilling the land, why would the peasants leave their villages 
and crowd into cities? In the process of the return by peasants 
who went outside their native places, market mechanisms and 
policy levers have played an important role. 
  Gao: Specifically, for certain returnees the 
exciting cause could be the joint effect of the above factors, 
and also could be the result of the effect of certain factors 
among them. It is not necessary to get to the bottom of this 
question. The value of the investigation and analysis of the 
exciting cause for their return lies in understanding and 
grasping this phenomenon and correctly guiding it. 
  Tai: This viewpoint is very important, and we are 
pursuing this train of thought. The reason for investigating and 
analyzing why the peasants return is to make the formulated 
policies and measures more scientific. In doing policy and 
management work, I advocate that we not examinue minutely why 
other people return. We must look at objective results, and use 
the three "is it favorable or not" questions as the criteria for 
judging whether people's behavior is right or wrong, 
advantageous or disadvantageous. 
<H5>  New Growing Points </H5>
  Gao: What those who engaged in trade or worked 
outside their native places obtained was not only a sizable 
economic income, skills, and business insight, but also they 
unconsciously absorbed the new ideas of modern life in the 
developed areas. Those who return bring back the culture and 
civilization on the outside; through their various ways of 
behaving they influence peasants around them, thereby pounding 
at the old, backward concepts and producing an exemplary effect 
on people's lifestyle. 
  Tai: The depth and the breadth of this effect far 
exceed those of radio, television, the press, and other mass 
media. A young woman from Jidong Village, Quanyang Town, Jieshou 
City went to Beijing, where she became a nurse. She was 
gradually influenced by the modern lifestyle. At the Spring 
Festival she returned home. Her ideas, concepts, and ways of 
behaving produced a big effect on the other young women in her 
village. When the Spring Festival had just ended, about a dozen 
young women requested that she take them to Beijing to become 
nurses. At the beginning of the 1990 Spring Festival, she set 
up in her native village a labor export organization and 
conveyance center. Over the past several years she has organized 
and conveyed to Beijing more than 1,200 person-times of young 
women. These women are now spurring on and influencing changes 
in the thoughts and concepts of even more women. 
  Tai: The pioneering activities of those who have 
returned home have mitigated the social problems brought by the 
transregional flow of labor forces and their crowding into 
cities. After World War II, in some independent developing 
countries, during the process of industrialization there 
appeared, to different degrees, the "urbanization transition 
syndrome." Brazil, the national condition of which approximates 
that of China, is a typical example. In the period 1940-1983, 
the proportion of Brazil's urban population in its total 
population rose from 31.9 percent at the beginning to 70.7 
percent at the end. The rural people who flowed into the cities, 
unable to find employment, roamed the streets. And the labor 
force that we originally exported but that returned to their 
native places and set up enterprises absorb the surplus labor, 
thereby causing the on-the-spot transfer of the rural surplus 
labor and really advancing this situation in a realistic way. 
  Gao: In solving the problem of the transfer of 
rural surplus labor, the government and academic circles have 
explored many ways in various places, e.g., through adjustment 
of the internal structure of agriculture, achieving the 
split-flow way of "not leaving the land and not leaving the 
native place" through guiding peasants on the spot to shift to 
secondary and tertiary industries; thus, the ways of "leaving 
the land but not leaving the native ploace" and "leaving the 
native place but not leaving the land" have been incorporated 
into the rural industrial structure, while some peasants have 
been organized and guided to take the way of "leaving both land 
and native place" by being labor exports to cities outside their 
native places. The idea of on-the-spot transfer was put forward 
long ago, and the abrupt rise in transfers provides a realistic 
way for doing it. Undeveloped areas are basically places where 
township-town enterprises have not yet been developed. Those who 
return and start an undertaking may be called a contingent of 
"fresh troops." In this sense they constitute not only a new 
economic growing point for the development of township-town 
enterprises in undeveloped areas, but also a new growing point 
for the development of rural society; they may even be said to 
be a new growing point for the social and economic development 
of China, a country in which 90 percent of the population lives 
in the rural areas. If we observe the now surging "tide of rural 
labor" with this kind of eye, we get another impression. 
  Tai: Being mobile is not their objective; what, 
in the end, they pursue is returning and starting an 
undertaking. Speaking of the local governments, those in this 
transregional flow of rural surplus labor do not, in reality, 
require a school education, a factory in which investment has 
been made, and a credit bank. 
<H5>  New Theme </H5>
  Gao: The contingent of those who return and start 
an undertaking will, following the increase in the number of 
people flowing out, expand proportionally. Compared with the 
"tide of rural labor," the phenomenon of "regression" is of a 
more constructive nature, and thus constitutes a more important 
theme. 
  Tai: We already understand this point. The Third 
Plenary Session of the 14th CPC Central Committee formally used 
the term "labor market," and for labor as a commodity with the 
market as the intermediary, to have both a flow and a reverse 
flow is natural. For local governments the most realistic theme 
is: how, in policy, public opinion, and other aspects, to create 
an environment and conditions for taking effective measures that 
guide more people to return and start an undertaking. I feel 
that we should treat this theme from the height of attracting, 
discovering, developing, and using talented persons. 
  Gao: This is very far-sighted. There are bright 
prospects for local governments in this aspect. What measures 
have you taken or are preparing to take? 
  Tai: First of all, all our types of labor-export 
organizations are doing everything possible to make widespread 
contacts with economically developed areas and with some 
enterprises with good economic returns, and they are conveying 
to them in an organized manner high-quality rural surplus labor 
and purposefully, through export, training the various types of 
talented people urgently needed for our economic development. 
Second, through finding out the real situation by frequent 
investigations, particularly grasping the opportune time of the 
Spring Festival period when they return home to visit relatives 
to make use of symposiums and other ways to investigate and get 
a detailed understanding of the situation with regard to the 
exported labor's quality, direction of going, service life, and 
occupation in order to discover talented people. Third, with 
regard to the difficulties in funds encountered when returning 
and starting an undertaking, we require that financial 
departments, on the basis of conscientious inspection, give 
support in the form of loans; with regard to tax revenue, we 
require the tax departments, within the scope permitted by 
policy, as much as possible grant reductions or exemptions. 
Fourth, we are considering giving a double award to those who 
return, start an undertaking, and obtain outstanding results -- 
good economic returns and good social benefits -- and put them 
in leading posts at the village level, and let them lead more of 
the measses to make money and become well-off. Finally, we hope 
you news and propaganda departments will adopt many forms to 
publicize them in the mass media, forming in all of society a 
good atmosphere conducive to guiding those who return to make 
great contributions and accomplish great tasks. 
  Gao: We have thought of this point. The press has 
the responsibility for publicizing typical examples of those who 
have returned and started an undertaking, and for forming in 
society a general mood of admiring and valuing this activity. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20425 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcst004___94042" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CST-94-004 </AU>
JPRS 
Science &amp; Technology 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  China </ABS>
<DATE1>   7 February 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> Telecommunications R&amp;D </F>
<H3> <TI>   Recent Developments in Fiber Optic Communications </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Recent Developments in Fiber Optic Communications </PHRASE></F></HT>
<H4>    Industrial Pilot Line Built by Institute 44 </H4>

<F P=102> 94P60159B Beijing ZHONGGUO DIANZI BAO [CHINA ELECTRONICS 
NEWS] in Chinese 7 Feb 94 p 3 </F>

<F P=103> 94P60159B </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing ZHONGGUO DIANZI BAO [CHINA ELECTRONICS 
NEWS] </F>

<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Li Tiecheng [2621 6993 1004]: ``Institute 44 </F>
Completes Fiber-Optic-Communications Industrial Pilot Line''] 
  [Summary] In a 6-year project assigned by the State 
Planning Commission, a 19-million-yuan 
fiber-optic-communications industrial pilot line for 
long-wavelength and short-wavelength optoelectronic devices 
(sources and detectors) has been completed at MEI's Institute 
44, and passed MEI-organized acceptance check at the end of 
1993. Trial-use and formal testing indicate that these devices' 
performance indicators meet current international standards for 
commercial devices. This pilot line has an annual capacity of 
11,000 devices. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20426 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcst004___94043" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CST-94-004 </AU>
JPRS 
Science &amp; Technology 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  China </ABS>
<DATE1>   18 February 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> Telecommunications R&amp;D </F>
<H3> <TI>   Recent Developments in Fiber Optic Communications </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Recent Developments in Fiber Optic Communications </PHRASE></F></HT>
<H4>    China, France Jointly Produce SDH Systems </H4>

<F P=102> 94P60159C Beijing ZHONGGUO DIANZI BAO [CHINA ELECTRONICS 
NEWS] in Chinese 18 Feb 94 p 1 </F>

<F P=103> 94P60159C </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing ZHONGGUO DIANZI BAO [CHINA ELECTRONICS 
NEWS] </F>

<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Xing You [5281 1429]: ``China, France Jointly </F>
Manufacture Fiber Optic, Microwave Equipment''] 
  [Text] The China Posts and Telecommunications Industry 
Corporation and France's Alcatel Corporation recently reached 
agreement to jointly produce Synchronous Digital Hierarchy (SDH) 
fiber optic communications systems and microwave communications 
systems. MPT's Meishan Communications Equipment Plant and MPT's 
Beijing Communications Equipment Plant signed separate contracts 
with Alcatel for technology transfer, product manufacturing, 
sales and exporting, and establishment of joint-venture business 
management entities. The two joint ventures will begin 
manufacturing the equipment in the latter half of this year. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20427 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcst004___94044" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CST-94-004 </AU>
JPRS 
Science &amp; Technology 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  China </ABS>
<DATE1>   28 February 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> Telecommunications R&amp;D </F>
<H3> <TI>   Recent Developments in Fiber Optic Communications </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Recent Developments in Fiber Optic Communications </PHRASE></F></HT>
<H4>    Zhengzhou-Xian Trunk Line Cable Completed </H4>

<F P=102> 94P60159D Beijing ZHONGGUO DIANZI BAO [CHINA ELECTRONICS 
NEWS] in Chinese 28 Feb 94 p 3 </F>

<F P=103> 94P60159D </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing ZHONGGUO DIANZI BAO [CHINA ELECTRONICS 
NEWS] </F>

<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Kun Shan [2492 1472]: ``Zhengzhou-Xian Fiber </F>
Optic Cable Trunk Line Completed''] 
  [Summary] The 50-million-yuan Zhengzhou-Xian fiber optic 
cable communications trunk line construction project was 
recently completed, with inter-district circuits already in 
trial operation. This 558-km-long trunk line, a critical segment 
of the Asia-Europe overland fiber optic cable, uses imported 
single-mode long-wavelength optical fiber and fiber optic cable 
throughout. The initial phase has four fiber optic cable digital 
transmission systems employing 1310-nm-wavelength fiber with a 
140 Mbps [i.e., DS4] transmission rate. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20428 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcst004___94045" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CST-94-004 </AU>
JPRS 
Science &amp; Technology 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  China </ABS>
<DATE1>   28 February 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> Telecommunications R&amp;D </F>
<H3> <TI>   Recent Developments in Fiber Optic Communications </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Recent Developments in Fiber Optic Communications </PHRASE></F></HT>
<H4>    Fuzhou-Hangzhou-Chengdu Cable To Be Built </H4>

<F P=102> 94P60159E Beijing ZHONGGUO DIANZI BAO [CHINA ELECTRONICS 
NEWS] in Chinese 28 Feb 94 p 3 </F>

<F P=103> 94P60159E </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing ZHONGGUO DIANZI BAO [CHINA ELECTRONICS 
NEWS] </F>

<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Yu Yikuan [0151 5030 1401]: ``Fuzhou </F>
(Hangzhou)-Guilin-Chengdu Fiber Optic Cable To Be Built''] 
  [Summary] It has been learned from authoritative sources 
that construction on China's longest fiber optic cable 
communications trunk line -- the Fuzhou 
(Hangzhou)-Guilin-Chengdu cable -- will begin this year. This 
4,354-km-long, 1.071-billion-yuan trunk line will link up six 
provinces: Fujian, Zhejiang, Jiangxi, Hunan, Guizhou, and 
Sichuan. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20429 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcst004___94046" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CST-94-004 </AU>
JPRS 
Science &amp; Technology 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  China </ABS>
<DATE1>   28 February 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> Telecommunications R&amp;D </F>
<H3> <TI>   Recent Developments in Fiber Optic Communications </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Recent Developments in Fiber Optic Communications </PHRASE></F></HT>
<H4>    Reeling Cable, Apparatus Developed </H4>

<F P=102> 94P60159F Beijing ZHONGGUO DIANZI BAO [CHINA ELECTRONICS 
NEWS] in Chinese 28 Feb 94 p 3 </F>

<F P=103> 94P60159F </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing ZHONGGUO DIANZI BAO [CHINA ELECTRONICS 
NEWS] </F>

<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Chen Zhenhong [7115 6297 7703]: ``MEI's </F>
Institute 23 Develops Reeling Fiber Optic Cable, Reeling 
Apparatus''] 
  [Summary] The reeling optical cable and reeling apparatus 
developed by MEI's Institute 23 has been formally certified. 
This cable, containing four to six fibers, has an external 
diameter of 4 mm and comes with a burn-resistant jacket. The 
reeling apparatus, consisting of a tractor and a reeling 
machine, can be manually operated or remote-controlled (for high 
overhead cable laying). 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20430 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcst004___94047" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CST-94-004 </AU>
JPRS 
Science &amp; Technology 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  China </ABS>
<DATE1>   1 March 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> Telecommunications R&amp;D </F>
<H3> <TI>   Recent Developments in Fiber Optic Communications </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Recent Developments in Fiber Optic Communications </PHRASE></F></HT>
<H4>    Caohejing Becoming Fiber Production Base </H4>

<F P=102> 94P60159G Shanghai WEN HUI BAO in Chinese 1 Mar 94 p 3 </F>
<F P=103> 94P60159G </F>
<F P=104>  Shanghai WEN HUI BAO </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Chen Wei [7115 1919]: ``Caohejing Becoming </F>
Optical Fiber Production Base''] 
  [Summary] The Shanghai Caohejing New Technologies 
Development Zone is becoming a major domestic optical fiber 
production base, especially with yesterday's signing of a 
contract between the U.S.-backed Shanghai AT&amp;T Optical Fiber 
Ltd. and Caohejing Development Zone. According to the agreement, 
Shanghai AT&amp;T Optical Fiber Ltd. will rent Caohejing's 
2,700-square-meter D3 land tract and build a 10,000-square-meter 
multistory plant on the tract. This US$20 million new enterprise 
will have an annual production capacity of 200,000 km of fiber. 


</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20431 </DOCNO>
<HT>      "jpcst004___94001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CST-94-004 </AU>
JPRS 
Science &amp; Technology 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  China </ABS>
<DATE1>   7 February 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> Science &amp; Technology Policy </F>
<H3> <TI>   Nation's Electric Vehicle R&amp;D Summarized </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Nation's Electric Vehicle R&amp;D Summarized </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94P60155A Beijing ZHONGGUO DIANZI BAO [CHINA ELECTRONICS 
NEWS] in Chinese 7 Feb 94 p 4 </F>

<F P=103> 94P60155A </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing ZHONGGUO DIANZI BAO [CHINA ELECTRONICS 
NEWS] </F>

<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Huang Zhiwei [7806 2535 0251] and Li Fuying </F>
[2621 1381 5391]: ``Current and Future Development of Nation's 
Automotive Electronic Products, Part 2''] 
  [Excerpt] [Passage omitted] A number of domestic units are 
now engaged in electric vehicle (EV) R&amp;D. The China 
Electrotechnical Society's EV Research Committee is now 
organizing and participating in EV R&amp;D and academic 
exchanges. 
Domestic varieties of EVs now in the R&amp;D stage include 
electric 
buses, freight EVs, 3-wheeled EVs, 2-wheeled EVs, etc. China 
already has the capability of small batch production of electric 
bicycles, 3-wheeled EVs, and electric wheelchairs, with electric 
automobiles remaining in the laboratory-prototype stage. 
Electric automobile topics now being researched include overall 
structure, drive motors, batteries, and controllers. [passage 
omitted] 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20432 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcst004___94002" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CST-94-004 </AU>
JPRS 
Science &amp; Technology 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  China </ABS>
<DATE1>   12 February 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> Science &amp; Technology Policy </F>
<H3> <TI>   Digital Switching Systems State Engineering Research Center </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Digital Switching Systems State Engineering Research Center </PHRASE></F></HT>


<TEXT>
Set   for Zhengzhou 

<F P=102> 94P60155B Beijing KEJI RIBAO [SCIENCE AND TECHNOLOGY DAILY] 
in Chinese 12 Feb 94 p 3 </F>

<F P=103> 94P60155B </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing KEJI RIBAO [SCIENCE AND TECHNOLOGY DAILY] 
in Chinese 12 Feb 94 p 3 </F>

<F P=105> Chinese </F>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Bai Xinjie [4101 2450 2638] and Zhang Jinling </F>
[1728 6855 1545]: ``Digital Switching Systems State Engineering 
Technology Research and Development Center To Be Built in 
Zhengzhou''] 
  [Summary] Following upon smooth advances in the 
industrialization of the HJD-04 stored-program-controlled (SPC) 
digital telephone switch [technical details of which are given 
in JPRS-CST-92-018, 9 Oct 92 p 28], the State Science and 
Technology Commission (SSTC) recently approved the establishment 
of a Digital Switching Systems State Engineering Technology 
Research and Development Center (SERC) built around the [PLA] 
General Staff's Institute of Information Engineering [in 
Zhengzhou]. Since the HJD-04 was first put into mass production 
(beginning of 1993), over 600,000 lines of this 
60,000-equivalent-line system have been marketed [as of end of 
1993], and over 160 telephone offices have been connected. This 
new SERC will primarily engage in HJD-04 R&amp;D, 
commercialization, 
systems evaluation, and technical training. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20433 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcst004___94003" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CST-94-004 </AU>
JPRS 
Science &amp; Technology 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  China </ABS>
<DATE1>   25 February 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> Science &amp; Technology Policy </F>
<H3> <TI>   Laser Processing State Engineering Research Center Set for </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Laser Processing State Engineering Research Center Set for </PHRASE></F></HT>


<TEXT>
Wuhan 

<F P=102>   94P60155C Beijing ZHONGGUO DIANZI BAO [CHINA ELECTRONICS 
NEWS] in Chinese 25 Feb 94 p 1 </F>

<F P=103> 94P60155C </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing ZHONGGUO DIANZI BAO [CHINA ELECTRONICS 
NEWS] </F>

<F P=105>  Chinese </F>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Cheng Guoyou [4453 0948 2589]: ``Nation To Build </F>
Laser Processing State Engineering Research Center''] 
  [Summary] The nation's first Laser Processing State 
Engineering Research Center (SERC) will be built at Huazhong 
(Central China) University of Science and Technology [in Wuhan]. 
This new SERC's range of key applications includes training in 
laser processing techniques for automotive systems, electrical 
and electronic equipment, and materials, with an emphasis on 
applications of laser cutting, welding, surface machining, and 
labeling techniques. In addition to systems R&amp;D and process 
R&amp;D, 
the new SERC will also gradually construct an 
intermediate-testing base and other business enterprises. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20434 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcst004___94004" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CST-94-004 </AU>
JPRS 
Science &amp; Technology 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  China </ABS>
<DATE1>   9 March 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> Science &amp; Technology Policy </F>
<H3> <TI>   Electronics Giant Set Up to Counter Competition </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Electronics Giant Set Up to Counter Competition </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   40100041A Beijing CHINA DAILY in English 9 Mar 94 p 1 </F>
<F P=103> 40100041A </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing CHINA DAILY </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Wang Yong] </F>
  [Text] China's largest electronics industrial and trading 
group was launched yesterday to fend off possible competition 
from foreign giants after the country re-enters in GATT. 
  The China Electronics Corporation (CEC), which covers 62 
subsidiaries at home and abroad, has total assets of 7.78 
billion yuan ($894 million). 
  ``It is impossible for small enterprises to ward off the 
pressure from foreign competitors, who will be allowed easier 
access to the Chinese market after the country rejoins the 
General Agreement on Tariffs and Trade (GATT),'' said CEC 
President Yu Zhongyu. 
  China is expected to be admitted to the world trade body 
this 
year. 
  Electronics is one of its four pillar industries along with 
motors, machinery and construction. 
  China began operating large-scale electronics companies in 
the 1980s. 
  But none of them have had the business capacity of CEC, 
which 
is expected to generate income of 5 billion yuan ($570 million) 
this year. 
  By 2000, CEC could control 45 per cent of the domestic 
integrated circuit market, 30 per cent of the VCR market, 15 per 
cent of electronics switching system and 10 per cent of cellular 
telephone, said Yu. Meanwhile its annual income is expected to 
hit 20 billion yuan ($2.29 billion). 
  The company will focus on the development of 
micro-electronics and telecommunications products and gradually 
set up six major manufacturing and trade bases around China. 
  The bases could change the old structure under which many 
small enterprises competed against each other. 
  Top government officials fear the lack of co-ordination 
between domestic firms will put China's electronics market at a 
disadvantage against foreign rivals which will pay lower tariffs 
when the country rejoins GATT. 
  China's tariff level has still to be trimmed to conform to 
GATT demands. 
  Yu said, CEC would co-operate more with international 
companies in key sectors such as micro-electronics, 
telecommunications, computers and systems engineering. 
  As Yu put it, the CEC will shoulder the construction of ten 
national major projects, such as the super-scale integrated 
circuits projects and mobile communication projects. 
  CEC is also involved in the huge task of constructing the 
Three Gorges Dam. 
  The company will soon help organize a grand exhibition of 
telecommunications products, which are to be chosen for the 
Three Gorge Dam project. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20435 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcst004___94005" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CST-94-004 </AU>
JPRS 
Science &amp; Technology 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  China </ABS>
<DATE1>   1 April 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> Aerospace </F>
<H3> <TI>   Vice Administrator of CNSA Analyzes Space Activities in China </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Vice Administrator of CNSA Analyzes Space Activities in China </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94FE0205A Beijing ZHONGGUO HANGTIAN [AEROSPACE CHINA] in 
Chinese No 10, Oct 93 pp 4-6 </F>

<F P=103> 94FE0205A </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing ZHONGGUO HANGTIAN [AEROSPACE CHINA] </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Wang Liheng [3769 4409 1854]] </F>
  [Excerpts] 
<H5>  Abstract </H5>
  Mr. Wang Liheng, Vice Administrator of the Chinese National 
Space Administration (CNSA), was invited to discuss China's 
space program at the 29th Joint Development Conference on 28 
June 1993. In his speech during the opening ceremony, he 
summarized China's future space development plans and policies, 
and pointed out the changes in China's space management system 
as a result of organizational reforms initiated by the Chinese 
Government. He also revealed China's near-term goals in its 
space program and stressed China's interest in cooperation with 
other members of the international space community. [Excerpts 
from his speech are presented below.] 
  [Passage omitted] It is well known that since the launch of 
the first artificial earth satellite, the accumulation of space 
activities and the development of space technologies over the 
past several decades have played a special and unprecedented 
role in the advancement of society and civilization and in 
raising the standard of living for mankind. For a developing 
country like China with a large population and extended 
geographic area and complex terrain, our dedicated mission and 
responsibility have always been to lift China from poverty and 
backwardness, to develop our economy and protect our 
environment, and to accelerate the advancement of our society. 
In accordance with the policy of accelerating China's economic 
modernization without going through the traditional development 
cycles of developed nations, we believe it is necessary to 
develop space technologies which may pay huge dividends in the 
form of social and economic benefits. For this reason, a space 
development program was initiated in this country back in the 
mid-1950s. After 30 years of hard work, significant progress has 
been made in both capability and the standard of China's space 
technology and a comprehensive and coordinated research and 
production system has been established. Today China is in a 
position to accept jobs in research, design, manufacturing, 
testing and production of artificial satellites, launch vehicles 
and other high-tech products; it has also built up a dedicated, 
experienced and technically competent research and development 
team in aerospace engineering. The development of space 
technologies has a visible effect on solving some of the major 
social problems facing China: over-population and shortage of 
resources, environment pollution and natural disasters, 
communication and transportation, education and cultural 
activities. It has also played an active role in promoting the 
development of high-tech industries and new technologies. 
  The next few years until the end of the century will be a 
critical period in the history of China's modernization and 
economic development. As China implements its reform and 
open-door policy as part of the overall national strategy, the 
effort to develop our space industry will undoubtedly continue 
to grow and our efforts toward international cooperation will be 
changed. In this regard, we will continue to follow a path of 
development that is consistent with China's tradition and its 
economic conditions and available resources; we will optimize 
our development program by concentrating our efforts on a 
selected number of advanced technologies. 
  The near-term objective of China's space program is to 
develop application satellites and satellite application 
technologies. We will focus on an integrated plan to develop 
both space systems and ground systems in parallel. The 
development of applications satellites is primarily motivated by 
the requirements of China's economic and social development; it 
is also our goal to develop an autonomous capability to build 
satellites that are operationally reliable and will eventually 
provide coverage for the entire country. At the same time, 
continuing efforts are being made to improve the Long March 
family of launch vehicles to meet the launch requirements for 
different payloads and different orbits. 
  We are currently developing a new generation of applications 
satellites which include high-capacity communications 
satellites, multi-purpose earth resource satellites, and various 
types of weather satellites. These satellites are expected to 
become operational in the next two years. By that time, the 
capacity provided by China's applications satellites will have 
increased by an order of magnitude compared to the 1980 era. We 
are also actively supporting the study of multi-spectrum, 
high-accuracy, uninterrupted, all-weather satellite remote 
sensing technologies as well as communications, navigation and 
microgravity technologies. Our objective is to build up a 
sizable space high-tech industry and to speed up the process of 
commercialization of space technologies. 
  A year ago, the government issued its ``National Guideline 
for Long-Range Science and Technology Development'' which covers 
the period from 2000 to 2020; it clearly stresses the importance 
of research and development of space propulsion technology, 
telemetry and control technology, and manned space technology. 
Once these objectives are achieved, China will be in a position 
to make greater contributions toward peaceful development of 
space resources and raising the standard of living for all 
mankind. 
  Space exploration and development of space resources are 
immense tasks that cannot be accomplished by one people or one 
nation, nor can they be completed within a period of a few 
decades or even a century. To accomplish these tasks requires 
the joint efforts of all nations over many generations. 
Recognizing this, China will continue to play an active role in 
promoting international cooperation in space activities. 
  In the past year, China, Thailand, and Pakistan jointly 
organized a ``Multi-Lateral Joint Symposium on Space 
Technologies and Applications for the Asian Pacific Region''; 
the purpose of this symposium was to establish the basic 
guidelines and to seek the proper format and approach for 
strengthening regional cooperation. Through multi-lateral 
efforts, substantial progress has been made in this regional 
cooperative venture. We believe that such cooperation will 
undoubtedly have a positive effect on the rapid economic growth 
in the Asian-Pacific region. 
  China's current economy, its basic industries and its 
science 
and technology are in need of further improvement and 
development. We are very interested in continuing our technical 
exchanges and maintaining contacts with advanced nations in 
space technologies with the hope of deriving mutual benefits 
from such exchanges. 
  In addition to maintaining and expanding cooperative efforts 
between governments, China also encourages academic exchanges 
and cooperation on a private level. We extend our warm welcome 
to the space scientists and experts of other countries to visit 
China and to give lectures. Members of Chinese academic 
institutions are also interested in participating in technical 
conferences on space technology and will continue to be a part 
of the ``Mission to Planet Earth'' joint effort. 
  In recent years, the five launch vehicles of the Long March 
family have provided launch services on the international 
market. They have been used either to carry individual payloads 
or to launch complete satellite systems. The entry of the Long 
March launch vehicles into the international market provides the 
user a new option for delivering his payload into space. In the 
future, we will offer more robust forms of services such as 
satellite orbit transfers; leasing of transponders or providing 
remote sensing data; providing ground systems equipment for 
different satellites applications; joint development of 
communications and broadcasting satellites, weather satellites, 
resource satellites and navigation satellites. 
  In order to carry out China's responsibility as a member of 
the international space community and to promote international 
cooperation, we joined the ``Outer Space Treaty Organization'' 
in 1983; in December 1988, we signed the ``Agreement on the 
Rescue and Return of Astronauts and the Return of Space 
Objects,'' the ``Treaty on International Responsibility for 
Damages Caused by Fallen Space Objects'' and the ``Treaty on 
Registration of Objects Launched Into Outer Space.'' In 
addition, in late 1988 and early 1989, the governments of China 
and the United States signed the following bilateral documents: 
``Memorandum of Mutual Agreement on the Safety of Satellite 
Technology,'' ``Memorandum of Mutual Agreement on the 
Responsibility of Satellite Launch Activities'' and ``Memorandum 
of Mutual Agreement on International Trade Issues of Commercial 
Launch Service.'' In other words, a mutual understanding was 
reached between China and the United States concerning the 
``permit'' issue of providing satellite launch service. It has 
been shown from the experience of launching ASIASAT, AUSSAT and 
the Swedish satellite that China has closely adhered to these 
agreements; I am confident that China will continue to do so in 
its future space activities and in cooperative ventures with 
other countries. In recent years, China has also made clear its 
position on the problem of space debris, and has made a 
concerted effort to protect the space environment. [passage 
omitted] 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20436 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcst004___94006" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CST-94-004 </AU>
JPRS 
Science &amp; Technology 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  China </ABS>
<DATE1>   1 April 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> Aerospace </F>
<H3> <TI>   Prospects for Satellite Remote Sensing in Oceanography </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Prospects for Satellite Remote Sensing in Oceanography </PHRASE></F></HT>


<TEXT>
Outlined 

<F P=102>   94FE0205B Beijing ZHONGGUO HANGTIAN [AEROSPACE CHINA] in 
Chinese No 10, Oct 93 pp 8-11 </F>

<F P=103> 94FE0205B </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing ZHONGGUO HANGTIAN [AEROSPACE CHINA] </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Wu Peizhong [0702 1014 0022]] </F>
  [Excerpts] 
<H5>  I. Introduction </H5>
  In oceanography, the most important issues are to recognize 
the different phenomena that occur on the ocean surface and to 
have a good understanding of the available resources in the 
ocean. These are also the objectives of ocean monitoring and 
surveillance. The traditional approaches for ocean monitoring 
and surveillance involve the use of surveillance ships, 
observation stations, ocean buoys, etc., to collect data that 
reflect the ocean environment and resources. However, these 
approaches are expensive, time-consuming and can only cover a 
limited area; consequently, they are not suited for wide-area, 
real-time, synchronous, continuous and dense observations. 
  Because of the immense dimensions and constant motion of the 
ocean, space-borne remote sensors have distinct advantages over 
other monitoring techniques. These advantages are: 1) unlike 
most conventional techniques which can only perform point-wise 
or line-wise monitoring, space-borne sensors provide an 
economical and convenient way to perform wide-area monitoring; 
and 2) they have real-time monitoring capability. Today, the 
simple ocean-surface monitoring technique has been replaced by 
the integrated technique which makes use of space-borne sensors, 
surface sensors and underwater sensors; in particular, 
space-borne monitoring is now becoming the principal technique. 
[passage omitted] 
  China's marine remote-sensing technology is lagging far 
behind [that of the United States and Europe]; the main reason 
is that the potential development of technical talents and 
scientists in this country is limited by the lack of raw 
remote-sensing data. Nevertheless, a great deal has been 
accomplished even with the limited data. In this paper, the main 
accomplishments are summarized, and an argument is made that 
since it is unlikely for China to launch its own remote-sensing 
satellites within the next few years, the best course would be 
to promote the research and application of remote-sensing 
technology in this country by making maximum use of the data 
collected by other countries. 
<H5>  II. Objectives and Requirements of Satellite Remote Sensing </H5>
in Oceanography 
  The main objectives of satellite remote sensing in 
oceanography are monitoring the dynamic ocean environment, 
observing of ocean color, and mapping of the coastal belt and 
offshore islands. 
  1. Monitoring the Dynamic Ocean Environment 
  Currently, satellite sensors can only detect changes on the 
ocean surface; internal conditions of the ocean are inferred 
from variations in the surface phenomena. The important 
phenomena include: 1) surface wind fields, wave fields, flow 
fields, tides, water pockets, front movement, vortices and 
internal waves; and 2) surface terrain, surface height and ice 
formation in the ocean. 
  Like other dynamic processes, the dynamic process of the 
ocean has its own characteristic length and time scales. In 
general, the length scale in the horizontal direction spans from 
several tens of centimeters to several thousand kilometers, with 
a span ratio of 10[.sup]6[/]-10[.sup]7[/]; the length 
scale in the vertical direction is typically 1/100 to 1/1000 
that of the horizontal scale; the span of the time scale is even 
larger, from several seconds to several years, with a span ratio 
of 10[.sup]8[/] to 10[.sup]9[/]. Based on these unique 
characteristics, the technical specifications of 
ocean-monitoring satellites must satisfy the following 
requirements: 
  (1) To achieve global monitoring, the earth resource 
satellites in general are placed in near-circular, 
sun-synchronous orbits. 
  (2) The scan distance and scan width of the ocean surface 
should be matched to the horizontal length span ratio, but 
because of the large variations in the span ratio associated 
with the different dynamic processes, and the limitations of the 
satellite orbit and the onboard detectors, it is necessary to 
consider a compromise value for the satellite design. 
  (3) The accuracy of the vertical length span ratio is 
primarily determined by the stability of the satellite orbit and 
the measurement accuracy. 
  (4) The operating life and the repetition period of the 
satellite orbit (including the back-up satellite) should be 
matched to the time span ratio. Because of the large variations 
in the time span ratio associated with the different dynamic 
processes, it is impossible to satisfy all requirements 
simultaneously; therefore, a compromise must again be 
considered. For an experimental satellite, it is reasonable to 
use a programmable repetition period. 
  (5) The observation of the key elements of the dynamic 
phenomena is based on the principle of measuring the roughness 
of the ocean surface; generally, active microwave detectors with 
all-weather capability are used. 
  2. Observation of Ocean Color 
  Ocean water contains organic and inorganic materials of 
different concentration. These include non-soluble organic 
materials such as floating plants, soluble organic materials 
such as yellow substances, and non-soluble inorganic materials 
such as suspended particles of mud and sand. The pollutants in 
the ocean are a mixture of organic and inorganic materials. 
Observation of ocean color usually refers to the measurement of 
chlorophyll concentration, the content of suspended mud and 
sand, the pollutants, the soluble organic materials, the depth 
of water and underwater terrains. The requirements on satellite 
orbit and altitude for observing ocean color are similar to 
those for measuring the dynamic environment, the only difference 
is that the repetition period can be somewhat longer. 
  The detectors used for observing ocean color elements 
generally operate in the visible-light band. The commonly used 
techniques for measuring the chlorophyll content in the ocean 
are the blue-green spectral response method and the fluorescent 
peak response method; both techniques require fine resolution of 
the spectral band and high sensitivity of the measuring 
instrument. 
  3. Mapping of the Coastal Belt and Offshore Islands 
  The coastal belt consists of the land and sea region along 
the shoreline. The main objectives of mapping the coastal belt 
are to monitor changes in the shoreline, the configuration of 
the beaches and reefs, the building environment along the shore, 
the water depth of shallow sea and underwater terrain, the 
geological structure and the distribution of vegetation. 
  The technical requirement for mapping the coastal belt and 
offshore islands is the same as that for mapping land areas. 
Improvement is being made to the multi-band scanning radiometer 
currently used for mapping to provide higher ground resolution 
and three-dimensional mapping capability; also, the development 
of synthetic aperture radar (SAR) technology (which has already 
been implemented on the Japanese remote-sensing satellite JERS-1 
launched in February 1992) will further improve the mapping 
capability of the coastal belt and offshore islands. 
<H5>  III. China's Accomplishments and Technological Gap in </H5>
Satellite Remote Sensing in Oceanography 
  During the past 10 years, significant advances have been 
made 
in satellite remote-sensing technology. In this country, 
progress has been slow mainly because of inadequate 
remote-sensing data. But even under these limited conditions a 
great deal has been accomplished, and some useful results have 
been produced. These results are derived from data collected by 
the meteorology satellites and earth resource satellites. 
  1. Application of Remote-Sensing Data From Meteorology 
Satellite in Oceanography 
  Since the early 1980s, when China began receiving data from 
the U.S. polar-orbit NOAA satellites and the Japanese 
geostationary GMS satellites, the following results have been 
produced: 
  (1) The data from NOAA AVHRR infrared channels 3, 4, 5 have 
been processed to derive surface temperatures of the ocean; the 
accuracy of the derived temperatures is +/- 1C on average 
and +/- 0.5C over a localized area; the geopositioning 
accuracy is 1-3 km. The data have been used in the following 
applications: 1) Issuing timely reports of ocean conditions to 
the fishing industry. By using the data of surface temperatures 
to determine the front of cold and warm currents, it is possible 
to issue timely reports of ocean conditions to the fishing 
fleet; these data have proved to be quite reliable from tests 
conducted over the past few years. 2) The Black Tide is a 
current that travels along the western boundary of the Pacific 
Ocean; it starts from Taiwan, moves northward past Okinawa, then 
turns east toward the coast of Japan, and terminates at 
160E. It is a warm current system which has a direct effect 
on the climate of regions along its path. By analyzing the 
surface temperature data, preliminary results of the 
distribution of surface currents in the East China Sea during 
winter and spring have been obtained. 
  (2) Data from AVHRR infrared channels 3, 4, 5 of the NOAA 
satellite are used to monitor ice conditions in the northern 
part of Bo Hai and the Yellow Sea. Ice maps of this region have 
been constructed using sophisticated data processing techniques 
including projection transformation, position correction, and 
image enhancement; these maps show detailed diagrams of ice 
coverage and thickness distribution of ice. The maps are 
broadcast and distributed to the user every winter. 
  (3) Data from channel 1 (visible-light channels) of the NOAA 
satellite and channels 1, 3, 4 of the NIMBUS-1 satellite are 
used in a remote-sensing test to measure water color at selected 
points along the river and at the mouths of rivers; preliminary 
results of chlorophyll concentrations at the mouth of the Yantze 
River and in Hangzhou Bay and Bo Hai Bay have been obtained. 
  (4) Real-time cloud maps from the GMS satellite and its 
derived products are used to determine wind speed and direction, 
which in turn are used to predict the intensity, the location of 
the eye, and the path of a typhoon. 
  2. Application of Remote-Sensing Data From the Landsat 
Satellite in Oceanography 
  In the mid-1980s, China constructed a ground station to 
receive remote-sensing data from the U.S. Landsat. The data have 
been used in the following applications in oceanography: 
  (1) The MSS and TM data from Landsat are used to derive 
preliminary results of suspended mud and sand concentrations at 
the mouths of the Yellow River, the Yangtze River, Hangzhou Bay, 
the Pearl River, the Min River and the Yalu River. The results 
obtained for the Yellow River are found to be correlated with 
the movement of mud and sand in the offshore region, the erosion 
of the shoreline, the characteristics of the flow system and 
with the formation of the river delta. Therefore they provide a 
valuable data base for establishing future development plan for 
the Yellow River Delta, for performing maintenance and repair, 
and for developing oil fields and harbors in this region. 
  (2) The MSS and TM data from Landsat are also used to survey 
the northwest region of Hainan Island and to construct 1:200,000 
and 1:500,000 scale maps that describe the vegetation cover, the 
terrain, the geology and land use of that region. 
  3. Deficiencies of the NOAA and Landsat Satellites in 
Oceanography Applications 
  (1) The accuracy of the AVHRR detector of the NOAA satellite 
in measuring ocean surface temperature is rather poor; also, the 
detector is subject to cloud cover limitations and therefore 
cannot make continuous temperature measurements. In monitoring 
ice conditions, the surface resolution and geopositioning 
accuracy of the detector are poor; therefore it is difficult to 
obtain information on ice movement. In measuring ocean color, 
the spectral resolution and sensitivity of the detector are both 
quite low, hence it is difficult to obtain quantitative measures 
of chlorophyll concentration. 
  (2) The TM (ETM) data from Landsat have poor spectral 
resolution and low sensitivity so it is difficult to obtain 
quantitative measures of suspended mud and sand in the ocean; in 
monitoring ice conditions, its repetition period is too long to 
be useful in providing information on ice movement; in mapping 
the coastal belt, the detector does not have sufficient dynamic 
range to accommodate the large difference in reflectivity 
between water and land. 
  (3) Many of the important marine environmental elements 
cannot be effectively measured by the remote sensors of the NOAA 
satellite or the Landsat; e.g., measurement of key dynamic 
parameters of the ocean; quantitative determination of the ocean 
color; quantitative measure of the pollution level in the ocean; 
and measurement of the depth of the ocean floor. 
  4. China's Technology Gap in Satellite Remote Sensing 
for Marine Applications 
  The development of marine remote-sensing techniques in the 
United States began in the mid-1960s; the data used were 
collected by the TIROS/NOAA satellites and the GOES family of 
weather satellites. In the early 1980s, China began receiving 
data from the TIROS/NOAA satellites and the GMS satellites, and 
in the mid-1980s, the data were first used in marine 
applications. Therefore, China is 20 years behind the United 
States and Western Europe in terms of receiving and applying 
data from weather satellites. Nevertheless, significant progress 
had been made within the past 10 years and China's current 
technology has reached a level comparable to that of advanced 
nations. But in the area of global weather monitoring and ocean 
monitoring, little progress can be made until China launches its 
own satellites. China's first experimental weather satellite, 
the Feng Yun-1A, was launched in September 1988, again 20 years 
behind the first TIROS/NOAA satellites; further effort is 
required to improve its operating life and storage capacity. 
  In July 1972, the United States launched the first 
land-monitoring satellite, the Landsat-1. In 1986, China began 
receiving remote-sensing data from Landsat-4 (launched on 16 
July 1982), and has continued to receive data for the past six 
years. Data from Landsat have generated excellent results in the 
survey of land resources, but they have not contributed a great 
deal to the important aspect of oceanography -- mapping of the 
coastal belt and offshore islands. In February 1992, Japan 
launched its own Landsat which is equipped with an L-band 
synthetic aperture radar in addition to a multi-band scanning 
radiometer; it has a ground resolution of 18 m x 18 m and has 
large onboard storage capacity. Therefore, the Japanese Landsat 
is a satellite with full-duration, all-weather global monitoring 
capability. The first Chinese Landsat is currently under 
development; it probably will not be launched until after 1994. 
Its detectors are similar to those used on the U.S. Landsat-5; 
in other words, the technology used on the Chinese Landsat is 
also 20 years behind. 
  In June 1978, the United States launched the world's first 
integrated marine observation satellite, the SEASAT-A. It is 
equipped with five detectors, four of which are microwave 
detectors, and one is a visible-light-infrared radiometer. This 
satellite operated continuously for over 100 days, during which 
time it collected various data on ocean wave fields, wind 
fields, current fields, internal waves, boundaries between land 
and water, terrains of shallow sea, ice distribution, oil 
pollution, and terrains of the ocean surface. Analysis of the 
data by scientists in the international community shows that the 
detectors onboard the SEASAT-A are primarily used to monitor the 
ocean's dynamic phenomena. 
  Improved versions of the SEASAT-A detectors have been 
implemented on the ERS-1 satellite, which was launched by the 
European Space Agency (ESA) in July 1991; they are designed to 
monitor ice conditions in the ocean. China currently does not 
have the technological maturity to launch its own marine 
satellites. The microwave detectors required for marine 
applications are still in the experimental stage; also, there is 
a lack of comprehensive research effort to develop microwave 
remote sensors for marine applications. 
  In October 1978, the United States launched the world's 
first 
ocean-color monitoring satellite, the NIMBUS-7; it was equipped 
with a multi-channel microwave radiometer and a coastal zone 
color scanner (CZCS). During 10 years of operation (1978-1988), 
particularly the first five years, it had collected one-third of 
the global data on ocean color, ocean surface temperature, and 
wind velocity. In addition, the United States is planning to 
launch another ocean-color monitoring satellite, the SEASTAR. 
Its onboard SEAWIFS detectors with eight visible-light bands are 
expected to provide better performance than the CZCS. In China, 
there are no immediate plans for launching ocean-color 
monitoring satellites. 
<H5>  IV. China's Goals for the Development of Satellite Remote </H5>
Sensing for Marine Applications in This Century 
  Satellite remote-sensing technology for marine application 
in 
China today is approximately 20-25 years behind the 
state-of-the-art. In order to accelerate the pace of development 
and to narrow the technology gap, we should concentrate our 
efforts on the development of integrated techniques for applying 
remote-sensing data in oceanography. We should also emphasize 
the systematic development of various technologies associated 
with satellite remote sensing, particularly detector technology, 
in order to build a good technical foundation in preparation for 
the launch of China's own marine satellites early next century. 
  1. Establishing Ground Systems for Receiving and 
Processing Satellite Remote-Sensing Data 
  The plan is to extend the capabilities of existing ground 
stations to receive data from the ERS-1 satellite, the JERS-1 
satellite (launched by Japan in February 1992), the ERS-2 
satellite (a follow-on satellite to ERS-1, scheduled to be 
launched at the end of 1994), the RADARSAT (to be launched by 
Canada in 1994), and three other polar-orbit satellites (the 
United States, Western Europe and Japan each plan to launch one 
satellite after 1997). During the 1990s, when China's own 
satellite remote-sensing technology is still in the early stage 
of development, the most cost-effective approach would be to 
make use of the remote-sensing data collected by foreign 
satellites. Such data will be used to meet the growing domestic 
needs in ocean petroleum development, marine products, marine 
engineering, ocean transportation, disaster prevention, ocean 
exploration, ocean management and military applications; this 
will also provide an opportunity to accumulate a knowledge base 
in applying microwave remote-sensing data, and to build a solid 
technical foundation for launching our own marine satellites. 
  The establishment of such systems will enhance China's 
position in the international community of remote sensing for 
marine applications. 
  2. Establishment of Ground Systems for Receiving and 
Processing Data From Ocean Color Monitoring Satellites 
  By upgrading existing ground stations of the weather 
satellites operated by the National Bureau of Oceanography, we 
will be able to receive data from foreign ocean-color monitoring 
satellites (e.g., the SEASTAR and the ADEOS). In view of the 
fact that China will not have its own ocean-color satellite 
during the 1990s, sharing data from other countries appears to 
be a viable approach. 
  The SEASTAR and the ADEOS satellites are expected to 
continue 
operating until the end of this century. They will be able to 
provide data on chlorophyll concentration in the ocean, 
suspended mud and sand content, and partial assessment of water 
quality; such data are important for the development and 
maintenance of fishing and cultivation zones, the construction 
of harbors and shipping lanes, and the development and 
utilization of beach-front areas. 
  3. Promoting Basic Research of Marine Satellite 
Technologies 
  The topics of basic research should include various types of 
microwave detectors (such as synthetic aperture radar, radar 
altimeter, microwave scattering meter, microwave radiometer, 
water-color detector and laser fluorescent detector), precision 
orbit determination techniques and precision measurement 
techniques. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20437 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcst004___94007" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CST-94-004 </AU>
JPRS 
Science &amp; Technology 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  China </ABS>
<DATE1>   1 April 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> Aerospace </F>
<H3> <TI>   Progress in Hypersonic Complex Flow Research </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Progress in Hypersonic Complex Flow Research </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94FE0205C Beijing ZHONGGUO HANGTIAN [AEROSPACE CHINA] in 
Chinese No 10, Oct 93 p 46 </F>

<F P=103> 94FE0205C </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing ZHONGGUO HANGTIAN [AEROSPACE CHINA] </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Gu Yue [0657 2588]] </F>
  [Text] Under the financial sponsorship of the National 
Science Foundation, a research program has been initiated to 
study certain key topics in aerodynamics -- vortices, shock 
waves, and complex flows. The research work is carried out under 
the direction of the renowned aerodynamicist and committee 
member of the Chinese Academy of Sciences (CAS), Prof. Zhuan 
Fenggan. Members of the research team include 140 scientists and 
engineers from the Beijing Aerodynamics Research Group of the 
Aerospace Industrial Corp., the Beijing Aeronautical and 
Aerospace University, the Graduate School of the Chinese 
Technical University, the Beijing University, the Mechanics 
Institute and Computer Center of the CAS, the Qinghua 
University, and the Chinese Aerodynamics Research and 
Development Center. Specifically, the research program covers 
the following eight problem areas: the characteristics and 
control of vortex flows; the effect of external excitation on 
shear layers and vortex motion; the interaction of moving 
shock-wave systems in gas flows; the shock-wave diffraction 
theory (using high-resolution digital simulation method and 
optical measurement technique); the non-equilibrium effect in 
high-temperature gas dynamics; digital simulation of 
non-equilibrium rarefied gas flows and experimental research of 
the transition region; digital simulation of internal complex 
flow field; and simulation of viscous separated flow field and 
eddy motion. All the planned activities of the research program 
have been successfully completed; many of the results have 
advanced the state-of-the-art in the particular field and are 
recognized by the international research community. 
  In the study of ``interaction between three-dimensional 
shock 
waves and boundary layers,'' a comprehensive set of experimental 
data has been obtained. In the study of separated flow and eddy 
motion, for the first time mathematical conditions of flow 
separation and the conditions that must be satisfied by the 
lines of flow attachment have been derived. It has been proved 
for the first time that the lines of flow separation are the 
lines of convergence of the limiting stream lines, and they are 
themselves limiting stream lines; but the convergence of the 
limiting stream lines does not provide sufficient condition for 
the existence of the lines of separation. Also, for the first 
time the topological distribution of singularities along the 
lines of separation and the evolution of Hopf fork vortices 
along the vortex axis have been discovered. In the study of 
flows inside a curved pipe, digital simulation results of 
internal secondary flows have been obtained. In particular, the 
research in digital simulation of rarefied gases has received 
international recognition by world-renowned scholars. 
  In mid-June, the results of this research program were 
reviewed and accepted by the National Foundation of Natural 
Sciences. Members of acceptance committee believe that many of 
the results are creative and original, and are judged to be 
state-of-the-art. For example, the flow-field analysis of 
separated flows and vortices, the study of high accuracy and 
high resolution format of digital computations, the study of 
vortex control techniques, the digital simulation of rarefied 
gas flows, and the study of shock-wave dynamics are considered 
to be outstanding achievements. Flow-field measurement and 
display technique is an important research tool in fluid 
mechanics; achieving such good results under existing test 
conditions is highly commendable. 
  Vortices, shock waves and complex flows are currently the 
most active areas of research in fluid mechanics. They involve 
the understanding of fundamental laws in fluid flow and in 
physics. Further studies in these areas not only have important 
theoretical implications, but also have practical applications 
in many engineering fields such as aeronautical, aerospace, 
mechanical and chemical engineering. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20438 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcst004___94008" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CST-94-004 </AU>
JPRS 
Science &amp; Technology 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  China </ABS>
<DATE1>   1 April 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> Advanced Materials </F>
<H3> <TI>   Research on New Carbon Nanotubes Reported </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Research on New Carbon Nanotubes Reported </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94P60168A Beijing KEXUE TONGBAO [CHINESE SCIENCE BULLETIN] 
in Chinese Vol 38 No 22, 16-30 Nov 93 pp 2024-2025] </F>

<F P=103> 94P60168A </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing KEXUE TONGBAO [CHINESE SCIENCE BULLETIN] 
in Chinese Vol 38 No 22, 16-30 Nov 93 pp 2024-2025] </F>

<F P=105> Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Jie Sishen [6043 1835 3234], Liu Wei [0491 4850] </F>
et al. of the CAS Institute of Physics, Beijing 100080: 
``Research on New Carbon Nanometer Tubes''; MS received 24 Mar 
93, revised 28 Jun 93] 
  [Abstract] The authors report their discovery of two new 
types of carbon nanotubes, with quasi-rectangular and 
quasi-triangular transverse cross sections, respectively. These 
10-21-nm-diameter carbon tubes have been fabricated via electric 
arc discharge with the following parameters: externally applied 
voltage is 20 V, dc current is about 200 A, helium gas pressure 
within the discharge chamber is about 500 x 133.332 Pa, and 
diameters of the two graphite rods used as discharge electrodes 
are 6 mm and 20 mm. Figure 1 below shows high-resolution 
electron micrographs of the carbon nanotubes; Figure 1(a) 
indicates that the carbon nanotube consists of two-layer or 
multilayer coaxial carbon films, with the cap sealed by a 
conical carbon film. Figure 1(b) shows a transverse cross 
section with two types of structures -- one type consists of the 
traditional quasi-concentric circles while the second (first 
newly discovered) type consists of quasi-rectangles (upper right 
part of figure). The second newly discovered type of carbon 
nanotube, with a quasi-triangular transverse cross section, is 
shown below in Figure 2. 

<FIG ID=JPRS-CST-004-10A>      Figure 1. High-Resolution Electron Micrographs of Carbon </FIG>


<FIG ID=JPRS-CST-004-10B>      Figure 2. High-Resolution TEM Micrograph of Carbon Nanotube With Quasi-Triangular Transverse Cross Section </FIG>

References 
  1. Iijima, S., NATURE, 1991, 354: 56-58. 
  2. Mackay, A. L., Terrones, H., NATURE, 1991, 352: 762. 
  3. Lenosky, T., Gonze, J., Teter, M., et al., NATURE, 1992, 
355: 333. 
  4. Vanderbilt, D., Tersoff, J., PHYS. REV. LETT., 1992, 68: 
511. 
  5. Ebbesen, T. W., Ajayan, P. M., NATURE, 1992, 358: 220. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20439 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcst004___94009" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CST-94-004 </AU>
JPRS 
Science &amp; Technology 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  China </ABS>
<DATE1>   1 April 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> Biotechnology </F>
<H3> <TI>   Study on Indirect Method of Determining Anaerobic Threshold </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Study on Indirect Method of Determining Anaerobic Threshold </PHRASE></F></HT>


<TEXT>
After   Exposure to High Altitude (3700 m) in Men 

<F P=102> 40091007A Beijing HANGTIAN YIXUE YU YIXUE GONGCHENG [SPACE 
MEDICINE &amp; MEDICAL ENGINEERING] in Chinese Vol 6 No 4, Dec </F>

 93 pp 
269-273 
<F P=103> 40091007A </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing HANGTIAN YIXUE YU YIXUE GONGCHENG [SPACE 
MEDICINE &amp; MEDICAL ENGINEERING] </F>

<F P=105>  Chinese </F>
CSO 

<F P=106> [English abstract of article by Zan Junping [2501 0193 </F>
1627], Yin Zhaoyun [1438 2507 0061], et al. of the Institute of 
Hygiene and Environmental Medicine, Academy of Military Medical 
Sciences, Tianjin] 
  [Text] By means of incremental exercise test on bicycle 
ergometer and determination of pulmonary gas exchange, anaerobic 
threshold (AT) was investigated in 26 young men exposed to an 
altitude of 3700 m for 6 months (group 1). The results indicated 
that there was a positive correlation between AT and body weight 
(BW) (P &lt; 0.01) and a negative correlation between AT and 
heart 
rate (HR) during stepping exercise on a 40 cm stool at a 
frequency of 25 step/min for 5 min (P &lt; 0.01). Further, it was 
found that AT was correlated with BW and HR (r = 0.799). The 
multiple regression equation was Y = 126.8278 + 1.4625 BW - 
0.8213 HR, where Y is estimated value of AT (w); BW is body 
weight (kg); HR is heart rate during stepping exercise 
(beats/min). In order to test their reliability, AT was 
determined in another 24 males exposed to an altitude of 3700 m 
with the same method (group 2). The analysis showed that 
measured value of AT was highly correlated with that estimated 
by the regression equation. Coefficient of correlation, slope 
and standard error of estimate were 0.820 (p &lt; 0.01), 1.292 
and 
6.7 w (8.6 percent), respectively. This slope was statistically 
not different from that for group 1 (1.001). It is suggested 
that the regression equation can be used in evaluation and 
investigation of aerobic capacity and physical work capacity in 
men exposed to high altitude of 3700 m for longer time. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20440 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcst004___94010" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CST-94-004 </AU>
JPRS 
Science &amp; Technology 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  China </ABS>
<DATE1>   1 April 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> Biotechnology </F>
<H3> <TI>   Effect of Hyperbaric Oxygen on Na,K-ATPase After Cerebral </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Effect of Hyperbaric Oxygen on Na,K-ATPase After Cerebral </PHRASE></F></HT>


<TEXT>
Ischemia   in Gerbils 

<F P=102> 40091007B Beijing HANGTIAN YIXUE YU YIXUE GONGCHENG [SPACE 
MEDICINE &amp; MEDICAL ENGINEERING] in Chinese Vol 6 No 4, Dec </F>

 93 pp 
282-285 
<F P=103> 40091007B </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing HANGTIAN YIXUE YU YIXUE GONGCHENG [SPACE 
MEDICINE &amp; MEDICAL ENGINEERING] </F>

<F P=105>  Chinese </F>
CSO 

<F P=106> [English abstract of article by Fang Yiqun [2455 0110 5028], </F>
Liu Jingchang [0491 2529 2490], et al. of the Naval Medical 
Research Institute of PLA, Shanghai] 
  [Text] The changes of Na,K-ATPase activities in the 
cerebral tissue in gerbils after acute brain ischemia treated 
with hyperbaric oxygen (HBO) were investigated. The results 
showed that Na,K-ATPase activity in cerebral tissue was 
significantly reduced (P &lt; 0.01) after 60 min ischemia and 80 
min reperfusion of the brain. The animals were in comatous and 
hypoactive state. Convulsion and seizures occurred occasionally. 
After treatment with 101.3 kPa or 253.25 kPa pure oxygen, the 
activity of Na,K-ATPase increased to approximately the normal 
value (no significant difference between 101.3 and 253.25 kPa). 
The results indicated that the mechanism of HBO in treating 
cerebral edema in gerbils might be closely related to the 
recovery of Na,K-ATPase activity in cerebral tissues. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20441 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcst004___94011" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CST-94-004 </AU>
JPRS 
Science &amp; Technology 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  China </ABS>
<DATE1>   1 April 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> Biotechnology </F>
<H3> <TI>   Expression of Chinese Hepatitis Delta Antigen in E. </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Expression of Chinese Hepatitis Delta Antigen in E. </PHRASE></F></HT>


<TEXT>
coli 

<F P=102>   40091007O Beijing BINGDU XUEBAO [CHINESE JOURNAL OF 
VIROLOGY] in Chinese Vol 9 No 4, Dec 93 pp 316-324 </F>

<F P=103> 40091007O </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing BINGDU XUEBAO [CHINESE JOURNAL OF 
VIROLOGY] </F>

<F P=105>  Chinese </F>
CSO 

<F P=106> [English abstract of article by Tang Shaohua [3282 1421 </F>
5478], Cong Xu [0654 2485], et al. of the Institute of Virology, 
CAPM, Beijing] 
  [Text] Hepatitis Delta virus is a defective virus which 
requires hepatitis B virus for its transmission. High prevalence 
of HBV infection in China is well known, but anti-HDV antibody 
positive rate in HBV infected population is very low (0-2.7 
percent) except XinJiang, XiZang (Tibet) and NeiMengGu (Inner 
Mongolia). In order to study if there are variant subtype of HDV 
in China, two Chinese HDV-cDNA fragments encoding HDAg were 
isolated from recombinants by PCR with specific primers. They 
were inserted into expression plasmid pBV220 and transformed 
into E. coli DH5 _a_. The ampicillin-resistant 
positive clones were selected by in situ hybridization with 
specific Digoxigenin labelled HDV-cDNA probe and ELISA. The 
results show that both fragments encoding HDAg either 214 amino 
acids or 74 amino acids at the N terminal end of ORF5 (according 
to Wang's report 1986) show the activity of HDAg. The ELISA 
titer was 1:10,000 to 1:32,000. SDS-PAGE gel electrophoresis and 
Western blotting show that the molecular weights were about 29 
kD and 10 kD respectively. The large HDAg has the activity of 
binding HDV-RNA but the small HDAg has lost the site of binding. 
It is interesting that the large Chinese HDAg expressed in 
E. coli also has the ability of binding Neo-RNA. The 
mechanism of this nonspecific reaction and its significance 
should be studied. These antigens reacted specifically with 
anti-HD positive serum and anti-HD monoclonal antibodies. These 
antigens also had high immunogenicity for production of antibody. 
  Key words: Hepatitis Delta virus, Expression of HDV-RNA, 
HDAg, E. coli 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20442 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcst004___94012" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CST-94-004 </AU>
JPRS 
Science &amp; Technology 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  China </ABS>
<DATE1>   1 April 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> Biotechnology </F>
<H3> <TI>   Molecular Cloning and Sequence Analysis of Glycoprotein D </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Molecular Cloning and Sequence Analysis of Glycoprotein D </PHRASE></F></HT>


<TEXT>
Gene   of Herpes Simplex Virus Type 1 Strain 168 Isolated in China 

<F P=102> 40091007N Beijing BINGDU XUEBAO [CHINESE JOURNAL OF 
VIROLOGY] in Chinese Vol 9 No 4, Dec 93 pp 308-315 </F>

<F P=103> 40091007N </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing BINGDU XUEBAO [CHINESE JOURNAL OF 
VIROLOGY] </F>

<F P=105>  Chinese </F>
CSO 

<F P=106> [English abstract of article by Yang Xionghu [2799 7160 </F>
5706] and Hou Yunde [0186 0061 1795] of the National Laboratory 
of Molecular Virology and Genetic Engineering, Institute of 
Virology, CAPM, Beijing] 
  [Text] According to the DNA sequence of glycoprotein D gene 
of HSV-1 strain Patton, two primers were designed and 
synthesized, a complete glycoprotein D gene of HSV-1 strain 168 
isolated in China was amplified through PCR reaction. The 
complete glycoprotein D gene sequence has 1185 nucleotides and 
encodes a polypeptide of 395 amino acids. Result obtained from 
the homology comparison among 168, HFEM, SC16, 17 and Patton 
showed that the most conserved region was located in the 
ectodomain, whereas the most variable regions in the signal 
peptide region, as well as transmembrane and cytoplasmic domain 
regions. The present paper provides the basis for further 
understanding of structure and function of HSV-1 gD gene and for 
a HSV vaccine development. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20443 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcst004___94013" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CST-94-004 </AU>
JPRS 
Science &amp; Technology 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  China </ABS>
<DATE1>   1 April 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> Biotechnology </F>
<H3> <TI>   Expression of Fusion Protein and Hemagglutinin of Measles </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Expression of Fusion Protein and Hemagglutinin of Measles </PHRASE></F></HT>


<TEXT>
Virus   in Vaccinia Virus 

<F P=102> 40091007M Beijing BINGDU XUEBAO [CHINESE JOURNAL OF 
VIROLOGY] in Chinese Vol 9 No 4, Dec 93 pp 301-307 </F>

<F P=103> 40091007M </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing BINGDU XUEBAO [CHINESE JOURNAL OF 
VIROLOGY] </F>

<F P=105>  Chinese </F>
CSO 

<F P=106> [English abstract of article by Xu Shuichan [1776 3055 </F>
1292], Ruan Li [7086 0500], et al. of the Institute of Virology, 
CAPM, Beijing] 
  [Text] Measles virus genes encoding fusion protein (F) and 
hemagglutinin (HA) were inserted into the vaccinia virus genome, 
and recombinants vLmF and vCmH were obtained. Using antibody to 
F peptide and monoclonal antibody to HA, the corresponding 
proteins were detected in the lysate of infected cells by 
Western blot, showing that the expressed products were similar 
to the authentic measles virus proteins. Both recombinants 
produced a high level of antibodies to measles virus in rabbits, 
which were able to both inhibit the hemolysis activity and 
neutralize the measles virus in cell culture. In addition, 
animals vaccinated with vCmH also developed 
hemagglutinin-inhibiting antibody. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20444 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcst004___94014" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CST-94-004 </AU>
JPRS 
Science &amp; Technology 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  China </ABS>
<DATE1>   1 April 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> Biotechnology </F>
<H3> <TI>   Construction of Pseudorabies Virus Genomic Library and </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Construction of Pseudorabies Virus Genomic Library and </PHRASE></F></HT>


<TEXT>
Identification   of Glycoprotein Gene 

<F P=102> 40091007L Beijing BINGDU XUEBAO [CHINESE JOURNAL OF 
VIROLOGY] in Chinese Vol 9 No 3, Sep 93 pp 241-245 </F>

<F P=103> 40091007L </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing BINGDU XUEBAO [CHINESE JOURNAL OF 
VIROLOGY] </F>

<F P=105>  Chinese </F>
CSO 

<F P=106> [English abstract of article by Guo Wanzhu [6753 8001 2691], </F>
Xie Yue [6200 6460], et al. of Sichuan Agricultural University, 
Yaan] 
  [Text] A genomic library of Pseudorabies (PRV) M III strain 
was constructed by cloning the BamHI restriction enzyme 
fragments of PRV DNA into plasmids pBR322 and pUC18. The 
recombinant plasmids pSAG1-19, pSAG2A-19 were identified by 
restriction digestion, Southern blot hybridization and detection 
of antigenicity and immunogenicity of the fusion protein from 
transformed E. coli. The inserted BamHI-7 fragment, 
approximately 6.9 kb, of the recombinant plasmids contained the 
glycoprotein gp50 gene. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20445 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcst004___94015" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CST-94-004 </AU>
JPRS 
Science &amp; Technology 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  China </ABS>
<DATE1>   1 April 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> Biotechnology </F>
<H3> <TI>   Coexpression of Hepatitis B Surface and Core Genes by </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Coexpression of Hepatitis B Surface and Core Genes by </PHRASE></F></HT>


<TEXT>
Recombinant   Vaccinia Virus 

<F P=102> 40091007K Beijing BINGDU XUEBAO [CHINESE JOURNAL OF 
VIROLOGY] in Chinese Vol 9 No 3, Sep 93 pp 209-217 </F>

<F P=103> 40091007K </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing BINGDU XUEBAO [CHINESE JOURNAL OF 
VIROLOGY] </F>

<F P=105>  Chinese </F>
CSO 

<F P=106> [English abstract of article by Zhang Fan [1728 1581], Tian </F>
Shufang [3944 3219 5364], et al. of the Institute of Virology, 
CAPM, Beijing] 
  [Text] The Hepatitis B virus (HBV) DNA sequences coding for 
the large surface protein and HBcAg/HBeAg were inserted into 
vaccinia virus dual expression vector pJSB1175, so that the HBV 
S, including PreS gene, is under the control of the promoter 
11k, while C, including PreC gene, is under the control of the 
promoter 7.5k. TK-143 cells infected with the derived 
recombinant plasmids in the presence of infections 
TK[.sup]+[/] vaccinia virus (Tiantan strain) yielded 
recombinant vaccinia virus that expressed both large surface 
protein and HBcAg/HBeAg. The large surface protein was not 
secreted but two polypeptides between 36-45 kilo-daltons were 
revealed in SDS-PAGE following immunoprecipitation by anti-HBs. 
HBcAg was not secreted either, it remained in the cells. But 
HBeAg could be secreted into the medium, and was present in much 
higher amount that HBcAg. Rabbits vaccinated with the 
recombinant viruses made antibodies that recognized HBsAg and 
HBcAg epitopes. The additional immunogenicity provided by 
expression of large protein HBcAg/HBeAg may be advantageous for 
the development of an HBV vaccine. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20446 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcst004___94016" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CST-94-004 </AU>
JPRS 
Science &amp; Technology 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  China </ABS>
<DATE1>   1 April 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> Biotechnology </F>
<H3> <TI>   Purification and Isolation of Different Stages of </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Purification and Isolation of Different Stages of </PHRASE></F></HT>


<TEXT>
Plasmodium   vivax, P. falciparum and 
P. berghei 

<F P=102> 40091007J Shanghai ZHONGGUO JISHENGCHONGXUE YU 
JISHENGCHONGBING ZAZHI [CHINESE JOURNAL OF PARASITOLOGY &amp; </F>

PARASITIC DISEASES] in Chinese Vol 11 No 4, Nov 93 pp 262-266 
<F P=103> 40091007J </F>
<F P=104>  Shanghai ZHONGGUO JISHENGCHONGXUE YU 
JISHENGCHONGBING ZAZHI [CHINESE JOURNAL OF PARASITOLOGY &amp; </F>

PARASITIC DISEASES] 
<F P=105> Chinese </F>
CSO 

<F P=106> [English abstract of article by Zhang Kunyan [1728 0981 </F>
3508], Zhou Jiexian [0719 3381 8300], et al. of the Institute of 
Antiparasitic Diseases of Guangdong Province, Guangzhou. 
Supported by UNDP/World Bank/WHO Special Programme for Research 
&amp; Training in Tropical Diseases (TDR) and the Medical &amp; 
Pharmaceutical Foundation of Guangdong Province.] 
  [Text] The present paper reported the results of 
purification and isolation of different stages of P. 
vivax, P. falciparum and P. berghei 
by Percoll gradient centrifugation after removal of leukocytes 
(WBCs) by passing the blood suspension through CF-11 cellulose 
columns. Some 94.7 percent and 75.4 percent of WBCs from the 
patients' blood of vivax malaria and the mice blood 
infected with P. berghei respectively were removed 
with no alteration of the parasite density and the malaria stage 
ratio after the cellulose filtration. 
  The densities of the uninfected and the infected 
erythrocytes 
with different stages of three species of malaria parasites were 
determined by isopycnic centrifugation on multi-continuous 
gradients of Percoll. The mean densities (kg/L) of schizonts, 
trophozoites, ring form and uninfected cells were approximately 
1.059, 1.072, 1.096 and 1.099 in P. vivax; 1.070, 
1.079, 1.10 and 1.10, gametocytes 1.085 in P. 
falciparum; 1.059, 1.062, 1.103 and 1.104 in P. 
berghei, respectively. Based on these values, three 
different density gradients of Percoll were devised to separate 
erythrocytes infected with the more mature stages (trophozoites 
and schizonts) from ring forms and uninfected cells. By these 
methods, it is possible to obtain high purified parasites of 
93.5 percent from blood with starting parasitaemias of 0.8 
percent in P. vivax, 100 percent from 2.3 percent in 
P. falciparum and 93.0 percent from 30.6 percent in 
P. berghei, being raised by 113.8, 43.4 and 2.0 times 
respectively. 
  Key words: P. vivax, P. falciparum, 
P. berghei, purification &amp; isolation, CF-11 cellulose 
column, Percoll density gradient centrifugation 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20447 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcst004___94017" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CST-94-004 </AU>
JPRS 
Science &amp; Technology 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  China </ABS>
<DATE1>   1 April 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> Biotechnology </F>
<H3> <TI>   Genomic Cloning of Fasciola hepatica Secretory </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Genomic Cloning of Fasciola hepatica Secretory </PHRASE></F></HT>


<TEXT>
Antigens   in Escherichia coli 

<F P=102> 40091007I Shanghai ZHONGGUO JISHENGCHONGXUE YU 
JISHENGCHONGBING ZAZHI [CHINESE JOURNAL OF PARASITOLOGY &amp; </F>

PARASITIC DISEASES] in Chinese Vol 11 No 4, Nov 93 pp 258-261 
<F P=103> 40091007I </F>
<F P=104>  Shanghai ZHONGGUO JISHENGCHONGXUE YU 
JISHENGCHONGBING ZAZHI [CHINESE JOURNAL OF PARASITOLOGY &amp; </F>

PARASITIC DISEASES] 
<F P=105> Chinese </F>
CSO 

<F P=106> [English abstract of article by Zheng Li [6774 5461], Liu </F>
Shigui [0491 0013 6311], et al. of the Department of 
Biotechnology, Sichuan University, Chengdu] 
  [Text] This paper reported the immunoscreening of three 
recombinants expressing secretory antigens from the genomic DNA 
library of F. hepatica and the primary study of 
expression of the three recombinants. To construct the genomic 
DNA library, DNA from the adult F. hepatica was cut 
with Sau3AI to an average length of about 2.0 kb and inserted 
into the BamHI site of the expression vector pUC18, the size of 
the genomic DNA library of F. hepatica being 1.5 x 
10[.sup]5[/] recombinants. 
  Three recombinants expressing antigenic determinants of 
F. hepatica pFH16, pFH23, pFH48 were detected through 
primary screening and rescreening with F. hepatica 
infected rabbit serum (1:50) preabsorbed to remove antibodies to 
E. coli and SPA-HRP (1:40). The test of the ability 
of expressing fusion proteins showed pFH16 &gt;  pFH48 &gt;  pFH23. 
These studies provide the possibility of further research on the 
expression of recombinant antigenic genes, the immunity of their 
expressed products and the protection of animals. 
  Key words: Fasciola hepatica, secretory antigen, 
genomic DNA library, immunoscreening 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20448 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcst004___94018" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CST-94-004 </AU>
JPRS 
Science &amp; Technology 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  China </ABS>
<DATE1>   1 April 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> Biotechnology </F>
<H3> <TI>   Evaluation of the Efficacy of Praziquantel-Liposome Against </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Evaluation of the Efficacy of Praziquantel-Liposome Against </PHRASE></F></HT>


<TEXT>
Alveococcosis 

<F P=102>   40091007H Shanghai ZHONGGUO JISHENGCHONGXUE YU 
JISHENGCHONGBING ZAZHI [CHINESE JOURNAL OF PARASITOLOGY &amp; </F>

PARASITIC DISEASES] in Chinese Vol 11 No 4, Nov 93 pp 251-254 
<F P=103> 40091007H </F>
<F P=104>  Shanghai ZHONGGUO JISHENGCHONGXUE YU 
JISHENGCHONGBING ZAZHI [CHINESE JOURNAL OF PARASITOLOGY &amp; </F>

PARASITIC DISEASES] 
<F P=105> Chinese </F>
CSO 

<F P=106> [English abstract of article by Li Furong [2621 1381 2837], </F>
Jiang Cipeng [5592 2945 7720], et al. of Hydatid Research 
Laboratory, Lanzhou Medical College, Lanzhou] 
  [Text] In this paper, praziquantel, an anti-hydatidosis 
drug, was encapsulated with liposome by REV (Reverse phase 
evaporation) method, the encapsulated percentage was 60 percent. 
The drug distribution dynamics in mice of both praziquantel 
(PZQ) and praziquantel liposome (PZQ-Lip) were determined using 
RP-HPLC method. The results indicated that the drug 
concentration of blood, liver and spleen in the PZQ-Lip group 
was higher than those in the PZQ group from 1/2 to 16 hours post 
ip. the t 1/2 of the former was considerably prolonged. The 
toxicity of PZQ-Lip tested by LD[.sub]50[/] was decreased 
about one fourth as compared with PZQ (3372 vs. 2454 mg/kg). 
There was a significant difference in the cyst inhibition rate 
between PZQ-Lip group (68.7 percent) and PZQ group (14.3 
percent) (P &lt; 0.01) as shown by the results of secondary 
alveococcosis mice treated with either drug at 500 mg/kg-d x 12 
d for four consecutive courses. Histological observation of the 
germinal layer after treatment showed that the damage of PZQ-Lip 
group was more severe than that of PZQ group. The 
ultrastructural observation showed that both drugs had marked 
effects on the organelles of cells. The above experiments 
indicated that the efficacy of PZQ-Lip was more effective than 
PZQ for treatment of alveococcosis. 
  Key words: Alveococcosis, liposome, praziquantel, 
pharmacokinetics, chemotherapy, histology, ultrastructure 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20449 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcst004___94019" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CST-94-004 </AU>
JPRS 
Science &amp; Technology 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  China </ABS>
<DATE1>   1 April 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> Biotechnology </F>
<H3> <TI>   Studies on the Establishment of Malarial Animal Model of </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Studies on the Establishment of Malarial Animal Model of </PHRASE></F></HT>


<TEXT>
Short-Term   Relapse IV. Short-Term Relapse in Rhesus Monkeys 
Infected With Sporozoites of Plasmodium cynomolgi 

<F P=102> 40091007G Shanghai ZHONGGUO JISHENGCHONGXUE YU 
JISHENGCHONGBING ZAZHI [CHINESE JOURNAL OF PARASITOLOGY &amp; </F>

PARASITIC DISEASES] in Chinese Vol 11 No 4, Nov 93 pp 244-247 
<F P=103> 40091007G </F>
<F P=104>  Shanghai ZHONGGUO JISHENGCHONGXUE YU 
JISHENGCHONGBING ZAZHI [CHINESE JOURNAL OF PARASITOLOGY &amp; </F>

PARASITIC DISEASES] 
<F P=105> Chinese </F>
CSO 

<F P=106> [English abstract of article by Zhang Jiaxun [1728 1367 </F>
1053], Lin Baoying [2651 1405 5391], et al. of the Institute of 
Parasitic Diseases (WHO Collaborating Center for Malaria, 
Schistosomiasis and Filariasis), Chinese Academy of Preventive 
Medicine, Shanghai] 
  [Text] It is believed that the short-term relapse could be 
artificially made by the application of the experimental method, 
therefore researchers in this laboratory established the monkey 
model of the short-term relapse. According to the experimental 
design, when the parasitemia was detected in rhesus monkeys 
infected with sporozoites of Plasmodium cynomolgi, a 
combined therapy of pyronaridine 6 mg/kg body weight, artemether 
10 mg/kg and chloroquine 20 mg/kg once daily for 3 days was 
carried out to clear the erythrocytic parasite and then the 
short-term relapse was observed in the animal for 100 days. The 
combined therapy was given again when relapse occurred. 
  One onset of relapse occurred on the 47th day after therapy 
in monkey M194 infected with sporozoites 11 x 10[.sup]3[/]. 
In M195 infected with sporozoites 55 x 10[.sup]4[/], relapses 
occurred for three times on 30, 37 and 51 days respectively 
after medication, but during a follow-up period of 200 days, no 
relapse was shown in M192 and M193 infected with sporozoites 50 
and 55 x 10[.sup]2[/], respectively. 
  The results showed that the frequency of the short-term 
relapse was relative to the sporozoites inoculation, and 
sporozoites less than 11 x 10[.sup]3[/] were not suitable for 
making short-term relapse in animal model. No long term relapse 
was seen in all the four monkeys until 400 days. 
  Under existing conditions, the relapse was generally 
explained with hypnozoite assumption, the establishment of 
animal model of short-term relapse could be tenable. The reasons 
were: (1) P. cynomolgi from Vietnam, a parasite with 
the biological characteristic of short-term relapse, was 
recognized; (2) A series of studies for the relationship between 
the parasite and monkey host was carried out and the 
experimental basis of the model establishment was put forward by 
the authors; (3) This study did not exclude the hypnozoite 
assumption. 
  The significance of this animal model study at least 
included: (1) to innovate the treatment countermeasure of the 
short-term relapse of malaria; (2) to study the biology of the 
short-term relapse; and (3) to test the antimalarial drugs for 
the radical cure of vivax malaria. As for the animal model of 
the long-term relapse, it will be necessary for study to select 
the monkey parasite which has the biological characteristic of 
long-term relapse. The verification of the relative problem, 
hypnozoite assumption, will also be necessary. 
  Key words: Malaria, short-term relapse, animal model, 
Plasmodium cynomolgi 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20450 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcst004___94020" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CST-94-004 </AU>
JPRS 
Science &amp; Technology 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  China </ABS>
<DATE1>   1 April 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> Biotechnology </F>
<H3> <TI>   Treatment of Epidemic Hemorrhagic Fever With Purified Human </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Treatment of Epidemic Hemorrhagic Fever With Purified Human </PHRASE></F></HT>


<TEXT>
Leukocyte   IFN-_a_ 

<F P=102> 40091007F Shanghai ZHONGHUA CHUANRANBING ZAZHI [CHINESE 
JOURNAL OF INFECTIOUS DISEASES] in Chinese Vol 11 No 4, Nov 93 </F>

pp 200-203 
<F P=103> 40091007F </F>
<F P=104>  Shanghai ZHONGHUA CHUANRANBING ZAZHI [CHINESE 
JOURNAL OF INFECTIOUS DISEASES] </F>

<F P=105>  Chinese </F>
CSO 

<F P=106> [English abstract of article by Bai Jingyu [4101 2417 5038], </F>
Tang Jihe [0781 1323 0735], et al. of the Third People's 
Hospital of Changzhou, Jiangsu Province] 
  [Text] This article deals with the efficacy of homemade 
purified human leukocyte IFN-_a_ (Hu IFN-_a_) in the 
treatment 
of epidemic hemorrhagic fever (EHF). Thirty-one cases each were 
allocated randomly into the IFN group and control group. Another 
24 cases each for IFN and control groups were studied by 
double-blind method. All the patients were treated within 5 days 
of the illness. The results showed that subsidence of symptoms 
and signs resulted from viremia, restoration of renal function 
and platelet count were much faster, and complications much less 
in the IFN treated group. In both the randomized and 
double-blind studies, the number of cases that skip both the 
hypotension and oliguria phases were significantly more in the 
IFN group than that in the control (87.1 percent and 62.5 
percent vs. 51.9 percent and 29.2 percent, p &lt; 0.05). The 
results suggest that Hu IFN-_a_ therapy administered before the 
5th day of EHF may shorten the duration of illness, alleviate 
the damage of organs, and improve the cure rate. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20451 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcst004___94021" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CST-94-004 </AU>
JPRS 
Science &amp; Technology 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  China </ABS>
<DATE1>   1 April 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> Biotechnology </F>
<H3> <TI>   Influence of 24h Head-Down Bed-Rest on Physiological </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Influence of 24h Head-Down Bed-Rest on Physiological </PHRASE></F></HT>


<TEXT>
Function   of Human Body 

<F P=102> 40091007E Beijing ZHONGGUO KONGJIAN KEXUE JISHU [CHINESE 
SPACE SCIENCE AND TECHNOLOGY] in Chinese Vol 13 No 5, Oct 93 pp </F>

66-71 
<F P=103> 40091007E </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing ZHONGGUO KONGJIAN KEXUE JISHU [CHINESE 
SPACE SCIENCE AND TECHNOLOGY] </F>

<F P=105>  Chinese </F>
CSO 

<F P=106> [English abstract of article by Shen Xianyun [3088 5029 </F>
0061], Huang Huaming [7806 5478 2494], et al. of the Institute 
of Space Medico-Engineering, Beijing] 
  [Text] In order to observe the dynamic features of 
physiological function of human body during the initial stage of 
space flight and to study the mechanism of ``space adaptation 
syndrome,'' the heart beat, respiration, head and leg body 
surface temperatures and EEG were observed in 12 subjects during 
head-down 6 bed-rest. All the indices were recorded in a 
physiological data acquisition and processing system for our 
bed-rest laboratory. Analysis items include the trend of heart 
rate, body temperatures, respiration and EEG during 24h 
bed-rest, R-R spectrum and EEG power spectrum. 
  The results showed that some important physiological 
functions such as heart beat, respiration and EEG, still 
remained circadian during head-down bed-rest. But some extent 
disorders appeared, i.e. (1) Two peaks of heart beat rhythm 
which appear in normal condition disappeared and phase of heart 
beat rhythm shifted. (2) The circadian rhythm of body 
temperature was changed. The rhythm in head surface temperature 
disappeared and the surface temperature in leg increased 
significantly in the initial several hours, then decreased, and 
the fluctuation was remarkable. (3) The power in _a_ band 
decreased and the power in  and _th_ band increased during 
bed-rest. The biorhythmic analysis indicated a decrease of 
circadian rhythm stability and showed a phase shifting. The 
results of R-R spectrum and EEG power spectrum showed that the 
regulation of heart and brain and cerebral cortical activities 
were changed during 24h bed-rest. 
  Subject term: Weightlessness simulation, Weightless 
physiological effect, Test, Analyzing. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20452 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcst004___94022" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CST-94-004 </AU>
JPRS 
Science &amp; Technology 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  China </ABS>
<DATE1>   1 April 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> Biotechnology </F>
<H3> <TI>   Treatment of Depression Syndrome With Chinese Herb-Compounds </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Treatment of Depression Syndrome With Chinese Herb-Compounds </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   40091007D Beijing HANGTIAN YIXUE YU YIXUE GONGCHENG [SPACE 
MEDICINE &amp; MEDICAL ENGINEERING] in Chinese Vol 6 No 4, Dec </F>



<TEXT>
93  pp 
290-296 
<F P=103> 40091007D </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing HANGTIAN YIXUE YU YIXUE GONGCHENG [SPACE 
MEDICINE &amp; MEDICAL ENGINEERING] </F>

<F P=105>  Chinese </F>
CSO 

<F P=106> [English abstract of article by Zhang Ruijun [1728 3843 </F>
6874], Yang Guanghua [2799 0342 5478], et al. of the Institute 
of Space Medico-Engineering, Beijing] 
  [Text] This paper summarized the results of treatment of 
depression syndrome caused by microwave, irradiation, noise or 
side effects of anti-cancer drugs with Chinese herb-compounds. 
Chinese herb-compound, containing Huangqui (Radix astragali), 
Ciwujia (Acan thopanax Senticosus), etc. was administered by 
mouth to the patients and mice exposed to microwave, radiation 
or chemotherapy with anti-cancer drugs. Mice exposed to noise 
were treated with herb-compound containing panax ginseng and 
Linguisticum chuanxiong. Both Chinese herb-compounds have the 
same tonic character. The results in patients showed reduction 
of patient's complaints, increase of WBC and thrombocyte count, 
and recovery of immune function. All of the changes were 
significant. Increase of WBC and thrombocyte count, recovery of 
immune function, increase of corticosterone and serotonin 
content in blood, cerebrum and spleen were also found to be 
significant in mice treated with Chinese herb-compound as 
compared with the control mice. Improvement of many 
physiological functions in the whole body after treatment with 
Chinese herb-compounds of the same tonic character suggested 
that, different adverse environmental factors may cause same 
general reaction, the general depression syndrome, which has 
been described in our previous paper. 
  Key words: depression syndrome, hematopoietic, immunity, 
serotonin, Chinese medical herbs. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20453 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcst004___94023" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CST-94-004 </AU>
JPRS 
Science &amp; Technology 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  China </ABS>
<DATE1>   1 April 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> Biotechnology </F>
<H3> <TI>   Effects of Medical Herbs on Blood Flow and Mechanical </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Effects of Medical Herbs on Blood Flow and Mechanical </PHRASE></F></HT>


<TEXT>
Properties   of Soleus Muscle in Tail-Suspended Rats 

<F P=102> 40091007C Beijing HANGTIAN YIXUE YU YIXUE GONGCHENG [SPACE 
MEDICINE &amp; MEDICAL ENGINEERING] in Chinese Vol 6 No 4, Dec </F>

 93 pp 
286-289 
<F P=103> 40091007C </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing HANGTIAN YIXUE YU YIXUE GONGCHENG [SPACE 
MEDICINE &amp; MEDICAL ENGINEERING] </F>

<F P=105>  Chinese </F>
CSO 

<F P=106> [English abstract of article by Sun Yazhi [1327 0068 1807], </F>
Cui Jian [1508 1696], et al. of the Institute of Space 
Medico-Engineering, Beijing] 
  [Text] Forty-five male Spraque-Dawly rats (240-300 g) were 
randomly assigned to three groups. The first was control group 
(fed with water). The second and third groups were fed with 
medicinal herbs according to prescriptions No. 1 and 2 
respectively. The rats were tail suspended with heads down 25-30 
degrees for 15 days. Mechanical properties of the soleus muscle 
were determined with tesion and displacement transducers. Blood 
flow in soleus muscle was determined with [.sup]51[/]Cr 
labelled frog red cells. 
  The result indicated that blood flow increased in soleus 
muscle in the second and third group rats but decreased in the 
first group rats; peak force of isometric twitch and tetanic 
contraction of soleus muscle increased in the second and third 
group rats but decreased in the first group rats. There were 
corresponding relationships between blood flow and peak force of 
various kinds of muscle contractions. The correlations were: 
  Y[.sub]1[/] = 16.98 + 705.42x; Y[.sub]2[/] = 9.04 + 
1183.76x 
  where: x -- blood flow in soleus muscle (ml/min.g); 
Y[.sub]1[/] -- peak force of isometric twitch (N); 
Y[.sub]2[/] -- peak force of isometric tetanic contraction 
(N). 
  These results provided scientific basis for adopting 
effective countermeasures against muscle atrophy during 
weightlessness or simulated weightlessness. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20454 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcst004___94024" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CST-94-004 </AU>
JPRS 
Science &amp; Technology 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  China </ABS>
<DATE1>   1 April 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> Biotechnology </F>
<H3> <TI>   Scorpion Neurotoxin Research </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Scorpion Neurotoxin Research </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94P60121A Beijing ZHONGGUO KEXUE [SCIENCE IN CHINA-SERIES B] 
in Chinese Vol 23 No 9, Sep 93 pp 923-930 </F>

<F P=103> 94P60121A </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing ZHONGGUO KEXUE [SCIENCE IN CHINA-SERIES B] 
in Chinese Vol 23 No 9, Sep 93 pp 923-930 </F>

<F P=105> Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Ji Yonghua [0679 3057 5478], Xu Ke [1776 4430], </F>
Shanghai Institute of Physiology, Chinese Academy of Sciences; 
Hiroyuki Hatori, Susumu Terakawa, Okazaki National Institute of 
Physiology, Okazaki, Japan] 
  [Summary] A best spectrum with high recovery rate of 
scorpion neurotoxin components has been obtained by using the 
reverse phase-high performance liquid chromatography (RP-HPLC) 
to separate crude toxin of East Asia scorpion (Buthus martensi 
Karsch). The RP-HPLC was able to effectively and clearly 
separate into two zones the anti-mammal neurotoxin (including 
anti-insect neurotoxin that attacks both mammals and insects) 
and the anti-insect neurotoxin which attacks only insects. The 
method was also used to purify five anti-insect neurotoxins 
which were then designated as BmK IT1, BmK IT2, BmK IT3, BmK 
IT4, and BmK IT5. The BmK IT1 was identified as a contracture 
anti-insect toxin and the BmK IT2 through IT5 were all flaccid 
paralysis anti-insect toxin newly identified by the following 
methods including toxin detection, amino acid component 
analysis, and N-terminal three-peptide sequence analysis. 
Results obtained from this experiment showed that the four 
flaccid paralysis anti-insect toxins were all alkaline and were 
all single chain polypeptides composed of 61 amino acid residues 
with isoelectric points between 8.3 and 8.5. Researchers found 
that positive electrical charge on the surface of amino acid 
residues of BmK IT2 molecule played an important role on 
biological activity of BmK IT2 toxin, because BmK IT2 molecule 
lost its toxicity when being treated with fluorescent labelling 
substance. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20455 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcst004___94025" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CST-94-004 </AU>
JPRS 
Science &amp; Technology 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  China </ABS>
<DATE1>   1 April 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> Biotechnology </F>
<H3> <TI>   Study on P190 Antigen Variation of Plasmodium falciparium </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Study on P190 Antigen Variation of Plasmodium falciparium </PHRASE></F></HT>


<TEXT>
Isolated   in Hainan 

<F P=102> 94P60121B Beijing ZHONGGUO KEXUE [SCIENCE IN CHINA-SERIES B] 
in Chinese Vol 23 No 10, Oct 93 pp 1070-1076 </F>

<F P=103> 94P60121B </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing ZHONGGUO KEXUE [SCIENCE IN CHINA-SERIES B] 
in Chinese Vol 23 No 10, Oct 93 pp 1070-1076 </F>

<F P=105> Chinese </F>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Pan Weiqing [3382 5898 1987], Yang Shitong [2799 </F>
2885 2717], Deng Hailin [6772 3189 3829], Lu Deru [7120 1795 
1172]] 
  [Summary] It is widely believed that the best way to 
control and eradicate malaria infection is to develop malaria 
vaccine. So far, the P190 antigen derived from Plasmodium 
falciparium is reportedly to be the most prospective candidate, 
because of the antigen's capability of inducing antibodies to 
provide complete immunity to monkey model of human malaria. 
Research results indicate that the repeated three-peptide 
sequence of P190 antigen, the repeated eight-peptide sequence of 
RESA antigen, and the repeated four-peptide sequence of CS 
antigen of Hainan strain (FCCI/HN strain) P. falciparium contain 
T cell epitope that is closely related to immune function 
against malaria infection. These repeated peptide sequences are 
believed to be the functional regions responsible for immunity. 
Variation of these sequences could be responsible for failure of 
human body's immune response to P. falciparium attack. In other 
words, plasmodia may constantly variate their repeated peptide 
sequences, the hot spots of gene deletion and gene insertion, to 
avoid being neutralized by host's immune response. Therefore, 
variations should be put into consideration when using the 
repeated peptide sequences to develop malaria vaccine. 
Researchers believe that vaccine developers should be able to 
correct the problem encountered if they study carefully the 
variation's nature and mechanism. Results obtained from this 
experiment indicate that Hainan FCCI/HN P. falciparium makes an 
ideal strain for developing malaria vaccine because of its P190 
antigen's conservativeness and bimorphism property. Chinese 
researchers are hoping to develop a complete vaccine that is 
capable of protecting human beings from any P. falciparium 
attack by putting two kinds of bimorphism sequences in one 
single vaccine. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20456 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcst004___94026" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CST-94-004 </AU>
JPRS 
Science &amp; Technology 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  China </ABS>
<DATE1>   1 April 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> Biotechnology </F>
<H3> <TI>   Polyvalence Vaccine Research Using Vaccinia Virus Expression </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Polyvalence Vaccine Research Using Vaccinia Virus Expression </PHRASE></F></HT>


<TEXT>
System 

<F P=102>   94P60121C Beijing ZHONGGUO YIXUE LUNTAN BAO [CHINA MEDICAL 
TRIBUNE] in Chinese Vol 19 No 47, Dec 93 p 1 </F>

<F P=103> 94P60121C </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing ZHONGGUO YIXUE LUNTAN BAO [CHINA MEDICAL 
TRIBUNE] </F>

<F P=105>  Chinese </F>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Yao Haijian [1202 3189 1696]] </F>
  [Summary] Research fellows Cao Xu [2580 2485] and Ruan Li 
[7086 0500] at the Virology Department of the Chinese Academy of 
Preventive Medicine have constructed a complete gene expression 
system from the Chinese-developed Tian Tan strain vaccinia 
virus. First the team identified four different promoters from 
Tian Tan strain vaccinia, artificially synthesized one promoter, 
and studied the two genes, thymidylic acid kinase and the 
beta-galactosidase, that can be used as selecting markers for 
vaccinia research, and then constructed a Tian Tan strain 
recombinant vaccinia virus vector system that contains 13 gene 
expression vectors, two selecting marker vectors, and one 
promoter screening vector. The system has been widely used in 
China to express more than 30 important viral antigens and many 
immune-activity polypeptides including hepatitis A, hepatitis B, 
Epstein-Bar (EB), Herpes simplex, epidemic hemorrhagic fever 
(EHF), respiratory tract plasmodia, measles, rabbies, 
cytomegalovirus, interleukin II, human aggregation growth 
factor, and tumor necrosis factor. Three live vaccines 
(hepatitis A, hepatitis B, and EB) that were developed from 
recombinant vaccinia virus were just put into clinical trial and 
clinical observation. Chinese researchers also succeeded in 
developing multivalent recombinant vaccinia virus that can 
express two, three, or four different exogenous genes at the 
same time. The construction of Tian Tan vaccinia vector system 
has provided a complete gene expression system for developing 
monovalent and multivalent genetic engineering live vaccines. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20457 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcst004___94027" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CST-94-004 </AU>
JPRS 
Science &amp; Technology 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  China </ABS>
<DATE1>   28 March 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> Computers </F>
<H3> <TI>   Digital to Transfer Computer Technology </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Digital to Transfer Computer Technology </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   40100046A Beijing CHINA DAILY (BUSINESS WEEKLY) in English 
28 Mar 94 p 4 </F>

<F P=103> 40100046A </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing CHINA DAILY (BUSINESS WEEKLY) </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

  [Text] -- Shanghai -- A leading U.S. computer maker has 
plugged into the booming information technology industry in 
Shanghai. 
  Digital Equipment Co recently signed a memorandum of 
understanding with the Pudong Software Park Development Co in 
Shanghai. 
  Initially, Digital is to offer its new Alpha AXP 64-bit RISC 
architecture (a high-speed data processing technology), mature 
network systems integration and other technical and management 
expertise. 
  ``Shanghai's development in the information technology 
industry will be explosive and Digital is very fortunate to have 
this opportunity to be a partner with this dynamic company to 
further the information technology objectives of China,'' said 
Bob Allesio, Digital's marketing director. 
  Information technology has recently gained a strategic 
position in the city's economy, joining automobiles and 
telecommunications as a pillar industry. 
  The industry expects sales to jump from 1 billion yuan ($115 
million) last year to 5 billion yuan ($575 million) in 1995 and 
20 billion yuan ($2.3 billion) by the year 2000. 
  City leaders expect the local information technology 
industry 
to gain at least one-third of the country's market. 
  As part of the expansion drive, Pudong Software Development 
Park was founded by the Electronics Industry Ministry and the 
city government to put East Shanghai in a leading position in 
the country's software development. 
  The park's ambitious plan is to employ 3,000 software 
engineers in 1996 and 10,000 by the year 2000. 
  The software park development company, owned by the city 
government and the Ministry of Electronics, is in charge of the 
park's infrastructure, business operations and support services. 
  Company president Sun Yuanhong said the signing of the 
memorandum marked ``the participation of one of the world's 
leading computer vendors in our project.'' 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20458 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcst004___94028" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CST-94-004 </AU>
JPRS 
Science &amp; Technology 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  China </ABS>
<DATE1>   28 March 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> Computers </F>
<H3> <TI>   Data-Bank Business Heats Up </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Data-Bank Business Heats Up </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   40100046B Beijing CHINA DAILY (BUSINESS WEEKLY) in English 
28 Mar 94 p 8 </F>

<F P=103> 40100046B </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing CHINA DAILY (BUSINESS WEEKLY) </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Chang Weimin] </F>
  [Text] China's fledgling information service sector, after 
years of probing for business openings, is turning to long-term 
commitments to help bolster the market. 
  Latest reports say competition is growing to build up data 
banks for use by businesses, which have come closer to the 
recognition that a good corporate image helps their long-term 
interests in the information market. 
  Latest statistics show that some 800 data banks have been 
established nationwide, compared with only a few score a decade 
ago. 
  However, the information contained in most data bases is far 
from enough. On average, the 800 data banks each have 50,000 
pieces of information, compared with 1.04 million pieces in 1989 
in the United States. 
  Li Yefu, president of Beijing-based MLS Information, a 
subsidiary of MLS Advertising and Planning Co, believes things 
are looking up. 
  In an interview with Business Weekly last week, Li pledged 
to 
contribute to China's information sector and expressed 
confidence that it will build up its profile within a few years. 
  Li said MLS Information completed a large data base early 
this month and is now making major efforts to promote it. 
  The data base, containing information on more than 600,000 
enterprises and institutions, is a rarity in the country. 
  Basic information on all large and medium-size State 
enterprises and institutions and 3,000 foreign firms and 
organizations has been gathered. 
  MLS Information spent two years gathering and processing the 
information with the help of a computerized system. 
  To commercialize information in the data base, the company 
decided to open a telephone hot line on the 18th of every month 
to answer questions about enterprises and institutions in China. 
  You Zhihai, a manager for MLS Information, said that on 
March 
18, the first day of service, scores of phone calls were 
received. 
  Li called the hot line a success, and said his firm plans to 
open several additional phone lines. 
  ``We, like our customers, also need new information from 
feedback. And we need a good corporate image for our long-term 
interest,'' he said. 
  The data base is to be updated every six months, You said. 
  Li said that his firm will soon begin a market investigation 
called Business Cycle Survey of China. 
  Li said he expects the survey, which is to be finished 
within 
a year, will help central government departments and State 
national industrial corporations to make policies and decisions. 
  The firm will compile and publish pamphlets three times a 
month to provide information from the survey to enterprises and 
government departments. 
  Questionnaires will be sent to some 30,000 enterprises. 
  ``We expect 70 per cent of them to fill in the forms and 
send 
them back to us,'' Li said. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20459 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcst004___94029" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CST-94-004 </AU>
JPRS 
Science &amp; Technology 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  China </ABS>
<DATE1>   18 February 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> Computers </F>
<H3> <TI>   Expert Data Base System Developed by USTND </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Expert Data Base System Developed by USTND </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94P60157A Beijing ZHONGGUO DIANZI BAO [CHINA ELECTRONICS 
NEWS] in Chinese 18 Feb 94 p 3 </F>

<F P=103> 94P60157A </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing ZHONGGUO DIANZI BAO [CHINA ELECTRONICS 
NEWS] </F>

<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Tan Keyang [6223 0344 2254]: ``USTND Develops </F>
`Expert Data Base System': Major Achievement in State `863 Plan' 
Intelligent Computing Technology Research''] 
  [Summary] The ``Expert Data Base System'' software tool 
developed over a 4-year period as a State 863 Plan (Intelligent 
Computing Technology area) project by the Computer Institute at 
the University of Science and Technology for National Defense 
(USTND) recently passed formal technical appraisal in Changsha, 
where an expert panel judged its technical performance to be 
world-class. This tool tightly couples intelligent software 
research with traditional computer software technologies; it 
organically fuses logical inference, modularized structure, 
object-oriented techniques, intelligent objects, and advanced 
graphical user interface techniques. Developed under the 
guidance of USTND Prof. Wu Quanyuan [0702 3123 3293], this new 
system has applications in areas such as defense research, 
energy resources exploration, iron and steel smelting, financial 
services, and logistics management. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20460 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcst004___94030" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CST-94-004 </AU>
JPRS 
Science &amp; Technology 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  China </ABS>
<DATE1>   25 February 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> Computers </F>
<H3> <TI>   Chinapac Network Passes Acceptance Check </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Chinapac Network Passes Acceptance Check </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94P60157B Beijing ZHONGGUO DIANZI BAO [CHINA ELECTRONICS 
NEWS] in Chinese 25 Feb 94 p 3 </F>

<F P=103> 94P60157B </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing ZHONGGUO DIANZI BAO [CHINA ELECTRONICS 
NEWS] </F>

<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Liu Keli [0491 0344 7787]: ``China Public </F>
Packet-Switching Network Passes Acceptance Check''] 
  [Editorial Report] Additional details on the Chinapac 
network not already supplied in two earlier articles [see 
JPRS-CST-93-015, 15 Sep 93 p 36] are given here. After 5 months 
of trial operation, Chinapac passed the joint MPT/Northern 
Telecom acceptance check on 5 February 1994. The total number of 
terminal ports, targeted to be 20,000, can be connected via 
fiber optic, digital microwave, and satellite links to 
international gateways in Beijing, Shanghai, and Guangzhou for 
interconnections with 26 packet-switching networks in the United 
States, Japan, France, Germany, the ROK, Sweden, Italy, and 
eight other countries. Chinapac consists of 32 nodes and eight 
tandem centers with a throughput of 6400 packets/second, and 
provides basic services such as switched virtual circuit [i.e., 
``virtual call''] and permanent virtual circuit, as well as 
specialized services such as virtual dedicated networking, 
broadcasting, IBM/SNA [systems network architecture] networking, 
token-ring LAN intelligent bridging, asynchronous datagram 
interfacing, electronic mailbox, videotex, Teletex, electronic 
data switching, data base searches, fax storage and relay, etc. 
Since trial operation commenced on 1 September 1993, over 500 
users and 16 nationwide groups have joined Chinapac, which has 
carried a monthly load of 31 million fields. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20461 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcst004___94031" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CST-94-004 </AU>
JPRS 
Science &amp; Technology 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  China </ABS>
<DATE1>   26 February 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> Computers </F>
<H3> <TI>   IBM, Great Wall Computer Group Establish Joint Venture </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    IBM, Great Wall Computer Group Establish Joint Venture </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94P60157C Beijing KEJI RIBAO [SCIENCE AND TECHNOLOGY DAILY] 
in Chinese 26 Feb 94 p 1 </F>

<F P=103> 94P60157C </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing KEJI RIBAO [SCIENCE AND TECHNOLOGY DAILY] 
in Chinese 26 Feb 94 p 1 </F>

<F P=105> Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Ji Hongguang [1323 3163 0342]: ``IBM and Great </F>
Wall Computer Group Build Joint-Venture Plant''] 
  [Summary] Beijing, 25 Feb -- The U.S. firm IBM China Ltd. 
and China Great Wall Computer Group announced today that they 
are establishing a joint venture to manufacture and market PCs 
and to provide a full range of services. The new joint venture, 
called Shenzhen Great Wall International Information Products 
Ltd., will initially produce the IBM PS/Value Point series of 
PCs as well as Great Wall microcomputer systems and will sell 
these products at home and abroad. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20462 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcst004___94032" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CST-94-004 </AU>
JPRS 
Science &amp; Technology 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  China </ABS>
<DATE1>   1 April 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> Computers </F>
<H3> <TI>   Software Environment of Special-Purpose-Processor-Based </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Software Environment of Special-Purpose-Processor-Based </PHRASE></F></HT>


<TEXT>
Neural   Network Simulation System 

<F P=102> 94P60143A Beijing JISUANJI XUEBAO [CHINESE JOURNAL OF 
COMPUTERS] in Chinese Vol 16 No 12, Dec 93 pp 947-951 </F>

<F P=103> 94P60143A </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing JISUANJI XUEBAO [CHINESE JOURNAL OF 
COMPUTERS] </F>

<F P=105>  Chinese </F>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Wang Dongsheng [3769 2639 3932], Wang Jin [3076 </F>
6651], et al. of the Division of Electronic Technology, 
University of Science &amp; Technology of China (USTC), Hefei 
230026: ``Software Environment of 
SP[.sup]2[/]N[.sup]2[/]S[.sup]2[/]''; MS received 8 Jul 
92. Cf. brief report in JPRS-CST-92-010, 22 May 92 p 27] 
  [Abstract] SP[.sup]2[/]N[.sup]2[/]S[.sup]2[/], a 
special-purpose-processor-based neural network virtual 
simulation system developed by the authors at USTC, is 
introduced. This system consists of a 
multiple-instruction-stream/multiple-data-stream (MIMD) parallel 
processing system and its software support environment. 
  The hardware architecture, shown in Figure 1 below, consists 
of four TMS320C25 DSP [digital signal processor] chips and four 
dual-port memory (DPM) chips interconnected into a ring; in 
addition, each DSP has its own program memory (PM), written with 
C25 assembly-language code, and its own working memory (WM), for 
storing inter-neuron connection weights. The software support 
environment, shown in Table 1 below, consists of two levels: 
bottom-layer software, including a service subroutine for the 
servo-simulation system, and applications software, including 
neural network simulation programs and some applications 
subroutines. These programs mostly utilize conventional 
network-decomposition techniques for popular neural network 
models such as Hopfield and BP [backpropagation]. Figures 2-5, 
not reproduced, show a BP network decomposition, a computation 
sequence and data transfer for Equation 7, a computation 
sequence and data transfer for Equation 8, and a Hopfield 
network decomposition. In a neural network simulation 
experiment, the authors ran such decomposition algorithms on the 
SP[.sup]2[/]N[.sup]2[/]S[.sup]2[/] and obtained the 
results listed in Table 2 below. In Table 2, single-processor 
simulation speed indicates number of characters recognized per 
second via an IBM PC 486 microcomputer (column 2) and number of 
seconds per image for image compression via an IBM PC 386 
microcomputer with 80387 coprocessor (column 3). Table 2 
therefore indicates that the neural network simulation speed of 
the SP[.sup]2[/]N[.sup]2[/]S[.sup]2[/] is 56 times that 
of an IBM PC 486 for character recognition, and 100 times that 
of an IBM PC 386 (with 80387 coprocessor) for image compression. 

<FIG ID=JPRS-CST-004-19A>      Figure 1. SP[.sup]2[/]N[.sup]2[/]S[.sup]2[/] Hardware Architecture </FIG>




  ------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Table 1. SP[.sup]2[/]N[.sup]2[/]S[.sup]2[/] Software Support Environme-| 
|nt                                                                           | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|                         |TMS320C25 Assembly Langu-|C Language               | 
|                         |age                      |                         | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Applications software    |Character recognition    |Parameter installation   | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Image compression        |Menu management          |                         | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Associative memory       |Sample editing           |                         | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Network decomposition    |Graphical display        |                         | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Bottom-layer software    |Memory testing           |8088 assembly language   | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Software speed testing   |C25 code loading         |                         | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Communications           |C25 code run control     |                         | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Floating-point addition  |Data transfer            |                         | 
|and multiplication       |                         |                         | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 





  ------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Table 2. Simulation Experimental Results                                     | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Simulation Contents      |Character Recognition    |Image Compression        | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Network model            |Hopfield                 |3-layer BP               | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Input mode               |20 x 20 dot-matrix chara-|128 x 128 images with 256| 
|                         |cters                    | gray levels             | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Data format              |Integer                  |Floating point (IEEE sta-| 
|                         |                         |ndard)                   | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Number of neurons        |400                      |136                      | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Number of connection wei-|160000                   |1024                     | 
|ghts                     |                         |                         | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Weight update speed      |9MIPS                    |149KIPS &yen;SP[.sup]2    | 
|                         |                         |[/]N[.sup]2[/]S[.sup]| 
|                         |                         |2[/] simulation speed | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|56 characters/s          |18 sec/image             |                         | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Single-processor simulat-|1 character/s            |1800 sec/image           | 
|ion speed                |                         |                         | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Simulation speed ratio   |56                       |100                      | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 


References 
  1. Wang, J., et al., ``The Architecture of Neural Emulator 
KDNeuro-I,'' Proc. Int. Conf. on CAS, China, Shenzhen, 1991, 
69-71. 
  2. Zhuang Zhenquan, Wang Dongsheng, and Wang Xufa, ``Neural 
Networks and Neurocomputers'' [in Chinese], DIANZI JISHU 
YINGYONG [APPLICATION OF ELECTRONIC TECHNIQUE], 1990, (5), 38-41. 
  3. Hopfield, J.J., ``Neural Networks and Physical Systems 
with Emergent Collective Computational Abilities,'' PROC. 
NATIONAL ACADEMY OF SCIENCE, USA, 1982, (79), 2554-2558. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20463 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcst004___94033" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CST-94-004 </AU>
JPRS 
Science &amp; Technology 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  China </ABS>
<DATE1>   21 February 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> Lasers, Sensors, Optics </F>
<H3> <TI>   Second-Generation Domestically Made GPS on Market </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Second-Generation Domestically Made GPS on Market </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94P60172B Beijing KEJI RIBAO [SCIENCE AND TECHNOLOGY DAILY] 
in Chinese 21 Feb 94 p 2 </F>

<F P=103> 94P60172B </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing KEJI RIBAO [SCIENCE AND TECHNOLOGY DAILY] 
in Chinese 21 Feb 94 p 2 </F>

<F P=105> Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Hu Yu [5170 2509] and Li Shaojing [2621 1421 </F>
0079]: ``Second-Generation Satellite Navigation Position 
Indicator Developed''] 
  [Summary] The model CGP93 second-generation domestically 
made satellite global positioning system (GPS) developed by the 
Beijing Satellite Technology Navigation Company and manufactured 
under the supervision of the Chinese Academy of Launch Vehicle 
Technology [CALT] is now on the market. The CGP93 system 
incorporates 5-channel C/A [coarse acquisition]-code 
single-frequency receiver technology, with all-Chinese-character 
operation. It can store 100 air or sea route points and has a 
positioning accuracy of 10-15 m and a rate accuracy of 0.02 m/s. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20464 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcst004___94034" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CST-94-004 </AU>
JPRS 
Science &amp; Technology 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  China </ABS>
<DATE1>   21 February 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> Lasers, Sensors, Optics </F>
<H3> <TI>   1024-Element Linear-Array PtSi IR CCD Detector Design </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    1024-Element Linear-Array PtSi IR CCD Detector Design </PHRASE></F></HT>


<TEXT>
Finalized 

<F P=102>   94P60172A Beijing ZHONGGUO DIANZI BAO [CHINA ELECTRONICS 
NEWS] in Chinese 21 Feb 94 p 3 </F>

<F P=103> 94P60172A </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing ZHONGGUO DIANZI BAO [CHINA ELECTRONICS 
NEWS] </F>

<F P=105>  Chinese </F>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Yu Ruming [0151 3067 2494]: ``Model H10CY3 </F>
Infrared CCD Detector Module Developed''] 
  [Summary] The model H10CY3 1024-element linear-array PtSi 
infrared (IR) CCD detector module developed by MEI's Institute 
44 in the midst of a foreign blockade on the technology passed 
design finalization and technical appraisal a few days ago. This 
detector, cooled by a side-window liquid-N (77K) Dewar, has 
peripheral drive circuits incorporating secondary integration 
techniques. Applications include spectral measurement, night 
vision, IR guidance, industrial inspection, and medical 
diagnosis. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20465 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcst004___94035" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CST-94-004 </AU>
JPRS 
Science &amp; Technology 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  China </ABS>
<DATE1>   7 February 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> Microelectronics </F>
<H3> <TI>   808-nm, 980-nm Quantum Well Laser Diodes Pass Design </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    808-nm, 980-nm Quantum Well Laser Diodes Pass Design </PHRASE></F></HT>


<TEXT>
Finalization 

<F P=102>   94P60158A Beijing ZHONGGUO DIANZI BAO [CHINA ELECTRONICS 
NEWS] in Chinese 7 Feb 94 p 3 </F>

<F P=103> 94P60158A </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing ZHONGGUO DIANZI BAO [CHINA ELECTRONICS 
NEWS] </F>

<F P=105>  Chinese </F>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Zheng Zhaosen [6774 0340 2773]: </F>
``808-nm-Wavelength, 980-nm-Wavelength Quantum Well Laser 
Diodes''] 
  [Summary] The 808-nm-wavelength high-power AlGaAs quantum 
well laser diode and 980-nm-wavelength InGaAs/AlGaAs 
strained-layer quantum well laser diode developed by MEI's 
Institute 13 as pump sources for solid state lasers recently 
passed design finalization. The former laser diode is a key 
device used in all-solid-state YAG lasers, while the latter is a 
key device for erbium-doped fiber optical amplifiers. Both 
achievements were listed as Eighth FYP Key State Projects and 
863 Plan key projects. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20466 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcst004___94036" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CST-94-004 </AU>
JPRS 
Science &amp; Technology 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  China </ABS>
<DATE1>   18 February 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> Microelectronics </F>
<H3> <TI>   Room-Temperature Vertical Cavity Surface-Emitting Laser </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Room-Temperature Vertical Cavity Surface-Emitting Laser </PHRASE></F></HT>


<TEXT>
Diode   Developed 

<F P=102> 94P60158B Beijing ZHONGGUO KEXUE BAO [CHINESE SCIENCE NEWS] 
in Chinese 18 Feb 94 p 2 </F>

<F P=103> 94P60158B </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing ZHONGGUO KEXUE BAO [CHINESE SCIENCE NEWS] 
in Chinese 18 Feb 94 p 2 </F>

<F P=105> Chinese </F>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by He Chunfan [0149 2504 5672]: ``Major Advance in </F>
Vertical Cavity Surface-Emitting Laser Diode Development''] 
  [Summary] The GaAs/AlGaAs vertical cavity surface-emitting 
laser diode (VCSEL) developed as an 863 Plan key project by the 
National Integrated Optoelectronics Laboratory at the CAS 
Institute of Semiconductors has fulfilled an Eighth FYP task 3 
years ahead of schedule. Fabricated via molecular beam epitaxy 
and proton bombardment techniques, this VCSEL exhibits 
room-temperature pulsed emission, with an emission threshold 
current of 10 mA and an output optical power ranging from 0.3 mW 
to 0.7 mW. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20467 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcst004___94037" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CST-94-004 </AU>
JPRS 
Science &amp; Technology 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  China </ABS>
<DATE1>   21 February 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> Microelectronics </F>
<H3> <TI>   Multi-Ion-Beam Reactive Co-Sputtering Apparatus Certified </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Multi-Ion-Beam Reactive Co-Sputtering Apparatus Certified </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94P60158C Beijing ZHONGGUO DIANZI BAO [CHINA ELECTRONICS 
NEWS] in Chinese 21 Feb 94 p 3 </F>

<F P=103> 94P60158C </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing ZHONGGUO DIANZI BAO [CHINA ELECTRONICS 
NEWS] </F>

<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Deng Xianchun [6772 6343 2504]: ``Sichuan </F>
University Develops Multi-Ion-Beam Reactive Co-Sputtering 
Apparatus''] 
  [Summary] The multi-ion-beam reactive co-sputtering 
apparatus and thin-film fabrication technology developed as a 
State 863 Plan key project by Sichuan University's Department of 
Materials Science and Institute of Nuclear Science and 
Technology recently passed expert technical appraisal. The 
apparatus, which uses microwave plasma-assisted sputtering 
techniques, has been utilized by the Sichuan University 
researchers to fabricate world-class lead-lanthanum-titanium 
(PLT) and lead-titanium (PT) thin films on a variety of 
substrates. The technique is particularly useful in fabricating 
ferroelectric thin films, high-Tc superconducting ceramic thin 
films, and superlattice films. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20468 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcst004___94038" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CST-94-004 </AU>
JPRS 
Science &amp; Technology 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  China </ABS>
<DATE1>   25 February 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> Microelectronics </F>
<H3> <TI>   5-Inch Single-Crystal Silicon Wafers Developed </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    5-Inch Single-Crystal Silicon Wafers Developed </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94P60158D Beijing ZHONGGUO DIANZI BAO [CHINA ELECTRONICS 
NEWS] in Chinese 25 Feb 94 p 2 </F>

<F P=103> 94P60158D </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing ZHONGGUO DIANZI BAO [CHINA ELECTRONICS 
NEWS] </F>

<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Chen Shuxin [7115 3412 2450] and Fang Quanyuan </F>
[2455 3123 3293]: ``Huajing Develops 5-Inch Single-Crystal 
Silicon''] 
  [Summary] Scientists at the China Huajing Electronics Group 
recently developed 5-inch single-crystal silicon wafers. As 
tested by an expert panel and by customers, this material's main 
technical performance exceeds the international general-purpose 
SEMI [Semiconductor Equipment and Materials Institute] materials 
standards. This world-class product, costing one-third less than 
the equivalent imported item, can be used for manufacturing 
2-3-m-linewidth VLSI circuits. The Huajing scientists 
reported their achievement at the recently held National 
Semiconductor and Integrated Circuit Silicon Materials 
Conference. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20469 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcst004___94039" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CST-94-004 </AU>
JPRS 
Science &amp; Technology 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  China </ABS>
<DATE1>   16 March 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> Microelectronics </F>
<H3> <TI>   Hainan Gets U.S. Fuzzy Control Technology </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Hainan Gets U.S. Fuzzy Control Technology </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   40100042A Beijing CHINA DAILY in English 16 Mar 94 p 2 </F>
<F P=103> 40100042A </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing CHINA DAILY </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Wu Yunhe: ``Hainan Hi-Tech Gets `Fuzzy'''] </F>
  [Text] Haikou -- A tripartite-invested venture was set up 
yesterday to produce the newest wave in electronics, a device 
that cuts the amount of power needed to run appliances. 
  With registered capital of $150 million, the Hainan-Aptronix 
Electronic Company was founded by US-based Aptronix Asia-Pacific 
Electronic Company, Hainan Seg International Trust and 
Investment Corporation, and Hainan-based Hua Xing International 
Leasing Company. 
  The Sino-American venture will use the world's latest 
hi-tech 
advances -- the ``fuzzy control technology'' -- to help improve 
the automatic capacity of household electrical appliances, such 
as washing machines, air-conditioners and cameras. 
  Yan Weiming, an official of the State Technology Supervision 
Administration, said a washing machine can cut power consumption 
by 2.6 per cent an hour with the fuzzy hi-tech. 
  The venture has spent $6 million to introduce two product 
lines from the United States to manufacture the device, which is 
expected to make household appliance factories more competitive. 
  It is the first factory to produce the fuzzy control device 
in China. 
  The company is expected to start production at the end of 
this year, and has a designed annual capacity of 5 million fuzzy 
control devices in 1995 for the domestic markets. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20470 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcst004___94040" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CST-94-004 </AU>
JPRS 
Science &amp; Technology 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  China </ABS>
<DATE1>   28 February 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> Telecommunications R&amp;D </F>
<H3> <TI>   Asia-Europe Fiber Optic Cable Details Set, Overall </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Asia-Europe Fiber Optic Cable Details Set, Overall </PHRASE></F></HT>


<TEXT>
Construction   Begun 

<F P=102> 94P60152A Beijing RENMIN RIBAO OVERSEAS EDITION in Chinese 
28 Feb 94 p 1 </F>

<F P=103> 94P60152A </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing RENMIN RIBAO OVERSEAS EDITION </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Pang Wei [1690 1792] and Wang Qingxian [3769 </F>
3237 2009]: ``Asia-Europe Fiber Optic Cable Overall Construction 
Begun''] 
  [Summary] Beijing, 27 Feb -- After over a year of 
consultations among 11 Asian and European nations, the route, 
construction methods, and operational date for the world's 
longest overland fiber optic cable -- the Asia-Europe fiber 
optic cable -- have been finalized, and overall construction has 
begun. 
  The Asia-Europe fiber optic cable project was first proposed 
and launched by China's MPT. In 1992, the nation's along the 
[proposed] route signed an ``Agreement to Construct an 
Asia-Europe Fiber Optic Cable'' [see FBIS-CHI-93-069, 1 Mar 93 p 
2] and formed an Asia-Europe Fiber Optic Cable Management 
Commission. The cable runs from Shanghai (eastern terminus) 
through China, Kazakhstan, Kyrgyzstan, Uzbekistan, Turkmenistan, 
Iran, Turkey, Ukraine, Poland, and Germany up to Frankfurt 
(western terminus), with a branch leading to Tajikistan -- a 
total length of 16,000 km. Completion of the project and 
operational date are now set for the first quarter of 1996. 
Within China, the cable links Shanghai with Xian, Lanzhou, 
Urumqi, and the Kazakhstan border; so far, the line from Xian 
eastward has been completed, while that from Xian westward is 
now under construction and can be completed next year. 
  The Asia-Europe fiber optic cable member states are to meet 
in Germany in June this year to negotiate Asia-Europe fiber 
optic cable sales and usage by the various countries. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20471 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcst004___94041" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CST-94-004 </AU>
JPRS 
Science &amp; Technology 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  China </ABS>
<DATE1>   7 February 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> Telecommunications R&amp;D </F>
<H3> <TI>   Recent Developments in Fiber Optic Communications </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Recent Developments in Fiber Optic Communications </PHRASE></F></HT>
<H4>    Six Achievements of Institute 8 Certified </H4>

<F P=102> 94P60159A Beijing ZHONGGUO DIANZI BAO [CHINA ELECTRONICS 
NEWS] in Chinese 7 Feb 94 p 3 </F>

<F P=103> 94P60159A </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing ZHONGGUO DIANZI BAO [CHINA ELECTRONICS 
NEWS] </F>

<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Zhang Chun'an [1728 2504 1344]: ``Set of </F>
Institute 8's Scientific Research Achievements Pass Appraisal''] 
  [Summary] Six research achievements of MEI's Institute 8 
recently passed appraisal. These achievements are: 
  (1) Dual-use (military/civilian) radiation-resistant optical 
fiber and fiber optic cable; 
  (2) Dual-use wire-guided high-strength/toughness fiber optic 
cable; 
  (3) Longitudinal hermetically sealed leak-resistant fiber 
optic cable, with a technical performance approaching 
late-eighties international standards; 
  (4) Wired optical waveguide connectors for dense-water 
single-fiber single-mode fiber optic cable, particularly suited 
to communications with offshore oil and gas fields; 
  (5) Dual-use fiber-optic-sensing high-voltage isolation 
modules; 
  (6) SD-optical modems, with wavelength-division-multiplexing 
and frequency-division-multiplexing (FDM) functions, ideal for 
optical fiber data transmission systems and single-fiber 
multiplexed video PFM [pulse-frequency modulated] FDM 
transmission systems. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20472 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcst005___94001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CST-94-005 </AU>
JPRS 
Science &amp; Technology 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  China Selections from the Guide to China's Science and Technology </ABS>



<TEXT>
Policy (White Paper on Science and Technology, No. 5) 
<DATE1>  8 April 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100></F>
<H3> <TI>     Selections from the Guide to China's Science and Technology </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Selections from the Guide to China's Science and Technology </PHRASE></F></HT>
  Policy (White Paper on Science and Technology, No. 5) 

<F P=102> 93FE0870A Beijing ZHONGGUO KEXUE JISHU ZHENGCE ZHINAN [GUIDE 
TO CHINA'S SCIENCE AND TECHNOLOGY POLICY] in Chinese No 5, Jun </F>

92 pp 1-202 
<F P=103> 93FE0870A </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing ZHONGGUO KEXUE JISHU ZHENGCE ZHINAN [GUIDE 
TO CHINA'S SCIENCE AND TECHNOLOGY POLICY] </F>

<F P=105>  Chinese </F>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Book by the State Science and Technology Commission: ``A </F>
Guide to China's Science and Technology Policy (White Paper on 
Science and Technology, No. 5)''] 
  [Text] 
<H5>  Preface </H5>
  [Text] The ``State Medium and Long-Term Science and 
Technology 
Development Program'' issued by the State Council and the 
``Medium and Long-Term Science and Technology Program'' and 
``People's Republic of China Science and Technology Development 
10-Year Program and Eighth Five-Year Plan Outline'' approved by 
the State Council and issued by the State Science and Technology 
Commission are program documents to guide the development of 
science and technology in China over the next several decades, 
and they have major significance for spurring S&amp;T progress in 
China and coordinated development of our S&amp;T progress and 
society. The China Science and Technology White Paper No. 5 is 
being published in a special edition to enable leading cadres at 
all levels, S&amp;T workers, and all our people to study, adhere 
to, 
and implement, and it also provides conveniences for foreign 
readers concerned with China's S&amp;T activities. 
  The ``Program'' adopts comrade Deng Xiaoping's philosophical 
idea that S&amp;T are the first force of production, is based on 
the 
requirement of the basic line of ``one center, two basic 
points'', adheres to the strategic principle that ``economic 
construction must rely on S&amp;T, S&amp;T work must be oriented 
toward 
economic construction'', and formulates the tasks for S&amp;T 
that 
must be completed to achieve our second and third strategic 
objectives for China's economic construction, the directions and 
foci of work in all realms, and the policy measures that must be 
adopted. A prominent direction and policy aspects, observance of 
the characteristics and laws of the development of S&amp;T 
themselves, and responding to the historical tide of reform and 
opening up are the obvious characteristics of the ``Program''. 
  In the course of history in moving toward the 21st century, 
whether or not China will be able to achieve a quadrupling [of 
our gross value of industrial and agricultural output] and 
attain relative prosperity will be determined to a substantial 
degree by successful reform and S&amp;T progress and by whether 
or 
not S&amp;T truly play a first-place transforming role in our 
economic and social development. Striving to complete the tasks 
set forth in the ``Program'' is an important guarantee for 
achieving China's overall modernization and construction 
objectives through the end of this century and into the next one. 
  S&amp;T work in the 1990s must continue adhering to the 
principle 
of ``orienting and relying'' and further perfect the three-level 
deployment of orienting toward the main battlefield of economic 
construction, developing high and new technology and its 
industry, and reinforcing basic research. Every level must 
strive to scale the peaks of S&amp;T and spur the development of 
our 
economy and society. 
  We must stabilize and reinforce basic research and ``attacks 
on key problems'', high-tech research, primary social public 
welfare research, and so on which have important strategic 
importance for the sustained development of China's S&amp;T and 
economy. We must maintain a crack research force that it is 
involved in this work and adopt solid measures to provide 
guarantees in capital, equipment, materials, and other areas. In 
particular, we must give powerful support to the state's major 
basic research projects and key laboratories. 
  For other S&amp;T work, including technology development, 
social 
services, and other realms, we must boldly open up and 
invigorate, guide and encourage S&amp;T personnel engaged in this 
work to be brave in orienting toward the economy and advancing 
toward commercialization, industrialization and 
internationalization of S&amp;T achievements. All scientific 
research organs and institutions of higher education should 
separate out a substantial portion of their skilled personnel to 
become involved in converting S&amp;T achievements into practical 
forces of production, go into the domestic and foreign markets 
to give full play to their abilities, foster their intelligence 
and skills on the main battlefields of economic construction, 
and make direct contributions to modernization and construction. 
In summary, we must use solid efforts to gradually perfect 
organic integration of S&amp;T and the economy, adapt to the new 
mechanisms and new systems of the socialist market economy, and 
liberate and develop S&amp;T as the first force of production to 
the 
greatest possible extent. 
  Guided by the spirit of comrade Deng Xiaoping's important 
speeches and the CPC Central Committee Politburo conferences and 
based on the blueprint drawn in the ``Program'', China's S&amp;T 
activities must change with every passing day, majestically, 
vastly, and mightily press forward, and propel China's economic 
construction toward a new stage. 
  State Council Member and State Science and Technology 
Commission Chairman 
  Song Jian 24 June 1992 
<H5>  Notice from the State Council Regarding Its Passing Down of </H5>
the ``State Medium- and Long-Term Science and Technology 
Development Program'' 
  State Council Document No. 18 (1992) 
  To the people's governments of all provinces, autonomous 
regions, and municipalities directly under the central 
government, all ministries and commissions of the State Council, 
and all organizations under its direct jurisdiction: 
  The ``State Medium- and Long-Term Science and Technology 
Development Program'' has been considered and passed by the 94th 
meeting of Standing Committee of the State Council and is now 
being issued to you. Please implement it. 
  The ``Medium- and Long-Term Science and Technology 
Development Program'' and ``People's Republic of China Science 
and Technology Development 10-Year Program and Eighth 5-Year 
Plan Outline'' have been agreed to in principle and will be 
issued under another number by the State Science and Technology 
Commission. 
  The State Council 8 March 1992 
<H5>  State Medium and Long Term Science and Technology </H5>
Development Program 
  As human society looks forward to the new century, the world 
is undergoing enormous changes. A new scientific and 
technological revolution is developing in a surging manner, 
market competition is growing more intense every day, 
international politics is changing, and our nation and people 
are facing an urgent and serious challenge. To achieve our 
second strategic objective in the year 2000 and thereby move 
into the ranks of the moderately developed countries during the 
middle of the next century, we must adhere to the four basic 
principles, continue to reform and open up, and rely on S&amp;T 
progress to accelerate development of our economy and society. 
This is a magnificent and arduous task and concerns the future 
of our country and the fate of socialism. 
  This program was formulated in accordance with the spirit of 
decisions made by the 13th National Conference of the Communist 
Party of China and subsequent meetings of the CPC Central 
Committee. Its goal is to clarify the strategies, principles, 
policies, and development foci for the medium and long-term 
development of natural science and technology in China and to 
guide the coordinated development of China's S&amp;T, economy, 
and 
society from 2000 to 2020. 
<H5>  I. Situations and Choices </H5>
  1. Science and technology are the first force of production 
and a magnificent revolutionary force that spurs economic and 
social development. Under the superior socialist system, S&amp;T 
progress and improvement in management levels will play decisive 
roles in the course of China's modernization and construction. 
Shifting economic construction further onto the track of relying 
on S&amp;T progress and improving the quality of laborers will 
guarantee the victorious achievement of China's second strategic 
objective and lay a solid foundation for achieving our third 
strategic objective. Based on the strategic three-step 
deployment of China's economic construction and in accordance 
with the trends and currents of international S&amp;T 
development, 
making comprehensive arrangements for the development of science 
and technology for the next 10 to 30 years is an important 
historical task. 
  2. In the past 40 years, China's S&amp;T activities have 
made 
world-famous achievements. China now has 10.9 million natural 
science and technology personnel including 1.05 million who are 
involved in research and development. We have over 5,000 
independent research and development organs and there are over 
7,000 R&amp;D organs under the jurisdiction of enterprises. They 
have formed a relatively complete S&amp;T system that has made 
several world-recognized major S&amp;T achievements. China has 
relied mainly on its own forces to solve many important S&amp;T 
problems in economic construction, national defense, and social 
development. This is particularly true of the past 10-plus years 
of reform and opening up when China has readjusted its S&amp;T 
development principles and made breakthrough advances in reform 
of the S&amp;T system, organizing attacks on key S&amp;T 
problems, 
extending S&amp;T achievements, spurring S&amp;T progress in 
rural 
areas, promoting development of high and new-tech industry, 
strengthening international S&amp;T cooperation and exchanges, 
and 
other areas. 
  3. During the course of developing S&amp;T work for more 
than 40 
years, we have accumulated rich experience and many lessons. 
  Our main experiences are: One, S&amp;T work must adhere to 
leadership of the Communist Party and to the socialist road. 
Two, adhere to reform and opening up. While perfecting planned 
management, we have strengthened the role of market regulation, 
accelerated the transfer of S&amp;T achievements into production, 
and promoted the integration of S&amp;T with the economy; on the 
basis of independence and making our own decisions, we have 
actively absorbed advanced experiences and S&amp;T achievements 
from 
foreign countries and accelerated the development of S&amp;T in 
China. Three, under the unified leadership of the state, we have 
concentrated manpower and materials to organize attacks on major 
S&amp;T tasks in national economic construction and social 
development. Four, while fostering the backbone role of our 
specialized S&amp;T staff, we have been concerned with 
integrating 
specialized scientific research work and mass technical 
innovation and integrating leading cadres with S&amp;T personnel, 
workers, and peasants to jointly spur application of S&amp;T 
achievements and popularization of S&amp;T knowledge and improve 
the 
scientific and cultural quality of all nationalities. 
  Our main lessons are: One, the guiding ideology and actual 
work in economic and social development have not always put 
promotion of S&amp;T progress in an important strategic position. 
Two, economic development lacks mechanisms and internal motive 
force for relying on S&amp;T progress, S&amp;T development lacks 
vitality in orienting toward economic construction, and large 
numbers of technical achievements cannot be converted into 
forces of production, which has resulted in a certain degree of 
detachment of S&amp;T from economic and social development and an 
inability to fully foster the potential of science and 
technology. Third, in S&amp;T work, there is a lack of unified 
arrangements and a rational division of labor as well as the 
universal existence of repeated problems at low levels; the 
phenomena of detachment from our national conditions, blindly 
pushing forward and catching up, and pressing urgently for 
achievements have also occurred at times. Four, major errors 
have occurred in policies toward intellectuals that have damaged 
the initiative and creativity of S&amp;T personnel and affected 
the 
healthy growth of our S&amp;T staff. A social climate of 
respecting 
knowledge and respecting skilled personnel has not been formed. 
  4. S&amp;T work must be oriented toward modernization, 
toward the 
world, and toward the future. Today's new S&amp;T revolution 
that is 
developing in a burgeoning manner in the world has caused 
S&amp;T to 
permeate every realm of human society in an unprecedented way, 
which has spurred an enormous takeoff of the social forces of 
production and engendered profound changes in the configuration 
of the world. The degree to which economic and social 
development in each country is dependent on S&amp;T progress is 
increasing. Overlapping and intersection of basic research, 
applied research, and technology development has appeared, 
schedules for converting technical achievements into commodity 
production have continually shortened, and the relationships 
among S&amp;T, education, and production are becoming closer. 
  Looking toward the world's S&amp;T development over the 
next 10 
to 30 years, major breakthroughs will happen in several emerging 
S&amp;T fields and new production technologies and new 
understandings of natural phenomena will have profound impacts 
on the development of human society. The development of high and 
new technology will further transform the face of existing 
industry and become a major factor in world economic 
competition. The world's economic development and S&amp;T 
progress 
are now moving toward internationalization and S&amp;T 
competition 
is increasingly becoming a decisive factor in international 
economic competition. At the same time, mankind must strengthen 
international cooperation to solve global problems like 
population, the environment, resources, disasters, and so on 
that it faces in common. No country can achieve modernization in 
a closed state. 
  5. China's S&amp;T development must begin with our national 
conditions. China has a large population, a weak foundation, and 
underdeveloped social forces of production. Some 80 percent of 
our population lives in rural areas, and we will remain in the 
initial stages of socialism for a rather long period of history 
into the future. China's economic and social development is 
facing restrictions by our population, resources, environment, 
and other factors. Our population has already surpassed 1.1 
billion, and even if we strictly control its rate of growth it 
will still grow to 1.5 billion by the 2020's. Although China has 
rather abundant total amounts of most resources, they are 
relatively insufficient in terms of per capita amounts of 
resources. Compared to the world average, we have one-third the 
per capita cultivated land area, one-fourth the freshwater 
resources, one-fifth the afforested area, and only one-half the 
energy resources. Environmental pollution and ecological 
destruction already constitute serious threats to our economic 
and social development. 
  For a long time, China has been relying on the consumption 
of 
large amounts of resources to develop our economy. Technologies 
and management in most industries are backward, the quality of 
products is poor, and economic results are low. China is one of 
the world's nations having the highest amount of energy consumed 
per unit value of output, and social labor productivity is 
equivalent to only about 5 percent of advanced world levels. In 
the final analysis, these discrepancies are discrepancies in 
S&amp;T 
levels, educational levels, and management levels. If we still 
lack a sense of crisis and urgency and do not do everything we 
can to catch up, the discrepancies will not shrink, and they may 
even expand. The objectives of China's socialist modernization 
and construction will be in danger of falling through and we 
will not have the place in the world that we should have. 
  6. The key to modernizing our national economy and 
significantly raising labor productivity is modernization of 
science and technology. We must certainly foster to the greatest 
possible extent the role of S&amp;T as the first force of 
production, respect knowledge and skilled personnel, and more 
consciously shift economic construction onto the track of 
relying on S&amp;T progress and improving the quality of 
laborers. 
This important decision is an indication of an historical change 
in China's S&amp;T, economic, and social development strategies 
and 
is important for achieving our goals of struggle for the 
remainder of this century and into the next one. 
  Looking toward the future, we must have a sober 
understanding 
of the serious situation, look more toward the favorable 
factors, and confidently meet the challenge. We now have 
substantial S&amp;T forces that have gained many successful 
experiences. Even more important is that 10 years of reform and 
opening up have brought vigor and vitality to our economic and 
S&amp;T development. If we just conscientiously adhere to the 
party's basic lines, fully foster the role of S&amp;T as the 
first 
force of production, inspire enthusiasm, and unite in struggle, 
we can certainly accelerate the development of the social forces 
of production, throw off our poverty and backwardness, and 
achieve our magnificent goal of modernization to fully 
illustrate the superiority of the socialist system. 
<H5>  II. Strategies and Principles </H5>
  7. China's basic S&amp;T development strategy is to 
strengthen 
consciousness of science and technology in our entire nation, 
improve the quality of workers, mobilize and attract a large 
part of our S&amp;T forces to throw themselves into the main 
battlefields of national economic construction, focus on 
technological innovation, strive to absorb and quickly apply the 
world's advanced appropriate technology, and accelerate 
technical upgrading in every realm of our national economy. For 
a substantial period of time into the future, the main direction 
in the development of S&amp;T must be modernizing industrial 
technology and equipment for large scale production and at the 
same time developing high and new technology and its industry in 
a planned and focused manner, stably reinforcing basic research, 
and increasing scientific reserves. 
  8. The strategic objectives for China's S&amp;T development 
must 
be based on the state's economic and social development 
objectives and deployments, apply modern S&amp;T to strengthen 
our 
comprehensive national strengths and improve people's living 
standards, focus on solving programs in industrial and 
agricultural large-scale modernized commodity production, and 
effectively control and alleviate population, resource, and 
environmental pressures. In certain S&amp;T fields where China 
has 
an advantage, we must boldly innovate, sustain our development 
momentum, and continue to hold a significant status in the 
world's advanced ranks; make breakthroughs in certain key fields 
in high and new technology and basic research, attain advanced 
world levels, and form some high and new-tech industries able to 
compete internationally. By the year 2000, the main realms of 
China's industry should attain the technical levels of the 
economically developed nations of the 1970's or early 1980's and 
in 2020 they should attain the technical levels of the 
economically developed countries of the early 21st Century to 
reduce our overall lag behind advanced world levels. 
  The development of agricultural S&amp;T must deal properly 
with 
the relationship of application and extension to research and 
development. We must apply appropriate and matching advanced 
technology, make a major effort to develop a commodity economy 
service system with S&amp;T as a pillar, raise technical levels 
in 
agriculture, and promote rational readjustment of industrial 
structures, product mixes, and employment structures in rural 
areas; we must also solidly strengthen agricultural scientific 
research work, make good deployments in depth, and increase 
reserve strengths for agricultural development. We must continue 
implementing the ``Spark'', ``Bumper Harvest'', ``Setting the 
Prairie Ablaze'' and other plans whose overall goal is 
development of our rural economy. 
  The development of industrial S&amp;T should be centered on 
improving economic results and make a major effort to spur 
S&amp;T 
progress in enterprises, especially large and medium-sized 
enterprises. We should focus on applying modern S&amp;T and 
modern 
management technology, and in particular we should use 
electronic and information technology to carry out technical 
upgrading in all industrial departments and raise technical 
levels of machinery and equipment. Conserve energy resources, 
reduce consumption, improve quality, develop product varieties, 
increase labor productivity and the international 
competitiveness of products, optimize the industrial structure 
and product mix, and spur a transition in China's economy from 
high consumption and low results to low consumption and high 
results. 
  Science and technology in the area of social development 
should strengthen R&amp;D in the areas of population, medicine 
and 
public health, social services, basic public facilities, 
environmental and ecological protection, disaster monitoring and 
prevention, and other areas to create an excellent natural and 
social environment for China's people. 
  The development of high and new technology should continue 
adhering to the principle of ``limited objectives, prominent 
foci''. The state should provide focused support for research on 
high and new technologies where major breakthroughs could be 
made and which has broad applications prospects, and make a 
major effort to foster the development of high and new-tech 
industry. We must actively create the conditions and 
conscientiously manage high and new-tech industry development 
zones properly. Spur international cooperation in high and new 
technology and open up markets, expand technology import and 
export trade, take full advantage of international resources, 
and guide high and new-tech industry in taking the route of 
internationalization. Actively promote the ``Plan To Attack Key 
Problems'', ``863 Plan'', ``Torch Plan'', and other high and 
new-tech resource and industrial development plans. Strive to 
make breakthroughs in certain fields and accelerate the course 
of high and new-tech commercialization, industrialization, and 
internationalization. 
  Basic research should respect the development laws of 
science 
itself, reinforce exploration and tracking in certain 
leading-edge fields, and strive to enter advanced international 
ranks. The goal of applied basic research should be solving 
major S&amp;T problems in economic and social development. Basic 
and 
applied basic research should maintain a crack high-level staff 
and the state should give it stable support. We must fully 
foster the role of the Chinese Academy of Sciences and 
institutions of higher education and strengthen coordination and 
cooperation between the two to benefit the training of skilled 
personnel and maintain vitality. 
  The development of national defense science and technology 
should adhere to the principle of shortening battlelines, having 
prominent foci, strengthening scientific research, and echelon 
replacement. Focus R&amp;D on high technologies that play a key 
role 
in improving the performance of key conventional weapons and 
improving our future new military capabilities and on technology 
that lays a solid foundation for national defense S&amp;T 
development; continue developing incisive national defense 
technologies and maintain development momentum. Continue to 
promote the course of modernization of weapons and equipment 
technology, achieve greater development of high-tech 
conventional weapons and effectively maintain our self-defensive 
nuclear deterrent capabilities, reduce our lag behind advanced 
world levels, and attain advanced world levels in certain areas; 
make national defense S&amp;T continue to occupy a first-class 
position in the world's advanced S&amp;T fields. 
  9. Continue adhering to the basic principle that ``economic 
construction must rely on S&amp;T, S&amp;T work must be oriented 
toward 
economic construction'' and promote the coordinated development 
of S&amp;T with our economy and society. While implementing the 
basic principle, we should also be concerned with implementing 
the following guiding principles, which have long-term 
significance: 
  --Firmly adhere to the ideology that S&amp;T are the first 
force 
of production, raise the consciousness of the entire party and 
all people of the importance of science and technology, and 
create a social climate of respect for knowledge and skilled 
personnel. All levels of government should solidly strengthen 
their leadership of S&amp;T work, fully foster the role of 
S&amp;T 
personnel, raise the scientific, democratic, and systematic 
levels of decision making, and create an environment and 
conditions conducive to S&amp;T development. 
  --Adhere to reform and opening up. Science and technology 
must develop in the midst of reform and opening up. Reform of 
the S&amp;T system must be coordinated with reform of the 
economic 
system and reform of the political system. While further 
fostering the roles of competitive mechanisms and the market, we 
must also strengthen the macro regulation and control functions 
and the necessary centralized management measures of the 
government, and apply policy, legal, administrative, economic, 
and other measures to carry out intervention and regulation. 
  --Adhere to the principle of relying on our own efforts and 
integrating doing our own development with importing technology, 
make importing technology from foreign countries and digesting, 
absorbing, and innovating it an important way to accelerate the 
development of China's S&amp;T. 
  --Adhere to the principle of ``let a hundred flowers bloom, 
let a hundred schools of thought contend'', fully foster 
socialist democracy, guarantee academic freedom, and encourage 
exploration and innovation. 
  --Adhere to the principle of integrating improvement with 
popularization and while making deployments in depth for S&amp;T 
development, and make a major effort to undertake mass 
technological innovation activities, strive to popularize 
scientific knowledge, continually improve the scientific 
qualities of workers, and continue the long-term fight against 
ignorance and superstition. 
<H5>  III. Development Foci </H5>
  10. Agricultural S&amp;T. Agriculture is the foundation of 
our 
national economy, and sustained agricultural growth is the 
decisive factor in the long-term stability and coordinated 
development of our entire national economy and concerns the 
overall situation in construction, reform, and social stability. 
Because China's population increases each year and our 
cultivated land area is continually being reduced, there are 
growing shortages of agricultural resources, ecological and 
environmental degradation is continuing, and we cannot adopt 
extensive modes to develop China's agriculture. 
  Thus, we must adhere to the principle of ``using S&amp;T to 
invigorate agriculture''. We should use S&amp;T and modern 
industry 
as a powerful pillar, establish a modernized agricultural 
production technology system, substantially increase land 
utilization rates, labor productivity, and product 
commercialization rates, and shift from traditional agriculture 
to modern intensive agriculture based on modern S&amp;T. 
  The foci of agricultural S&amp;T are: 
  --Effectively protecting and fully using our existing 
cultivated land, orienting toward all our territorial resources, 
and planned upgrading of a large area of moderate and low-yield 
fields. Make a major effort to develop arid and semi-arid 
agricultural technology and water-saving irrigation technology. 
Effectively utilize hilly and mountainous regions, grasslands, 
surface water, and large beach areas with great potential, focus 
on water conservancy construction, prevent soil erosion, protect 
the ecology and environment, and establish a rational 
agriculture, forestry, animal husbandry, sideline production, 
and fishery combined ecology system. 
  --Broaden food sources, develop new protein resources and 
compound feeds. Develop diversified food product production and 
processing technology. Comprehensively utilize all types of 
animal and plant resources, improve the dietary structure of 
urban and rural residents. 
  --Utilize hybrid superiority and genetic engineering 
technology for selective breeding of high-yield, superior 
quality, multi-resistant new animal and plant varieties. Do 
extensive R&amp;D on regional comprehensive matching, mixing, and 
application of fertilizers, water-saving irrigation, and other 
agricultural production technology and breeding technology, 
substantially improve the quality and output of agricultural 
products. 
  --Use modern industrial technology to outfit agriculture and 
township and town enterprises, develop agricultural product 
storage and transportation, preservation, processing, packaging, 
and comprehensive utilization technology, raise rural 
industrialization levels and management levels, lead surplus 
agricultural labor power to move toward developing the rural 
commodity economy. 
  11. Industrial S&amp;T. Industry is the leading factor in 
the 
national economy, and the technical levels, product 
capabilities, and economic results of China's industry determine 
development of our entire economy. China has established a 
preliminary industrial system with a relatively full complement 
of categories. Overall, however, the backward situation of 
industrial technology has still not been fundamentally changed. 
This is manifested primarily in backward equipment, technology, 
and management technology, outdated designs, low mechanization 
and automation levels, and other areas, which has led to poor 
product performance and quality, high consumption of energy 
resources and materials, low economic results, and a lack of 
international competitiveness. 
  For this reason, the primary tasks in industrial S&amp;T 
development are to use modern S&amp;T, especially 
microelectronics 
technology, to carry out technical upgrading in all of China's 
main industrial realms. We must readjust and optimize our 
industrial structure, broadly adopt new technical principles and 
new design methods, replace equipment, technologies, and 
products, open up new manufacturing technology and resource 
extraction technology, raise automation and intelligence levels 
in large-scale production, and raise the levels of moving to 
complete sets of domestic manufacturing, management technology 
levels, and safe production technology levels for advanced 
technical equipment in our primary industries to improve 
economic results, increase product varieties, improve quality, 
and strengthen international competitiveness. 
  --Energy resources are a key factor in spurring development 
of the national economy. The development of energy resource 
S&amp;T 
should adopt the principle of combining development and 
conservation, substantially increase energy resource utilization 
rates, improve structures, and reduce pollution. 
  The focus of energy resource development is resolving 
problems in oil and gas pool exploration and development 
technology in desert zones and offshore areas, and technology to 
improve recovery rates in oil fields; R&amp;D on coal mining, 
utilization, safe production, and coal cleaning technologies; 
development of advanced manufacturing technology for large 
thermal power generators, technology for construction of large 
hydropower stations under complex conditions, and extra-high 
voltage power transmission and distribution technology; R&amp;D 
on 
large advanced nuclear power technology and nuclear safety 
technology; development of economical and appropriate new energy 
resource and rural energy resource technology; and major efforts 
to extend and apply advanced energy conservation technology. 
  --Communication, transportation, and communications are 
important basic facilities and vanguard departments in 
development of our national economy and society. 
  The primary direction for applying S&amp;T to spur the 
development of communication, transportation, and communications 
is: on a foundation of coordinated development of all types of 
transportation technology, substantially increase overall 
transportation efficiency and equipment utilization rates; 
develop advanced communications networks and communication 
technology. 
  The focus of communication and transportation S&amp;T 
development 
is R&amp;D on key technologies for container transportation, 
rapid 
passenger transportation, and other multi-mode integrated 
passenger and freight transportation; accelerate R&amp;D on key 
technologies for heavy load transportation on railroads and 
high-speed dedicated line passenger transportation technology 
for speeds greater than 200 km/hour; research and extend 
high-efficiency energy resource transportation technology; 
develop high-seas transportation and interior river 
transportation systems and key shipbuilding technologies; 
develop technologies for high-speed highways and grades one and 
two dedicated automobile trunk highways and manufacturing high 
efficiency vehicle transportation and key technologies for all 
types of powered vehicles; develop design, manufacturing, and 
batch production technologies for Chinese-made trunkline 
aircraft and strengthen technical research on flight safety; 
make major efforts to extend and apply electronic computers and 
automation technology, raise modernization levels of 
communication and transportation management as quickly as 
possible. 
  The focus of communications S&amp;T development is on 
preferential development of satellite communications and fiber 
optic communications technology; focus on developing digital 
microwave communications and mobile communications technology; 
do R&amp;D on digital program controlled exchange and 
communications 
network technology, and gradually develop comprehensive 
professional digital natural network technology. 
  --The materials industry is a basic industry of our national 
economy. The primary development directions of materials science 
and technology is improving quality, increasing product 
varieties, reducing costs, and alleviating contradictions 
between supply and demand. 
  The focus of materials S&amp;T is reinforcement of energy 
resource development and comprehensive utilization technology 
and doing good exploration, analysis, and comprehensive 
evaluation of mineral deposits; develop advanced mining and 
dressing technology and complete sets of equipment, and research 
on development and comprehensive utilization technologies for 
paragenetic minerals; reinforce research on ferrous and 
non-ferrous metals, organic polymers, and inorganic non-metallic 
materials, and R&amp;D on technologies for transforming the 
properties of traditional materials and new types of materials; 
develop high-grade, specialized, and superior performance 
refined chemical industry products; do R&amp;D on new coal and 
chemical industry technologies and various types of new 
renewable resource recovery and utilization technologies. 
  --Machine building and electronics is the equipment industry 
for our national economy. The performance, quality, efficiency, 
and speed of renewal of machines and electronic equipment 
determine production technology levels and economic results in 
all areas of our national economy. 
  The focus of machine-building and electronics S&amp;T is 
R&amp;D on 
basic components of machinery and key technologies for the 
design, manufacture, and testing of a new generation of 
electronic components for comprehensive improvement of the 
quality and reliability of basic products; develop design and 
manufacturing technology for large complete sets of equipment 
and systems process control technology; develop integrated 
electromechanical products that combine machine and electronics 
technology, develop computer-aided design, manufacturing, and 
testing technology, numerical control technology, and detection 
and sensing technology; and develop and extend electrical and 
electronic energy conservation technology. 
  --The consumer products industry is related to the joys and 
sorrows in the lives of all our people and is extremely 
important, but S&amp;T levels are still relatively backward and 
there is great development potential. 
  Light industry, textiles, clothing, appliances, and other 
consumer product industries should broadly adopt advanced 
electromechanical technology, gradually adopt international 
standards, increase the variety of designs and colors, improve 
product quality, and actively expand exports. 
  12. Science and technology in the area of social 
development. 
Whether or not we can control population growth, improve the 
quality of our population, rationally develop and utilize 
natural resources, and protect the ecology and environment are 
major matters that concern the future of the Chinese nation. 
Solving these problems requires us to carry out comprehensive 
improvement in all areas of government, the economy, society, 
and culture, and we must reinforce research and application of 
S&amp;T in social development. 
  The foci of social development S&amp;T are: 
  --Strengthen scientific research on population, resolutely 
and effectively control the size of our population, make major 
efforts to improve and perfect existing birth control technology 
and methods, and make them safe, convenient, economical, and 
effective. 
  --Reinforce research on the climate and research on 
earthquakes, droughts, and other natural disasters, develop 
disaster relief technology, work quickly to establish natural 
disaster monitoring, assessment, and assistance decision-making 
engineering systems. Use remote sensing technology and systems 
monitoring technology for timely monitoring, prediction, and 
evaluation of the development processes of disaster situations 
to enable measures to be adopted quickly to reduce losses. 
  --Develop all types of high efficiency complete sets of 
technology and equipment to control pollution, and pay special 
attention to solving technical problems in reducing pollution 
from burning coal and develop ecological construction projects; 
do research on the greenhouse effect, acid rain, and ozone layer 
mechanisms and their environmental and physical effects, and 
propose the corresponding countermeasures. 
  --The development of medical and public health S&amp;T 
concerns 
the development of our national economy and the people's 
livelihood and the vitality and development of our nationality. 
They occupy an important status in social development. We must 
fully utilize and develop China's valuable traditional medicines 
and abundant pharmaceutical resources and reinforce research on 
the medicines of our nation; we must strengthen research on 
common diseases, frequently-occurring diseases, and medicine for 
the elderly, and do our own work to develop all types of 
innovative medicines that are of superior quality, highly 
effective, and have few side-effects; reinforce development of 
medical treatment instruments and equipment. 
  --To improve the living environment and residential 
conditions of our people, we must raise technical levels in 
urban and village and town construction programs, structural 
planning, construction, and management; do R&amp;D on economical, 
useful, and advanced structural materials and construction 
equipment, improve the quality and useful functions of urban and 
rural residences, and raise technical levels in social public 
facilities and the service industry. 
  13. High and new technology and high and new-tech industry. 
High and new technology and development of its industry is the 
fountainhead and foundation of sustained development of the 
social forces of production. Research on high and new technology 
must be concerned from the beginning about close integration 
with traditional industry and technical upgrading, make a major 
effort to develop high and new-tech industry development zones, 
and spur commercialization, industrialization, and 
internationalization of high and new technology. Try to make 
breakthroughs in microelectronics, information, biology, new 
materials, aviation and space, automation, new energy resources, 
lasers, oceans, and other fields so that China occupies a 
significant status in the world's high and new-tech realms. 
  The foci of high and new technology development are: 
  --Microelectronics technology and computer technology are 
the 
supporting technologies for modern S&amp;T and national economic 
development. We must concentrate forces to accelerate 
construction of micrometer and sub-micrometer silicon integrated 
circuit design, manufacturing, and testing centers, and do 
research on very large scale integrated circuit production 
technology; develop the associated gallium arsenide integrated 
circuit manufacturing technology and integrated optoelectronic 
technology. We must make a major effort to develop 
general-purpose super-high performance parallel computers and 
software engineering and commercialize their production. We 
should study a new generation of computer technology and develop 
Chinese language information processing technology, man-machine 
interface technology, and artificial intelligence technology. Do 
R&amp;D on flexible manufacturing systems technology, robot 
technology, and computer integrated manufacturing systems 
technology. 
  --The development of biotechnology opens up new routes for 
mankind's industrial and agricultural production and 
development, and it will become an effective measure in the 
world to solve major problems like food, health, resources, the 
environment, and so on. We should focus on research on breeding 
new animal and plant varieties, develop new organic products, 
drugs, and bacteria, and develop microorganic conversion of 
renewable resources and their comprehensive utilization. 
  --New materials technology may lead to breakthrough advances 
in certain technical fields and cause fundamental changes. We 
should do R&amp;D on composite materials, structural and 
functional 
ceramic materials, non-crystalline materials, superconducting 
materials, optoelectronics materials, and other new materials 
and extend and apply them in a timely manner. 
  --Aerospace technology has far-reaching and major 
significance for reinforcing China's comprehensive national 
strengths and raising S&amp;T levels. We should continue to 
strengthen development and research on space motive power and 
propulsion technology and measurement and control technology, do 
research on manned space technology, and maintain China's 
international status in this field. 
  14. Basic research and applied basic research. Basic 
research 
and applied basic research are the forerunners of new technology 
and new inventions, powerful reserve strengths for S&amp;T and 
economic development, and the cradles of training for S&amp;T 
personnel, and we should give them full consideration. When 
making overall deployments in leading-edge disciplines, we 
should also focus closely on agriculture, energy resources, 
communication and transportation, information, materials, and 
other key strategic realms of national economic development and 
on major questions regarding population, medicine and public 
health, resources, ecology, the environment, natural disasters, 
national security, and so on and undertake multidisciplinary 
comprehensive research. 
  The foci of basic research and applied basic research are: 
  --Strengthen research on condensed state physics, molecular 
biology, chemistry, oceanography, ecology, information science, 
and other leading-edge basic disciplines. In particular, we must 
make breakthroughs in the physical mechanisms of high marginal 
temperature superconductivity. We must strengthen research in 
intersecting fields for physics, life science, materials 
science, energy science, and other disciplines. Reinforce 
research in non-linear mathematics, computational mathematics, 
and large-scale scientific and engineering computing theory and 
methods. 
  --Research in molecular and cellular biology should explore 
basic laws of genetics, differentiation, and development at the 
molecular and cellular levels to provide a theoretical 
foundation for the development of modern biotechnology. 
Reinforce research on chemistry related to life processes. Focus 
on exploring new materials, develop polymer, catalytic, surface, 
and rare earth chemistry; pay attention to research and tracking 
of molecular design, microscopic reaction dynamics, and so on. 
  --The Earth sciences should undertake R&amp;D on the complex 
coupling systems composed of the solid Earth, atmosphere, 
hydrosphere, and biosphere in an integral body to provide basic 
data and a theoretical foundation for solving the state's major 
problems such as resources, energy resources, the environment, 
natural disasters, and so on. Research in ecology should focus 
on establishing systematic synergetic progression and regression 
ecological system mechanisms and optimum artificial systems, and 
so on to make a contribution to improving the environment and 
spurring social development. 
  --Information science should focus on the development 
direction of intelligence, resolve problems in communications, 
computers, automatic control, and other key information 
technologies, and strive to make breakthroughs. 
  --The development of space science should reinforce research 
in basic space science and integrate closely with high 
technology. It should focus on research on physical, chemical, 
and life phenomena under microgravity and overall behavior of 
the solar-terrestrial system. 
  15. National defense science and technology. The development 
of national defense S&amp;T is an important factor in 
guaranteeing 
national security and increasing our comprehensive national 
strengths. The development of China's national defense S&amp;T 
must 
start with the realities of the initial stages of socialism, 
adapt to our strategic deployments for economic construction and 
military strategies for the new era, make overall results the 
center, and integrate traction and technological propulsion, do 
selective tracking, and focus on breakthroughs. 
  --Using advanced national defense S&amp;T to promote the 
development of weapons and equipment and spur the achievement of 
our military strategic objectives in the new era is a key task 
in national defense S&amp;T development. Based on the state's 
financial possibilities, focus on developing weapons and 
equipment systems that will play a major role in improving 
China's military war fighting capabilities and play a 
substantial promoting role in raising S&amp;T levels in our 
national 
defense S&amp;T and the country as a whole. For this reason, we 
must 
strengthen research on key technologies that play important 
roles in the development of these weapons and equipment systems. 
  --Based on the principle of integrating military and 
civilian 
uses, pay full attention to theoretical exploration, strengthen 
leading applied theoretical research, and lay a foundation for 
the sustained and stable development of national defense S&amp;T. 
<H5>  IV. Intensifying Reform, Establishing a New System Conducive </H5>
to Economic Development and S&amp;T Progress 
  16. China's S&amp;T system must be conducive to spurring 
economic 
development and China's economic system must be conducive to 
spurring S&amp;T progress. To further resolve problems of 
integrating S&amp;T and the economy, we must use our prior 
achievements and experience as a foundation and conform to the 
principle of coordination and matching up in continued intensive 
reform. 
  The overall goals in reform of China's S&amp;T system are: 
establish and perfect a new system that conforms to the 
objective laws of S&amp;T development to organically integrate 
with 
and mutually promote S&amp;T and the economy that is adapted to 
the 
socialist planned commodity economy; make S&amp;T work actively 
serve the socialist planned commodity economy, promote the shift 
of economic construction onto the track of relying on S&amp;T 
progress and improving the qualities of laborers, and fully 
foster the role of S&amp;T as the first force of production. 
  The concrete objectives for reform of the S&amp;T system 
are: 
  --Transform the functions of government, form a macro 
S&amp;T 
progress management system that organically integrates direct 
planned management with indirect management, and standardize and 
legalize it. 
  --Reform the S&amp;T personnel management system, create an 
excellent environment that allows skilled personnel to display 
their talents. Establish a socialized service system for S&amp;T 
personnel and S&amp;T activities. 
  --Establish an industrial and rural research and development 
extension and service system that organically integrates R&amp;D 
organs with enterprises and rural areas and that is rationally 
deployed. 
  --Cultivate and establish a socialist market system for 
materials, technology, labor services, information, and so on, 
and create a favorable environment of rational competition for 
S&amp;T development. 
  --Form a diversified S&amp;T investment system composed of 
government, civilian, enterprise, financial, and other areas. 
  --Form an S&amp;T organizational structure that is adapted 
to 
development of the socialist planned commodity economy. 
  Reform of the S&amp;T system should be carried out in 
phases in a 
matching manner based on the objective requirements of economic 
development and S&amp;T progress. Prior to the year 2000, form a 
basic configuration for the new system and afterwards gradually 
perfect it. 
  17. The nucleus of reform of the S&amp;T system is 
establishing 
new operational mechanisms and organically integrating 
perfection of planned management with strengthened market 
regulation, and fully fostering the combined advantages of the 
two. Bring in fair competition, rational personnel, technology, 
and information circulation, guidance by demand, and other 
market mechanisms to make S&amp;T progress become an inherent 
requirement in society's economic activities. Establish the 
corresponding operational mechanisms based on different levels 
and the characteristics of different categories of S&amp;T 
development. 
  Basic research and applied basic research and public 
welfare-type S&amp;T work should have the goals of using 
scientific 
exploration to obtain macroeconomic and social benefits, with 
the state providing sustained and stable financial support. For 
a relatively long period into the future, large comprehensive 
scientific research and important projects to attack key 
technical problems will have to depend mainly on state support 
and planned management. At the same time, the necessary 
competition mechanisms to obtain better investment results 
should be brought in. Technology development and applied 
extension work with direct economic benefits should further 
foster the role of market regulation under guidance by state 
policies. 
  18. Perfect the state's macro S&amp;T management and 
regulation 
and control systems, transfer government's functions, place the 
formulation and implementation of the principles, policies, 
programs, plans, and laws related to S&amp;T development in the 
first position in work, and comprehensively apply legal, policy, 
administrative, and economic measures to spur S&amp;T progress. 
  We must strengthen regulation and control measures, improve 
macro regulation and control capabilities, and reinforce and 
improve state directive-type plan management. At the same time, 
we must gradually expand the scope of guidance-type plans. Open 
up S&amp;T credit, risk investment, and other types of capital 
channels to support S&amp;T development. Encourage technical 
innovation and reinforce and improve S&amp;T award systems. 
Protect 
intellectual property rights, foster the role of patents, 
promote the commercialization, industrialization, and 
internationalization of technical achievements, and form an 
environment to promote S&amp;T progress. Strengthen standards, 
measurement, and quality supervision work, formulate technical 
standards, perfect the state's quality supervision and assurance 
system. 
  19. As reform of the economic system intensifies, gradually 
make industries and enterprises the primary aspect of technology 
development. We must strengthen the technology absorption and 
self-development capabilities of enterprises, and establish and 
perfect an enterprise technology development and technology 
management system. Use various arrangements to promote 
horizontal integration among enterprises and among enterprises, 
R&amp;D organizations, and institutions of higher education. 
Advocate making large and medium-sized enterprises the backbone 
and superior quality name-brand commodities the dragon's head, 
use integration of scientific research and production to form 
enterprise groups equipped with technology development, 
production, marketing, and service functions, and in particular 
support the development of S&amp;T vanguard-type or 
internationally 
competitive enterprise groups. 
  Reinforcing industrial S&amp;T work is extremely important 
for 
economic development. To conserve resources, concentrate forces, 
and provide better technical support to enterprises, we must 
selectively establish and perfect industrial technology R&amp;D 
centers to assume responsibility for research and development 
tasks for an entire industry's basic general-purpose technology, 
leading-edge technology, comprehensive sets of technology, and 
so on. The industrial technology R&amp;D centers should be 
jointly 
supported by the state, industry, and enterprises, implement 
their own management decisions, and complete tasks assigned to 
them by the state, industry, and enterprises. 
  20. Intensify reform of the rural S&amp;T system. Developing 
China's agriculture requires reliance on S&amp;T, and the state 
should continue to strengthen its support of agricultural 
scientific research and agricultural technology extension work. 
In reform of the S&amp;T system, we must ensure stable growth in 
agricultural S&amp;T spending and sustained development of 
agricultural S&amp;T staffs. We must guide and encourage 
scientific 
research organizations, institutions of higher education, and 
S&amp;T personnel at all levels to match up with local 
governments 
and jointly carry out regional economic and technical R&amp;D. 
The 
state and local areas should support and guide agricultural 
S&amp;T 
organizations at the county level and below to develop into 
independent accounting and comprehensive technology development, 
extension, service, and management entities that implement 
compensated services to reinforce the vitality of agricultural 
S&amp;T extension work. 
  To meet the development needs of the rural commodity 
economy, 
we must use leadership to develop integrated technology, 
agriculture, industry, and trade management entities under a 
variety of ownership systems that use advanced and appropriate 
industrial technology to outfit new types of rural enterprises 
and integrate with a variety of types of specialized peasant 
technical associations to implement full-process commodity 
production services. On the basis of stabilizing the household 
contractual responsibility system linked to output, use 
technical services to form a dual-layer administrative system 
that integrates unification and a division of labor with a 
significant production scale to promote the entry of their 
commodities into the domestic and foreign markets. 
  Adopt all types of flexible and effective arrangements to 
carry out regular technical education and training of peasants 
to train several new types of peasants who understand modern 
technical knowledge. 
  Guide and encourage scientific research organizations, 
institutions of higher education, and vast numbers of S&amp;T 
personnel to go to rural areas to assume contractual 
responsibility and establish township and town enterprises and 
other industries to spur the raising of rural industrial 
structures and technical levels. 
  21. Establish S&amp;T organizational structures adapted to 
development of the socialist planned commodity economy. China's 
R&amp;D organizations should have multiple levels, multiple 
functions, and a variety of ownership systems, and there should 
be ones are oriented toward the entire country as well as ones 
oriented toward industries or local areas; there should be ones 
involved in basic research and applied research as well as ones 
involved in technology development; there should be state-run 
ones as well as collectively-run ones, individually-run ones, 
and so on. The R&amp;D organs of the Chinese Academy of Sciences 
and 
of all departments, institutions of higher education, and large 
backbone enterprises are the main force in China's S&amp;T 
activities and government at all levels should provide them with 
focused support. With the precondition of the public ownership 
system being the main factor, the state should continue to 
encourage and guide the healthy development of civilian-run 
S&amp;T 
organs so they serve as an important supplement to socialist 
S&amp;T 
activities. 
  Based on the requirements of China's economic and social 
development and operational mechanisms for the development of 
S&amp;T at different levels, readjust the organizational 
structure 
of S&amp;T in China. The state provides focused support to some 
R&amp;D 
organs that assume responsibility for basic research, applied 
basic research, public welfare-type S&amp;T work, and important 
comprehensive and long-term scientific research tasks or assume 
responsibility for R&amp;D on general-purpose technology for an 
entire industry. The remaining scientific research units under 
the system of ownership by the whole people, especially the 
large number of technology development-type medium-sized and 
small scientific research organs, should gradually be divided up 
and reorganized based on their own concrete conditions under the 
guidance of state policies and in accordance with market 
regulation mechanisms. Among them, some should develop into 
S&amp;T 
vanguard-type enterprises and provide high and new-tech products 
and services to the domestic and foreign markets; some can 
integrate with enterprises to establish enterprise groups; some 
can enter enterprises and become enterprise technology 
development departments or intermediate testing base areas; some 
can orient toward medium-sized and small enterprises and rural 
areas and become regional or industrial technology development 
and service centers, and so on. 
  22. Gradually establish a socialized management system for 
S&amp;T personnel. Development of the planned commodity economy 
requires rational circulation of S&amp;T personnel within a 
reasonable scope. We must deregulate S&amp;T personnel 
administration, which means carrying out the required skilled 
personnel planned management based on the state's requirements 
and allowing the necessary personnel circulation based on market 
demand for rational combination with the other forces of 
production. Socialization of commodity production and the laws 
of skilled personnel growth require socialization of S&amp;T 
personnel administration. For this reason, we must gradually 
establish and perfect the corresponding S&amp;T personnel 
socialized 
administration system. This is the direction for reform of the 
S&amp;T personnel administration system. To achieve this 
objective, 
we must actively and stably carry out matching reform. 
  We must gradually change the state's centralized management 
model for S&amp;T personnel and open up an S&amp;T labor service 
market 
in a planned manner. Formulate laws to guarantee that S&amp;T 
personnel have some margin for selection of occupations, 
gradually establish an appointment contract system for S&amp;T 
personnel and hiring units that has free bidirectional 
selection, promote the rational circulation of skilled 
personnel, especially high-level skilled S&amp;T personnel, and 
perfect the specialized technical post recruitment system for 
S&amp;T personnel. Based on the principle of distribution 
according 
to work, form a new assignment system and stimulate S&amp;T 
personnel to dedicate themselves to working at their 
professions. Establish a social guarantee system, transfer the 
insurance industry which is currently the responsibility of the 
state to society, and provide unemployment, old-age, medical, 
and injury insurance from society for S&amp;T personnel. Reform 
systems related to household registration, housing, and so on 
and gradually adapt them to the need for personnel circulation. 
This is difficult and complicated work and we must strive to 
carry it out for a long period. 
<H5>  V. Resolutely Opening Up to the Outside World, Actively </H5>
Promoting International S&amp;T Cooperation and Exchanges 
  23. Science and technology are being increasingly recognized 
as the knowledge and wealth of all of mankind. In international 
relations, S&amp;T exchanges are often the vanguard of 
international 
contacts and one of the most stable realms of cooperation. Thus, 
actively promoting international S&amp;T cooperation and 
exchanges 
should be an important long-term principle for China's 
development of its S&amp;T activities. 
  Undertaking international S&amp;T cooperation and exchange 
must 
adhere to the principle of making one's own independent 
decisions and of equality and mutual benefit, and implement the 
policy of opening up to the outside world. Respect international 
S&amp;T cooperation laws and practices, protect intellectual 
property rights. While promoting world S&amp;T progress, 
accelerate 
the raising of China's S&amp;T levels, increase our capabilities 
for 
relying on our own efforts in China's S&amp;T work, and gradually 
form an internationally competitive scientific research and 
technology development and innovation system. 
  24. We must undertake in an omnidirectional manner 
international S&amp;T cooperation and exchanges based on China's 
needs and possibilities. While doing good intergovernmental 
S&amp;T 
cooperation, expand the scope and scale of civilian S&amp;T 
cooperation, and gradually expand the contacts with the outside 
world of enterprises, scientific research organizations, 
institutions of higher education, and civilian S&amp;T 
organizations. In international S&amp;T cooperation, we must have 
good bilateral cooperation and make full use of international 
organizations to undertake multilateral cooperation and 
exchanges. While developing S&amp;T exchanges with the developed 
countries, we should be concerned with strengthening S&amp;T 
cooperation and exchanges with the developing countries. We must 
use S&amp;T exchanges and technology trade as a vanguard to 
promote 
economic and trade cooperation between China and all countries 
of the world. 
  25. Truly doing technology importing and digestion, 
absorption, and innovation work well is a long-term strategic 
measure for accelerating the pace of China's modernization and 
construction. 
  Selection of technologies to import should use the principle 
of adapting to China's requirements and reinforcing our own 
development capabilities to conscientiously do good preparatory 
discussion work. The state must formulate laws, procedures, and 
standards for technology imports, strengthen macro control and 
management, prevent blind importing and redundant importing, and 
focus on protecting intellectual property rights. 
  Technology imports should be integrated with domestic 
attacks 
on key S&amp;T problems and technology trade, focus on importing 
software and key production technology, and be concerned with 
coordinating and matching technology, capital, equipment, 
management, skilled personnel, and the market. 
  The state should use legislation to ensure capital channels 
for digesting, absorbing, and innovating imported technology and 
guarantee that scientific research organs are involved in the 
entire process of importing technology and digesting, absorbing, 
and innovating work. Truly reinforce work to shift to domestic 
production of imported technology and equipment. 
  26. S&amp;T cooperation and exchanges with the outside world 
should be closely integrated with China's economic, social, and 
S&amp;T development plans. Actively undertake cooperative 
research, 
joint development, cooperative management, and other forms of 
international S&amp;T cooperation, select S&amp;T realms where 
China has 
urgent requirements or significant advantages, and participate 
in big international S&amp;T plans and projects. Create the 
conditions for organizations in foreign countries and 
international organizations to cooperatively manage research, 
development, design, production, information service, and other 
organizations in China or foreign countries and spur technical 
economic cooperation. 
  27. S&amp;T cooperation and exchanges with the outside world 
should spur the development of the export-oriented economy, 
provide technical support and services to promote exports of 
high added-value products and high and new-tech products, and 
increase their proportion of our total export volume. With a 
prerequisite of obtaining the optimum economic results, actively 
organize technology exports. Provide greater support to high and 
new technology development organizations and enterprises with 
export prospects in the areas of policies, capital, foreign 
affairs authority, and other areas and increase their 
administrative flexibility. We must train and create in a 
planned manner a large number of S&amp;T-type skilled 
administrative 
and management personnel who are proficient in specialized 
technology, familiar with the international environment, and 
have a good grasp of foreign languages. Try to absorb students 
who have studied in foreign countries to participate in 
export-oriented high and new-tech industry work. 
  28. Further formulate and perfect the related policies to 
spur S&amp;T personnel to have contacts with the outside world, 
scholarly exchanges, and knowledge exports. We must provide 
convenient conditions for S&amp;T personnel to participate in 
international conferences, carry out scholarly visits and do 
visiting research, and take second posts in foreign countries or 
international organizations. We should transfer downward the 
authority over examination and approval of S&amp;T personnel to 
go 
to foreign countries to participate in scholarly activities and 
simplify the procedures. We must actively create the conditions 
to attract top-quality S&amp;T personnel working in foreign 
countries to return to China and serve the country and recruit 
experts in foreign countries to come to China to participate in 
scientific research and education work, carry out guidance and 
advising for production and management activities, or assume 
responsibility for administrative duties. 
  Based on needs and possibilities, organize knowledge exports 
in a planned manner and expand foreign exchange earnings from 
technology. We should send more technical experts and management 
experts to work in foreign countries, assume contractual 
responsibility, manage technical projects, provide technical 
services, and establish scientific research and engineering 
technology service organizations in foreign countries. 
  29. Create conditions and an environment conducive to 
international S&amp;T cooperation and exchanges. Strengthen 
collection and exchanges of S&amp;T information in China and 
foreign 
countries, undertake country research and comparative research 
on the S&amp;T situation and S&amp;T policies in each country. 
Focus on 
the characteristics and advantages of each country in different 
fields to formulate strategies, tactics, and policies for 
undertaking S&amp;T cooperation and exchanges with them. Open up 
funding channels for S&amp;T cooperation and exchanges with the 
outside world, raise capital from China and foreign countries 
from many parties, and provide capital support to international 
S&amp;T cooperation and exchanges. 
<H5>  VI. Policies and Measures </H5>
  30. To ensure that S&amp;T progress is placed in a primary 
status 
in the state's development strategy, the highest leading organs 
of the state must truly reinforce leadership over S&amp;T work 
and 
carry out unified planning and guidance of major problems in 
coordinating the development of China's S&amp;T with our economy 
and 
society. Strengthen the duties of the state's S&amp;T 
administrative 
departments, strive to raise macro decision making levels, 
overcome all types of barriers and decentralistic deviations, 
use our limited resources in the most needy areas, and guarantee 
the achievement of the state's major S&amp;T tasks. 
  31. Strengthen S&amp;T investments, improve S&amp;T 
expenditure 
management. While guaranteeing stable growth in the state's 
financial allocations, we must also strengthen society's 
investments of S&amp;T expenditures, change the situation of the 
state providing all financial inputs, and form three major 
S&amp;T 
investment pillars composed of financial allocations, money 
raised by enterprises themselves, and loans from financial 
organs, while at the same time actively attracting civilian and 
foreign capital, establishing a multi-channel and multi-level 
S&amp;T investment system, and substantially increasing the 
intensity of capital inputs in S&amp;T development from all of 
society. 
  The government should make appropriate increases in S&amp;T 
investments and implement preferential policies for high and new 
technology development. Enterprises must focus on new product 
development, increase R&amp;D inputs, gradually increase 
agricultural R&amp;D inputs, and encourage township and town 
enterprise to invest in agricultural S&amp;T. 
  The banking and financial systems should both establish 
S&amp;T 
credit accounts and increase S&amp;T loans. By the year 2000, 
they 
should make a substantial increase in the amount of S&amp;T 
loans. 
  Gradually readjust the S&amp;T investment structure, make 
expenditures on basic research and applied basic research attain 
about 10 percent of total expenditures on R&amp;D. They must 
increase capital support for intermediate testing, production 
technology development, and technical achievement 
commercialization and industrialization. They should select 
focal points for high and new technology and high and new-tech 
industry, substantially increase the strength of investments, 
and gradually implement risk investments. 
  Continue to reform the S&amp;T expenditure management 
system. The 
state's S&amp;T investments should implement unified management 
and 
bring in competitive mechanisms. Based on different categories 
of scientific research projects, implement special loans, fund 
systems, contractual responsibility systems, bidding systems, or 
contract systems. For projects with economic benefits that are 
included in state plans, implement the method of the government 
and units which benefit making matching investments. Establish 
R&amp;D project evaluation systems and independent evaluation 
organs. Implement supervision and inspection of S&amp;T 
expenditure 
allocations and utilization. Perfect S&amp;T financial management 
methods, strengthen auditing work. 
  32. Apply taxation, price, credit, depreciation, and other 
economic levers to induce technical progress in industries and 
enterprises and promote the development of S&amp;T activities. 
  Provide exemptions from business taxes for S&amp;T 
consulting, 
technology transfers, technical services, technology 
development, and other technical income. Collect additional 
taxes on products and technologies that do not conform to the 
state's industrial policies and technology policies and which 
impede S&amp;T progress. 
  Provide interest subsidies or low-interest loans for 
R&amp;D, 
testing and analysis, software, and other technical investments 
by R&amp;D organs and enterprises and for commercialized 
production 
of new products as determined by the state. 
  Implement accelerated depreciation methods for basic 
facilities and high and new-tech product production equipment in 
R&amp;D organs. 
  33. Strengthen construction of the S&amp;T legal system, 
use laws 
to fix the principles and policies for spurring S&amp;T progress, 
move S&amp;T work onto the track of the legal system, and 
subject it 
to legal protections and supervision. Move quickly to formulate 
a ``Scientific and Technical Progress Law'' and other laws 
related to S&amp;T work, perfect laws related to S&amp;T 
organizations, 
labor, awards, protection of intellectual property rights, and 
other areas, and strive to form a relatively complete S&amp;T 
legal 
system by the year 2000. 
  Popularize knowledge on S&amp;T laws and regulations, 
strengthen 
S&amp;T law and regulation implementation and supervision, and 
establish technology contract arbitration organizations and 
S&amp;T 
legal system organizations at all levels and an S&amp;T law and 
regulation research, consulting, and service system. 
  34. Promote scientific, democratic, and systematic decision 
making. As a comprehensive knowledge system and tool of 
thinking, S&amp;T can help us observe and analyze constantly 
changing economic and social phenomena at the macro level and 
make differentiated, diagnostic, and scientific decisions. 
  We must focus on and reinforce decision making research and 
decision making consulting work, and establish and perfect 
democratic and scientific decision making procedures and 
implementation procedures. For issues that have a major impact 
on our national economy and the people's livelihood, we must 
carry out soft science research prior to making decisions and 
gradually form a system. Leaders at all levels must focus on 
soft science research work, actively apply soft science research 
achievements, and make correct decisions. 
  35. Develop personnel resources, fully foster the role of 
S&amp;T 
personnel. Leaders at all levels must be adept at discovering 
talented personnel, uniting with qualified personnel, and not 
sticking to one pattern in using skilled personnel. All S&amp;T 
personnel who make achievements in their work should be given 
the respect due them. They should use a variety of routes to 
accelerate the training of a new generation of S&amp;T personnel 
and 
boldly utilize young S&amp;T personnel who have both skill and 
political integrity. Focus on continuing education for S&amp;T 
personnel, actively and in a planned manner assign S&amp;T 
personnel 
to go to foreign countries for advanced study or training. Fully 
foster the backbone role of middle-aged and young S&amp;T 
personnel, 
actively provide S&amp;T personnel who are away and those who 
have 
retired with opportunities for continuing service. 
  Reinforce professional education for laborers, encourage 
them 
to engage in self-study and improve their skills. Talented 
S&amp;T 
personnel who come from among the workers and peasants should be 
given equal treatment with specialized technical personnel. 
  Reinforce ideological and political work for S&amp;T 
personnel, 
teach them to love the motherland, support the four basic 
principles, and respect the ethics and standards of S&amp;T work. 
Encourage them to strive for improvement and make more 
contributions to national modernization and construction. 
  Endeavor to improve the working and living conditions of 
S&amp;T 
personnel. Integrate with reform of the personnel system and 
assignment system, adopt the required measures immediately, and 
substantially increase the real incomes of S&amp;T personnel. 
Preferential treatment should be given to S&amp;T personnel in 
rural 
area and frontier regions and those who work in underground, 
remote, and dangerous environments. 
  36. Create a stable environment for S&amp;T development 
that is 
full of democracy and academic freedom. Different scholarly 
views should be dealt with in academic circles through 
scientific practice and discussion, and correctness should not 
be determined through administrative means. 
  Fully foster the role of the Chinese Science and Technology 
Society and other scholarly groups, and encourage all scholarly 
groups and S&amp;T personnel to participate in scholarly 
exchanges, 
decision making and deliberations, consulting services, and 
other activities. 
  Establish and perfect a socialized S&amp;T support system 
for 
scientific research equipment, S&amp;T information, printed 
materials, book and periodical publishing, and so on. 
  37. Strengthen support from society as a whole for S&amp;T 
work. 
Party and government leaders at all levels in all departments 
and all locations should increase their understanding of 
economic work and provide it with extremely great attention and 
support. Leading organs must strive to improve their own S&amp;T 
accomplishments, truly make reliance on S&amp;T a first-rate 
matter 
for invigorating China, invigorating their regions, and 
invigorating their departments, and become leaders in initiating 
S&amp;T development. 
  Planning, personnel, education, finance, banking, taxation, 
foreign trade, propaganda, and other departments as well as 
news, publishing, and artistic circles must all strengthen their 
support for S&amp;T work and jointly contribute to the 
development 
of science and technology. 
  38. Developing science and technology is an achievement of 
the Chinese nationality covering thousands of years and it 
requires struggle by our entire nationality and unremitting 
efforts by many generations of people. In history, the Chinese 
nationality has relied on its own diligence and intelligence to 
create a magnificent ancient civilization that is still 
glimmering with an immortal brilliance today. Today, under the 
leadership of the Communist Party of China and guided by the 
party's basic lines and relying on S&amp;T progress, we will 
certainly be able to achieve a new takeoff in the social forces 
of production and achieve our second and third magnificent 
strategic objectives in socialist modernization and construction. 
<H5>  China's Medium- and Long-Term Science and Technology </H5>
Development Program (Main Points) (1990-2000-2020) 
<H5>  Agriculture </H5>
  Agriculture is the foundation of our national economy. 
Sustained and stable growth in agricultural production is the 
decisive factor in long-term stable development of our entire 
national economy and concerns the overall situation of economic 
construction and reform and opening up. The agricultural problem 
is certainly not a local problem, but is instead a problem that 
concerns the overall situation. It is not a regular problem of 
economic work, but is instead a major economic and strategic 
problem as well as a political problem. Thus, we must pay full 
attention to and strive to develop agriculture. Immediately 
strengthening agricultural S&amp;T work is an extremely urgent 
task. 
<H5>  I. Development Strategies and Objectives </H5>
  Based on the ideas for China's economic construction and 
development determined by the 13th CPC Congress and China's 
agricultural development plans, by the end of this century we 
must attain a gross value of social output in rural areas of 
1.89 trillion yuan and a per capita net annual income in rural 
areas of 800 yuan, and the people's lives should attain a 
relatively prosperous level. By the 2020's, the gross value of 
social output in rural areas will continue to grow and our per 
capita GNP will approach the levels of the moderately developed 
countries, and the dietary structure in urban and rural areas 
will change from a relatively healthy to a nutritious one. 
Agricultural production will gradually develop in the direction 
of specialization, commercialization, and modernization and form 
prosperous new socialist rural areas in a preliminary manner. 
  The basic tasks of agricultural S&amp;T work during this 
period 
are to achieve the objectives outlined above, provide feasible 
advanced S&amp;T achievements and appropriate technology, 
continually open up new domains for agricultural S&amp;T 
development, strengthen new S&amp;T reserves, and open up a new 
route for the continual development of agricultural production. 
  Agricultural S&amp;T must focus closely on the objectives 
outlined above and attain the three resolute things: resolutely 
orient toward service to production, do good deployments in 
depth for agricultural scientific research work; resolutely 
extend appropriate and matching advanced technology, actively 
apply the achievements of the new technological revolution; 
resolutely unite economic benefits, social benefits, and 
ecological benefits, implement guidance by categories and 
improvement by regions. The four integrations: implement 
integration of traditional agricultural technology with modern 
S&amp;T, gradually shift toward modern agriculture; integrate 
labor 
intensity with technological intensity, gradually shift toward 
knowledge and technological intensity; integrate manual labor 
with semi-mechanization and mechanization, gradually shift 
toward mechanization; integrate using land with nurturing land, 
gradually shift toward high output, superior quality, high 
efficiency, low consumption intensive management and scientific 
service to agriculture. 
  Based on the above requirements, the strategic objectives 
facing agricultural S&amp;T work during the 2020's are: use 
S&amp;T and 
modern industry as powerful pillars, transform traditional 
agriculture into modern sustained agriculture based on modern 
S&amp;T and modern management, gradually reduce the proportion of 
our agricultural population, substantially increase land 
utilization rates, labor productivity, and product 
commercialization rates, establish a modern agricultural 
production technology system. 
  By the year 2000, agricultural S&amp;T must serve a 
doubling of 
agricultural output, comprehensive development of the rural 
commodity economy, and attaining relative prosperity in the 
people's lives. 
  --On the basis of per capita grain of 400 to 424 kg and a 
gross output of 500 to 530 billion kg, comprehensively develop 
other cash crops and forestry, animal husbandry, and fishery, 
increase the daily amount of heat energy supplied by food per 
person per day of urban and rural residents to 2,715 kcal, 73.5 
g of protein, 56.6 g of fats, and basically satisfy normal 
physical requirements. 
  --The primary realms of agricultural S&amp;T should attain 
advanced world levels of the early 1980's. The role of 
agricultural technology in increasing agricultural output should 
increase from the present 35 percent to about 50 percent. 
Continue to maintain a world vanguard status in soil 
improvement, breeding multi-resistant crops, using hybrid 
advantages, multiple maturation cropping, high output 
cultivation, biological prevention, livestock and poultry 
epidemic disease diagnosis and prevention, freshwater 
aquaculture, and several other fields where we have advantages. 
  --Plant grass and trees, increase vegetation, reduce soil 
erosion, control degradation and desertification of cultivated 
land and grasslands, achieve a preliminary improvement in the 
agricultural ecology and environment. 
  By the year 2020, agricultural S&amp;T must serve 
comprehensive 
development of agriculture and the rural commodity economy and 
the people's lives should make a transition from relative 
prosperity to a nutritious model. 
  --On the basis of per capita grain of 500 to 525 kg and 
total 
output of 700 to 750 billion kg, achieve coordinated development 
of other cash crops and of forestry, animal husbandry, and 
fishery, increase the amount of heat energy supplied by food per 
person per day for urban and rural residents to 2,850 kcal, 85 g 
of protein, 80 g of fats, attain nutritious levels in dietary 
structures, and gradually form a dietary structure with Chinese 
characteristics. 
  --Rely on science and technology, develop the agricultural 
forces of production, increase the role of agricultural S&amp;T 
in 
increasing agricultural output to about 70 percent. Make 
significant improvements in the agricultural ecology and 
environment, begin making a transition toward benevolent cycles. 
  --Use modern industry to outfit agriculture, basically 
achieve mechanization and partial semi-automation in 
cultivation, planting, management, harvesting, and other primary 
field activities and in livestock, poultry, and aquacultural 
raising as well as in post-production cooling and storage of 
agricultural products, processing, and so on, substantially 
raise labor productivity, enable each agricultural labor to 
support 7 to 8 people. 
  --Make a major effort to develop high technology and new 
technology. Broadly apply microelectronics technology in the 
primary production and management realms of agriculture. Achieve 
major developments and new breakthroughs in biotechnology and 
apply them in animal and plant cultivation and breeding, plant 
disease and insect pest and epidemic disease prevention, 
agricultural product processing, agricultural microbiology, and 
other important realms, gradually form and develop an emerging 
industry. 
  --Further develop food source and nutrition source S&amp;T, 
exploit the increased output potential of animal and plant 
proteins, accelerate development of the food product and feed 
industries, provide highly nutritious, economically beneficial, 
and diversified food products to improve the dietary structure 
of urban and rural people. 
<H5>  II. Focal Tasks and Key Technologies </H5>
  Starting now, and on to the end of this century and into the 
2020's, the strategic foci of China's agricultural S&amp;T 
development are: serve substantial improvements in the 
agricultural forces of production, economic benefits, and 
product quality; broadly open up food sources, improve the 
dietary structure; prevent natural disasters, protect the 
ecology and environment. While increasing the intensity of 
material inputs and improving agricultural technical equipment 
and construction of basic agricultural facilities, we must also 
make a major effort to extend and popularize agricultural 
S&amp;T, 
actively undertake applied research, and truly reinforce basic 
work and theoretical research to increase the reserve strengths 
of agricultural production and agricultural S&amp;T. 
  The key tasks for agricultural S&amp;T development are: 
<H5>  A. Rationally develop, utilize, and protect agricultural </H5>
natural resources. 
  Agricultural natural resources are an important material 
foundation for agricultural development. We must adhere to the 
principle of combining rational development and utilization with 
protection, strengthen scientific management of our existing 
cultivated land, monitor the evolutionary laws of its soil, 
water, and fertilizer, and establish dynamic monitoring systems. 
Strengthen comprehensive development and improvement in key 
regions, especially moderate and low-yield regions, improve the 
production performance of cultivated land, and establish a soil 
ecology and environment that combines utilization with nurturing 
and has high output and stable output. While fully protecting 
and utilizing cultivated land, we must also orient toward our 
entire national territory, truly reinforce monitoring of 
cultivated land, grasslands, mountains and forests, and water 
areas, produce quantitative statistics and quality assessments 
that conform to reality, propose optimized programs for rational 
development and comprehensive utilization. We must also 
strengthen protection of agricultural natural resources and 
undertake comprehensive improvement technology that is centered 
on planting grass and planting trees and focused on water and 
soil preservation, and that integrates organic measures with 
engineering measures. In addition, we must also place protection 
of the ecology and environment and utilization of climatic 
resources in a primary status, and strengthen monitoring, 
forecasting, and prevention of disastrous weather to maintain 
sustained and stable development of agriculture. 
  Prior to the year 2000, rationally develop agricultural 
natural resources and increase utilization rates, achieve 
preliminary control over destruction of agricultural natural 
resources and the agricultural ecology and environment, and 
achieve a simultaneous increase in the renewal capabilities of 
renewable resources and agricultural development requirements. 
In 2020, apply advanced S&amp;T, expand comprehensive 
development of 
natural resources, further increase utilization rates. At the 
same time, make a transition to benevolent cycles in the 
agricultural ecology and environment, lay an excellent material 
foundation for achieving agricultural modernization. 
<H5>  B. Broadly open up food sources, improve the dietary </H5>
structure of urban and rural residents. 
  Improve nutritional levels of urban and rural residents, 
select a dietary structure that conforms to China's national 
conditions. With a prerequisite of striving to increase grain 
production, orient toward our entire national territory, 
comprehensively develop all types of food resources, promote 
coordinated development of cropping and breeding. Readjust 
cropping structures and deployments, significantly develop 
legume crops; increase the protein content of grain crops; 
reform cultivation systems, make appropriate increases in the 
multiple cropping index, make a transition from a two-element 
structure (grain and cash crops) to a three-element structure 
(grain, cash crops, and feed crops). Readjust livestock and 
poultry structures and, while increasing hog slaughter rates and 
feed conversion rates, also make a major effort to develop 
grain-saving poultry and grazing animals. Accelerate development 
of aquaculture S&amp;T, orient toward interior water areas, 
obtain 
animal protein from the sea. 
  Prior to the year 2000, the amount of superior quality 
protein assimilated from animals and plants by urban and rural 
residents should be about 30 percent. Attain about 50 percent in 
2020 and achieve a transition in dietary structures from 
relative prosperity to a nutritional type. 
<H5>  C. Selectively breed new crop, livestock and poultry, and </H5>
aquaculture product varieties, establish and perfect an improved 
variety breeding system. 
  Reinforce collection, examination, preservation, and 
utilization research for all germplasm resources, establish and 
perfect modernized variety resources storehouses (gardens) and 
pure breed farms. At the same time, we must on the basis of 
different requirements cultivate new high-yield, superior 
quality, multi-resistant crop varieties (combinations), new 
livestock, poultry, and aquaculture product series that are 
fast-growing and have strong breeding capabilities, and good 
product quality, and continually replace and utilize them in 
production. Focus on utilizing the advantages of hybrids, 
undertake research on breeding theory, technology, and methods, 
further improve breeding efficiency and shorten breeding cycles. 
Establish a crop, livestock and poultry, and fish variety 
examination system, achieve regionalization of improved 
varieties; perfect the improved variety breeding system; 
implement inspection and quarantine systems, do good 
specialization and quality standardization for seed production 
and livestock (poultry) breed breeding. 
  Prior to the year 2000, replace primary grain crop varieties 
twice and achieve a matching of improved varieties and improved 
methods, increasing output by about 10 percent each time; attain 
a popularization rate of 30 percent for improved commercial 
livestock, poultry, and fish varieties. By 2020, replace primary 
crop varieties two or three times, increasing output by 10 to 15 
percent each time; attain a popularization rate of 50 percent 
for improved commercial livestock, poultry, and fish varieties. 
<H5>  D. High output, superior quality, high efficiency, low </H5>
consumption comprehensive agricultural, animal husbandry, and 
fishery output increasing technologies. 
  On the basis of selective utilization of improved varieties, 
do research on fertilizer mixing and application, water-saving 
irrigation (or dry crop technology), preventing dangers from 
plant diseases and insect pests and weeds, agricultural 
meteorological disasters, and other regionalized, standardized, 
and match optimized cultivation technologies; develop intensive 
livestock and poultry feeding and raising technologies; develop 
large water area breeding and high density aquaculture precision 
breeding technologies; strengthen deep sea fishing technology; 
do foresighted research on epidemic disease monitoring, control, 
and elimination technology for endangered animals and plants, 
protect a substantial increase in agricultural, animal 
husbandry, and fishery output. 
  Prior to the year 2000, increase the yearly nitrogen 
fertilizer utilization rate to 40 percent. Increase irrigation 
water utilization rates to more than 50 percent, and produce 0.4 
kg of grain per mm of rainfall in arid regions. Control loss 
rates from damage due to diseases and insect pests to 3 percent 
for grain and 5 percent for cotton, and do not allow loss rates 
for other cash crops to exceed 5 percent. Control death rates to 
less than 5 percent for hogs, 10 percent for poultry, and 2 
percent for livestock. Control loss rates from aquacultural 
diseases to less than 10 percent. Propose agricultural 
meteorological disaster prevention technology and broadly apply 
it in production. In 2020, as science and technology progress, 
raise nitrogen fertilizer utilization rates in that year to 60 
percent. Increase irrigation water utilization rates to 65 to 70 
percent, and produce 0.5 kg of grain per mm of rainfall. Control 
loss rates due to diseases, insect pests, and weeds to 1 percent 
for grains and 3 percent for primary cash crops. Control death 
rates at 5 percent for poultry and 4 percent for aquacultural 
diseases. Apply agricultural meteorology disaster prevention 
technology in a broad manner to obtain significant benefits. 
<H5>  E. Regional comprehensive development and improvement </H5>
technology. 
  Focus on the Huang-Huai-Hai [Huang He-Huai He-Hai He] Plain, 
Songnen-Sanjiang Plain, red (yellow and purple) soil hill region 
of southern China, Hainan Island, the loess plateau, and other 
moderate and low-yield regions and coastal beaches to determine 
the causes of low yields and the primary restricting factors, do 
research on comprehensive development and improvement 
technologies, establish regional ecology comprehensive function 
optimized technical systems, and use experimental regions, 
demonstration regions, and diffusion regions to accelerate 
technological development and provide a scientific foundation 
for the coordinated development of agriculture and construction 
of base areas for each type of commodity. 
  Prior to 2000, study and propose technical programs for 
rational agricultural structures for different regions and 
improvement of low-yield soils, further perfect commodity base 
area comprehensive matching technology for grain, cotton, 
legumes, hogs, cattle, poultry, fish, tropical crops and so on, 
use the market as a guide, strive to raise commercialization 
rates, make quality conform to international standards, 
especially for major industrial raw materials, and foster our 
competitive advantages in international markets. In 2020, study 
and propose comprehensive, matching, and systematization 
technologies for grain, cash crops, livestock and poultry, and 
aquaculture, further develop export-oriented industry. 
<H5>  F. Agricultural product storage and transportation, </H5>
processing, packaging, and comprehensive utilization technology. 
  With the goal of improving the quality of agricultural 
products, conserving raw materials and energy consumption, and 
increasing the value of output, focus on research on storage and 
transportation, preservation, processing and packaging 
technologies for grain, oils, fruits, vegetables, and other 
agricultural products and for livestock, poultry, and 
aquaculture products; do research on laws of changes in the 
quality and nutritional components of agricultural, livestock, 
and aquaculture products in the storage, transportation, and 
processing processes and on regulation and control technology to 
maintain superior quality; do research on intensive processing 
and comprehensive utilization technology for agricultural, 
livestock, and aquaculture products and for straw, sideline 
products, and leftover materials, explore new routes for 
increasing the value of products and exporting to earn foreign 
exchange. 
  Prior to 2000, propose relatively perfect and advanced 
agricultural, livestock, and aquaculture product storage and 
transportation, processing, packaging, and comprehensive 
utilization technology, increase the competitiveness of our 
superior products in the international market. In 2020, provide 
modernized production technology and technical equipment, use 
diversified and superior quality processed products to open up 
more international markets and increase our foreign exchange 
earning capability. 
<H5>  G. Agricultural mechanization technology and agricultural </H5>
engineering research. 
  Integrate with different administrative scales and 
cultivation systems, develop mechanization technology for the 
cultivation, planting, management, harvesting, and other 
production links for primary grain and cash crops and for upland 
agriculture and water-saving irrigation of farmland; do research 
on mechanization, semi-mechanization, and grassland (pasture) 
mechanization technology for intensive livestock and poultry 
raising in the suburbs of large and medium-sized cities and in 
commodity base areas; do research on mechanization of aquatic 
breeding and fishing and on mechanization of medium-sized and 
small processing; do research on agricultural and sideline 
product processing and comprehensive utilization machinery and 
tools and mechanization technology and equipment; do research on 
facility agriculture, comprehensive utilization of rural energy 
resources, and agricultural, livestock, and fishery 
environmental engineering technology and sets of equipment. 
  Prior to 2000, provide appropriate technology and equipment 
for achieving mechanization of a large portion of the activities 
in agricultural production and agricultural and sideline product 
processing, and new energy-saving technology. In 2020, provide 
post-production processing automation and semi-automation 
technology to provide advanced sets of mechanization technology, 
facility agriculture, and other environmental engineering 
technology and equipment to develop agricultural production, and 
basically achieve agricultural mechanization. 
<H5>  H. Application of biotechnology, microelectronics </H5>
technology, and other high technology and new technology in 
agriculture. 
  Use genetic engineering and cell manipulation technology to 
accelerate selective breeding of high output, high quality, and 
multi-resistant agricultural crop varieties; adopt animal gene 
transfers and embryo engineering technology to develop new 
livestock, poultry, and fish varieties that grow quickly and 
have a high feed remuneration and excellent quality; develop 
animal epidemic disease monoclonal antibody and DNA probe and 
diagnosis technology as well as safe and highly effective 
vaccines; do research on development and utilization of protein 
and cellulose resources and on biotechnology for intensive 
processing of agricultural and sideline products to 
commercialize them and increase their economic value. 
  Apply other high and new technologies focused on 
microelectronics technology such as electronic computer 
technology, remote sensing technology, isotope and radioactive 
nuclei technology, and so on to accelerate the development and 
formation of emerging industries. 
  Prior to 2000, breed several new high output, superior 
quality, and multi-resistant agricultural, livestock, and fish 
varieties and apply them directly in production; develop 
successful animal and plant epidemic disease diagnosis and 
prevention technologies and commercialize them. Apply 
microelectronics technology, remote sensing technology, and 
radioactive nuclei technology to accelerate modernization of 
research and management measures. By 2020, make important 
breakthroughs in biotechnology and broadly apply them in all 
important fields to form and develop emerging industries. 
Broadly apply microelectronics technology, remote sensing 
technology, and so on in agricultural departments and primary 
production realms and obtain significant economic and social 
benefits. 
<H5>  I. Agricultural applied basic research </H5>
  Focus on undertaking research on the genetic laws of crop, 
livestock and poultry, aquaculture, and other important economic 
properties, and in particular strengthen research on resistance 
(resistant to diseases and insect pests, resistant to reversion) 
and the genetic laws of product quality properties; conduct 
research on growth and development laws, nutrient metabolism, 
and external environment regulation and control mechanisms, and 
in particular pay attention to the most vigorous leading-edge 
fields in modern agricultural science such as photosynthesis, 
organic nitrogen fixation, multi-resistance mechanisms, 
veterinary immunology, veterinary acupuncture products, and so 
on, and strive for major advances and new breakthroughs. 
  Prior to 2000, apply all of the technologies described above 
and produce results. By 2020, make important breakthroughs in 
integrating theory and practice. 
<H5>  J. Research on modern agricultural macroeconomics and </H5>
scientific management. 
  With agricultural modernization as the goal, undertake 
research on industrial-agricultural relationships, total and 
regional agricultural development strategies, the rural economy, 
agricultural product prices and circulation systems, agriculture 
abstracts and information modernization, agricultural S&amp;T 
management, and so on, establish the corresponding information 
systems, and provide a theoretical foundation for macro decision 
making in agricultural departments. 
  Prior to 2000, propose and establish macroeconomic theory 
and 
method systems and implement overall agricultural modernization 
and construction path and step programs to gain typical 
experience. By 2020, formulate policies, laws and regulations, 
and S&amp;T management theories and methods that conform to 
realities in China to guide agricultural modernization and 
construction. 
<H5>  Forestry </H5>
  Forestry is an important part of our national economy, and 
it 
is both an industry and a public welfare activity. Forests are 
the main factor in the ecological system of continents and an 
important species genetic storehouse. Forest resources are a 
nation's basic resources and ``life resources'', and they 
determine and affect the development and growth of regular 
renewable resources, maintain the vitality and stability of 
ecological systems, and are an important prerequisite for human 
production and life. The development of forestry concerns the 
overall situation in national construction. It provides timber 
and a variety of forestry and sideline products as well as food, 
oils and fats, medicines, fiber, and other important raw 
materials, and it has a profound impact on maintaining 
ecological equilibrium, improving environmental quality, 
improving and protecting our national territory, reducing 
national disasters, spurring increased agricultural output, 
invigorating the rural economy, and protecting the conditions on 
which mankind depends for existence and development. A developed 
forestry is one indicator of a nation's wealth, the prosperity 
of a nationality, and the civilization of a society. Planting 
trees to create forests and make the motherland green is a 
fundamental national policy in China. 
<H5>  I. Development Strategies and Objectives </H5>
<H5>  A. Industry development strategies </H5>
  Implement intensive management, reinforce protection, make 
major efforts at developing and comprehensively using forest 
resources, increase the total amount of forest products and 
reduce consumption to the greatest possible extent, reverse 
trends toward declining resources, and gradually improve the 
ecology and environment. 
<H5>  B. Industry strategies and objectives </H5>
  By the end of this century, increase the forested area by 
450 
million mu, including 100 million mu of rapid-growing abundant 
output forests, and strive to increase the forest coverage rate 
from the present 12.98 percent (based on data from a detailed 
survey during the Sixth 5-Year Plan) to 15 percent, and increase 
it to 20 percent by 2020. The amount of forest growth should 
rise from the present 320 million cubic meters to 400 million 
cubic meters, and to 550 million cubic meters by 2020. By the 
end of this century, tend 450 million mu of middle-aged and 
young trees and produce 140 to 150 million cubic meters of 
lumber for use in construction (including 95 million cubic 
meters of lumber for use within plans). Readjust the industrial 
structure, achieve a proportion of one-third of the value of 
output overall each for lumber, intensive processing and 
utilization, and economic diversification. 
<H5>  C. Science and technology strategies and objectives </H5>
  By the year 2000, deal with key technologies for reversing 
the decline in forest resources, substantially increase the 
amount of forest growth, resource utilization rates, and labor 
productivity, and serve development of the commodity economy in 
forest regions. Establish an industrial system based on forest 
cultivation, use highly efficient utilization as a vanguard and 
optimized products as a dragon's head, and build a forest 
ecology protective screen system to shift forestry onto the 
track of using modern S&amp;T and modern management as a 
foundation. 
  --Increase the quality of afforestation. Use intensive 
management and strengthened management and administration to 
increase the afforestation preservation rate. Increase the 
afforestation preservation rate from 26 percent in the early 
1980's to 70 by the year 2000 and to 90 percent by 2020, and 
provide comprehensive technology for mature forests and timber. 
  --Propose matching technologies for comprehensive protection 
of forests. Establish forest resource comprehensive information 
management and monitoring systems, increase the detailed survey 
rate for forest resources; establish a forest protection system, 
reduce the occurrence rates and damage rates to forests from 
diseases and insect pests and fires; do research from the 
perspective of territorial security and management on systems to 
integrate with agriculture, animal husbandry, and water 
conservancy, increase the effectiveness of forest resource 
protection. Use scientific protection to reduce forest resource 
losses by more than 30 percent. 
  --Rationally deploy and develop forest resources, increase 
the amount of forest growth. Do good resource deployments, 
readjust the forest variety structure and optimize forest 
resource management and utilization programs, and provide them 
with legal guarantees. Implement integration of artificial 
afforestation, upgrading secondary forests, closing off 
mountainous areas to nurture forests, and aerial seeding for 
afforestation, adapt to local conditions to expand forest 
resources. Use improved strong seedling varieties, intensive 
cultivation technology, and other measures to increase the 
amount of forest growth by about 20 percent. 
  --Scientifically utilize forest resources. First of all, we 
must control amounts being cut. Make a major effort to develop 
the lumber industry, forest product chemical industry, and 
economic diversification to develop the utilization of forest 
resources toward high efficiency, use intensive processing to 
increase product quality and utilization rates, and make their 
utilization rates equivalent to a doubling of industrial lumber 
(almost 100 million cubic meters). Raise the ratio between 
industrial timber and fuel forests (including some timber that 
has not undergone industrial processing) from the present 3:7 to 
5:5. 
  --Propose quantitative evaluation indicators for forests and 
the ecology and environment. Establish stable forest ecology 
system models, provide quantitative evaluation indices for the 
role of forests in preventing wind and stabilizing sand, water 
and soil preservation, conserving water sources, purifying the 
atmosphere and water, developing forest tourism, convalescence, 
and other areas and thereby calculate the ecological value of 
forests in improving the environment. 
  --Attain international levels of the early 1980's in 
forestry 
S&amp;T. Make substantial breakthroughs in the areas of soft 
science 
research and forestry applied basic research. Accelerate the 
transfer of S&amp;T achievements into production and attain an 
achievement conversion rate of about 70 percent. The role of 
S&amp;T 
in forestry development should increase from the present 10 
percent to about 30 percent. Attain a preliminary scale for 
scientific research systems, extension systems, and technical 
supervision systems, improve the irrational situation in the 
deployment and structure of the S&amp;T system, substantially 
improve the quality of S&amp;T personnel, and increase the 
proportion of specialized forestry personnel from 8.7 percent to 
11 percent of forestry employees. 
  By the year 2020, continue to focus on increasing forest 
resources, further improve the ecological and environmental 
benefits of forests, establish rational models for developing 
and utilizing forest resources, and comprehensively develop the 
economy in forest areas. In particular, we must make important 
breakthroughs in applying biotechnology and microelectronics 
technology, opening up new ways to increase resources, and other 
areas and establish an industrial system. Strive to attain 
advanced international levels in the main fields of forestry 
S&amp;T. Increase the role of S&amp;T in forestry development 
from 30 
percent to 60 percent. Finish building a scientific research, 
extension, and supervision system. Achieve basic rationality in 
the deployment and structure of S&amp;T personnel, significantly 
improve the quality of S&amp;T staffs, and increase the 
proportion 
of specialized personnel to 15 percent of forestry employees. 
<H5>  II. Focal Tasks and Key Technologies </H5>
<H5>  A. Research on existing forest resource management, </H5>
administration, and protection. 
  1. Establish a comprehensive information management and 
monitoring system for forest resources. We must gain an 
understanding of our resources to reverse the loss of control 
between resource consumption and growth. Apply remote sensing 
technology matched with the necessary ground surveys to 
establish a detailed survey system for forest resources and 
complete it using counties (forestry bureaus) as the statistical 
elements, provide national macro forest resource detailed survey 
and monitoring technology including data on all categories of 
forested area and reserve resources and the corresponding 
charts, reduce the survey schedule from the present 5-10 years 
to 3-5 years, and increase the precision of surveys; by 2020 
establish a system that totally applies computer differentiation 
and dynamic monitoring and analysis of forest resources, provide 
the state with new resource data every year. 
  2. Do research on forest protection technology. Adopt 
advanced technology to reinforce prediction and forecasting of 
forest diseases and insect pests and form a national network. By 
2000, attain a short-term prediction and forecasting rate of 80 
percent and a medium and long-term prediction and forecasting 
rate of 70 percent for primary forest diseases and insect pests. 
In addition, establish a national quarantine network. Establish 
comprehensive management system models for primary diseases and 
insect pests, reduce the disease and insect pest disaster rate 
by 30 to 40 percent and by 70 percent in 2020, and reduce timber 
losses by 30 and 60 percent, respectively. In the area of 
preventing forest fires, we must focus on prediction and 
forecasting systems that integrate aerial and ground activities 
and do research on forest fire rescue equipment. Reduce the 
forest fire occurrence rate by 30 percent by 2000 and about 50 
percent by 2020, and do research on the deployment, functions, 
and management of natural protection regions. Undertake research 
on protection, breeding, utilization, and other areas for 
endangered rare animals and plants, rescue valuable animals and 
plants threatened by extinction, and establish base areas for 
introducing and raising fine varieties. In addition, undertake 
resource on forest genetic resource preservation technologies. 
  3. Do research on tending and intermediate cutting and 
secondary forest upgrading technology for middle-aged and young 
forests. Do research on tending and intermediate cutting modes 
and intensities, improve forest growth rates and timber quality. 
Propose rational densities and deployments for forest 
passageways. Use research on secondary forest comprehensive 
cultivation technology to fully foster the production potential 
of forests, readjust standing forest structures and forest age 
structures, increase forest quality and output, and upgrade some 
secondary forests to rapid-growing abundant harvest forests. 
  4. Study and formulate rational cutting amount standards. 
Readjust the amounts being cut in our 131 forestry bureaus and 
deal with the problem of overcutting. Do research on rational 
management and administration models for enterprises whose 
resources have been exhausted. Formulate national forest cutting 
quotas and formulate forest phase diagrams. Do research on 
rational cutting modes and replacement methods, adopt a variety 
of routes to reduce waste of timber. Strengthen research on 
cutting, transportation, and forestry machinery. Gradually 
reduce the forestry deficit by the year 2000, try to prevent 
total consumption of forest resources from exceeding the total 
amount being grown. 
<H5>  B. Research on establishing short-schedule industrial timber </H5>
technology systems. 
  1. Do research on improved variety selective breeding 
technology, improve the genetic quality of forests. Establish 
and perfect short-schedule forest selective breeding and 
improved variety breeding systems. Selectively breed 
rapid-growing, superior quality, multi-resistant new varieties, 
new asexual strains, and new combinations. Do research on 
multi-resistant improved varieties and multi-generation breeding 
technology. In the area of moving quickly to measure and shorten 
breeding schedules, focus on hybrid advantages, ultra-close 
advantages, and applications of new breeding technologies. In 
artificially planted forests, increase the genetically improved 
breeding material utilization rate to 30 percent by 2000 and to 
more than 70 percent by 2020. 
  2. Do research on intensive management technologies for 
industrial forests. Formulate technical standards and methods 
for large-area appropriate areas and trees, demarcate stand 
categories and compile stand maps for all of China to make 
cultivation technologies for primary fast-growing timber trees 
scientific and systematic. Do research on scientific fertilizer 
application technologies for primary fast-growing tree 
varieties; study water-conserving irrigation technology; do 
research on scientific deployments of mixed forests and 
mixed-age forests, establish stable community structures. The 
maturation time limits or rotational cutting schedules should be 
10 to 25 years for plains regions and mountainous areas of 
southern China and 15 to 40 years for mountainous areas of north 
China; the average annual growth volume should be 0.7 to 1 cubic 
meters in southern China and 0.5 cubic meters in northern China. 
  3. Study directional cultivation technology for industrial 
forests. formulate directional cultivation technology indicators 
for papermaking materials, artificial board materials, 
construction materials, energy resource materials, and forest 
product chemical raw materials base areas, and select tree 
varieties, stands, and maturation ages according to different 
use objectives and establish different models for directional 
cultivation of superior-quality industrial forests. Do good 
rational deployment and scale management of base areas, have as 
a strategic focus the mountainous areas of Xiaoxing'anling 
Changbai Shan, hilly and mountainous areas of southern China, 
and the Zhongyuan Plain in north China to study material quality 
forecasting and cultivation techniques for existing 
rapid-growing tree varieties. By 2000, strive for directional 
cultivation of 36 million mu of base area forests among China's 
100 million mu of abundant output forests and produce about 10 
million cubic meters of superior quality industrial materials, 
and develop to 100 million mu by 2020. 
<H5>  C. Research on ecological forestry engineering. </H5>
  1. Do research on shelter forest systems in the ``three 
norths'' [northwest, north, and northeast China], along the 
coast, in the middle and upper reaches of the Chang Jiang, and 
in the Taihang Shan region. Do research on the benefits of 
shelter forest systems on the natural environment, the water 
source conservation and mud and rock flow control functions of 
water source forests in the upper reaches of the Chang Jiang, 
the protective mechanisms of marine shelter forests, and 
evaluate the public welfare benefits, replacement technologies 
for shelter forest management and afforestation, agricultural, 
forestry, and animal husbandry structures in shelter forest 
regions, and on integration of arbors, irrigation, and grasses 
and on tree variety structures and deployments. By 2000, attain 
a shelter forest area of 300 million mu and a sheltered area of 
2 billion mu to prevent continued degradation of the ecology and 
environment. Control the continued expansion of desertification 
in local regions. This can reduce the amount of wind-blown dust 
in the ``three norths'' region by 40 percent, reduce the amount 
of silt losses in the middle and upper reaches of the Chang 
Jiang and loess regions by 30 percent, and reduce wind disasters 
in coastal regions by 40 percent. By 2020, increase the shelter 
forest area to 500 million mu and the sheltered area to 3 
billion mu, obtain the optimum sheltering structure benefits and 
comprehensive benefits, improve the ecology and environment, and 
gradually move towards benevolent cycles. 
  2. Do research on forestry in plains regions. In the 
Sanjiang, Songliao, North China, Huang-Huai-Hai, Chang Jiang 
middle and lower reaches, Zhu Jiang [Pearl River] Delta, and 
other primary commodity grain base areas, do research on 
compound farmland shelter forest systems and on their management 
and afforestation technology for a variety of crop and forest 
interplanting arrangements, evaluate the ecological and economic 
benefits of shelter forests on increasing agricultural output, 
and so on, and further establish a system that integrates 
agriculture, forestry, and animal husbandry. By 2000, gradually 
complete a shelter forest system in the regions listed above, 
increase grain output by about 5 percent, and increase timber 
output by 200 to 300 million cubic meters; by 2020, attain a 
forest coverage rate of 10 to 15 percent, with shelter forests 
accounting for 50 percent, and establish a relatively stable 
agriculture, forestry, animal husbandry, and fishery compound 
ecology system and increase grain output by 10 percent. 
<H5>  D. Research on intensive processing and highly efficient </H5>
utilization of timber. 
  1. Do research on using fast-growing trees, small trees, 
waste trees, poor-quality trees, bamboo, and agricultural 
residues as raw materials and on technologies for manufacturing 
them into finished wood products, mainly artificial board. Do 
focused research on using small diameter timber, intermediate 
cutting timber, and timber processing residues as raw materials, 
develop new production technologies and new equipment for 
particle board and fiberboard for a variety of uses, and 
implement quality controls. Undertake research on the 
construction of large-scale artificial board enterprise systems 
engineering, and by the year 2000 apply this achievement to 
attain an annual output of 500,000 cubic meters of high-quality 
particle board and fiberboard to replace 1.5 million cubic 
meters of industrial timber. By 2020, achieve an annual output 
of 3 million cubic meters of superior quality lumber to replace 
9 million cubic meters of industrial lumber; in regions suitable 
for the development of medium-sized and small enterprises, 
extend technologies for using fast-growing tree varieties, 
bamboo, and agricultural residues as raw materials to produce 
artificial board and other finished products. This would include 
producing 1 million cubic meters of artificial board which along 
with other finished products could save the country 6 million 
cubic meters of industrial timber by the year 2000 and 12 
million cubic meters by 2020. Actively undertake research on 
directional cultivation fast-growing timber utilization, and by 
the year 2000 utilize fast-growing timber to produce 1 million 
cubic meters of plywood and 400,000 cubic meters of 
superior-quality plywood for use in mechanized processing and 
structures. Attain 3 million cubic meters and 1.2 million cubic 
meters, respectively, by 2020, and replace 1.5 million cubic 
meters and 4.5 million cubic meters, respectively, of raw 
lumber. Extension of the three technologies listed above could 
produce 3 million cubic meters of artificial board by 2000 and 7 
million cubic meters by 2020. 
  2. Study and extend lumber drying, decay prevention, and 
other modification technologies. Do research on lumber drying 
benchmarks, develop from the drying techniques for the 30-odd 
tree varieties we currently understand to 60 varieties by 2000, 
and be concerned with drying techniques for hard-to-dry lumber 
and especially large and thick lumber. Extend lumber decay 
prevention technology, do research on difficult infusion 
technology, and develop low-toxicity decay prevention agents. 
After lumber undergoes drying and decay prevention, its lifespan 
can be extended 3 to 5 times. By 2000, this could conserve an 
estimated 10 million cubic meters of lumber. On a foundation of 
studying and extending lumber drying and decay prevention, 
undertake research on other improvement technologies for 
fast-growing timber and form an integrated matching technology 
for sawing-drying-decay prevention-inspection with modern 
characteristics. 
  3. Do R&amp;D on technology for artificial board, primarily 
particle board, and on the use of woody materials including 
rapid-growing timber as structural materials. Based on different 
structural requirements, do research on artificial board 
performance, strength, fire resistance, structural 
architectures, and other technologies, formulate the related 
standards and structural regulations, extend complete sets of 
high-quality woody construction material houses and commercial 
components primarily for civilian residences. By the year 2000, 
strive for 700,000 cubic meters of artificial board for use as 
construction material to replace 2 million cubic meters of raw 
lumber. By 2020, consume 3 million cubic meters of structural 
artificial board and gradually achieve modernization of 
residential structures. 
<H5>  E. Research on multi-effect utilization of forest plant </H5>
resources. 
  1. Do R&amp;D on pulp and paper making technology for 
rapid-growing lumber, bamboo, forest region waste materials, 
bast fiber, and so on. Focus on research on rapid-growing 
timber, small diameter timber and branch pulp and paper making 
technology, and waste liquid recovery and processing technology, 
focus on pulp and paper making technology for bast fiber and 
other special paper, and increase the quality and fitness rates 
of paper pulp. Attain a forestry cardboard output of more than 1 
million tons by 2000 and more than 2 million tons by 2020. 
  2. Do research on new types of woody material resource 
production technology. Accelerate research and extension of 
forest energy resource processing, conversion, and utilization 
technology. Use firewood, waste material, and forest product 
industrial waste materials, dregs, and liquids in forest regions 
to develop new solid molded fuel processing technologies and 
produce commodity energy resources with a high unit volume heat 
value that are easy to transport and use, upgrade and extend new 
types of high efficiency waste-burning boilers, study timber 
gasification technology and utilization modes, and increase 
energy resource utilization rates and economic benefits. By the 
year 2000, try to provide 5 percent of the energy resources 
required by the three big forestry enterprises of artificial 
board, paper pulp, and sawn lumber, which means using 620,000 
cubic meters of waste lumber to replace 100,000 tons of standard 
coal, and provide part of the energy resources to develop the 
forest product industry in regions without coal. By 2020, try to 
provide more than 30 percent of the energy resources required by 
the three big forestry enterprises. China's vast agricultural 
and forestry regions currently burn up about 100 million cubic 
meters of timber resources. Extend high efficiency woody 
material energy resources and various types of energy-saving 
stoves to deal with 10 percent of this amount by the year 2000 
(conserving about 10 million cubic meters of burned timber a 
year) and more than 30 percent by 2020. 
  3. Study extracts from rosin and other trees and intensive 
processing technology for them, reform the product mix. 
Accelerate improvements in rosin processing technology, focus on 
improving rosin quality, and integrate with forestry pulp and 
paper making to develop floating oil rosin processing 
technology. Do research on production technology for modified 
rosins, shellacs, and other derivatives, achieve product variety 
systemization. Develop separation technology for turpentine and 
other refined oils, and increase the variety of all types of 
sizing material, perfumes, medicines, and other refined chemical 
products. Make refined rosin products comprise one third of the 
450,000 tons of total rosin output and exports account for 
one-half of the total volume of the world's rosin trade by 2000, 
and one-half total output of refined products by 2020. 
  4. Do research on developing new plant resources. Focus on 
research on perfume, medicinal, and edible forest plant 
resources. Do R&amp;D on using 5 to 10 types of new forest plant 
resources by 2000 and 30 to 50 types by 2020. 
  5. Do research on cash forest cultivation and processing and 
utilization technology. Focus on research on selective breeding 
of improved varieties and cultivation technologies for oil tea, 
tung oil, walnuts, Chinese chestnut, persimmon, jujube, desert 
sour jujube, Emblica officindlis Gaertn, Chinese tallow tree, 
raw lacquer, Chinese gall, and other cash forests and some 
fruits and berries, and on new replacement and upgrading and 
processing and utilization technologies, increase output and 
improve quality, and increase output by about 30 percent by the 
year 2000. Do research on storage, transportation, preservation, 
processing, and packaging technology for cash forest products 
and on intensive processing and comprehensive utilization 
technology for sideline products and leftovers, serve 
mountainous region development, increased product value, exports 
to earn foreign exchange, and improved results. Propose a series 
of appropriate technologies for product processing and 
comprehensive utilization by 2000. Move some superior quality 
products into the international market by 2020, increase their 
competitiveness and foreign exchange earnings capability. 
<H5>  F. Research on the application of soft science in forestry </H5>
science decision making and modernized management. 
  1. Research on forestry development strategies and policies. 
Do research on forestry development strategies and models and on 
development strategies and comprehensive programs to accelerate 
cultivation, reinforce protection, and rationally develop and 
utilize forest resources, research on directional cultivation of 
short-schedule industrial timber and processing and utilization 
technology systems, and on regional development strategies and 
strategies for developing economic diversification in forest 
regions. Do research on forestry economic policies, industrial 
policies, price policies, S&amp;T policies and input/output 
policies, and do research on forestry property systems. Propose 
comprehensive research reports on forestry development 
strategies and policies by 2000 and propose quantitative 
indicator systems by 2020. 
  2. Research on reform of the forestry system and management. 
Undertake research on dynamic analysis of reform of the forestry 
economic and S&amp;T systems and construction and reform 
development 
trends in foreign countries, and the goals, environment, and 
condition of reform, and research on forestry and forestry 
S&amp;T 
operational mechanisms. Do research on all categories of 
management (including skilled personnel, enterprises, 
administration, S&amp;T, information, economics, etc.), propose 
forestry and forestry S&amp;T system reform models by 2000. 
  3. Research on evaluation and countermeasures. Do research 
on 
forestry and forestry S&amp;T development evaluation indicator 
systems and research on comprehensive evaluation of forestry 
development, evaluating the implementation of major programs and 
policies, evaluating government decision making behavior, 
evaluating the economic results of extending and applying S&amp;T 
achievements, evaluating forestry economics and S&amp;T 
strengths, 
establishing and evaluating forestry information systems, and 
countermeasures and contingency systems for major forestry 
problems, and propose a multi-objective evaluation system by 
2000. 
<H5>  G. Forestry applied basic research. </H5>
  1. Research on the application of biotechnology in the realm 
of forestry. Lay a good foundation by 2000. Open up new tree 
breeding technologies and at least five monoploid cultivation 
technologies for use in afforestation and tree planting, 
selectively breed two to three improved varieties, and use 
sifting of somatic cell mutations to select four to five new 
varieties. Apply genetic recombination technology to make 
important breakthroughs in the areas of developing microbial 
insecticides and lignin degrading enzymes. Do research on 
technologies to supply protein feeds from forestry production 
residues such as wood chips, twigs, fiberboard production waste 
water, and so on. Use wood and plant cell suspension cultivation 
to produce saponin, organic soda, pigments, and so on. Develop 
in depth from 2000 to 2020 and make important breakthroughs in 
particular in the areas of cultivating new varieties, shortening 
tree growth schedules, producing protein feeds, and so on. 
  2. Research on forest ecology systems. Establish 20 forest 
ecology positioning stations throughout China in different 
climatic zones by 2000, develop research on the forces of 
production in forest ecology systems, research on system 
structures, functions, and comprehensive benefits, and research 
on the role of systems in maintaining dynamic equilibrium in the 
geosphere and biosphere and on the effects of human social and 
economic activity on them and countermeasures. Undertake 
research on atmosphere pollution, especially the decline of 
forests due to acid rain. By 2020, perfect ecological quotas, 
regulations, and standards to regulate the use of forest 
resources and protect the ecology and environment and on its 
harmful impacts. 
  3. Research on basic problems related to forestry. Do 
research on forestry genetics, tree growth and development 
mechanisms and control technologies, tree water content 
physiology and soil water and fertility supply and demand 
mechanisms, tree photosynthetic respiration and metabolism 
routes, paragenetic nitrogen-fixing microorganisms and 
bacteriorhizae, the material properties of lumber, fluid 
dynamics and engineering dynamics, tree chemical reaction 
mechanisms and catalysis mechanisms, and so on, enter the 
applications stage by 2000 and integrate with applied research 
by 2020 to gradually form forces of production. 
<H5>  Water Conservancy </H5>
  Water is an important material foundation on which mankind 
depends for its existence and production, one of our nation's 
main resources, and an important factor that can promote or 
restrict economic and social development. 
  China has many rivers and vast bodies of water, abundant 
hydraulic resources, great hydropower and water-borne transport 
development potential, and a long history of magnificent 
achievements in water conservancy construction and preventing 
water disasters. However, our water resources are very low in 
amounts available per capita and several cities in the north 
China region and coastal areas have increasingly serious water 
shortages and water pollution. Added to the extremely uneven 
temporal and spatial distributions of our precipitation, there 
are frequent rains and waterlogging alternating with droughts. 
The flood prevention capabilities of our rivers vary widely and 
flood disasters are still serious threats to social and economic 
development. Moreover, there is serious soil erosion in the 
upstream regions and riverbed silting in downstream regions of 
several rivers that exacerbate the dangers of flooding. For this 
reason, a high degree of attention to water conservancy 
construction is a major topic that China is facing. 
<H5>  I. Development Strategies and Objectives </H5>
<H5>  A. Development objectives for the water conservancy industry </H5>
in the year 2000. 
  1. Establish a scientific system for water resource 
management, formulate and perfect laws, regulations, policies, 
and management systems related to water, strengthen modernized 
management facilities. 
  2. Consolidate and improve flood prevention capabilities on 
our seven biggest rivers. We should adopt effective 
countermeasures in key river segments and key cities on the 
middle and lower reaches of the Chang Jiang, Huang He, Huai He, 
Hai He, Songhua Jiang, Liao He, and Zhu Jiang to raise flood 
resistant standards up to the biggest floods that have occurred 
during this century. 
  3. Achieve a preliminary lessening of water shortage 
problems 
in north China and key cities. Increase total annual water 
supplies to industry and agriculture throughout China from the 
present 470 billion cubic meters to 510 billion cubic meters 
and, in accordance with the principle of comprehensively 
reducing expenditures and appropriate broadening sources of 
income along with reinforcing conservation in water use and 
planned water use, focus on building several water source 
projects such as diverting the Huang He into Shanxi, diverting 
the Huang He into Baiyangdian, diverting the Huang He into 
Qingdao, the eastern line for diverting water from southern to 
northern China, and other multi-basin water diversion projects 
and a small number of key water impoundment projects to 
compensate for inadequate water sources in northern China while 
at the same time actively resolving the problems of rural areas 
with water source difficulties and drinking water for people and 
livestock in pastoral regions. 
  4. Strengthen farmland drought resistance and waterlogging 
elimination capabilities, newly develop an irrigated area of 80 
million mu, increase and improve a drainage area of 40 million 
mu. 
  5. Develop the hydroelectric power industry. Develop our 
hydropower installed generating capacity from the present 
30,190MW to 80,000MW, including development of small-scale 
hydropower in rural areas from 11,000MW to 22,000MW. 
  6. Develop the water-borne transportation industry. Focus on 
building shipping channels on the Chang Jiang, Zhu Jiang, 
Heilong Jiang, Huai He, Beijing-Hanzhou Canal, and other trunks, 
extend the high-grade shipping channel course for 300 to 500 ton 
and larger vessels by a factor of almost one. Use improvement of 
the mouths of the Chang Jiang and Zhu Jiang to increase water 
depths and raise the maritime freight passage grade. 
  7. Develop the aquaculture industry. Attain a reservoir 
aquaculture breeding area of 24 million mu. 
  8. Gain preliminary control of water pollution on primary 
rivers and attain an area of 750,000 square kilometers for soil 
erosion control. 
<H5>  B. Water conservancy development objectives for 2020 </H5>
  Based on the need for further development of our national 
economy, achieve a universal increase in flood prevention 
standards on large rivers that can prevent the biggest floods 
that have occurred during this century, and focus on the ability 
to prevent floods that occur at a frequency of once every 100 
years in key cities; attain 160,000MW in hydropower development 
and utilization; attain a farmland irrigation area of 900 
million mu and basically control the easily waterlogged area; 
basically control water source pollution; further control soil 
erosion; make new developments in water-borne transportation, 
aquaculture, and other industries. Coordinate water source 
development and utilization with social and economic development 
and ecological and environmental development. 
<H5>  II. Focal Tasks and Key Technologies </H5>
  To achieve the above development objectives for the water 
conservancy industry, along with increasing material inputs and 
increasing and improving engineering equipment, fully rely on 
science and technology, use technical progress and scientific 
management as a pillar, and fully foster the benefits of 
improving resources and engineering equipment. The focus of 
water conservancy S&amp;T development is on preventing flooding, 
waterlogging, and drought disasters, developing and utilizing 
water resources, conserving water use, improving results in 
water conservancy, improving the water conservancy environment, 
and other important problems, undertaking research ranging from 
macro decision making to key technical measures, and providing a 
scientific foundation for developing water conservancy to meet 
our national economic and social development requirements. 
<H5>  A. Flood control on rivers </H5>
  1. Countermeasures and important technical problems related 
to effectively controlling normal floods and the biggest floods 
that have occurred on key river segments during this century, 
resisting huge floods, urban flood control, and so on. 
  2. Water quality and working conditions forecasting, flood 
monitoring and warning devices, rapid information processing 
facilities, and modernized flood control dispatching technology; 
precipitation forecasting technologies, especially for 
rainstorms, increased projection periods and accuracy of flood 
predictions. 
  3. Safe construction of floodwater impoundment regions, the 
question of rational utilization of land and readjustment of 
production structures. 
  4. Flood disaster control and prevention in mountainous 
regions and hilly regions and technical measures for dealing 
urban flooding from rains. 
  5. Compile national flood prevention protection region risk 
maps, flood avoidance evacuation implementation programs, and so 
on. 
  6. Tactics and measures to reduce losses from flood 
disasters. 
<H5>  B. Water resource development, utilization, and management. </H5>
  1. Water resource comprehensive development deployments and 
industrial and mining enterprise deployments, urban development 
scale optimization and coordination. 
  2. Balanced supply and demand and countermeasures for 
national water resources and water resources in primary cities 
of north China, northwest China, northeast China, and along the 
coast. 
  3. Multi-basin water diversion and key water impoundment 
project technical, economic, and environmental comprehensive 
demonstrations and their key technologies. 
  4. Rainwater, surface water, and groundwater ``three 
waters'' 
conversion laws; using underground reservoirs for regulation of 
water resources and artificial groundwater replenishment 
technologies. 
  5. Seawater utilization and desalinization technology; 
artificial rainfall enhancement technology; saltwater upgrading 
and utilization technology. 
  6. Water resource management models and optimized 
dispatching 
technology. 
  7. Urban and rural water supply technology. 
<H5>  C. Hydroelectric power generation. </H5>
  1. Hydraulic resource system planning theory; large and 
medium-sized hydropower station and cascade hydropower station 
cluster optimized development sequences and optimum parameters; 
hydropower station static and dynamic economic benefits analysis 
and key technologies in project construction; comprehensive 
development and utilization technology integrated with large and 
medium-sized hydropower stations (see the Energy Resource Medium 
and Long-Term Science and Technology Development Program for 
details). 
  2. Using new technologies in rural small-scale hydropower to 
reduce project costs and replacement and upgrading of existing 
hydropower stations. 
  3. Standardization, systemization, and model spectrum 
development for water turbine generators and electromechanical 
products. 
<H5>  D. Farmland water conservancy </H5>
  1. New irrigation technology; new electromechanical 
irrigation and drainage technology centered on energy 
conservation; wind powered, hydraulic, solar powered, and other 
new water-lifting equipment. 
  2. Technical upgrading in irrigation regions; irrigation 
silt 
treatment technology for diversion of the Huang He in the lower 
reaches of the Huang He. 
  3. Waterlogged and marshy low-output field water conservancy 
improvement technology; soil salinization-alkalinization 
prevention technology and water salinity monitoring and 
forecasting technology. 
  4. Water conservancy technology for key agricultural 
development regions, the Huang-Huai-Hai and San Jiang Plains, 
and so on; high-lift irrigation in northwest China; tropical 
crop irrigation and beach development and utilization, and so on. 
  5. Pastoral region water conservancy and drinking water 
technical measures for people and livestock in water-short 
regions. 
<H5>  E. Water conservancy environment, water source protection, </H5>
water and soil preservation. 
  1. The impact of human activity on the aquatic environment; 
the mutual effects of water conservancy project construction and 
the ecology and environment; assessment of the environmental 
impact of water projects; land water nutrient enrichment 
development laws and improvement measures; urban water 
conservancy environmental problems; regional economic 
development and water resource protection measures; 
environmental impacts following multi-basin water diversion and 
regional water resource reallocation and countermeasures. 
  2. Laws of conversion of water-borne pollutants; standards 
for controlling the total amount of pollutants and controlling 
their concentration; water quality monitoring and comprehensive 
pollution treatment technologies; rational exploitation and 
protection of groundwater resources (see the part on the 
Environment, Ecology, and Social Development Program for 
details). 
  3. Planning and comprehensive improvement of different 
categories of water and soil preservation regions and small 
river basins; technical standards for water and soil 
preservation, macro dynamic monitoring of water loss and soil 
erosion and the ecology and environment. 
<H5>  F. Water-borne transportation. </H5>
  Interior river shipping channel network programs, optimized 
deployment demonstrations, and benefits evaluation; improvement 
technologies for meandering shipping channels; the impact of 
high dams and large reservoirs on upstream and downstream 
shipping channels and improvement measures; comprehensive 
improvement countermeasures to increase shipping channel water 
depths at the mouths of the Chang Jiang, Zhu Jiang, and other 
major rivers. 
<H5>  G. Water-saving technology. </H5>
  1. Standards, models, and implementation policies for 
water-saving agriculture, water-saving industry, and 
water-saving society. 
  2. Water-saving crop irrigation systems; farmland irrigation 
technology; farmland rainfall and soil water utilization and 
preservation, new materials to inhibit evaporation of soil 
water; utilization of recovered water in irrigation regions. 
  3. Economical utilization and reutilization technology for 
industrial water; conversion of industrial polluted water to a 
resource and its recovery and utilization. 
  4. City and town water supply standards and water-saving 
facilities and measures. 
  5. Water price policies. 
<H5>  H. Hydraulic project construction. </H5>
  1. Basic characteristics of tall earth and rock dam 
structural materials and seepage stabilization and control; 
characteristics of concrete in tall concrete dams, high dam body 
types, stress, and strain and its optimization; concrete-faced 
rock-fill dams, rolled concrete dams, directional blasting for 
rock-fill dams, and other dam structure technologies; high dam 
floodwater discharge energy dissipation technology. 
  2. Analysis of the stability and deformation of high dams on 
complex bases; leakage prevention and consolidation processing 
of thick capping strata and karst regions; dam base and side 
slope destabilization and damage mechanisms and safety 
improvement technologies; grouting design theory, materials, and 
techniques. 
  3. The stability of rock surrounding large underground 
chambers; ground stress fields and the engineering geology 
characteristics of deeply buried long tunnels; rock explosion 
forecasting and prevention; interaction of underground chamber 
linings with surrounding rock, role and design of anchor sprayed 
structures; rapid excavation comprehensive construction 
technology for chambers; soft rock and soil body hole (or pipe 
passageway) formation technology. 
  4. Intersecting engineering technology in multi-basin water 
diversion; leakage prevention and collapse prevention technology 
for open water transmission canals. 
  5. Earthquake resistance technology for hydraulic structures 
in earthquake regions; anti-freezing technology for hydraulic 
structures in frozen regions; engineering and construction 
technology for marsh regions. 
  6. Mechanization of project construction. 
  7. New engineering materials. 
  8. Dealing with reservoir inundation, resettlement 
arrangements and environmental capacity, questions of 
resettlement compensation standards and developmental 
resettlement. 
<H5>  I. Hydraulic project management. </H5>
  1. Large dam and slope danger elimination consolidation 
technology, construction techniques, and equipment. 
  2. Hydraulic project detection and hydraulic structure 
safety 
monitoring technology; development of instruments and gauges and 
their systemization and standardization, slope and dam hidden 
danger detection technology. 
  3. Hydraulic project durability and anti-aging technology; 
engineering maintenance and river channel controlled guidance 
project replacement technology. 
  4. Rust prevention and corrosion prevention for metallic 
structures and their components. 
  5. Comprehensive utilization and management in reservoir 
fishery and water conservancy projects. 
<H5>  J. Huang He improvement and basin development. </H5>
  1. Huang He basin socioeconomic development trends and 
development and improvement strategies. Water conservancy 
economic development models for different types of regions; 
development prospects for downstream river channels and analysis 
and demonstration of future solutions. 
  2. Observation research on water and silt changes in the 
Huang He and laws of changes in water and soil loss in 
geological and geomorphological evolution processes, 
establishment of water current and silt digital models. 
  3. Research on flood control and icing prevention 
countermeasures in the lower reaches of the Huang He and on 
river channel silt reduction in the lower reaches. Modern flood 
control communications and dispatching command systems; flood 
control administrations and prevention countermeasures in the 
lower reaches; silt prevention and accumulation reduction 
measures. 
  4. Research on water resource utilization and water resource 
protection in the Huang He basin, research on water resource 
economic models; research on water-saving technology; runoff 
regulation and optimized dispatching in the upper, middle, and 
lower reaches; water pollution prevention countermeasures and 
water quality monitoring and forecasting. 
  5. Reach on the Huang He ecology and environment. 
  6. Rational development and utilization of loess plateau 
land 
resources and water and soil preservation and wind prevention, 
sand consolidation technology. 
  7. Research on improvement of the mouth of the Huang He and 
comprehensive development of its delta. 
<H5>  K. Chang Jiang improvement and basin development. </H5>
  1. Water and soil preservation in the upper reaches of the 
Chang Jiang and river channel improvement in the middle and 
lower reaches; lake region improvement; research on 
comprehensive development of water resources on the trunk and 
tributaries and on long-range flood control strategies. 
  2. Research on flood control on the Chang Jiang and 
improving 
the flood control benefits of the Three Gorges project. 
  3. Research on silt laws at the Three Gorges project and 
their impact on river potential in the middle and lower reaches 
of the Chang Jiang and their relationship to river and lake 
evolution. 
  4. Geological problems in the Three Gorges project reservoir 
and dam regions and environmental geology issues. 
  5. Developmental resettlement in the Three Gorges project 
and 
its impact on the ecology and environment; economic analysis of 
the Three Gorges project. 
  6. Comprehensive improvement and comprehensive development 
technology for the mouth of the Chang Jiang. 
<H5>  L. Water conservancy applied basic research. </H5>
  1. The occurrence and evolutionary characteristics and basic 
laws of flood, waterlogging, and drought disasters. 
  2. Farmland waterlogging disaster occurrence laws and water 
salt movement laws. 
  3. Water loss and soil erosion laws and soil erosion moduli. 
  4. Silt movement mechanisms and riverbed evolution and river 
mouth problems. 
  5. High speed current characteristics; non-constant flow and 
turbulent flow theory. 
  6. Soil static and dynamic state basic properties and basic 
theories. 
  7. Rock (body) basic mechanical properties and deformation 
and destruction mechanisms. 
  8. Concrete fracturing theory and strength theory. 
  9. Hydraulic machinery optimized design computation methods 
and the impact of sand-carrying flows on hydraulic machinery. 
  10. Comprehensive research on hydraulic project safety, 
benefits, and risks. 
  11. The regional ecological and environmental impact of 
hydraulic projects. 
  12. Macro decision making and demonstration methods for 
hydraulic projects. 
<H5>  M. Research on water conservancy development strategies. </H5>
  1. Water conservancy economic theory; water conservancy 
technology policies and water conservancy economic policies. 
  2. Water management systems and scientific water law and 
regulation systems matched to the ``Water Law''. 
  3. Models for coordination of water resource development and 
utilization with national economic development. 
  4. The relationships of water disasters to forests, water 
resources to forests, and basin improvement and forests. 
<H5>  Energy Resources </H5>
  Energy resources are a strategic focus of China's economic 
and social development in the present stage. China's 
industrialization is far from completed, and for a relatively 
long time the development of basic industry and communication 
and transportation, which consume large amounts of energy, will 
be a prerequisite for economic growth. For us to rely on 7 
percent of the world's cultivated land to improve food supplies 
for 22 percent of the world's population, we must invest large 
amounts of energy resources to achieve agricultural 
modernization. People's household consumption is an embodiment 
of the ultimate utilization of energy resources. In modern 
society, per capita energy consumption to attain a relatively 
prosperous life is about 1.5 tons of standard coal. For this 
reason, the prospects for China's modernization depend to a 
substantial extent on adequate supplies and effective 
utilization of energy resources. Thus, we should give them full 
attention. 
<H5>  I. Development Strategies and Objectives </H5>
<H5>  A. Development strategies </H5>
  1. Year 2000 
  --Combine development and conservation. By 2000, strive to 
attain 1.4 billion tons of standard coal in primary energy 
resource output; attain power output of 1.2 trillion kWh; 
achieve an annual energy conservation rate of 3.5 percent in 
industrial departments. 
  --Strive to improve the energy resource structure and 
deployment. 
  --Energy development and utilization should focus on 
electric 
power, make coal the foundation, actively develop petroleum and 
natural gas, and make major efforts to develop hydraulic 
resources to develop hydropower and develop nuclear power in a 
planned manner. Rely on S&amp;T, increase energy resource 
production 
and utilization efficiency and utilization of renewable energy 
resources. 
  --Encourage energy conservation. Strengthen energy resource 
scientific management; push forward with technical upgrading to 
conserve energy. 
  --Achieve a preliminary reversal in urban atmospheric 
pollution caused by burning large amounts of coal and ecological 
vicious cycles caused by excessive consumption of energy from 
organic matter in rural areas. 
  2. Year 2020 
  --Form an energy resource system that has a more rational 
structure and deployment and higher production and utilization 
efficiency. Establish large-scale coal-power and 
coal-power-chemical industry base areas. 
  --Develop oil and gas on a large scale in western China and 
offshore and the coal resources of Shanxi, Shaanxi, Inner 
Mongolia, and other regions. 
  --Develop hydraulic resources on a large scale on the trunk 
and tributaries of the Chang Jiang, Huang He, Hongshui He, 
Lancang Jiang, and so on. 
  --Make a major effort to develop nuclear power, natural gas, 
coal-based synthetic fuels, and new energy resources. 
  --Basically solve the energy resource problems of rural 
areas, achieve rural electrification. 
<H5>  B. Science and technology strategic foci. </H5>
  The development of energy S&amp;T must begin with China's 
energy 
resource characteristics and create new forces of production to 
satisfy demand for energy resources from economic growth and 
improvements in the people's lives. The strategic foci are: 
  1. Strengthen the energy resource S&amp;T research and 
development system, improve our own R&amp;D capabilities and our 
imported technology digestion, absorption, and innovation 
capabilities, increase technical reserves; use new technology to 
upgrade the energy resource industry and high energy consumption 
industry, substantially increase energy resource production and 
utilization efficiency and economic benefits. 
  2. Make a major effort to develop new power generation, 
power 
supply, and power utilization technology, promote national 
electrification. Rationally develop and utilize coal resources, 
develop safe and high efficiency new coal mining technology and 
coal processing, combustion, and conversion technology. 
  3. Develop civilian nuclear power technology and new 
petroleum, natural gas, and hydropower exploration and 
development technology, improve the energy resource structure 
and deployment. 
  4. Develop new energy resources and rural energy resource 
technology, fully utilize local energy resources, establish a 
rural energy resource system that uses multiple types of energy 
resources for mutual supplementation. Develop economical and 
appropriate new energy resources and renewable energy resource 
technology, and form a new energy resource industry. 
  5. Develop energy resource environmental technology. The 
focus is on R&amp;D on clean coal technology, nuclear safety 
technology, and rural ecological and environmental technology. 
<H5>  C. Strategic objectives. </H5>
  1. Adopt new technologies and modern management technology 
to 
upgrade the energy resource industry. 
  Year 2000: Attain international levels of the 1980's for 
about 50 percent of the primary technical equipment in the 
energy resource industry. Basically obtain complete sets of 
equipment used in large amounts and over large areas from 
domestic sources and move some technologies and equipment into 
the international market. Increase labor productivity in the 
energy resource industry by 30 percent compared to 1980. 
  Year 2020: Attain international levels of that time for some 
technical equipment, reduce the lag of technical levels for most 
equipment to about 10 years. Be capable of doing our own 
development and manufacturing of large complete sets of 
equipment. 
  2. Promote industrial energy conservation technology. 
  Year 2000: Increase the average efficiency of primary energy 
consuming new equipment products by 3 to 5 percent, increase the 
proportion of energy-saving equipment to 20 percent. 
  Year 2020: Attain international levels at the time for the 
efficiency of some energy-consuming equipment. Complete 
technical upgrading for energy conservation in large and 
medium-sized enterprises. 
  3. Develop new coal extraction and utilization technology. 
  Year 2000: Solve technical problems of hard-to-mine coal 
seams and deep coal seams. Increase the degree of centralization 
in mine production, develop fully mechanized mining equipment at 
the 10,000 tons per day grade and the associated tunneling 
technology and equipment. Gain a basic understanding of safety 
technology to control horrible accidents in mines. Reduce the 
accidental death rate per 1 million tons to 1 in unified 
distribution coal mines, 3 in local state-run mines, and 5 in 
township and town mines. Attain a degree of mechanization in 
extraction and tunneling of 75 percent in unified distribution 
coal mines (including 42 percent in fully mechanized mining), 35 
to 40 percent in local state-run mines, and 15 to 20 percent in 
township and town mines. Develop mining technology and complete 
sets of equipment for 10 million ton grade strip mines, increase 
the proportion of output from strip mines among unified 
distribution coal mines to 12 percent. Gain an understanding of 
coal dressing technology and coal dressing plant automation 
technology at different levels, carry out mechanized processing 
for all raw coal produced in unified distribution coal mines. 
Complete coal-water slurry, circulating fluidized bed, and goal 
gasification combined cycle experimental power plants and 
demonstration plants for methanol produced from coal, shaping 
and pyrolyzation of material extracted from brown coal, combined 
refining of coal and oil, and so on, and gain an understanding 
of new technologies for coal gasification in medium-sized and 
small cities. 
  Year 2020: Begin using robots and artificial intelligence 
technology in underground coal mining, develop remote sensing 
and automation technology, complete research and experiments on 
automated coal extraction work faces and underground coal 
gasification. Wash all coal that should be dressed. Achieve 
large-scale commercial application of coal-based synthetic fuel 
technology. 
  4. Develop new oil and gas exploration and development 
technologies. 
  Year 2000: Solve problems related to improving recovery 
rates 
in late periods of development in old oil fields in eastern 
China. Form matching technologies for exploring and developing 
complex and unusual oil and gas pools and condensed oil pools. 
Gain an understanding of primary oil and gas exploration, 
development, and centralized transmission technologies for 
desert regions, shallow seas, beaches, and offshore areas. 
Approach international levels at the time for primary 
technologies in oil and gas exploration and development. 
  Year 2020: Form a technological system to increase ultimate 
recovery rates that is adapted to the characteristics of China's 
oil and gas pools. Gain an understanding of matching oil and gas 
exploration, development, and centralized transmission 
technologies for desert zones, offshore areas, and mountainous 
areas of southern China as well as internationally competitive 
oil and gas exploration and development technology. 
  5. Improve the reliability, quality, and economy of power 
supplies. 
  Year 2000: For power supply quality, attain a cycle 
deviation 
of 50 plus/minus 0.1 Hz in primary power grids. Attain the 
requirements in the ``National Power Supply and Use Program'' 
for voltage deviations for urban users, adopt high parameter and 
large capacity thermal power generators, attain the availability 
levels of similar generators in foreign countries for large 
generators placed into operation during the 1990's, reduce 
consumption of standard coal to supply power in 2000 to 380 
g/kWh at thermal power plants and reduce coal consumption to 
supply power to 330 g/kWh in the newly installed generating 
capacity in large power grids. Establish equipment and grid 
fault diagnosis and monitoring systems. Digest imported 600MW 
super-critical generators, gain an understanding of ultra-high 
voltage power transmission technology in frigid, high elevation, 
and salty and cloudy regions. 
  Year 2020: Regarding power supply reliability, attain a 
total 
annual power outage time of no more than 10 hours. For power 
supply quality, attain a cycle deviation of 50 plus/minus 0.5 Hz 
and a user voltage deviation of plus/minus 5 percent. Further 
improve generator availability rates. Reduce consumption of 
standard coal to supply power to 360 g/kWh. Gain an 
understanding of 30 MPa steam parameter GW grade super-critical 
generators and 1 GV extra-high voltage power transmission 
technology. 
  6. Develop new hydropower technology. 
  Year 2000: Gain an understanding of advanced technology for 
key hydropower stations on the upper reaches of the Huang He, 
the trunk and tributaries of the upper and middle reaches of the 
Chang Jiang, and the Wu Jiang, Hongshui He, and Lancang Jiang, 
redevelopment technology and power generation ahead of schedule, 
technology for existing hydropower stations, pumped storage 
technology, and variable frequency power generation and low 
water level power generation technology. Adopt new technologies 
to reduce construction costs, shorten construction schedules, 
and increase generator efficiency at hydropower stations. 
  Year 2020: Gain an understanding of the technology for 
construction of large and huge hydropower stations under unique 
and complex natural conditions and large water turbine generator 
and pumped storage generator manufacturing technology. 
  7. Develop nuclear power technology. 
  Year 2000: Gain an understanding of pressurized-water 
nuclear 
power plant technology using 600MW as the primary series and 
advanced nuclear fuel cycle technology. Develop 900MW and 
1,200MW advanced pressurized-water reactors. Do research on 
inherently safe high-temperature gas-cooled reactors and 
pressurized swimming pool-type pressurized water reactors. 
Complete the low-temperature heat supply demonstration reactor. 
  Year 2020: Gain an understanding of inherently safe 
pressurized-water reactors, gain an understanding of and extend 
low-temperature heat supply and heat and power cogeneration 
reactors, do research on and gain an understanding of commercial 
fast neutron breeder reactor and modular high-temperature 
gas-cooled reactor technology and nuclear waste storage and 
nuclear facility retirement technology. 
  8. Develop new energy resources and rural energy resource 
technology. 
  Year 2000: Popularize wood and coal-saving stoves. Increase 
the average thermal efficiency of rural household stoves to 20 
percent. Accelerate electrification. Develop wind power, solar 
power, marine power, hydrogen energy, and other new energy 
resource technologies, improve all types of scattered 
small-scale new energy resource technologies, improve the 
quality and economy of equipment and systems, form a new energy 
resource industry. 
  Year 2020: Basically resolve agricultural production, 
township and town industry, and rural resident household energy 
use problems, achieve rural electrification. Attain 
international levels for small-scale new energy resource 
technology. Gain an understanding of large-scale new energy 
resource development and utilization technology. 
  9. Develop energy resource environmental technology. 
  Year 2000: Solve problems with economical and effective coal 
desulfurization technology, low-pollution fuel technology, and 
coal burning equipment pollutant discharge control technology. 
Gain an understanding of technologies for preventing the 
environmental impact of coal mining on land, the atmosphere, 
water sources, and so on and offshore safe oil extraction 
technology, and establish a nuclear safety technology system. 
  Year 2020: Basically resolve problems related to technology 
for prevention of environmental damage from energy resource 
production and utilization. 
  10. Strengthen energy resource S&amp;T development 
capabilities. 
  Year 2000: Increase annual inputs of energy resource 
industry 
scientific research funds at a rate that exceeds growth in the 
value of output. Improve the quality of all categories of 
personnel, train several S&amp;T personnel at international 
levels. 
Complete several scientific research base areas, laboratories, 
and experimental base areas at international levels. 
  Year 2020: Enable S&amp;T development capabilities to 
satisfy 
energy resource development requirements. 
<H5>  II. Focal Tasks and Key Technologies </H5>
<H5>  A. Energy conservation technology. </H5>
  Do research on advanced thermal power technology; surplus 
energy recovery and utilization technology, heat pump 
technology; industrial boiler, kiln, and oven energy 
conservation technology; wind-powered generator and water pump 
system optimized and matching energy conservation upgrading 
technology and other energy conservation technology for 
general-purpose electromechanical products; petroleum and 
petrochemical enterprise system energy conservation technology; 
electrical and electronic energy conservation construction and 
AC speed regulation technology; new types of electric lighting 
sources; household appliance energy conservation technology. 
  Extend heat and power cogeneration; continuous steel casting 
and rolling, aluminum oxide integrated method production, 
outside-the-kiln cement decomposition dry method production, wet 
method chemical fiber spinning, continuous boil-off papermaking, 
and other new industrial technologies; hollow-core bricks and 
new types of wall materials; heat insulation materials; new 
energy-saving technology for vehicles and boats; coal shaping 
and high efficiency stoves. 
  Establish an energy resource management information system; 
implement enterprise energy resource balance standards and 
energy resource audits; do research on energy-saving structure 
technology; develop advanced energy resource measurement gauges 
and energy-consuming equipment automatic control devices. 
<H5>  B. Technical upgrading in existing energy resource </H5>
enterprises. 
  Solve problems with deep coal seam exploration technology in 
old mining regions of east China; improve the reliability and 
economy of existing coal mine extraction and tunneling 
equipment; optimize mine opening deployments, rationally 
centralize production; improve coal extraction technology, 
support technology, and auxiliary transportation equipment; 
perfect mine disaster prevention technology and communications 
systems; do research on extraction technologies for use 
underneath villages, underwater, and in karst water, and surface 
facility protection technology; solve problems with open-cut 
mine ventilation, transportation, and stope technology; do 
research on appropriate technology for integrated upgrading of 
township and town coal mines. 
  Do research on oil and gas distribution laws, 
three-dimensional seismic technology, and new exploratory 
drilling technology for complex fault-blocks and concealed oil 
and gas pools in old oil regions of east China; technology for 
improving ultimate recovery rates in late period of development 
in old oil fields, including: oil pool development seismic 
technology, oil pool digital simulation technology, oil field 
secondary development and readjustment technology, thin oil 
strata and thick oil strata output increasing technology, 
extraction technology for low permeability oil pools, dense oil 
pools, and unique oil and gas pools, tertiary oil extraction 
technology, horizontal drilling technology, and gas exploration 
and development technology for shallow seas with water depths 
less than 5 meters and on beaches. 
  Technology to extend lifespans, improve performance, and 
exploit potential in existing large capacity thermal power 
generators; technology for shifting from oil burning to coal 
burning; technology for upgrading, exploitation of potential, 
capacity expansion, and additional functions at hydropower 
stations; technology to upgrade urban power grids. 
<H5>  C. New coal extraction technology. </H5>
  Do research on mine pressure, rock destruction mechanisms, 
and other mining engineering sciences, overall optimization of 
mine designs and computer-aided design technology, extraction 
techniques and technical equipment for deep mines and 
hard-to-mine coal seams, computer control and automation 
technology for fully-mechanized coal mining equipment and 
systems, and mine small geological structures detection 
measures. Mine auxiliary transportation equipment series. 
Fully-mechanized mining equipment with daily outputs of 10,000 
tons, increase the lifespans and reliability of mining and 
tunnelling equipment components. Develop design and 
manufacturing technologies for large strip mine extraction 
techniques and complete sets of equipment and strip mine slope 
monitoring and handling technology. Perfect vertical shaft, rock 
passageway, and half-coal half-rock passageway tunneling 
equipment, develop new types of large diameter, large depth 
drilling rig assemblies and remote sensing counter-drilling 
drilling rigs to complete shafts greater than 70 meters. Solve 
problems with dynamic pressure, soft rock, and large chamber 
support technology as well as new steel and timber-conserving 
support technology. 
  Year 2020: Develop artificial intelligence industrial robots 
for use in mines. Establish computer monitored and controlled 
automatic mines and commercial underground coal gasification 
stations. 
<H5>  D. Coal mine safety technology. </H5>
  On a foundation of gaining an understanding of the natural 
laws of all types of disasters in mines, especially deep mines, 
establish safety protection systems. Do research on prediction 
and forecasting methods and equipment, multifunction mine 
environment monitoring and control systems and warning and 
communications systems. Do research on improving gas pumping and 
exhaust rates and single coal seam gas pumping and exhaust 
technology, and on coal and gas eruption and carbon dioxide 
eruption prevention technology. Perfect comprehensive dust 
prevention technology. Do research on effective drugs for 
pneumoconiosis pathology. Do research on comprehensive mine fire 
prevention and mining region surface coal fire control 
technology. Do research on comprehensive mine high-temperature 
prevention technology. Establish modern coal mine rescue 
systems. Develop advanced self-rescue and mine disaster rescue 
expedition technology and equipment. 
  Year 2020: Gain an understanding of comprehensive technology 
for controlling mine accidents and advanced mine expedition and 
emergency rescue technology. 
<H5>  E. Clean coal technology. </H5>
  Do research on coal product mix optimization and the 
combustion characteristics of power coal. Develop large open-cut 
mine coal dressing, water-short mining region dry method coal 
dressing, and deep ash removal and desulfurization technology, 
increase automation levels in coal dressing plants. Do research 
on effective powdered coal and coal slurry utilization 
technology. New coal shaping technology and matching stoves, 
lignite material extraction, rapid pyrolysis, and no-bonding 
agent shaping technology. Coal-water mixture preparation, 
pipeline transmission, and combustion technology. Advanced power 
plant conventional pulverized coal boiler technology, 
fluidized-bed combustion technology, coal gasification combined 
cycle power generation technology. Two-stage coal gasification, 
pulverized coal fluidized-bed gasification, and other coal 
gasification technology. Liquid fuels produced from coal, coal 
and oil co-refining and new coal chemistry technology. 
  Year 2020: Extend and apply the above new technologies, gain 
an understanding of coal-based fuel cells and 
magnetohydrodynamic power generation technology. 
<H5>  F. Environmental protection technology in energy resource </H5>
production. 
  Do research on economical and effective coal-burning 
equipment pollutant discharge control technology and power plant 
ash and waste water, coal mine gangue and coal slurry water 
treatment and utilization technology. Mine cave-in regions and 
strip mine emptied extraction region land restoration 
technology, mine water purification technology, and technology 
for preventing pollution from hazardous elements in coal. Oil 
field contaminated water treatment and utilization technology, 
offshore oil extraction pollution prevention technology, 
typhoon-prone marine region safe oil extraction technology. 
Ultra-high voltage power transmission safety technology, 
hydropower project ecological and environmental assessment and 
prevention technology. Nuclear facility safety and environmental 
protection technology, labor protection technology in energy 
resource industry production. 
<H5>  G. Energy resource exploration and development technology </H5>
for west China. 
  Do research on advanced comprehensive exploration technology 
for western coal fields, water-short and water-rich mining 
region hydrogeology and water resource evaluation and 
exploration technology. Coal field development technology for 
regions with large amounts of wind-blown sand and arid regions. 
Seismic exploration technology for oil and gas pools in the 
central parts of the deserts of west China. Ultradeep and 
cluster-type well drilling technology and oil extraction 
technology. Condensed oil and gas field, high-pressure gas 
field, and carbonate rock oil field development technology. 
Desert zone oil and gas field surface structures and centralized 
oil and gas transmission technology. New hydraulic energy 
exploration and development technology and technology for 
transmitting power from west to east China. 
  Year 2020: Adopt new technologies for large-scale 
development 
of the energy resources of western China. 
<H5>  H. Offshore oil and gas exploration and development </H5>
technology. 
  Develop offshore petroleum geology theory for China. Do 
research on the oil and gas distribution laws of important 
petroliferous basins. Open up new realms for oil and gas 
exploration. Do research on new offshore geophysical prospecting 
technology. Comprehensively improve drilling technology, 
numerical controlled logging technology, and oil pool evaluation 
technology. Do research on offshore oil and gas pool development 
project optimization technology, develop simple, portable, 
reusable, and more economical production facilities, develop 
deepwater oil and gas field exploration and development 
technology. 
  Year 2020: Comprehensively develop new offshore oil and gas 
exploration technology, improve the efficiency of geophysical 
prospecting data collecting, processing, and interpretation. 
Gain an understanding of new deepwater oil and gas field 
exploration and development technology and high-temperature 
high-pressure drilling technology. Adopt advanced extraction 
technology. Improve economic results in offshore oil and gas 
production. 
<H5>  I. Natural gas exploration and development technology. </H5>
  Do research on gas pool formation conditions and gas field 
distribution laws, improve natural gas resource evaluation 
methods. Do research on shallow strata and deep gas pool 
seismic, drilling, logging, and gas testing technology; 
extraction technology for all types of gas pools and stable and 
increased output methods; oil field associated gas recovery and 
utilization technology; natural gas processing and centralized 
transmission technology; underground gas storage technology; 
natural gas utilization technology. 
  Year 2020: Gain an understanding of advanced natural gas 
exploration, development, processing, liquefaction, 
transmission, storage, and comprehensive utilization technology. 
<H5>  J. Nuclear power technology. </H5>
  Gain an understanding of pressurized-water reactor nuclear 
power technology, achieve commercialization of nuclear power 
generators, especially with 600MW units as the primary series. 
Solve nuclear power safety and economy problems. Do R&amp;D on 
advanced pressurized-water reactor and inherently safe 
pressurized-water reactor technology, and on advanced nuclear 
fuel cycle technology, including: key nuclear power plant 
equipment, special materials, quality assurance, nuclear 
engineering design and operational management technology; 
advanced uranium ore surveying, prospecting, development, and 
ore dressing technology; new centrifugal method and laser method 
uranium separation and concentration technology; nuclear fuel 
assembly design and manufacturing technology; spent fuel 
reprocessing technology and nuclear waste processing technology. 
Do research on fast neutron breeder reactors, modular 
high-temperature gas-cooled reactors, and high and 
low-temperature nuclear heat supply technology; track 
international nuclear fusion technology. 
  Year 2020: Gain an understanding of inherently safe 
pressurized-water reactor and fast neutron breeder reactor 
technology, make breakthroughs in key nuclear fusion technology. 
<H5>  K. Hydropower engineering technology. </H5>
  Do research on advanced hydropower project survey and design 
technology. Work on high dam design and construction technology 
under complex geological conditions, deep capping strata 
foundation and karst region dam construction technology, large 
underground project rapid construction technology, and 
engineering geology problems related to high dam and 
reservoir-induced earthquakes and landslides near dams in 
reservoir regions. Do research on low-head power generation 
technology and variable-frequency power generation in the 
hydropower station construction process. Do research on large 
capacity and high specific rotation speed water turbine 
generators and large capacity pumped-storage generators, new air 
corrosion-resistant and wear-resistant materials for water 
turbines, and high-head ship locks and large ship lifts. 
  Year 2020: Gain an understanding of hugh hydropower projects 
and their associated technology. 
<H5>  L. Advanced thermal power technology. </H5>
  Achieve a shift to domestic production and improvement of 
300 
and 600MW imported generators. Do research on fuel 
characteristics and advanced fuel technologies. Do research on 
high-performance auxiliary equipment, improve coal unloading, 
coal allocation, coal transportation, ash removal, and water 
treatment technologies. Optimize cooling systems, gain an 
understanding of air cooling technology and other technology to 
reduce water consumption. Improve peak regulation operating 
supervision and on-line diagnosis technology for power 
generation equipment, and improve equipment reliability, 
generator safety monitoring and control, and automation levels. 
Develop super-critical generators and large capacity gas-fired 
turbines with inlet temperatures greater than 1,200C. 
  Year 2020: Gain an understanding of 30 MPa GW-grade 
supercritical thermal power generator technology. 
<H5>  M. Advanced power transmission and allocation and power grid </H5>
technology. 
  Improve 500 kV power transmission and transformation 
equipment and line construction technology. Do research on 500 
kV DC power transmission technology. Do research on the adoption 
of extra-high voltage zinc oxide lightning arrestors, 
SF[.sub]6[/] gas insulators, and fully-sealed combination 
electrical devices. Improve on-line monitoring technology for 
power transmission and transformation, urban power supply 
technology, and load management technology. Perfect electric 
power system protection and safety automatic devices and on 
remote-control and dedicated communications systems, establish 
integrated power grid computer management and information 
systems, raise automation levels in grid dispatching. 
  Year 2020: Gain an understanding of 1,000 kV power 
transmission and transformation technology and large-area 
integrated grid technology. Integrate with power grid advanced 
dispatching technology and agricultural monitoring and control 
technology. 
<H5>  N. New energy resource technology. </H5>
  Do research on fast-growing fuel forest selective breeding 
and cultivation technology, new biogas pit fermentation 
technology and matching technology, urban organic waste methane 
production technology, biomass gasification and liquefaction 
technology, and trash power generation technology; hot gas 
generator technology; high-efficiency, low-cost photocells, 
advanced solar energy utilization technology; economical and 
appropriate medium-sized and small wind-powered generators; 
advanced geothermal power generation and cascade utilization 
technology; 10MW-grade tidal energy power station technology; 
hydrogen energy development and utilization technology. 
  Year 2020: Gain an understanding of large-scale centralized 
utilization new energy resource technology. 
<H5>  O. Energy resource soft science research. </H5>
  Establish democratic and scientific decision making systems 
and mechanisms and decision making support systems, and a 
national energy resource information system. Do research on 
national energy resource model systems and databases adapted to 
the characteristics of the commodity economy. Improved energy 
resource statistical methods and indicator systems. Develop 
advanced energy resource soft science research methods. Do 
research on energy resource economics. Perfect state energy 
resource technology policies and economic policies. Do research 
on rational energy resource structures and deployments and on 
rational energy resource utilization. Do research on formulation 
of the China Electrification Program and Energy Resource Region 
Program. Formulate a national energy resource law. Do research 
on the international energy resource environment, international 
energy resource commodities, technology trade strategies and 
policies, and international comparisons of energy resource 
consumption. 
<H5>  Communication and Transportation </H5>
  China's communication and transportation industry is 
composed 
of five parts, railroads, water-borne transport, highways, civil 
aviation, and pipelines, and it has a large amount of the 
state's important basic facilities. As a unique material 
production development and public service department, the 
communication and transportation industry is the infrastructure 
of our national economy, a prerequisite for social expanded 
reproduction and development of the commodity economy, and an 
essential guarantee for normal operation of economic activities 
and the people's lives. Communication and transportation also 
play an extremely important role in strengthening international 
relationships, consolidating national defense, promoting 
national unity, emergency and disaster relief, and other areas. 
The essence and role of the communication and transportation 
industry determines its status as a vanguard sector of our 
national economy. 
  China has a vast territory and huge population, a long 
coastline, and a network of rivers that have potential for 
developing a variety of transportation modes. There are 
substantial imbalances in the geographic configuration of 
resource distributions, territorial development, industrial 
deployments, and economic development. Moreover, there has been 
flourishing development of the commodity economy, continual 
urbanization of our population, and growing tourism demand in 
the past several years. These form the basic configuration for 
the high-intensity freight flow and rapidly-growing 
multiple-bearing passenger flow from west to east and from north 
to south in China's communication and transportation. Based on 
China's natural and economic conditions, railroads will be the 
main force in transportation of large amounts of freight and in 
medium and long-distance passenger and freight transportation in 
China for a substantial period of time to come. Highways are the 
main force in short-distance passenger and freight 
transportation and will gradually play a key role in 
transporting high-grade industrial and agricultural products, 
transporting fresh and easily-spoiled freight, and 
medium-distance passenger transportation. Water-borne transport 
is the main force in foreign trade transportation and one of the 
primary modes for transportation of large amounts of bulk 
freight. Civil aviation has enormous advantages in long-distance 
passenger transportation and in transportation of valuable, 
emergency, live, and other freight. Pipelines are the primary 
transportation mode for petroleum, natural gas, and other fluid 
materials, and regions with the proper conditions are actively 
developing pipeline coal transmission. 
  The development of the communication and transportation 
industry must be based on reliance on S&amp;T progress. The next 
30 
years will be a period of sustained and arduous efforts to 
achieve major historic developments in our communication and 
transportation industry, and we must certainly strive hard to 
reinforce communication and transportation S&amp;T work, focus on 
developing advanced and appropriate technology, and form forces 
of production as quickly as possible. These are the unshirkable 
historic tasks for S&amp;T work. 
<H5>  I. Strategic Objectives </H5>
  Based on the strategic objectives for the development of 
China's national economy, the relevant areas have predicted that 
by the year 2000, there will be about 1.5-fold and 2-fold 
increases, respectively, in the amount of freight turnover in 
society as a whole and the amount of passenger turnover. By 
2020, they estimate that there will be another about 1-fold 
increase in the amount of passenger and freight turnover in 
society as a whole compared to 2000. 
<H5>  A. Strategic objectives for development of the communication </H5>
and transportation industry. 
  On a foundation of rational and coordinated development of 
all modes of transportation, gradually form a communication and 
transportation network that is complete and has a clear 
separation of layers, and make a major effort to develop 
integrated transportation and establish a communication and 
transportation industry with comprehensive transportation system 
as the primary axis to obtain greater economic and social 
benefits with fewer inputs and to establish the corresponding 
communication and transportation industry. With a prerequisite 
of investment, policy, and S&amp;T guarantees, communication and 
transportation should make a transition by the year 2000 from 
serious stagnation to basic adaptation; by 2020, try to complete 
a communication and transportation system with perfect 
facilities, advanced technical equipment, modernized management, 
freely-flowing goods, and convenient passenger movement that is 
safe, fast, comfortable, and economical. The communication and 
transportation industry will meet our national economic and 
social development requirements. 
<H5>  B. Strategic objectives for communication and transportation </H5>
science and technology. 
  The development of communication and transportation must 
rely 
on science and technology, and S&amp;T work must be oriented 
toward 
the development of communication and transportation. We must 
strengthen research on the interrelationship of communication 
and transportation with our national economy, the development of 
a comprehensive transportation system, and other areas, improve 
macro decision making levels, adopt advanced and appropriate 
technology, actively do good digestion, absorption, innovation, 
and improvement of imported technology, form some ``composite 
technologies'' that integrate traditional technology with high 
technology and new technology, and shift China's communication 
and transportation industry onto the track of modernized 
management methods and modernized basic facilities and equipment. 
  1. Railroads. Gradually achieve a shift to electrification 
and internal combustion in traction power, a shift to heavy 
modes in track structures, modernization of transportation 
management, automation of transportation process control, and 
mechanization of track maintenance, construction, loading and 
unloading, and locomotive repair activities. Extend heavy load 
transportation technology, place high-speed railways into 
operation, and develop suburban passenger transportation 
systems. During this century, attain an average traction weight 
of more than 2,900 tons for freight trains, a daily transit 
density of 120 pairs on busy trunklines, an average 
transportation density of 35 million ton/kilometers, and a 
maximum speed of 140 kilometers/hour on passenger trains. By 
2020, open dedicated coal haulage lines with unit trains of more 
than 10,000 tons and complete one or two high-speed passenger 
railways with a speed of 200 kilometers/hour in regions of 
particularly busy passenger transport. Complete advanced 
railways that have Chinese characteristics fused with 
international trends, developed line networks, powerful 
capacity, high efficiency, and good benefits that are safe and 
reliable and have superior-quality services. 
  2. Water-borne transport. Gradually achieve scientific 
water-borne transport decision making, equipment and management 
modernization, and mechanization of loading, unloading, and 
construction activities. Complete a technologically advanced 
open seas flotilla that is internationally competitive, focus on 
strengthening north-south maritime transportation passageways 
and develop the corresponding interior river ship transportation 
on the Chang Jiang, Zhu Jiang, Beijing-Hangzhou Canal, Huai He, 
and Heilong Jiang to gradually form primary water-borne 
transport channels along the coast and on the Chang Jiang, Zhu 
Jiang, Beijing-Hangzhou Canal, and so on. By 2000, increase the 
proportion of containerized freight shipping for mixed foreign 
trade cargo to more than 50 percent and the proportion of 
maritime large volume freight decentralized loading and 
transportation to more than 95 percent, raise the average 
tonnage of ships on interior rivers from the present 92 tons to 
200 tons, broadly apply sectional barge top propulsion 
transportation, and basically popularize rolling loading 
transportation on continental island and straits shipping lines. 
Significantly improve efficiency in ship transportation, reduce 
energy consumption by 10 to 20 percent, and reduce the 
communication accident rate by 20 to 40 percent. By 2020, finish 
building China's water-borne transportation industry into a 
transportation force with perfect facilities, advanced 
equipment, and scientific management that is safe and reliable 
and has significant benefits and that plays a major role in our 
national economy. 
  3. Highways. Establish a highway communication system with 
the technical characteristics of higher speeds, higher 
efficiency, larger vehicles, and more specialized uses, achieve 
modernization of management, design, construction, maintenance, 
and transportation services. Use increased highway routes and 
higher highway grades and service levels to gradually build a 
national trunkline highway system composed of high-speed 
highways and grade one and two dedicated automobile highways. By 
2000, form a pyramid with a primary highway framework; by 2020, 
basically complete 12 20,000- to 25,000-kilometer national 
trunklines, centralize 50 to 60 percent of the total amount of 
highway communication, improve mixed communication, and enable 
primary key communication facilities and cities larger than 1 
million in population to enter primary trunklines within 2 
hours. At the same time, establish safe, fast, convenient, and 
economical modern truck transportation systems, significantly 
increase the average shipping distance of trucks, attain maximum 
speeds of up to 120 kilometers/hour, which is approximately 
double average speeds, reduce the communication accident rate by 
more than 50 percent, reduce unit fuel consumption per 100 
ton/kilometers by 40 percent, and approximately double truck 
transport efficiency. 
  4. Civil aviation. Take aim at advanced international 
technical levels, adopt international standards, strengthen 
technology importing, digestion, and absorption; reinforce 
capital construction, improve the deployment of the factors of 
production. Approach advanced international levels in 2000 in 
airports, runways, repair facilities, transportation services, 
personnel quality, and other areas. By 2020 basically achieve 
modernization of civil aviation technical equipment, basic 
facilities, and transportation management and leap into advanced 
world ranks in safety and reliability, flight schedule normalcy, 
aircraft utilization rates, labor productivity, passenger 
service, and other primary economic and technical indicators. 
  5. Pipelines. Prior to 2000, focus on solving pipeline 
construction technology problems in regions with horrible 
natural conditions and under special circumstances and pipeline 
transmission technical problems for highly viscous and easily 
condensed crude oil. Achieve sealed transmission and optimized 
operation of most pipelines and reduce overall energy 
consumption in crude oil pipeline transmission by 10 percent. 
Use scientific research to attack problems with key technologies 
and equipment, gain a comprehensive understanding of slurry 
preparation, transmission, dehydration, and other technology for 
pipeline coal transmission and basically achieve a shift to 
domestic production of large special-purpose equipment. Prior to 
2020, expand the scope of pipeline transmission and further 
improve pipeline transmission technology and technical equipment 
levels. 
  On a foundation of promoting technical progress and 
comprehensive development in all types of transportation modes, 
overall development levels for S&amp;T in China's communication 
and 
transportation industry in 2000 should approach or attain levels 
in the developed countries of the early 1980's, and the 
technical staffs and specialized scientific research and 
extension systems at all levels should basically satisfy the 
requirements of communication and transportation development. By 
2020, strive to attain advanced international levels of the 
early 21st Century in primary scientific and technical realms 
and attain advanced international levels in certain fields to 
form a communication and transportation S&amp;T system with 
Chinese 
characteristics. 
<H5>  II. Focal Tasks and Key Technologies </H5>
<H5>  A. Reinforce soft science research, raise overall </H5>
transportation macro decision making levels. 
  1. Do R&amp;D on national communication and transportation 
policy 
models. Focus on research on basic communication and 
transportation facilities and equipment information management 
technology, on data collection, processing, forecasting, and 
allocation technology for large volume freight transportation, 
centralized container transportation, and passenger 
transportation flow directions and flow amounts. Based on the 
principles of systems engineering and communication and 
transportation economics, do research on the inter-feedback 
effects between communication and transportation and development 
of the national economy. In 2000, establish a communication and 
transportation policy model prototype. In 2020, provide computer 
software support systems for formulating the proportional 
relationship between socioeconomic and transportation 
development, strategies for the coordinated development of all 
types of transportation modes, multi-objective evaluation of 
program foundations, feasibility, and comprehensive 
transportation systems for major national transportation 
passageways, and other important problems. 
  2. Actively study ways for railroads to implement the 
state's 
macro coordination and control functions, railroad management 
systems, administrative models, investment mechanisms, 
enterprise economic environments, and rail network development 
scale and deployments and coordination and optimization of them 
with other transportation modes. Establish passenger and freight 
transportation volume forecasting models and unified technical 
economics indicator systems and optimized models for rational 
matching up of train weights, densities, and speeds. Provide new 
methods for railroad cost/benefit analysis, research on railroad 
construction feasibility and the impact of technical progress on 
railroad development, and so on. 
  3. Focus on research on water-borne transportation 
development strategies, establish macro decision making support 
systems. Establish basic information databases for water-borne 
transportation, develop passenger and freight transportation 
forecasting models and transportation network optimization 
simulation models. Do research on water-borne transportation 
industry policies, macro coordination and control functions, 
harbor deployments, coordination of their development with other 
transportation modes, and other questions. Strengthen basic 
research work on water transportation economic theory and 
benefits estimation methods, and so on. 
  4. Establish a highway communication program evaluation and 
decision making support system. Focus on establishing highway 
communication databases, develop research on communication macro 
decision making and control models. In 2000, establish a 
preliminary ministry and provincial two-level highway 
communication information system, and form a highway 
communication decision making science system prototype. In 2020, 
be able to do qualitative and quantitative analysis and 
evaluation of the economic benefits of highway communication 
programs, investment decision making programs, and highway 
communication construction and technology policies. 
  5. Undertake research on civil aviation market demand 
forecasting, development program decision making and evaluation, 
civil aviation airworthiness, and operational management laws, 
regulations, and economic and technical policies. In 2000, 
establish an automated management information database. 
  6. Undertake soft science research on pipeline transmission, 
establish a planning, management, and allocation information and 
decision making system, conduct research on technical economics 
policies. 
<H5>  B. R&amp;D on key technologies for integrated passenger and </H5>
freight multi-mode transportation. 
  1. Do research on key technologies and modernized equipment 
for transportation capacity balancing and key node construction 
for integrated large volume freight transportation (railroads, 
water-borne, pipeline, and highways) centered on energy 
resources. This includes centralized and decentralized 
transportation systems, transshipment systems, and storage 
systems. 
  2. In centralized container shipping (water-borne, highways, 
railroads, civil aviation), undertake development of key 
technologies and modernized equipment for transportation 
capacity balancing and key node construction. This includes: 
centralized and decentralized transportation systems, 
transshipment systems, and so on. 
  3. In rapid passenger transportation (railroads, highways, 
civil aviation, water-borne), undertake development of key 
technologies and modernized equipment for integrated 
transportation. 
  4. Do research on modernized management systems, regulations 
systems, and organizational modes for integrated transportation. 
<H5>  C. Key technologies to accelerate railroad S&amp;T </H5>
 development. 
  1. Attack key matching technology problems for heavy load 
transportation, substantially increase freight transportation 
capacity. 
  Develop 6,400 kW and larger electric locomotives, 4,500 hp 
and larger internal combustion locomotives, and large freight 
cars with axle weights of 23 to 25 tons; do research on laying 
75 kg-grade heavy track structures; do research on solving heavy 
load train optimized operations, synchronized remote control, 
high efficiency loading and unloading, and other key 
technologies. Prior to 2000, open dedicated coal haulage lines 
to 6,000 to 10,000 tons unit trains and achieve heavy load 
transportation on the Jing-Lu [Beijing-Shanghai], Jing-Guang 
[Beijing-Guangdong], Jing-Ha [Beijing-Harbin], Da-Qin 
[Datong-Qinhuangdao], and other trunk lines. Prior to 2020, open 
dedicated coal haulage lines to 10,000 tons and up unit trains, 
open 8,000 to 12,000 ton combination trains when necessary on 
busy trunk lines. 
  2. Substantially increase passenger transportation 
capacities, do research on high-speed passenger transportation 
technology. 
  Prior to 2000, develop new types of passenger electrical and 
internal combustion locomotives, double-decker passenger cars, 
and electrically controlled braking systems. Open three large 
trunklines to extra-fast passenger trains with maximum speeds of 
140 kilometers/hour; do suburban passenger transportation system 
trial point research in one or two large cities. Develop and 
apply advanced passenger transportation service facilities with 
electronic ticket sales, passenger guidance, luggage management, 
and so on. Around 2000, focus on doing research and experiments 
in rapid passenger transportation technology, passenger/freight 
distributed transportation, and other new fields. Develop 
locomotives and rail cars with maximum speeds in excess of 200 
kilometers/hour; do research on high-speed train automatic 
control technology; solve high-speed railway design, 
construction, and maintenance problems. By 2020 complete one or 
two high-speed passenger railways in regions with especially 
high passenger traffic and place suburban passenger 
transportation systems into operation in huge cities. 
  3. Do research on railroad transportation safety system 
engineering, establish safety guarantee systems. Establish train 
accident factor analysis systems and accident prevention and 
control mechanisms. 
  Develop and extend equipment technical state monitoring, 
breakdown diagnosis, and warning equipment; adopt signals to 
prevent abrupt forward movement by trains and erroneous handling 
of line entries, and other control devices; develop natural 
disaster prediction, warning, and new rescue equipment. 
  4. Broadly apply electronics technology, develop new 
communications and signalling equipment, provide technical 
measures for achieving high density and safe railroading. 
  Prior to 2000, develop fiber optic, microwave, and satellite 
digital communications. Complete a preliminary full-line 
automatic telephone network. Do R&amp;D on train radio 
communications and bidirectional, speed-differential display 
automatic closure and train automatic speed governing and 
control systems. Adopt computer-aided dispatching command 
systems for primary trunklines. In 2020, complete a 
comprehensive professional digital communications network. 
Develop train spacing automatic readjustment systems and new 
train operation automatic control systems. Develop computer 
real-time decision making and dispatching command systems. 
  5. Apply advanced technical measures to reform 
transportation 
organization and achieve modernization of transportation 
management. 
  Study and apply computer-compiled train transportation 
charts 
and all types of planning, optimized freight flow, passenger 
flow, car flow, and train flow organizational programs. Achieve 
comprehensive management automation in primary marshalling 
stations, passenger transportation stations, and freight 
transportation stations. Actively do research on new cooling 
sources and establish transportation cooling chains. Develop 
centralized loading, piggyback, and continental bridge 
transportation. By 2000, complete a real-time tracking 
management system for rapid freight trains, centralized 
container loading, locomotives, and passenger and freight cars; 
strengthen planning, forecasting, and accuracy of car flow 
organization and locomotive and car dispatching, raise 
transportation organization levels. Complete a unified 
transportation management database for transportation, finances, 
planning, statistics, and so on, attain resource sharing and 
optimized data processing, achieve modernization of 
transportation management. 
  6. Adopt new technologies, accelerate new line construction. 
  Achieve comprehensive rapid line selection. Make 
breakthroughs in key technologies for extra-long tunnels and 
underwater tunnels for single lines. Provide matching 
technologies for large span, high pier, deep base bridge 
construction. Do research on reducing the engineering costs of 
new lines. 
  7. Develop railroad operations mechanization and automation. 
  Develop and apply advanced construction, line maintenance, 
and car repair equipment and industrial production machinery. 
  8. Do research on energy conservation technology and 
environmental protection technology. 
  Strengthen research on wheel-track relationships and other 
specialized basic theory and on magnetic levitation ultra-high 
speed railroad technology. 
<H5>  D. Establish south-north maritime transportation </H5>
passageways, develop key technologies for open-sea 
transportation and interior river transportation. 
  1. Make full use of our maritime shipping advantages, 
develop 
sets of technologies for high efficiency maritime transportation 
passageways centered on energy resources. 
  Undertake research on preparatory engineering technology for 
deepwater harbor construction, structural forms and 
manufacturing technology for 10,000-ton and up open-type piers 
and new technologies and new materials for their construction; 
gain an understanding of tidal river mouth silt movement laws, 
formulate shipping channel improvement countermeasures for the 
mouths of the Chang Jiang and Zhu Jiang, create the conditions 
for the passage of 35,000-ton conventional freighters and second 
and third-generation centralized loading container ships; 
digest, absorb, and study high efficiency bulk cargo loading and 
unloading equipment and technologies, place ship unloading 
machinery with a units/hour efficiency of more than 2,000 tons 
into operation; do research on new transportation modes, develop 
coastal large tonnage energy-saving bulk freighters, shallow 
draft large ships, and self-unloading ships; develop 
high-performance diving technology and equipment. By 2000, 
complete a large preliminary coastal south-north bulk cargo 
transportation passageway which has a high transportation 
capacity, high efficiency, low costs, and good results in which 
large bulk cargo fleets are the primary force and in which there 
is an overall balance between harbor ship loading and unloading 
capacities. 
  2. Adopt modern technological equipment and management 
measures, improve the international competitiveness of the 
open-sea fleet. 
  Actively study rational structures for the open-sea fleet, 
develop large tonnage bulk freighters, develop third and 
fourth-generation centralized container loading, liquid chemical 
product, and other new types of ships; raise automation levels 
in engine room management, adopt advanced communications and 
navigation equipment; do research on new automatic breakdown 
diagnosis and handling technologies, perfect modernized 
transportation management measures. 
  3. Develop interior river transportation resources, 
strengthen research on infrastructure and equipment, 
substantially reduce transportation costs. 
  Develop and apply modernized shipping channel survey and 
design measures, do research on interior river shipping channel 
network planning and on shipping channel and ship matching 
technology and improvement technologies for shipping channels 
with large amounts of silt and those with multiple 
intersections; undertake research on categories and arrangements 
for high dam and large reservoir ship passage structures and 
their impact on upstream and downstream ship transportation, 
make breakthroughs in key technologies for ship lifts; make a 
major effort to extend segmented top propulsion transportation 
and develop all sorts of new high efficiency energy-saving types 
of ships. By 2000, increase the average load per horsepower of 
thrust by 30 to 40 percent, reduce transportation costs by 
one-half, increase 300 ton and above grade shipping channels 
almost one-fold. 
  4. Do research on water safety facilities, establish water 
safety guarantee systems, reduce communication accident rates. 
  Use importing and doing our own research to gradually 
establish a ship communication management system that conforms 
to China's national conditions, a future global maritime 
accident risk search and rescue and safety system, and a 
comprehensive maritime ship assistance system, and undertake 
research on water pollution prevention monitoring, forecasting, 
and emergency response handling technology. By 2000, attain 
rapid discovery and timely rescues for communication accidents 
and a significant reduction in water pollution. 
  5. Actively apply advanced and technology and scientific 
methods to modernize transportation management. 
  Make a major effort to extend and apply electronic computers 
and office automation technology, develop ship automatic 
tracking and dispatching command systems and international 
centralized container loading and harbor operations dispatching 
management information systems. By 2000, complete a three-level 
water-borne transportation management information network 
centered on the ministry, achieve automation of information 
collection, transmission, and processing and optimization of 
freight transportation organization, transportation capacity 
arrangements, production dispatching, and operational planning, 
achieve modernization of water-borne transportation management. 
  6. Prepare good technical reserves, meet new challenges from 
water-borne transportation technology in the early part of the 
next century. 
  Actively create the conditions to undertake applied research 
on integrated coast-ship technology, highly reliable artificial 
intelligence ships, magnetohydrodynamic and superconduction ship 
propulsion, ship harbor entry and exit automatic control 
technology, coal-based fuels for use on ships, and so on, and 
reduce the lag of China's water-borne transportation industry 
behind the developed countries in the area of high technology 
applications. 
<H5>  E. Improve highway grades and vehicle transportation </H5>
capacity, establish key technologies for highway trunkline roads 
and high efficiency vehicle transportation systems. 
  1. Develop new technologies for high-speed highway and 
dedicated automobile highway construction, meet the needs for 
high-speed (80 to 120 km/hour) and heavy load (total unit 
vehicle weights of 30 to 40 tons) traffic. 
  Develop and extend applications of aerial photography 
measurement and highway and bridge computer-aided design, 
achieve modernization of highway survey and design. Do research 
on countermeasures for comprehensive improvement of mixed 
communication, propose rational geometric standards for 
high-speed highway and dedicated automobile highway planar and 
vertical and horizontal cross-sections. Actively develop roadway 
asphalt and mixed materials made of it, roadway cement and 
concrete materials, base materials, and new types of roadway 
engineering materials, and form series of standards for China's 
high-grade road surface engineering materials. Establish 
high-strength, long-lasting, smooth, slip-resistant, and 
economical high-grade road surface structure systems. Develop 
high-grade highway construction machinery and maintenance 
machinery with a large production capacity, and make it into 
complete sets and systematize it. Develop construction quality 
detection and control and highway communication environmental 
protection and public hazard prevention technology. By 2000, 
basically achieve automation of trunkline highway and bridge 
design and map-making, achieve mechanization of high-grade 
highway construction and maintenance, make high-grade road 
surface indicators satisfy applications requirements, and reduce 
overall engineering costs by 10 percent and greatly improve the 
situation of interference in the vertical and horizontal 
directions for trunkline highways. All of China's major ports 
should be opened to traffic to the interior via high-speed 
highways. By 2020, basically improve mixed communication of 
trunkline highways, attain an average highway network density in 
the economically developed regions of east China of 0.5 
kilometers/square kilometer. 
  2. Research on roadway modernization management technology 
and equipment development. 
  Develop highway communication applied function basic data 
collection equipment and form a batch production and system 
detection capability. By 2000, establish a national roadway and 
bridge detection and evaluation center and province-level 
detection stations. Do R&amp;D on roadway and bridge management 
systems and by 2000, attain an initial scale and apply them in 
province-level roadway and bridge maintenance plan decision 
making. Do R&amp;D on key equipment and its system software for 
traffic monitoring and control, traffic information and fee 
collection systems, dedicated communications systems, and 
traffic engineering facilities, and establish a trunkline 
highway traffic accident database. By 2000 establish an initial 
relatively perfect traffic management facilities and safety 
guarantee system for trunkline highways. 
  3. Develop sets of highway rapid direct vehicle 
transportation technologies. 
  Rationally readjust the structure of vehicles, accelerate 
the 
development of highway passenger transportation, centralized 
loading container transportation, and special-purpose vehicle 
transportation; develop large highway diesel passenger vehicles, 
special-purpose vehicles, and semi-hitch vehicles, as well as 
matching facilities and service and management systems for 
passenger and freight transfer stations. Do R&amp;D on large and 
medium-sized vehicle transportation enterprise computer 
comprehensive management and production dispatching systems; 
establish scientific and rational vehicle detection and 
maintenance systems, develop vehicle detection and diagnosis 
technology. By 2000, approach a ratio of 1.5:3.0:5.5 in the 
structure of large, medium-sized, and small tonnage trucks, with 
the total tonnage of large tonnage diesel freight trucks 
accounting for 50 percent, approach a ratio of 1:1 between 
semi-hitched trucks and fully-hitched trucks, attain 
international levels for similar products for highway passenger 
car primary technology performance indices; increase the 
utilization rate for truck routes in large and medium-sized 
truck transportation enterprises by 5 to 10 percent, attain a 
completion rate of 90 percent in large passenger and freight 
vehicle technology, reduce maintenance and repair expenditures 
by about 30 percent. 
  4. Make breakthroughs in key technologies for highway 
bridges 
with very large spans (over 500 meters). 
  Focus on research on construction technology and the 
corresponding construction equipment for very large-span 
bridges; do R&amp;D on construction control computer programs and 
methods; do R&amp;D on large tonnage supports, large tonnage 
pre-stressing systems and large tonnage expansion and 
contraction joints; do research on applications of new types of 
structures, reliability theory, structural stability, and 
non-linear analysis. By 2000, integrate with engineering 
practice to gain an understanding of complete sets of 
construction and design technology for 500-meter and larger span 
bridges. 
  5. Research and extension of vehicle gas-saving technology. 
  Focus on research on using energy-saving technology in 
vehicles, do research on liquified natural gas, alcohol, and 
other substitute vehicle fuels, develop applications of new 
vehicle fuels and new types of powered vehicles. By 2000, reduce 
gas consumption in vehicles by more than 5 percent, extend and 
apply natural gas and alcohol substitute fuels in vehicles in 
local regions in China. 
  6. Do R&amp;D on artificial intelligence applications 
technology. 
  Establish highway and bridge design expert systems, achieve 
self-adapting control of planning and decision making systems; 
conduct research on transportation system engineering, 
ergonomics, and other basic issues related to highway 
communication. 
<H5>  F. Guarantee flight safety, increase aircraft utilization </H5>
rates and key technologies for administration and management 
modernization. 
  1. Technology development and application for civil aviation 
safety guarantee systems. 
  Focus on R&amp;D on six large regional group networks for 
flight 
management radar, flight planning and processing system group 
networks, and special-purpose applications software and network 
technology for integrated voice and data service communications 
networks for civil aviation; develop comprehensive monitoring 
and control, and early breakdown diagnosis and warning systems 
for civil aircraft; do R&amp;D on new technologies and new 
equipment 
for airport safety inspections, hijack prevention, and aircraft 
landing guidance. By 2000, reduce flight accident rates in 
China's civil aviation by 60 percent from the present base, and 
reduce the flight abnormality rate due to air communication 
management by 80 percent. 
  2. R&amp;D on key technologies for improving civil aviation 
utilization rates. 
  Do R&amp;D on advanced aircraft maintenance technologies and 
techniques, including: sets of technology and equipment for 
repairing imported large aircraft body structures and their 
engines and components; develop automatic testing equipment 
software; do research on repair technology for large flow rate 
passenger cabin pressurization equipment and repair technology 
for composite materials; fuel regulator experiment console 
software development, engine testing console demarcation, and so 
on. Develop large aircraft hanger moving work platforms and 
dock-type work platforms. Do R&amp;D on aviation company 
transportation capacity dispatching and airport real-time 
dynamic aircraft management systems. By 2000, attain average 
advanced international levels of the early 1990's for aircraft 
utilization rates on international flights and attain average 
advanced international levels of the early 1980's for domestic 
trunkline aircraft utilization rates; increase our own 
maintenance of aviation engine models by 50 percent and attain a 
self-maintenance rate of 30 percent for components to 
substantially conserve foreign exchange. 
  3. Operational management system, transportation service, 
and 
other ground equipment technology development. 
  Do R&amp;D on international and domestic flight booking 
ticketing, departure registration, aircraft loading, air freight 
transportation, and other passenger and freight service computer 
real-time control systems; establish a digital communications 
network and database linked to networks in world aviation cities 
and all of China's large and medium-sized cities; establish 
flight dynamic monitoring and control and information 
transmission systems, develop aviation materials information 
management systems, achieve modernization of civil aviation 
planning statistics and finances computations, operational 
management, and decision making. Develop airport automatic 
baggage sorting systems, achieve automatic baggage sorting; 
develop special types of airport ground-based vehicles and 
equipment. By 2000, apply computerized seat bookings for 90 
percent of ticket sales points in all regions of China, achieve 
computer handled passenger boarding measures and flight dynamic 
monitoring and control, and the primary technical indices of all 
types of special equipment and vehicles developed for civil 
aviation should attain the levels of similar products in foreign 
countries and be installed at large and medium-sized airports. 
<H5>  G. Key technologies for increasing oil and gas pipeline </H5>
transmission capacity and developing pipeline coal transmission. 
  1. Research on oil and gas pipeline transmission technology. 
  Do basic research on oil transmission technology and update 
oil transmission technology to meet the special requirements of 
different oil properties and different oil transmission 
conditions. Strengthen research on normal temperature oil 
transmission technology and on a variety of physical and 
chemical prepared transmission methods for highly viscous and 
condensation-prone crude oil, undertake research on orderly 
transmission of different refined oil products and different 
types of crude oil and on water transmission, implement 
transmission, wall processing, crude oil modification, and other 
exploratory pipeline transmission technology. By 2000, achieve 
closed transmission and optimized operation in over 80 percent 
of China's oil transmission pipelines. 
  2. Research on coal slurry pipeline transmission technology. 
  Do experimental research on common coal slurry and highly 
concentrated coal-water mixture pipeline transmission technology 
and parameters, propose rational slurry production and 
dehydration technology processes and transmission equipment; do 
research on optimized pipeline transmission technology that 
integrates common coal slurry and highly-concentrated coal-water 
mixture, do systematic experimental research on the coal 
varieties in mining regions that could adopt pipeline 
transmission, establish slurry production, pipeline 
transmission, and dehydration parameter databases. 
  3. Develop special-purpose equipment for pipeline 
transmission. 
  To improve efficiency and resolve open-cut operation 
problems, develop heating ovens, pumps, compressors, and all 
types of special-purpose valves for oil and gas transmission, 
develop main pumps, large dehydrators, and trunkline valves for 
pipeline coal transmission trunklines. By 2000, achieve a shift 
to domestic production and systemization and match up special 
equipment for gas transmission and offshore pipelines. 
  4. Develop pipelines and construction technology. 
  Do research on improving pipe material properties, pipeline 
crack prevention, earthquake resistance, welding, corrosion 
prevention, insulation, pipe cleaning, fault diagnosis, repair 
and restoration, and other technologies, undertake research on 
construction technologies for desert and offshore regions and on 
various types of power sources. 
  5. Undertake research on pipeline transmission detection, 
monitoring and control, and automation technology and equipment. 
  From 2000 to 2020, besides continuing to intensify research 
work in the three main areas outlined above, there should be 
innovations and breakthroughs on the basis of tracking research 
and application of high technology and new technology to form a 
``composite technology'' cluster for communication and 
transportation that has Chinese characteristics, and continue to 
provide key technologies for a takeoff in communication and 
transportation. 
<H5>  Machine-Building and Electronics </H5>
  The machine-building and electronics industry is the 
outfitting department for our national economy. Progress in 
production technology and the amount of economic benefits in all 
sectors of the national economy are fundamentally determined by 
the performance, quality, efficiency, and speed of replacement 
of the machinery and electronic equipment that they utilize. The 
machine-building and electronics industry must also provide 
advanced military outfitting for national defense modernization 
and provide durable consumer goods for the ever-growing material 
and culture life needs of the people. 
  The technical levels and scale of the machine-building and 
electronics industry are important indicators for assessing a 
nation's S&amp;T levels and economic strengths. Scientific and 
technical achievements must generally be materialized into the 
form of equipment to be converted into forces of production, and 
machine-building and electronics S&amp;T are the foundation for 
development of the machine-building and electronics industry. 
Looking at the history of S&amp;T development, machine-building 
S&amp;T 
have always been the most acute and most broad-ranging field for 
absorbing new S&amp;T achievements in all realms; electronics 
S&amp;T is 
the most rapidly developing and most vigorous high-tech realm of 
the present era. The mutual integration and permeation of 
machine-building, electronics, and information technology have 
caused changes of essence to occur in the functions of 
traditional machinery and electronics products and turned the 
machine-building and electronics industry into a 
technology-intensive modernized industry with rapid replacement 
of products, high added value, and large foreign exchange 
earnings from exports. 
  S&amp;T levels in China's machine-building and electronics 
industry lag considerably behind the developed countries. We 
must strengthen our sense of urgency and sense of 
responsibility, take full advantage of the favorable situation 
of reform and opening up, adopt resolute measures, and make 
major efforts to invigorate the machine-building and electronics 
industry a strategic principle in China's economic construction. 
<H5>  I. Development Strategies and Objectives </H5>
<H5>  A. Development strategies. </H5>
  Use the domestic and foreign markets as a guide, use 
microelectronics and computer technology as a vanguard, make 
development of important sets of technologies and equipment for 
agriculture, energy resources, communication and transportation, 
communications, the raw materials industry and other urgent 
requirements in our national economy; make the ``four basic 
things'' of basic technology and techniques, basic components 
(general-purpose machinery components and electronic and 
instrument components), basic materials, and basic machinery the 
foundation for establishing a multi-level technology development 
system where emerging technology is the main factor and where 
traditional technology, emerging technology, and high technology 
coexist. We must have the ``one focus and three promotions'', 
meaning focus on the foundation, promote improvements in our own 
development capabilities, promote integration of 
machine-building technology and electronics technology, promote 
commercialization and industrialization of new technology and 
scientific research achievements. 
<H5>  B. Strategic objectives. </H5>
  Year 2000 
  Make the direction of the main attack improving our own 
development and manufacturing capabilities for machinery and 
electronics products (especially major technical equipment and 
basic components) and continually reinforcing the 
competitiveness of machinery and electronics products in the 
domestic and foreign markets, reinforce close integration of 
scientific research with production and technology with the 
economy, accelerate digestion and absorption of imported 
technology, strengthen technical reserves, and accelerate the 
commercialization and industrialization of S&amp;T achievements. 
  1. Gain a basic understanding of key technologies in the 
design and manufacture of important technical equipment and 
engineering systems. The focus is: large thermal power, 
hydropower, and nuclear power transmission and transformation 
equipment, large iron and steel and non-ferrous metals smelting 
and rolling equipment, large coal and mine extraction equipment, 
petroleum drilling and extraction (including that used in ocean, 
desert, and other unusual environments) and intensive petroleum 
processing equipment, large coal chemical industry, chemical 
fertilizer, and petrochemical equipment, large harbor hoisting 
and transportation equipment, large sets of cement equipment, 
large batch vehicle production technical equipment, civil 
passenger aircraft technical equipment, agricultural machinery, 
engineering and construction machinery, light industry and 
textile machinery, printing machinery, packaging machinery, 
automatic industrial production control systems, marine, land, 
and air communication management systems and monitoring and 
control systems, environmental protection and monitoring 
equipment, and so on. 
  2. Gain a basic understanding of key electronic technologies 
developed during the 1980's. Focus on gaining an understanding 
of 1 to 2 micron silicon microelectronics technology and gallium 
arsenide integrated circuit development technology; develop chip 
components and surface mounting and microassembly technology; 
electric power electronics technology; sensing components and 
transducer technology; micrometer wave technology; flat display 
technology; special-purpose electronics equipment and new 
testing technology; key fourth-generation computer technology; 
computer software technology and computer-aided engineering and 
automatic detection technology; applied technology for 
industrial control machinery and microcomputers; digital and 
optical fiber communications technology; new generation consumer 
electronics technology and key digital sound and image 
technology; key technologies in medical treatment electronics 
equipment design and manufacturing. 
  3. Use the development and application of advanced design 
technology, advanced manufacturing technology, reliability and 
quality control technology, and environmental protection 
technology and modern management technology to make 5 percent of 
our primary machinery and electronics products attain advanced 
world levels of the period and about 40 percent of our primary 
machinery and electronics products attain levels of the late 
1980's and early 1990's, and improve the average efficiency of 
high energy-consuming machinery products produced in large 
amounts that cover broad areas by 3 to 5 percent; make 
electromechanically integrated products account for about 15 
percent of the total number of product varieties of machinery 
and electronics products. 
  4. Extend computer-aided management in key enterprises in 
the 
machine-building and electronics industry and gradually meet the 
needs of medium-sized and small enterprises. 
  5. In machine-building and electronics enterprises, complete 
2 to 3 preliminary computer-integrated manufacturing system 
(CIMS) trial points. 
  6. Begin with key basic components, basically solve the 
problems of key technologies in the design, manufacturing, and 
materials areas of basic machinery and electronics components, 
and comprehensively improve their quality and reliability. 
Develop several new types of basic components now in short 
supply in China. 
  7. Actively do R&amp;D on high and new-tech products, 
achieve 
commercialization and industrialization of about 100 types of 
leading high and new-tech products, and export a portion of them. 
  8. Actively study, formulate, and adopt standards at 
international levels, coordinate standards and levels with the 
standards of the primary industrially developed nations, meet 
China's commodity economy development and increased product 
export requirements. Establish and perfect special purpose 
measurement standards for the machine-building and electronics 
industry. 
  Year 2020 
  Make high technology the foundation, establish scientific 
research, design, manufacturing, and testing work in the 
machine-building and electronics industry on a foundation of 
China's own R&amp;D capabilities and conditions, attain or 
approach 
international levels for similar products for the quality, 
performance, price, appearance, and so on of machine-building 
and electronics products. In addition, lay a scientific and 
technical foundation for China to basically achieve 
modernization and attain a per capita GNP level of a moderately 
developed country by the mid-21st Century. 
  1. Gain an understanding of important technical equipment, 
engineering systems, and high and new-tech product design and 
manufacturing technology, basically satisfy market demand and 
participate in international competition. 
  2. Achieve computer-aided management of key enterprises in 
the machine-building and electronics industry. 
  3. Gain an understanding of modern design theory and 
methods, 
universally adopt advanced manufacturing technology, achieve 
computer-integrated manufacturing systems in 100 key enterprises 
in the machine-building and electronics industry. 
  4. Attain advanced world levels of the period for 20 percent 
of primary electromechanical products, become more competitive 
in the international market. Attain levels of the year 2010 for 
80 percent of primary electromechanical products. 
  5. Further improve standards and levels to adapt to the 
needs 
of China's high-tech development and broadly undertaking 
international economic and technological exchanges. 
<H5>  II. Focal Tasks and Key Technologies </H5>
  To achieve the development strategies and objectives 
outlined 
above, we must select 14 items from among product technologies 
and production technologies as a technical cluster to play an 
important leading role in invigorating the machine-building and 
electronics industry and provide focused support and 
preferential development. 
<H5>  A. Important technical equipment and engineering system </H5>
technology. 
  The research focus is on applications of systems 
engineering, 
gaining an understanding of systems design technology, and 
raising system completion levels. Do research on the key design 
and manufacturing technologies and on the process automation and 
control technologies and reliability technologies for key 
equipment in the systems. 
  Year 2000 
  --Do research on the related materials, technologies, and 
structural problems of supercritical parameter thermal power 
generators, automatic control technologies and cooling and peak 
regulation technologies for large thermal power generators, 
low-head power generation technology for hydropower generators, 
variable frequency power generation technology, nuclear power 
generator nuclear fuel cycle technology, high voltage and 
extra-high voltage power transmission and transformation 
equipment extra-high voltage control and insulation tolerance 
levels and loss reduction technology. 
  --Do research on automatic working condition monitoring and 
control technology for sets of equipment at large open-cut 
mines, frigid zone power intensity, centralized grease 
lubrication, and other systems and vibration reduction 
technology. 
  --Do research on the related automation, monitoring and 
control, energy conservation, speed regulation, and other 
technical problems for blast furnace, sintering, coking, 
smelting, rolling, and other key equipment needed in integrated 
iron and steel enterprises. Develop the equipment required for 
high-performance steel varieties and non-ferrous metal smelting 
equipment. 
  --Do research on the key equipment, instruments and gauges, 
and control systems appropriate for modern petroleum extraction 
and petrochemical, coal chemical, and new technology flow 
processes. Gain an understanding of key technologies for high 
pressures, high speeds, high degrees of sealing, high 
efficiency, corrosion resistance, low temperature resistance, 
energy consumption reduction, and so on that result from a move 
to larger sizes and high parameters. Do research on the 
reliability, adaptability, mechanization, automation, and other 
key technologies for desert oil field and marine oil field 
drilling and extraction equipment. 
  --Do R&amp;D on key technologies for new technical 
equipment for 
new types of dry method outside-the-kiln cement decomposition 
production technical equipment and flotation method glass 
production technical equipment. 
  --Do research on high efficiency, precision, automatic, and 
flexible manufacturing technology and equipment for vehicle 
production. 
  --Do research on key technologies for improving the 
performance, lifespan, reliability, automation, and so on of 
large harbor loading and unloading equipment. 
  --Do R&amp;D on communication electronic engineering systems 
technology; air traffic management automation, monopulse/S mode 
secondary radar technology, whole phase parameter solid state 
primary radar technology, and microwave landing technology; 
harbor ship traffic management automation and high resolution 
harbor radar technology; railroad operations management 
modernization, high-speed highway electronic monitoring and 
control, and urban communication management technology. 
  --Do R&amp;D on electronic engineering systems technology in 
public activities; major disaster electronic monitoring, 
forecasting, and rescue command systems technology; electric 
power load control systems technology; public structure 
electronic systems technology; safety and public health 
electronics technology, and so on. 
  --Do research on fault diagnosis and warning devices for use 
in major technical equipment and engineering systems. 
  Year 2020 
  Focus on dealing with the key technologies for developing 
toward larger sizes, special purposes, high efficiency, energy 
conservation, and automation and the related technologies for 
the equipment and systems required for high and new technology 
development. 
<H5>  B. Electromechanical integration technology. </H5>
  Closely integrating machine technology, electronics 
technology, and information technology to raise product 
performance and manufacturing technology to new levels in 
possible automatic optimized control will inevitably produce 
enormous economic and social benefits. The common key 
technologies in electromechanical integration are mainly 
detection and sensing technology, information processing 
technology, automatic control technology, systems integration 
technology, precision machine-building technology, servo and 
drive technology, and so on. Strive to make several 
breakthroughs. 
  Year 2000 
  --Do research on precision rapid position control and rapid 
response in servo drive technology. 
  --Do research on numerical control technology. In machine 
tools, the rate of a shift to numerical control should reach 50 
to 60 percent of value of output and the rate of a shift to 
numerical control should reach 20 percent of product varieties. 
  --Develop electric power electronics technology. Make a 
major 
effort to develop a new generation of electric power electronic 
components. Focus on developing self-turnoff components 
represented by crystal gate turn-off devices (GTO) and 
high-power transistors (GTR), and field control components 
represented by power field effect devices (MOSFET), static 
induction crystal gate devices (SITH), field control crystal 
gate devices (FCTH), and so on. Develop AC variable frequency 
speed regulation systems. 
  --Do research on expanded applications of microelectronics 
technology, reinforce R&amp;D on special-purpose electronic 
equipment. 
  Attain an intelligence rate of 15 to 20 percent for 
instruments and gauges. Focus: intelligent regulation and 
control instruments used in important technical equipment, 
microcomputer-controlled materials testing equipment, component 
analysis and surface analysis instruments, large precision 
testing and scientific experiment instruments, and electronic 
diagnosis, treatment, and other medical instruments. 
  In the area of vehicles, make conserving gas, reducing 
pollution, and guaranteeing safe operation the primary 
objective, achieve electronic control of ignition timing, 
air-fuel ratios, anti-lock braking, and gasoline injection. 
Further expand applications of electronic control technology in 
high-power medium-speed and low-speed diesel engines, ship 
diesel engines, electric-powered cars, and internal combustion 
electric motors. 
  The focus for agricultural machinery is on integration with 
raising grades and replacement and extending applications of 
microelectronics technology in all types of combined grain 
harvesters, large and moderate horsepower tractors, and 
livestock and feed processing machinery. 
  Do research on the use of electronics technology to replace 
and upgrade light industrial machinery, textile machinery, 
medical treatment equipment, and food packaging and printing 
machinery. Develop electromechanically integrated consumer 
products (such as household appliances, office machinery, 
cameras, etc.). 
  Year 2020 
  --Approach world levels of the period for primary 
Chinese-made electromechanically integrated products. 
  --Base 70 to 80 percent of the electromechanically 
integrated 
products required by all sectors of our national economy on 
domestic sources. 
  --Make exports of electromechanically integrated products 
account for 40 to 50 percent of total exports of machinery and 
electronic products. 
  --Do research on new types of electric power electronic 
circuit electromagnetic process and simulation technology. 
<H5>  C. Microelectronics technology. </H5>
  Microelectronics technology is the technical foundation of 
the modern electronics and information industries. The focus is: 
use the domestic market as a support, make breakthroughs in 
design technology and applications, achieve product replacement 
and scale production. In the near term, do R&amp;D on and apply 
application-specific integrated circuit technology to spur 
development of general-purpose ICs. 
  Year 2000 
  --Develop silicon IC technology, accelerate development of 
chemical compound semiconductor technology. 
  --Focus on application-specific ICs in doing research on 1 
micrometer very large scale ICs [VLSI] and gallium arsenide 
large scale ICs, microwave single chip ICs, and 
three-dimensional ICs; do batch production of 2 micrometer VLSI 
circuits; apply medium and small scale gallium arsenide and 
microwave single chip ICs; complete and perfect 3 micrometer IC 
technology systems and quality monitoring and control systems, 
gain an understanding of and extend scale production technology. 
  --Do R&amp;D on sets of circuits for household appliances, 
single-board computers and control computer circuits, IC 
technology for use in communications, gain an understanding of 
product design, production, and, management technology for scale 
production. 
  Year 2020 
  --Continue fostering the role of silicon IC technology, 
gradually raise technical levels and application levels of 
gallium arsenide ICs. 
  --Undertake additional research on new materials, new 
components, new equipment, and new assembly technology. 
  --Do targeted tracking and research on new trends in other 
microelectronics technologies and their applications. 
  --Do research on sub-micrometer (0.8 micrometer grade) VLSI 
circuit technology. 
  --Gain an understanding of and extend the application of 1 
micrometer VLSI circuit scale production technology, form a 
trial production capability for sub-micrometer VLSI circuits, 
comprehensively develop application-specific circuit product 
varieties in integration with main units, carry out systematic 
integration R&amp;D, move toward the highest international 
levels. 
<H5>  D. Optoelectronics technology. </H5>
  Optoelectronics technology mainly includes semiconductor 
optoelectronics, lasers, infrared, photography and displaying, 
information processing, and other technology. Its foundation is 
optoelectronic components, mainly various types of laser 
components, infrared components, detection components, 
photographic and display components, and optoelectronic 
integrated and optical integrated circuits, fiber optic cable 
and optical passive components, and so on. The core of 
optoelectronic technology is the application of complete 
optoelectronic units (systems). 
  Year 2000 
  --Gain an understanding of key optoelectronic component 
design and production technology, including optical 
communications, optical storage, laser processing, and other 
necessary components to basically meet our national economic 
development requirements. Focus on making breakthroughs in 
metallic oxide gaseous phase precipitation technology, molecular 
beam epitaxy technology, electron beam and ion beam etching 
technology, optical fiber coupling and sealing technology, 
superior quality large dimension laser crystal growth 
technology, high-strength optical thin film evaporation coating 
technology, and so on. Gradually achieve a shift to domestic 
production of technical equipment. 
  --Actively undertake research on optoelectronics technology 
complete applications units and systems, including applications 
in monitoring, control, and processing, office automation, 
communications and information processing, communication 
monitoring and control, medical treatment, agriculture and 
forestry, and other realms, form several broad-area 
optoelectronic complete units and systems. 
  --Do R&amp;D on vacuum and solid photography, flat displays, 
high-quality color imaging, high-function terminal display, and 
other technology. 
  --Develop long wavelength and ultra-long wavelength low-loss 
optical fiber and optical cable, optoelectronic components, and 
wave division multiplexing technology; coherent optical 
communications technology; and optical communications processing 
technology and optical integration technology. 
  --Develop high-power laser design and manufacturing 
technology, do research on expanding the application of lasers 
in processing, detection, assembly, and other areas, and develop 
the corresponding new generation of lasers. 
  Year 2020 
  Focus on making breakthroughs in optoelectronic and optical 
integrated circuits, ultra-long wavelength and multiple 
wavelength optical fiber and optical cable, and the 
corresponding optical passive components and receiver and 
emitter manufacturing and applications technology. 
<H5>  E. Computer and software technology. </H5>
  Computer and software technology can permeate nearly every 
realm of human activity and become a basic intelligent tool in 
S&amp;T and economic work. They have been integrated with many 
disciplines and have generated many new intersecting disciplines. 
  Year 2000 
  --Focus on developing fourth-generation computer technology, 
including systems architecture, hardware, and peripherals design 
and scale economic manufacturing technology. 
  --Focus on developing system software technology where we 
have our own copyrights, including operating systems, database 
management systems, and all types of language systems. 
  --Develop fourth generation computer applications 
technology, 
including industrial control technology, graphic, image, and 
voice processing technology, communication communications 
technology, network and interface technology, artificial 
intelligence technology, Chinese information processing 
technology, and computer-aided software engineering technology. 
  --Do research on public support software technology, 
man-machine interface technology, software engineering 
technology, and software integration, software intelligence, 
software solidification, and software production automation 
technology. 
  --Track the new generation of computer and software 
technology. (For example: (Feifeng Nuoyiman) computers, fuzzy 
computers, non-binary computers, optoelectronic computers, 
biocomputers, superconducting computers, etc.). 
  Year 2020 
  On the foundation of the fourth generation of computers, 
develop and establish a new generation computer industry and 
software industry. 
<H5>  F. Communications technology and broadcast and television </H5>
technology. 
  Communications is the infrastructure of modern society and a 
strategic focus of our national economic development. 
Broadcasting and television are the most effective propaganda 
and educational tools for establishing the ``two types of 
civilization [material and spiritual]''. 
  Digital communications technology and high-quality, 
multifunction, intelligent broadcasting and television 
technology are the primary development direction of the future. 
  Year 2000 
  --Focus on solving problems with scale production technology 
for optical fiber communications below DS 5, digital microwave 
communications below DS 4, high-capacity C band and Ku band 
satellite communications, and a new generation of mobile 
communications and other systems equipment and their key 
components. 
  --Gain an understanding of the software and hardware 
technology digital program controlled exchanges and the design 
and production technology for their application-specific ICs. 
  --Develop electric cable and optical cable bidirectional 
television transmission technology, digital television and flat 
television technology, high-fidelity audio technology, digital 
video recording and sound recording technology, and 
multi-function intelligent broadcast television terminal 
technology. 
  --Do R&amp;D on Ku band direct broadcast television 
satellite 
technology. 
  --Do R&amp;D on medium-wave amplitude modulation stereo 
broadcast 
technology, single sideband shortwave broadcast technology, and 
high-clarity television technology, develop energy-saving radio 
and television products. 
  Year 2020 
  --Focus on developing high-capacity, high-speed fiber optic 
communications system technology and integrated services digital 
satellite communications system technology, study and extend 
general-purpose integrated services digital network (ISDN) 
technology. 
  --Develop high-precision magnetic recording technology and 
erasable magneto-optical recording technology. 
<H5>  G. Design technology. </H5>
  Design technology is the primary link in the conversion of 
scientific research achievements into commodities. The one-time 
success rate for product designs in foreign countries has now 
risen from 30 or 40 percent to 90 percent. Because modern 
electromechanical products are developing toward large models, 
complete sets, precision, efficiency, high operation, and other 
high parameters, and because product replacement occurs quickly, 
the lifespan of one generation of products is becoming 
increasingly shorter, so to satisfy market demand and increase 
the competitiveness of products, we must continually improve 
design quality and efficiency. The focus is on extension and 
application of modern design theory and design technology. 
  Year 2000 
  --Focus on collecting and accumulating the load spectra of 
power generation equipment, metallurgical equipment, engineering 
machinery, vehicles, tractors, and so on and integrate with 
random fatigue and product strengthened lifespan experiments, 
friction science experiments, and stress and corrosion 
experiments to revise and perfect design regulations, 
principles, and standards and provide a foundation for designing. 
  --Do research on all types of general-purpose database and 
program database establishment technology. Strengthen technical 
data experimentation, collection, and accumulation work, 
gradually establish various types of special-purpose and 
general-purpose databases (such as materials physical 
performance, fatigue, friction and wear, corrosion, and other 
data) and graphics bases. 
  --Strengthen extension and application of modern design 
methods, including reliability design, optimization design, 
finite element design, fatigue design, limited lifespan design, 
man-machine engineering design, and other methods, extend 
modularized design and product mold-making design. 
  --Extend and develop computer-aided design (CAD) technology, 
do research on intersecting graphics systems, three-dimensional 
entity model modeling technology, dynamic duplication 
technology, and engineering pattern automatic input technology. 
  --Do research on electronics product stability design 
applications and special-purpose IC design and standard IC 
structural design technology. 
  --Do research on establishing reliability technology systems 
and guarantee systems. Strengthen analytical research on the 
failure of machinery and electronics products and basic 
components. 
  Year 2020 
  --Do research on multi-objective, multiple variable, 
multiple 
restraint complex systems optimized design methods, do research 
on large non-linear power computing programs and on 
special-purpose design programs targeted at products. 
  --Gain an understanding of and universally apply advanced 
design methods, use fatigue design methods to design products 
that receive variable loads, use computers to conduct true load 
duplication simulation, use fracture dynamics for estimations to 
analyze defective components in large bands; damage capacity 
designs based on fracture mechanics; use dynamics analysis 
software to conduct systematic dynamic analysis of machinery 
structures; carry out dynamic optimization analysis, systems 
analysis, machine-machine engineering analysis, all types of 
reliability analysis, and so on. 
  --Establish failure atlases and case databases for all 
categories of products. Develop probability designs and 
maintenance designs for electromechanical products 
environmental-tolerant designs for all types of special 
environments. 
  --Establish complete and appropriate databases and new 
design 
regulations. Achieve computer-aided design (CAD) for more than 
90 percent of machinery and electronics product atlases. 
  --Do research on expert systems applications and establish 
the corresponding knowledge bases and experience bases. 
<H5>  H. Advanced manufacturing technology. </H5>
  Manufacturing technology is the basis for achieving 
high-performance product design and the key technology for 
improving quality, improving productivity, reducing consumption, 
lowering costs, improving labor conditions, and reducing and 
even eliminating environmental pollution. With the development 
and gradual industrialization of new technologies and high 
technologies, market competition will become ever more intense 
and the importance of developing advanced manufacturing 
technologies will become increasingly prominent. The development 
directions for manufacturing technology are toward high 
engineering, superior quality, precision, and automation. 
  Year 2000 
  --Improve the quality and manufacturing levels for the large 
key cast, forged, welded, and heat treated components in power 
generation, metallurgical, chemical industry, and other major 
sets of equipment. Raise our self-sufficiency rate for large 
cast and forged components to 70 percent. 
  --Do systematic research on cold and hot processing 
technique 
regulations, unify standards, establish regulations databases 
and expert systems for cutting, grinding, casting, forging, 
welding, heat treatment, and other technologies. Lay a 
foundation for achieving computer-aided manufacturing (CAM). 
  --Raise conventional technology levels such as high-speed 
cutting, ultra-precise cutting, minor and no-cutting, gas 
protection welding, oxide-free heating, surface protection 
technology, wear-resistant and corrosion-resistant metallic hot 
spray surface plating and buttering, and other technologies. 
Study and extend applications of cold-temperature compression, 
precision forging, roller forging, oblique rolling, rotary 
compression forming, super-plastic forming, and other shaping 
technologies for axles, blades, bearings, standard components, 
and all other types of components used in large amounts over 
broad areas. Study and extend precision impact cutting shaping 
and processing. 
  --Do research on high precision (0.1 micrometer and above) 
and large component cutting and processing technology, thin-wall 
and small-margin casting technology, new high-density energy 
welding, cutting, heat treatment, and surface protection 
technology (such as applications of lasers, electron beams, ion 
beams, and so on). 
  --Do R&amp;D on electronic product scale production and new 
rear-end packaging technology, focus on making breakthroughs in 
assembly, non-metallic materials processing, precision mold 
processing, thin film formation, surface decoration, and other 
technologies. 
  --Do research on ceramic powder, electron pulp, and 
high-performance base plate manufacturing technology and chip 
component carrier component manufacturing technology. 
  --Systematically develop technical equipment, auxiliary 
equipment, and technical materials adapted to traditional 
technology and new technological developments, gradually form 
production capacities and series, attain a fulfillment rate of 
80 to 85 percent. 
  --Do R&amp;D on microfine processing (1 to 2 micrometers), 
analysis, testing, and quality control technology. 
  Year 2020 
  Attain self-sufficiency rates of 95 percent for large and 
medium-sized cast and forged components for power generation, 
metallurgical, chemical industry, and other important sets of 
equipment. 
  --Gain a fundamental understanding of precision and 
ultra-precision processing technology and large component 
processing and special type processing technology to meet the 
requirements for development of the space, aviation, nuclear 
power, electronics, and instruments industries. In special 
processing realms, broadly apply laser, electron beam, ion beam, 
and other technologies. 
  --Attain a fulfillment rate of 95 percent for the technical 
equipment, auxiliary equipment, and technical materials adapted 
to complete set production and new technologies. 
  --Gain a fundamental understanding of electronic product 
scale production technology, broadly apply thin film formation, 
surface decoration, and other technologies. 
<H5>  I. Testing and sensing technology. </H5>
  Modern testing technology relies primarily on transducers 
and 
all types of information measurement devices, information about 
the absolute values of the physical quantities, chemical 
quantities, and state quantities generated by the object being 
tested and changes in them, and has response and conversion 
functions. Sensing technology is also an assembly of optical, 
electronic, audio, information, bionic, and various other new 
technologies. The primary tasks that testing technology will 
face in the future are continually resolving the measurement 
content proposed by the development of new technologies and 
their precision, speed, reliability, and other problems, and it 
is an indispensable part of modern automation technology. 
  Year 2000 
  --Do research on testing technologies for the external 
loads, 
stresses, and strains of electromechanical products under all 
types of unusual working conditions, and non-destructive testing 
technology for especially thick components and rough surfaces. 
  --Integrate with product characteristics in undertaking 
research on emission, potential method, and other crack 
detection technologies, diagnosis methods, and information 
processing technologies. 
  --Do research on rapid strengthening simulation testing and 
dynamic simulation testing technology. 
  --Do research on automatic testing technology for 
large-batch 
production and on automatic testing systems used in scientific 
experiments, raise the precision of testing and the scope of 
testing by one to two numerical grades. Meet the speed and 
reliability requirements of automatic measurement. 
  --Do research on new types of detecting technologies (laser, 
superconduction, sound wave, infrared, etc.) and sensing 
mechanisms. 
  --Undertake research on advanced information testing 
technologies and on digital and intelligent electronic 
measurement instruments. 
  --Do research on detecting sensing components for all types 
of detection uses and on sensing and transducing component 
manufacturing technology and equipment. 
  --Develop digital and analog transducers and contact and 
non-contact type transducers. 
  --Do research on integrated and intelligent sensing 
technology. 
  Year 2020 
  --Do research on dynamic detection technology for 
electromechanical products, complete units and systems 
simulation and rapid strengthening technology, and do research 
on testing technology for complex stress and strain problems. 
  --Accelerate research on transducer solidification, 
miniaturization, integration and shifting to intelligence, 
graphics, multiple functions, and optics. 
  --Broadly apply dynamic testing technology, do research on 
systemization of testing technology, meaning form and complete a 
system from information collection, transmission, and processing 
to display, and raise the precision of testing by one to two 
numerical grades compared to the year 2000. 
<H5>  J. Computer-integrated manufacturing technology (CIM). </H5>
  Computer-integrated manufacturing technology (CIM) mainly 
resolves problems in the automation of discrete production 
processes and is a necessary transformation for development of 
the machine-building and electronics industry. CIM uses 
computers and their software to organically integrate the 
various types of scattered automation systems required by the 
manufacturing and administrative activities of manufacturing 
plants to achieve automation of the entire process from market 
forecasting, design, and processing to after-sales services. 
  Year 2000 
  --Undertake R&amp;D on key technologies for 
computer-integrated 
manufacturing systems: digital control and the related 
technologies, industrial robot technology, materials storage, 
transportation, and identification technology, flexible 
manufacturing systems technology, and information integration 
and systems analysis technology, quality assurance and diagnosis 
monitoring and control systems technology, management and 
administration and production control technology, artificial 
intelligence technology, and so on. 
  --Gain a fundamental understanding of industrial robot 
design 
and manufacturing technology, and achieve commercialization and 
partial industrialization; develop new varieties of industrial 
robots such as economical robots, flat joint assembly robots, 
large robots for use in casting and forging production, and 
partially intelligent assembly robots; do research on the third 
generation of robots. 
  --Do research on layered and distributed database 
technology, 
establish a small number of CIM system general-purpose databases 
such as integrated storage and retrieval data, tables, and 
various other information databases, materials databases, tools 
databases, common technology databases, and so on. 
  --Do R&amp;D on CIM integrated software systems and network 
interface technology. 
  --Establish several expert systems, such as cutting tools, 
complex cavity mold (including injection mold) design, 
manufacturing, and machinery equipment fault diagnosis systems, 
and so on. 
  --Do research on real-time on-line fault information 
collection technology, fault self-diagnosis systems, an so on. 
  Year 2020 
  --Do research on overall deployments for achieving a shift 
to 
CIM in China's machine-building and electronics industry during 
the 21st Century and gradually implement the measures. 
  --Do research on a third generation of robots with sight, 
hearing, and natural speech capabilities and form an industry. 
  --Do research on the expert systems and establishment of 
knowledge databases associated with integrated manufacturing 
technology. 
  --Do research on intelligent computer-integrated 
manufacturing technology based on the fifth generation and 
possibly on a sixth generation of computers. 
<H5>  K. Basic components integrated technology. </H5>
  Basic components technology for machinery and electronics 
play a decisive role to a substantial extend in equipment and 
systems levels and in quality and reliability. The focus of 
basic components technology is research on key technologies to 
improve their quality, performance and reliability and 
continuing to actively develop high-performance, miniaturized, 
modularized, intelligent, specialized, highly reliable, and 
other new types of basic components. 
  Year 2000 
  --Concentrate forces to study and resolve problems in key 
technologies for the maintenance of precision, high transmission 
speeds, low noise, and high performance in general-purpose 
components. Do R&amp;D on new types of products appropriate for 
the 
requirements of various working conditions. 
  --Improve the efficiency, control performance, reliability, 
and quality stability of hydraulic components and system. 
Develop high-pressure flow rate hydraulic components and 
functional compound components, do research on hydraulic system 
contamination control technology. 
  --Do research to improve the lifespan, reliability, and 
other 
technical levels of pneumatic components and systems. Develop 
low power consumption, electrical-pneumatic-hydraulic integrated 
air source purification, and other new technologies. 
  --Develop high-speed, high temperature, high-pressure, and 
corrosion-resistant sealing components. 
  --Improve the technical performance, reliability, and 
quality 
stability of low-voltage electrical components. Develop 
standardized, general purpose, adaptable, and highly safe 
low-voltage electrical components, do research on electronic 
multifunction and other types of new low-voltage electrical 
components. 
  --Do research to resolve problems with key technologies for 
high quality, high reliability, rapid adaptation, and so on for 
tractor and internal combustion engine fittings and vehicle and 
ship components. 
  --Do research to improve the quality and reliability of 
instrument components, develop multifunction instrument 
components. 
  --Do R&amp;D on design technology and manufacturing 
technology 
for a variety of chip components, form scale production. 
  --Do R&amp;D on new types of high-resolution display tubes 
and 
their electronic and vacuum components and microwave and 
millimeter wave components. 
  --Do research to improve the quality and reliability of 
small 
and special electric machines, switches, relays, and connectors. 
  --Do R&amp;D on new types of miniature audio components, 
piezo-electric crystal components, and magnetic, audio, and 
optical storage and recording component technology. 
  --Do R&amp;D on high-performance, highly reliable, 
low-cost, and 
miniature physical and chemical power sources. 
  --Develop high efficiency, precision, complex, and long 
lifespan mold design, manufacturing, and assembly technology 
(including impact molding, injection molding, forged molding, 
etc.) and the associated technical equipment. 
  Do research on heat current channel formation technology and 
mold temperature control technology, develop heat current 
channel components and temperature control components, develop 
and apply various types of rapid and convenient mold-making 
technologies and rapid mold replacement technologies. 
  Year 2020 
  --Do R&amp;D on various types of miniature, huge, new 
principles, 
new media, special environment, and compound integration 
hydraulic and pneumatic components, make their lifespans and 
reliability basically attain or approximate level of similar 
products internationally at that time, and make product variety 
specifications and quantities basically meet product development 
requirements. 
  --Do research on and produce sealing components for use in 
high speed, high temperature, high pressure, corrosion 
resistant, and other special working conditions. 
  --Attain standardization, general use, adaptability, and 
safety in the product structures of hydraulic and pneumatic 
components, electronic components, electrical devices, and 
instrument components. Satisfy product development requirements 
for multi-function electrical components, basically satisfy 
market demand for development and production of 
application-specific ICs. 
  --Broadly apply microelectronic and computer technology in 
the basic components industry and widely use laser, fiber optic, 
biochemical, imaging, and other new technologies based on 
requirements. 
  --Do research on ultra-precision (0.1 micrometer) and 
multiple operating position (over 50 operating positions) grade 
molding entry advanced structures and large and precision 
component mold manufacturing technology and broadly extend and 
apply them. 
<H5>  L. Special-purpose materials development and materials </H5>
application technology. 
  R&amp;D work on special-purpose materials in the 
machine-building 
and electronics industry is relatively weak and we lag far 
behind foreign countries in materials application technology, 
which is manifested primarily in: many shortages and few product 
varieties for high-performance materials, low materials use 
levels, and low materials utilization rates; common materials 
with low overall performance account for the largest portion and 
they have poor quality and incomplete product variety 
specifications, which affect product quality. Materials 
strengthening and surface protection technologies are not widely 
applied. 
  Year 2000 
  --Do research on key technologies for high parameter energy 
resource equipment, ultra-high precision instrument materials, 
highly sensitive materials, and permanent magnet materials. 
  --Do research on and expand applications of high-strength 
steels, nodular cast iron, powder metallurgy, and diamond, boron 
nitride, and other ultrahard cutting tools. 
  --Do research on new types of high-performance engineering 
plastics, new types of composite materials, and fine ceramics 
and on their applications technology. 
  --Develop large diameter perfect silicon crystals for use in 
microelectronics technology products and electronic components, 
new types of semiconducting materials and high-purity metallic 
and metallic-chemical compounds with unique physical properties, 
materials used in chip components and mixed ICs, and so on. 
  --Develop new types of photoelectric semiconducting 
materials, photoelectric conversion materials, and photoelectric 
transmission materials. 
  --Develop auxiliary materials for the machine-building and 
electronics industry such as lubricants, rust prevention 
materials, sealing materials, bonding agents, and so on. 
  --Undertake research on materials consumption technology; 
increase the proportion of economical materials applications. 
  Year 2020 
  Besides the need for conventional materials to adapt to high 
parameter developments, the foci are: 
  --Do research on regular temperature superconducting 
materials and applications technology for high-tech ceramics in 
the machine-building and electronics industry. Do research on 
applications of carbon fiber reinforced plastics, 
microcrystalline and non-crystalline state alloy materials, and 
high-density energy storage materials in machinery components 
and electronic products and on their applications technology. 
  --Do research on special types of corrosion-resistant 
materials and surface technology such as laser surface corrosion 
resistant alloying, functional metallic surface passive films, 
light metallic base composite materials, and so on. 
  --Undertake research on computer-aided materials selection 
systems. 
  --Undertake research on materials application technology and 
testing technology. 
<H5>  M. Energy conservation technology. </H5>
  Energy resource consumption per unit of industrial value of 
output in China is several times higher than in the industrially 
developed countries, and over one half is consumed in 
electromechanical products. This shows that there is substantial 
potential for energy conservation in China's electromechanical 
products. The routes to energy conservation can be divided into 
three main areas: energy transmission, energy conversion, and 
systematic energy conservation. The energy conservation 
potential of the latter is greater than that of the two former 
areas. 
  Year 2000 
  --Strengthen research on improving product energy conversion 
efficiency and the related drive science, friction science, 
electrical engineering, engineering fluid dynamics, 
aerodynamics, and engineering thermophysics, lay a foundation 
for product renewal and replacement. 
  --Do research on modern large-scale electric power systems, 
large capacity generation high-performance insulation 
technology, loss reduction, iron core structures, and other 
technology, and boiler and industrial oven and kiln combustion 
technology. 
  --Do research on applications of ternary flow theory to 
upgrade the structures of centrifugal compressors, blowers, 
steam turbine blades, and turbines, apply two-phase flow theory 
to upgrade solid and flow mixed media pump structures and 
improve pump efficiency. 
  --Extend and apply electric power electronics technology, 
reduce energy consumption in blowers, water pumps, electric 
welders, and other energy consuming products used over broad 
areas. 
  --Do research on the adoption of AC-AC variable frequency 
drive systems for use in electric drive equipment and on 
electric motor rotation speed regulation systems, improve their 
efficiency. 
  --Develop flow meters, combustion analyzers, intelligent 
energy management and controllers that have microcomputers, 
achieve systematic energy conservation for enterprises that 
consume large amounts of energy. 
  --Do additional research on heat and power cogeneration, 
coal-fired/gas-fired--steam combined cycle power generation 
technology, increase overall efficiency. 
  --Do research on pressurization technology for internal 
combustion engines, increase the efficiency of vehicles, 
tractors, engineering machinery, and so on. 
  --Do research on surplus heat and surplus pressure recover 
thermal devices, low heat value and low potential energy 
comprehensive utilization technology, and various types of new 
high-efficiency heat transfer components and devices. 
  --Adapt to local conditions in developing and utilizing new 
energy resources, such as: 10MW-grade tidal energy power 
generation technology and solar energy and hydrogen energy 
utilization technology, develop a new generation of chemical and 
physical power sources, achieve an appropriate degree of scale 
production. 
  --Do research on substitute fuels and develop energy 
conservation software. 
  Year 2020 
  Guided by modern theory, do further research on improving 
machinery product drive, friction, combustion, insulation, and 
other new technologies, make the energy consumption indices of 
machinery products attain or approximate advanced international 
levels. 
  --Do research on the use of variable speed drives in blowers 
and pumps with relatively large load variations; do research on 
3MW and up large generators with intense load variations in 
conjunction with the use of dynamic passive power compensation 
and high sub-harmonic absorption devices, adopt sound frequency 
control systems for industrial boilers. 
  --Do applied research on magnetohydrodynamic power 
generation, magnetic levitation technology, magnetic ion 
technology, and new energy resources. 
<H5>  N. Modern management technology. </H5>
  The essence of management is the optimized deployment and 
operation of all types of resources, and advanced technology 
often cannot foster its role except through advanced management. 
Thus, the adoption of modern management technology in 
decision-making, program formulation, planning, administration, 
production, marketing, and other realms is extremely important 
for improving management levels, labor productivity, and 
economic results. 
  Year 2000 
  --Broadly study and apply operational research, forecasting, 
evaluation technology, decision-making science, control theory, 
systems theory, information theory, and other modern theories in 
macro management of the machine-building and electronics 
industry. 
  --Broadly study and apply industrial engineering, management 
economics, man-machine engineering, behavioral science, and 
statistics in enterprise management. 
  --Study and formulate according to industry advanced work 
time quota standards, universally adopt value engineering, group 
formation technology, reliability management, and enterprise 
diagnosis, establish several standard time work system 
demonstration points in key enterprises in all industries. Use 
reinforced work technique management in medium-sized and small 
enterprises as a foundation for intensive implementation of 
comprehensive quality management to improve the quality of 
enterprises. 
  --Do research on management information systems and 
technology. This includes: enterprise management commercial 
software packages, management model software bases, enterprise 
decision-making support systems, distributed network information 
systems, data collection systems, and industry and enterprise 
office automation systems (OA), and gradually apply them in 
enterprises. 
  Year 2020 
  --Comprehensively achieve computer-aided management in 80 
percent of enterprises in the machine-building and electronics 
industry. 
  --Implement production standard time work systems in 60 
percent of enterprises to substantially increase labor 
productivity and reduce production costs. 
  --Do research on modern management methods and the 
management 
technologies associated with computer-integrated production 
systems. 
  --Achieve office and marketing automation in 50 to 60 
percent 
of key enterprises in the machine-building and electronics 
industry. 
<H5>  Information and Communications </H5>
  The concept of information and communications technology in 
the ``Program'' refers to microelectronics technology, 
telecommunications and posts technology, computer systems and 
their peripherals and software technology, computer-aided 
technology, and information systems and office management 
technology. Among these, computer-aided technology refers 
primarily to computer-aided design (CAD), computer-aided 
manufacturing (CAM), computer-aided testing (CAT), and 
computer-integrated manufacturing systems (CIM) technology. 
Information systems refer to information collection, storage, 
processing, transmission, and utilization systems based on 
computers and modern telecommunications technology. 
<H5>  I. Development Strategies and Objectives </H5>
<H5>  A. Development strategies </H5>
  To deal with the reality that China's lag behind the 
developed nations in the information and communications fields 
is still growing, formulating a correct development strategy for 
the information and communications technology field is extremely 
important. Based on analysis and research concerning the present 
international and domestic environment and conditions, the basic 
development strategy for this realm can be summarized as: 
  --Information and communications S&amp;T work must be 
oriented 
toward and lead development of our national economy and make its 
driving force meeting the needs that national economy places on 
the information and communications industry. Rationally and 
comprehensively arranging developmental research, applied 
research, and basic research to make the three form a deployment 
in depth mainly requires that our primary forces be concentrated 
on the present requirements of our national economic development 
and that we appropriately organize crack forces to orient toward 
the 21st Century and track new international technologies. 
  We must begin with China's current situation and 
characteristics, closely integrated scientific research, 
education, production, and utilization units, spur integration 
between scientific research and enterprises, shorten scientific 
research and production schedules, and spur the rapid conversion 
of scientific research achievements into forces of production. 
  --Adhere to the principle of ``importing, digesting, 
developing, innovating'' and integrating technology with trade, 
combine importing advanced technology from foreign countries 
with reinforcement of our own development and research, closely 
integrate imported technologies with domestic S&amp;T work so 
that 
each promotes the other, and raise domestic technology levels. 
  --Make full use of the macro control and decision-making 
roles of soft science. Research on communications network 
systems and standards must be the vanguard for communications 
equipment development and communications construction, and 
ensure that network technology plays a guidance, promotional, 
and restricting role for the three technologies of conversion, 
transmission, and terminals to gain the optimum economic results 
in construction of communications networks. 
  --The development of information and communications S&amp;T 
must 
have prominent foci. Among them, the focus of telecommunications 
technology is on program controlled conversion, fiber optic 
communications, mobile communications, satellite communications, 
digital microwave, and ISDN network technology for use in all 
types of telecommunications networks. The focus of technology in 
the postal administration is on reducing physical labor and 
raising mail processing rates, improving the working 
environment, and establishing a rational postal administration 
network system. The focus for microelectronics technology 
development is on complete sets of techniques and technology and 
technology quality monitoring and control system technology for 
commercialized production of sub-micrometer very-large scale 
integrated circuits. The development focus for computer 
technology is making comprehensive breakthroughs in production 
technology for fourth generation computer systems and gaining an 
understanding of the key technologies for a new generation of 
computer systems. 
  The overall strategic direction for this realm is rapidly 
reversing the passive situation of China's still-expanding lag 
behind the developed countries and the new emerging 
industrializing countries and regions. Information and 
communications technology should be made into a tractive force 
that spurs China's social and economic development. 
<H5>  B. Strategic objectives </H5>
  Strategic objectives for communications S&amp;T development: 
  Prior to 2000, the development of communications S&amp;T 
should 
serve the achievement of a six-fold increase in posts and 
telecommunications capacity, the basic achievement of 
self-sufficiency in telecommunications and postal and 
communications network upgrading and construction and in primary 
equipment, technology, and techniques (basic self-sufficiency 
refers to the next value of imports after offsetting imports and 
exports not exceeding the gross value of industrial output), and 
strive to attain international levels of the late 1980's in 
S&amp;T 
levels for certain important realms. 
  By 2020, communications S&amp;T development must serve 
accelerated development of our posts and telecommunications 
capacity, serve the continued perfection and development of 
postal and telecommunications networks, and use S&amp;T as a 
pillar 
for establishing a complete communications industrial colony. 
Basically achieve a shift to domestic production for the 
technology, techniques, and communications equipment required 
for communications network construction. Further shorten our lag 
in scientific research levels behind the developed nations in 
the communications S&amp;T realm and strive to catch up with 
advanced international levels for scientific research levels in 
certain specializations. 
  The strategic objectives for development of microelectronics 
and computer S&amp;T: 
  By 2000, microelectronics and computer S&amp;T development 
levels 
should attain the levels of the early and mid-1980's in the 
developed countries, meaning they will lag 15 to 20 years behind 
the developed countries. 
  By 2020, China's microelectronics and computer S&amp;T 
development levels should attain levels of 2005 to 2015 in the 
developed nations, meaning they will lag 10 to 15 years behind. 
<H5>  II. Focal Tasks and Key Technologies </H5>
<H5>  A. Communications technology. </H5>
  1. Network technology: work on problems concerning network 
digital mode compatibility technology; gradually gain an 
understanding of network synchronization technology; develop 
network management systems; do research on technical system 
standardization for integrated services digital networks (ISDN); 
establish an ISDN experimental base area, gradually develop 
integrated services digital networks. After 2000, complete 
inspection and certification of broadband integrated services 
digital network (B-ISDN) technical systems, standardization, and 
experimental networks. 
  2. Telephone switching technology: Gain a comprehensive 
understanding of moderate and large capacity digital stored 
program controlled (SPC) switching systems equipment production 
and develop the various related technologies; conduct research 
on SPC digital switches appropriate for ISDN; do research on 
broadband switching and on-board satellite switching technology; 
form a SPC digital switching equipment industry on a substantial 
scale. After 2000, continue to do research on broadband 
switching technology (including optical switching) and on-board 
satellite switching technology and gradually put it into use. 
  3. Transmission technology: Give preference to the 
development of digital transmission technology, make major 
efforts to develop fiber optic communications, satellite 
communications, digital microwave communications, and other new 
technologies, actively do R&amp;D on circuit multiplexing 
technology 
and capacity expansion technology, focus on developing mobile 
communications; undertake research and application of production 
technology, form a scale production capability for all major 
types of transmission measures equipment systems. After 2000, 
gain an understanding of Gb/s high-speed optical transmission 
system technology, do research on urban broadband network 
optical transmission technology, large-capacity extra-long 
lifespan satellite communications technology, technology for 
using new microwave bands, and so on. 
  4. Data communications technology: Develop all types of data 
terminal equipment, switching and transmission equipment, 
network control center equipment, and so on; rely primarily on 
our own developments to gradually establish public packet data 
communications networks; after 2000, continue to do research on 
high-speed packet switching technology for voice, data, and 
other integrated services and put them into use. 
  5. Fax and telegraph communications technology. 
  6. Secure communications technology: do research on 
encryption theory and detection standards, do research on public 
packet switching network encryption technology, develop data, 
fax, voice communications, and other types of encryption 
equipment. 
  7. Communications instruments technology. 
  8. Postal administration technology: Further scientifically 
organize and optimize central bureau system postal 
communications networks. Do R&amp;D on postal administration 
network 
scientific management, monitoring and control, and postal 
service digital integration systems, postal administration 
network technology for advanced applications, and complete sets 
of postal administration equipment. 
<H5>  B. Microelectronics and computer technology. </H5>
  See the Medium and Long-Term S&amp;T Development Program for 
Machine-Building and Electronics for details of industrial 
technology development for microelectronics and computer 
technology. 
  To develop the information and communications industry, the 
microelectronics and computer industries must: 
  1. Make major efforts to develop application specific 
integrated circuits (ASIC), fuse development of microelectronics 
and systems development together, try to make substantial 
improvements in information and communications product 
performance and reliability, reduce costs, reduce volumes, 
increase competitiveness. 
  To accomplish this, we must concentrate forces to establish 
one to three technically stable and nationally oriented 
processing centers (foundries), popularize large-scale 
integrated circuit CAD technology, and establish several 10 or 
over 100 design centers. We should also strive to stabilize the 
technology for the 3 to 5 micrometer imported production lines, 
open up processing services to all of society, and strive to use 
the development of ASIC to fully foster the potential of 
existing equipment. 
  2. Reverse the abnormal situation of only have software 
research and basically having no industry. Focus on developing a 
large software capacity, try to provide the program controlled 
switch software, information management system software, CIMS 
software, and other large software required for the development 
of China's information systems as quickly as possible. 
  3. Make major efforts to develop Chinese input computer 
technology, lay a foundation for having information systems 
permeate all aspects of our national economy and society. 
  4. Develop China's own systems design forces, try to form a 
large information system design capability as quickly as 
possible. 
<H5>  Metallic Materials </H5>
  Metallic materials are important raw materials required in 
the energy, communications, machine-building, electronics, 
chemical, light and textiles, and other industries. S&amp;T work 
in 
the metallic materials industry must resolutely serve enterprise 
technical upgrading, production, and construction, actively 
digest, absorb, and innovate imported technology, make major 
efforts to organize attacks on key S&amp;T problems and develop 
technology to make several important achievements in new 
technologies, new equipment, and network materials, and make the 
necessary contribution to economic construction, social 
development, and national defense modernization. 
  At present, the main problems facing the metallic materials 
industry are: 1) Product quality and variety that do not meet 
the needs of China's readjustment of the industrial structure 
and technical progress; 2) A low self-sufficiency rate and an 
acute contradiction between supply and demand; 3) A lack of 
fundamental changes in the situation within the industry of 
uneven development, a lack of proper matchups, and backward 
techniques, technologies, and equipment. The basic solution is 
reform, reliance on S&amp;T progress, and reliance on scientific 
management to achieve even greater development of the forces of 
production in the metallic materials industry and move overall 
S&amp;T levels near to advanced world levels more quickly. 
<H5>  I. Development Strategies and Objectives </H5>
<H5>  A. Development strategies. </H5>
  From now until the end of this century, the metallic 
materials industry must resolutely and unwaveringly adhere to 
the 13th CPC Central Committee's strategy of ``focusing on 
results, improved quality, coordinated development, stable 
growth''. Focusing on S&amp;T progress and economic results 
involves 
fundamental work to make greater changes in the face of the 
metallic materials industry. 
  The iron and steel industry must make product variety and 
quality its strategic focus, and its goal for the year 2000 is: 
with a prerequisite of continually improving product quality, 
expanding product variety, improving economic results, 
conserving energy and reducing consumption, and improving the 
environment, attain a steel output of 80 to 90 million tons. In 
the steel product structure, increase sheet and pipe from 36 
percent in 1986 to about 45 percent; produce 60 percent of steel 
which attains international standards and advanced standards in 
foreign countries; substantially alleviate shortages of key 
product varieties for about 100 types of products needed by all 
sectors of the national economy. 
  The non-ferrous metals industry must make increasing output, 
expanding product variety, and improving quality its strategic 
focus. By 2000, strive for output of 4 to 4.5 million tons of 10 
types of non-ferrous metals, increase the comprehensive 
utilization rate of paragenetic non-ferrous metals in key 
smelting enterprises from 50 percent to 70 to 80 percent, reduce 
DC electricity consumption per ton of aluminum in key aluminum 
mills from 14,800 kWh to 13,000 to 13,200 kWh, increase the 
finished product rate for copper sheet and band from 50 to 60 
percent up to 70 to 80 percent, and for primary products 
excluding copper and nickel, strive to achieve self-sufficiency 
in quantity, continually expand the product variety of 
non-ferrous metals, rare metals, and new materials, and improve 
quality. 
  By 2020, make the basic configuration, enterprise structure, 
technology structure, product variety structure, product 
quality, and staff quality in the metallic materials industry 
more scientific and rational and establish a preliminary 
industrial system with Chinese characteristics that is 
internationally competitive that basically meets our national 
industrialization and modernization requirements. 
  To achieve this arduous task, we must use new technology to 
upgrade traditional techniques and equipment to shift the 
metallic materials industry onto the track of modern S&amp;T and 
modern scientific management. For this purpose, we must 
formulate an S&amp;T development strategy that is appropriate for 
our step-by-step achievement of our development objectives, and 
its guiding ideology and basic principles are: 
  1. S&amp;T in the iron and steel industrial must make 
expanding 
product variety and improving quality its fundamental principle. 
It must resolutely adhere to the technical principle of fine 
material, fining, precision rolling, and finishing and strive to 
improve product quality. It must focus on developing low-alloy 
steel and alloy steel, reinforce scientific research and 
production for special steels, and form a leading-edge technical 
base area as quickly as possible to service industrial 
development and new technology industry. S&amp;T work in the 
non-ferrous metals industry must make increasing output, 
expanding product variety, and improving quality its fundamental 
principle. It must give preference to developing aluminum, 
actively developing lead, zinc, gold, and silver, create the 
conditions for developing copper, and selectively develop other 
non-ferrous metals to meet the development needs of our national 
economy. 
  2. Continually reform techniques and equipment and develop 
new technologies to change the situation of high consumption of 
raw materials, energy, and labor per unit of product and severe 
pollution. 
  3. Weak mines and insufficient resources are an acute 
contradiction in development of the metallic materials industry. 
While using the ore resources of foreign countries, we must 
place our standpoint on rapid development of domestic mines. We 
must accelerate exploration and development of resources in 
serious shortage, improve extraction rates and the extent of 
utilization, and protect resources and the ecology and 
environment. 
  We must rationally utilize mineral resources and renewable 
resources, focus on comprehensive utilization of resources, and 
strive to raise utilization levels for valuable elements and 
useful materials. 
  4. Pay full attention to basic research work, make 
comprehensive arrangements for development research, applied 
research, basic research, and soft science research. 
  5. We must focus on digesting, transplanting, extending, and 
innovating imported technology as a strategic issue. 
<H5>  B. Strategic objectives. </H5>
  Year 2000 
  1. Organize attacks on key problems targeted on the key 
product varieties required by departments of the national and 
the national defense industry and the new types of materials 
required for high-tech development, provide several important 
achievements, and apply them in production and construction. 
Attain the levels of developed countries of the early 1980's in 
most realms of new materials S&amp;T and attain advanced levels 
of 
the period for some of them. 
  2. Provide new technologies and new equipment to improve 
production technology and raise equipment levels in existing 
enterprises. Attain levels of the late 1970's or early 1980's 
for the primary techniques and production technologies in large 
enterprises. 
  3. Make major efforts to improve product quality, readjust 
the product mix. Actively implement international standards, 
develop measurement, testing, information bases, and other basic 
technical work, form integral metallic materials industry 
standards. 
  4. Undertake technology development centered on conserving 
energy and reducing consumption, use technical upgrading in an 
effort to attain total energy consumption of 1.4 tons of 
standard per ton of steel and total energy consumption of 8.5 
tons of standard coal per ton of aluminum in key enterprises. 
  5. Accelerate the conversion of S&amp;T constructions into 
forces 
of production. Attain a conversion rate of about 60 percent for 
moving technology development achievements into production. 
  Year 2020 
  Development and application of information technology, 
automation technology, new energy resource technology, new 
materials technology, and other key high-tech fields in the 
metallic materials industry will develop rapidly. Make 
breakthroughs in new materials technology realms where we have 
advantages, spur the development of related S&amp;T, and for an 
emerging industry with a high added value. 
<H5>  II. Focal Tasks and Key Technologies </H5>
  In 2000, the focal tasks and key technologies for S&amp;T 
development are: 
<H5>  A. Geological surveying. </H5>
  1. Do research on the formational categories and mineral 
exploration directions of easily extracted and easily dressed 
iron ore, do forecasting of the mineralization of manganese-rich 
ores and superior quality manganese ore and chromium ore, 
further expand available mineral reserves. 
  2. Give preference to solving shortages of copper, gold, and 
silver ores, accelerate exploration for aluminum, lead, zinc, 
tin, antimony, and rare metal resources, undertake geological 
prospecting research for a second round of searching for 
minerals surrounding existing producing mines to extend the 
service lives of mines. Explore for minerals in strategic 
regions and zones, do research on the geological environment of 
mineralization, establish mineralization models, search for 
large non-ferrous metal ore beds. For copper, the middle and 
lower reaches of the Chang Jiang and the northeast region of 
Jiangxi are the main areas for doing focused research to locate 
large concealed ore deposits; for aluminum, we should do 
research on the formational conditions and ore exploration 
directions for bauxite in Guangxi, Guangdong, Fujian, Yunnan, 
and other regions and search for superior quality gibbsite and 
other types of bauxite. 
  3. Undertake research on new technologies, new methods, and 
new theories for locating all types of blind ore and concealed 
ore; increase rich ore reserves as quickly as possible, focus on 
developing high-precision prospecting technology and equipment 
and on computer ore exploration expert systems. In the early 
21st Century, develop geophysical chromatographic phase 
formation (CT) mineral prospecting technology, do deep-crust 
mineral prospecting and ocean geological surveys. 
<H5>  B. Dressing technology. </H5>
  In open-cut mines, develop gradient-assisted extraction 
techniques, improve large-region multiple-removal 
microdifferential blasting technology, increase the height of 
terraces, and increase the intensity of mineral extraction. 
Large deep-depression open-cut mines should accelerate their 
development of intermittent-continuous ore and rock 
transportation and high terrace soil removal techniques. 
Strengthen research on slope stability and monitoring and 
control, and under conditions where large high efficiency 
equipment is utilized, attain an annual downward movement rate 
of 10 to 12 meters in large open-cut mines. 
  Make major efforts to develop underground mine extraction 
techniques and technology, perfect and improve mine block 
collapse methods, mechanical filling mining methods, and large 
diameter deep hole mining method techniques and equipment, 
increase recovery rates. Strive to achieve mechanization and 
partial automation prior to 2000 in primary mines for tunneling, 
extraction, loading, and ore removal, achieve continuous mining 
and continuous ore removal. Moreover, we must strengthen 
research on deep mineral body extraction techniques and the 
associated equipment, rock dynamics, and ground pressure 
movement laws. 
  In the area of ore dressing technology, on a foundation of 
systematic research and summarization of process mineralogy for 
all primary ore resources, do research on differentiation of 
microfine particle embedded ore, weakly magnetic ore, 
polymetallic paragenetic compound ore, low-quality magnetite and 
high arsenic content and highly oxidized hard-to-dress ore, and 
manganese-poor ore and the related high efficiency, non-toxic, 
inexpensive new preparations and new equipment. Do research on 
rational comprehensive utilization of refined ore quality ore 
tailings. Do good environmental protection and improvement. 
<H5>  C. Comprehensive utilization of resources. </H5>
  For comprehensive utilization of Panzhihua Mine resources, 
we 
must do research on improving technical levels in titanium 
dressing and intensive processing technology for titanium and 
form a production capacity of 200 tons of crude titanium ore 
refining and titanium dregs, powdered titanium white, and spongy 
titanium plants on a substantial scale. Perfect and improve 
existing flow process vanadium extraction techniques and 
technology, increase vanadium recovery rates; do research on 
comprehensive utilization routes for blast furnace slag and 
techniques and technologies for extracting gallium and scandium. 
Continue studying new flow processes for iron and steel smelting. 
  For comprehensive utilization of Baotou Mine resources, we 
must undertake research and industrial experiments on economical 
and rational new flow processes for comprehensive recovery of 
iron, rare earths, and niobium and increase the extent of 
comprehensive utilization of primary ores. We must develop 
single rare earth separation technologies for Baotou rare earths 
and the ion-type rare earths of southern China and open up new 
routes for their application. Pioneer new technologies and new 
techniques for separation and extraction of highly pure (greater 
than 99.99) single rare earth oxides and single rare earth 
metals and strengthen applications of rare earths in metallurgy, 
agriculture and animal husbandry, high technology, and other 
realms. 
  For comprehensive utilization of Jinchuan Mine resources, we 
must do R&amp;D on highly efficient large-diameter borehole 
mineral 
extraction technology, increase output of rich ore, and meet the 
needs of doubling production. In addition, we must do R&amp;D on 
high-strength, non-polluting, low energy consumption production 
technologies and raise comprehensive utilization levels for 
copper, cobalt, and platinum family metals and other paragenetic 
elements. 
  For comprehensive utilization of Dachang resources, we must 
do research on high efficiency ore extraction technology, 
improve tunneling and ore removal capabilities, study and 
perfect ore dressing technologies, formulate rational product 
programs, develop high efficiency ground ore grading and 
separate dressing, concentration, and dehydration equipment, and 
increase recovery rates for tin, zinc, lead, antimony, silver, 
indium, and other dressed ores. Do research to solve problems in 
rational smelting technologies and equipment for comprehensive 
utilization of refined jamesonite and dimorphite resources. 
  Do research on dressing and smelting technology and 
comprehensive utilization for Buzhuyuan polymetallic ore, Hainan 
beach sand ore, and Liaoning ludwigite. 
<H5>  D. Iron smelting, steel smelting, and steel rolling </H5>
technology. 
  1. Integrated iron smelting technology. 
  Blast furnace iron smelting technology should be focused on 
high output, superior quality, low consumption, and long 
lifespans, strive to improve the quality of raw material, expand 
the proportion of pellets, readjust the furnace charge mix. Make 
major efforts to develop and apply high oxygen-content large 
coal spray technology, use coal as a substitute for coke, and 
use less coke. Develop and apply high-pressure, high wind 
temperature, low-silicon smelting and other new technologies and 
blast furnace coal gas dry method dust removal technology. Adopt 
effective measures to make the lifespans of large blast furnaces 
that undergo major overhauls or are rebuilt during the 1990's to 
more than 8 years without intermediate repairs and a utilization 
coefficient of more than 2.0. Actively create the conditions to 
development non-blast furnace smelted iron production, explore 
molten reduction techniques and new full-oxygen iron smelting 
technologies. 
  2. Steel smelting technology. 
  The focus in rotating furnace steel smelting to solving 
problems with reblowing techniques and technology and equipment 
as well as the associated matching technologies, basic theory, 
and other problems. Do research based on raw materials 
conditions and product quality to improve and extend molten iron 
desiliconization, dephosphorization, and desulfurization as well 
as limited slag steel smelting and outside-the-furnace fining 
technology. Large and medium-sized rotating furnaces require 
research on perfection and detection, automatic control 
technology, and static electricity dust removal technology. The 
objective for the imported molten iron pretreatment-steel 
smelting-fining-continuous casting production lines at the 
Baoshan Iron and Steel Complex and Wuhan Iron and Steel Complex 
should be on the production variety and quality of ultra-deep 
steel stamping, silicon steel, tin-plated steel, and other 
superior cold sheet rolling, organize systematic S&amp;T research 
and development work, and strive to attain international levels 
of the time. 
  The development direction for electric furnace steel 
smelting 
technical processes should be integration with high-power or 
ultra-high power electric furnaces and outside-the-furnace 
fining and the matching continuous casting to achieve energy 
conservation and reduced consumption, stable components, and 
pure quality steel. Undertake experimental research on DC 
electric arc steel smelting, plasma steel smelting, and other 
new technologies. Develop the corresponding special smelting and 
outside-the-furnace treatment technologies based on production 
variety requirements. 
  The focus in development of continuous casting technology is 
on research to gain an understanding of modernized plate slab 
continuous casting, circular blank continuous casting and alloy 
steel continuous casting suitable for steel pipe, and plants 
having the proper conditions should develop as appropriate 
horizontal continuous casting and odd-shaped blank continuous 
casting; pay attention to research on the technologies 
associated with continuous casting, improve production 
management systems, strengthen production operation technology 
for existing casting machines, link up prior and subsequent work 
procedures, strive to attain a design capability as quickly as 
possible. Continually expand the types of continuous casted 
steel, improve the quality of cast blanks. Focus on solving 
problems with shipbuilding plate, container plate, deeply 
stamped plate, common alloy structural steel, high-strength 
structural steel, spring steel, stainless steel, and other 
continuous casting technologies, achieve hot loading and hot 
transportation or direct rolling of continuous casting blanks in 
some plants. Import and digest thin sheet blank continuous 
casting and rolling technology. Attain a national rate of more 
than 50 percent for continuous casting and a proportion of more 
than 20 percent for continuous casting of alloy steel. 
  3. Steel rolling technology. 
  In the area of sheet material, medium thickness sheet 
production must do research on and apply large cross-section 
high rigidity rolling mills, adopt controlled rolling, plane 
sheet shape control, and other technologies to produce wide and 
thick plate. Hot and cold broad-band steel rolling production 
should do R&amp;D on hot transportation, hot loading, and direct 
rolling production technologies, and study and apply high-speed 
high-power large coil re-rolling mills, plate shape control 
technology with hydraulic micro-adjustments, hydraulic curved 
rollers, and controllable roller shapes as well as no-acid 
dephosphorization technology. In product development, we must 
further develop surface plating technology and intensive 
processing technology. 
  In the area of steel pipe, seamless pipe production should 
strengthen a production division of labor and develop toward 
specialization. We must develop continuous rolling pipe mills, 
three-high rolling mills, and compression mill production 
technology and do rational selection based on the scale of 
production and production variety characteristics to adopt 
optimum mill types. Develop welded petroleum pipes, boiler 
pipes, and other new welded pipes. 
  Shaped steel production should do R&amp;D on universal 
rolling 
mills. Extend and adopt short stress and pre-stressed mill 
frameworks, periodic cross-section and unusual shape precision 
rolling technology, and develop high efficiency rolling mills 
with techniques that are matched up with continuous casting. In 
wire production, we must digest high-speed twist-free rolling 
mills. Further develop intensive processing technology for 
finished metal products and so on. 
  Enterprises having the proper conditions should gradually 
develop on-line detection, rapid roller replacement, continuous 
annealing, cutting and packaging, and other precision adjustment 
equipment automatic continuous operation technology in the 
rolled steel production process and achieve partial computer 
control. 
  Steel smelting and steel rolling should make major efforts 
to 
extend all types of new technology to increase finished blank 
rates and finished material rates. 
<H5>  E. Copper and aluminum smelting and processing technology. </H5>
  For copper, lead, and zinc smelting, extend oxygen-rich 
smelting and flash smelting technology; do R&amp;D on new 
continuous 
smelting techniques and equipment and simplified technical flow 
processes; undertake zinc sulfide refined ore oxygen pressure 
acid immersion and other experiments and equipment development; 
radical-controlled arsenic and sulfur contamination; reduce 
energy consumption in smelting. Strive to increase the capacity 
of different smelting equipment by 10 to 15 percent and reduce 
energy consumption by 10 to 50 percent by the end of this 
century. 
  The focus of research on copper processing is on research on 
unidirectional flow replaceable inductor smelting furnaces, high 
precision rolling, continuous casting, oxide-free compression, 
disk and pipe stretching, bright heat annealing, and other new 
techniques and new equipment. In addition, we must expand 
product varieties and strengthen research on wire drawing frame 
materials, high softening point water tank bands, 
high-performance elastic materials, high precision waveguide 
tubes, and other processing technologies. 
  The aluminum smelting industry must focus on energy 
conservation technology. Aluminum oxide must integrate with the 
characteristics of China's ores and use digestion and 
development of the key technology and equipment of indirect 
heating reinforced dissolving to do further research on 
high-efficiency energy-saving new aluminum oxide production 
techniques and equipment to reduce total energy consumption per 
unit of aluminum oxide to 4.5 million kilocalories using the 
Baeyer method and less than 7 million kilocalories using the 
integrated method; aluminum electrolysis should do R&amp;D on 
complete sets of large electrolysis trough technologies and 
equipment, complete industrial research on 280 kA intermediate 
loading electrolysis tanks and extend and apply them in actual 
production to increase the current efficiency in electrolytic 
aluminum production to 93 to 95 percent, and actively do 
research on high-efficiency energy-saving new types of 
electrolysis troughs and techniques. In the early 21st Century, 
we will be doing R&amp;D on single water hard aluminum ore 
production aluminum oxide evaporation-free and dregs-free 
technologies and develop large technologies and equipment for 
producing aluminum oxide from nepheline. We will also strengthen 
research on chlorination-electrolysis techniques for smelting 
magnesium from magnesite. 
  Aluminum processing should develop new types of low energy 
consumption smelting equipment and electromagnetic casting, 
electromagnetic purification, and other techniques, do further 
development of aluminum alloy fining agents, and will be 
required to be capable of casting 20 ton and larger high-quality 
cast ingots. Develop multiple mill framework hot precision 
rolling technology and equipment to meet the product variety and 
quality requirements represented by can material, and develop 
water-based lubricants for use in high-speed cold rolling and 
use them in production. In addition, do R&amp;D on polyester band 
composites with aluminum foil added, aluminum band insulating 
fiber composites, insulated aluminum windows and composite 
shaped materials, functional film aluminum foil bands, and other 
intensively processed products. 
<H5>  F. Tungsten, antimony, and hard alloy intensive processing. </H5>
  Do R&amp;D on techniques and technologies for direct 
production 
of tungsten carbide from refined tungsten ore, liquid film 
separation technologies, ultrafine tungsten carbide powder 
production technologies, and so on; do research on hard alloy 
material structures and surface processing technology, increase 
the overall performance of hard alloys. In the early part of the 
21st Century, do research on non-abrasive optimum forming and 
sintering technologies. Undertake research on laser coating, 
diamond-plated layers, and other new technologies, strive to 
make China's hard alloy intensive processing technology enter 
advanced world levels. 
  Actively antimony-bearing, gold-bearing, antimony salt, and 
other antimony series products, focus on doing research on 
intensive processing technology for concentrated diantimony 
trioxide particle material, antimony-bearing flame retardant 
parent particle material, antimony based composite flame 
retardant agents, and other series of products, make China's 
antimony product overall quality indices attain advanced 
international levels, and strive to enable China's primary 
antimony products to enter the international market by the year 
2000. 
<H5>  G. Development and utilization of gold and silver resources. </H5>
  Focus on strengthening research on the mineralization laws 
of 
new categories of ore beds and ore prospecting methods to 
provide prospective regions and target regions for locating 
large gold deposits, increase the resources available for mine 
construction, and undertake research on ore prospecting in areas 
surrounding old mines. Do research on technologies to enable 
extraction of thin ore veins with different preservation 
conditions and altered rock fractured mineral beds; make 
breakthroughs in extraction technologies for placer gold ore 
beds in frozen soil zones; focus on solving problems in smelting 
technologies for arsenic-bearing, carbon-bearing, microfine 
impregnated, and low-grade gold ores. Accelerate research on 
techniques for dressing ore from gold and silver in polymetallic 
ores and platinum family metals and on new techniques for 
comprehensive extraction of the gold, silver, and platinum 
family metals in smelting intermediate products; raise 
utilization rates for precious metal resources. Propose 
technologies having practical value for extracting gold from 
seawater and technologies for recovering platinum family metals 
from nuclear power plant wastes in 2020. 
<H5>  H. New types of materials. </H5>
  1. High-performance conventional materials. Focus on 
developing super-high strength steels, high strength and 
super-high strength highly malleable steel, casing steel, 
low-temperature steel, non-rusting heat resistant steel, wear 
resistant steel; aluminum-lithium alloys, magnesium-lithium 
alloys, high strength, highly malleable aluminum alloys, 
corrosion resistant alloys, high temperature resistant titanium 
alloys, and copper, nickel, beryllium, zirconium, hafnium, and 
other special alloy materials. Attain levels of the developed 
countries of the late 1980's or early 1990's for product quality 
and basically satisfy demand. 
  2. Functional materials. We must achieve systematic 
production of Nd-Fe-B permanent magnet materials and we must 
enter the international market in rare earth permanent magnetic 
materials. Undertake development of new types of rare earth 
functional materials. Develop non-crystalline materials and 
apply them; iron-based non-crystalline magnetic materials must 
attain an industrial scale. Develop fast-hardening 
microcrystalline materials with unique properties. Develop 
silicon materials for use in integrated circuit wiring 
sub-micrometer technology and silicon materials for use in high 
voltage high power electronic components, _P_ 100 mm gallium 
arsenide and other chemical compound semiconductor materials and 
their ultra-thin layer epitaxy technology, and semiconductor 
materials manufacturing technology for use in solar cells. Do 
research on precious metals materials for use in 
high-performance precision instruments, develop pulp, metal 
filaments, and precious metals composites for use in the 
economics industry. Develop low-temperature superconducting 
material applications technology, do research on 
high-temperature superconducting materials. Do research on 
damping materials and shape-recalling alloys and hydrogen 
storage materials. 
  3. New types of structural materials. Do research on 
ultra-pure, ultra-micrograined, microcrystalline, and 
non-crystalline powder preparation techniques. Do R&amp;D on 
oxide 
dispersed reinforced alloys, monocrystalline leaf materials, 
powdered high temperature alloys, engineering ceramics, special 
fire-resistant materials, and other new types of high 
temperature materials. Do R&amp;D on high strength high modulus 
hydrocarbon fiber and boron fiber, and their composites, develop 
steel-steel, steel-nonmetallic, aluminum, magnesium, copper, 
titanium, and other metal-based composites. For those materials 
among them which have high requirements, involve considerable 
difficulty, and whose development is still in the initial 
stages, moving toward applications should be the main direction 
of attack, with selected breakthroughs in several types of 
products. Do research to gain an understanding of ion injection, 
plasma spray coating, physicochemical gaseous phase deposition, 
laser processing, and other surface modification technologies. 
<H5>  I. Energy conservation technology. </H5>
  Develop and utilize systems energy conservation technology, 
establish key enterprises, production workshops, and energy 
consuming equipment energy use optimization models, set 
production energy use parameters and rational energy consumption 
quotas, comprehensively optimize energy resource systems. 
Establish energy resource models for China's metallic materials 
industry, formulate rational structures for industrial system 
energy resources and technology systems for effective 
utilization of energy and resources. 
  Do research on technology for using weakly bonded coal for 
coking, explore new combustion technologies, improve combustion 
efficiency. Gain an understanding of the use of microelectronics 
technology for upgrading ovens and kilns that consume large 
amounts of energy and have outdated equipment. Do R&amp;D on 
energy-saving industrial ovens and kilns, implement 
microcomputer control. Focus on developing sensible heat 
utilization technology for high temperature materials and high 
temperature gases, do research to improve utilization rates for 
the sulfur in non-ferrous metallic ores, comprehensively raise 
residual heat and residual energy recovery and utilization 
levels. 
<H5>  J. Computer applications and automation technology. </H5>
  1. Rapidly improve the reliability and precision of existing 
smelting instrument and gauges, develop special instruments and 
gauges urgently needed in production, develop detection 
technology, analytical technology, and interface technology 
including transducers, extend and apply hydraulic drive and 
electrical drive equipment, increase the extent of 
mechanization, prepare the required conditions for computer 
applications. 
  2. Carry out structural analysis and design for automation 
systems at all levels based on enterprise scales and equipment 
capabilities, apply system integration theory and computer 
technology, do research on computer fully automated systems 
engineering. 
  3. Apply computer modelling and simulation technology, 
computer-aided design, and engineering automation technology, 
raise the scientific levels and working efficiency of 
self-control systems design. Do research on mathematical 
modelling for production technology and enterprise 
administration and management, establish knowledge databases, 
and utilize artificial intelligence technology to develop expert 
systems. 
<H5>  K. Soft science research. </H5>
  Strengthen soft science research, achieve science and 
democracy in decision making, establish soft science research 
funds. Give prominence to research on development strategies and 
policy research such as metallic materials systems deployments, 
technical economics indicator systems, optimized matching of 
work procedure factors, and other problems, organize experts to 
conduct research demonstrations in all areas of S&amp;T, the 
economy, and society to provide a scientific foundation for 
making important decisions. 
<H5>  L. Applied research and basic research. </H5>
  The objectives for basic research and applied research in 
the 
metallic materials industry up to the end of this century and 
into the early part of the next century are to concentrate on 
the strategic foci in development of the metallic materials 
industry and explore new technological development routes; to do 
research on effective ways to improve the quality of key 
products and the development directions for new materials, and 
to provide a scientific basis and technical foundation for 
solving problems in theory and applications. At the same time, 
track developments in modern materials science, try to make 
important breakthroughs in certain fields where we have a 
relatively good foundation, and attain advanced international 
levels. 
  Research foci: continuous smelting, vacuum metallurgy, 
plasma 
metallurgy, molten reduction, ultrapure steel smelting, and 
other new technologies and methods, as well as development and 
utilization of compound paragenetic mineral resources. Do 
research on the related thermodynamics problems and macro 
kinetics problems, carry out systematic basic data measurement 
and accumulation. Do research on microalloyization and the 
behavior of minute amounts of contaminants in the deformation 
and phase transformation processes, strengthening and increased 
flexibility mechanisms, and materials fatigue, corrosion, 
fracturing, wear, and other loss principles. Do research to 
explore the microstructures, surfaces, and boundaries of 
materials and the relationship of contaminants and defects to 
performance, do research on the mechanisms of the materials 
phase transformation and phase formation processes under the 
effects of external fields, metastable phase phase formation 
laws and phase structure characteristics. Establish materials 
science and technology databases and expert systems to design 
new materials as well as metallurgical system mathematical and 
physical models, and so on. Pay attention to research on rock 
dynamics, metals pressure processing, dynamic metallurgy, 
thermodynamics theory, surface science, and other S&amp;T. 
<H5>  Chemical Industry </H5>
  The chemical industry is an important industrial sector that 
uses coal, petroleum, natural gas, natural minerals, and organic 
matter as raw materials to produce chemical fertilizer, organic 
and inorganic basic raw materials, synthetic materials, fine 
chemical products, and other things. As a basic industry, it has 
obvious characteristics like many varieties of products, a broad 
area of service, powerful matching up, and so on, and it 
provides development of our national economy with many important 
raw materials and adds an abundant variety of consumption 
commodities needed in the people's lives. It supports 
agriculture and industry, bears the glorious mission of 
achieving agricultural modernization, and wholeheartedly 
supports agricultural development. Many of the economically 
developed nations have invariably adopted strategies that give 
preference to its development, preferential investments, and 
preferential growth to place the chemical industry in the 
leading ranks of their national economies. In the world of the 
future, the chemical industry will be an important part in 
improving the material and spiritual lives of the Earth's 
population of 6 to 7 billion people and in new energy resource 
development, materials science, biochemical engineering, and 
environmental protection projects in high-tech realms and its 
role cannot be neglected. It can be predicted that during the 
next century the chemical industry will still serve as one of 
the primary industries and will occupy an extremely important 
status in the economic development of all countries. 
  The 21st Century will be an era of rapid development of 
science and technology and a high degree of integration of 
S&amp;T, 
the economy, and society. The globalization of S&amp;T will move 
China's chemical industry S&amp;T into development on a world 
scale 
and it will face intense challenges. Every chemical industry 
S&amp;T 
worker must feel a heavy sense of duty, and the next 10 years or 
even the next several decades will be an era in which there is 
much for them to do. 
<H5>  I. Development Strategies and Objectives </H5>
<H5>  A. Industry development strategies and objectives. </H5>
  By the end of this century, the chemical industry will face 
the two important tasks of propelling a revolution in 
traditional industry and catching up with the world's new 
technological revolution. For this reason, the chemical industry 
must choose the route of relying on S&amp;T, improving economic 
results, satisfying social demand, and coordinated and stable 
development, establish a benefits, quality, and intensive 
development strategy, and move the chemical industry from 
extensive administration onto the track of intensive 
administration. Development and construction of the chemical 
industry must be organically integrated with economic results 
and the requirements of national economic development and use a 
minimum of inputs to obtain the optimum outputs. Concretely 
speaking, this means that existing enterprises must serve as the 
foundation and S&amp;T must serve as the vanguard in making 
breakthroughs in digesting, absorbing, and innovating new 
imported technology and accelerating development of the 
petrochemical industry, use technical upgrading as the means to 
optimize the industrial structure, orient toward the 
international and domestic markets, and make major efforts to 
develop agricultural chemical products, basic chemical raw 
materials, and synthetic materials while at the same time 
actively opening new realms in the refined chemical industry. 
  By the year 2000, the primary chemical products of the 
chemical industry should basically satisfy the requirements in 
quantity, product variety, quality, and other areas for 
development of all sectors of our national economy and 
improvement in the people's living standards, and the production 
technology and equipment of primary chemical industry products 
should attain advanced international levels of the 1970's and 
1980's. The value of output in the chemical industry will rise 
from 62.23 billion yuan in 1980 to 280 billion yuan in 2000, 4.5 
times the 1980 amount. Actual profits will increase from 10.86 
billion yuan in 1980 to 55 billion yuan in 2000, 5.1 times the 
1980 amount. Full-staff labor productivity in the chemical 
industry will increase from 15,800 yuan/man-year in 1980 to 
30,000 yuan/man-year in 2000. Energy consumption per value of 
output in the chemical industry will drop from 19 tons of 
standard coal/10,000 yuan in 1980 to 10 tons of standard 
coal/10,000 yuan in 2000. 
<H5>  B. S&amp;T development strategies and objectives. </H5>
  Year 2000 
  Starting now and up to the year 2000, S&amp;T progress in 
the 
chemical industry will implement an S&amp;T development strategy 
of 
developing production technology in the traditional chemical 
industry as the main factor with development of emerging 
chemical industry technology as the auxiliary factor. The 
primary content is: giving primacy to the development of the 
production technology that is important, advanced, and suitable 
for industrialization to develop large-scale production and 
basically establishing the technology and equipment required for 
the construction of large production facilities that are 
representative of the primary industry on domestic sources; 
making the formation of industries the objective for limited 
selection of emerging technological realms in the chemical 
industry, achieving technical breakthroughs, and laying a 
technical foundation for emerging industries; resolutely having 
high starting points in technology development with a 
appropriate degree of leading, increasing the span of technology 
and time, striving to achieve leap forward-type development, and 
reducing our lag behind advanced international levels; being 
concerned with the technology and economic benefits of 
scientific research, providing advanced and appropriate S&amp;T 
achievements. 
  The development objectives for S&amp;T in the chemical 
industry 
that are established on the basis of the S&amp;T development 
strategy outlined above are: 
  1. Basically achieve a shift to domestic production for the 
industry's primary advanced technology and equipment. 
  We must concentrate forces and focus on attacking key 
problems concerning complete sets of production technology and 
equipment. On the basis of digesting and absorbing imported 
technology, do good innovation, integrate technology and 
results, and work simultaneously on technology and equipment. We 
must adapt to the realities of China's resource conditions and 
technical structure, ensure that complete sets of technology and 
equipment are advanced, integral, and appropriate, attain 
advanced levels of the 1970's and 1980's for the industry's 
primary newly-built and upgraded production facilities, and 
achieve a self-sufficiency rate of 80 percent calculated on the 
basis of investments. 
  2. Make major efforts to develop new products and improve 
product quality, rationalize the chemical industry product mix. 
  The development direction for new products is to develop 
high, precision, incisive, and specialized product varieties, 
work quickly to resolve serious shortages and fill in blank 
spaces, export to earn foreign exchange, have production 
technology to replace imported products, and accelerate product 
renewal and replacement. Strengthen intensive processing and 
precision processing, increase the added value of products. 
Adhere to the principle of quality first, actively improve 
product quality. Complete the development of and place into 
production over 300 new national-grade chemical industry 
products each year. By the end of this century, 70 percent of 
China's 1,200 primary chemical industry products should adopt 
international standards or advanced standards from foreign 
countries, and the rate of a shift to refined products for 
chemical industry products should reach 40 percent. 
  3. Lay a preliminary technical foundation for focusing on 
emerging technical realms in the chemical industry. 
  Development of chemical industry emerging technology should 
adopt the principle of ``limited objectives'', with the focus 
being placed on new materials in the chemical industry, modern 
biochemical products, the modern coal-formed synthetic gas 
chemical industry, computer applications technology, and other 
emerging technological industries in the chemical industry, with 
the value of output from their directly produced chemical 
industry products reaching about 10 percent of the gross value 
of output in the chemical industry. 
  4. Complete a highly effective chemical industry S&amp;T 
development system. 
  Further strengthen and perfect the chemical industry's 
S&amp;T 
development organizations, achieve a rational deployment and 
coordinated configuration of industry technology development 
centers, enterprise research organizations, and regional 
scientific research units, and reinforce close cooperation with 
institutions of higher education, the Chinese Academy of 
Sciences, and other scientific research forces. On a foundation 
of consolidating existing specialized research directions, make 
good readjustments in research realms, open up and extend new 
disciplines and specialized fields; continue strengthening 
chemical industry S&amp;T staff construction, achieve 100,000 
S&amp;T 
personnel involved in chemical industry S&amp;T development by 
the 
end of the century, and pay close attention to training 
top-notch S&amp;T personnel to have several high-level discipline 
leaders in primary chemical industry specializations and 
technical fields; further perfect S&amp;T development conditions, 
adopt advanced instruments and equipment, upgrade existing 
experimental facilities, establish several R&amp;D base areas, 
and 
complete a unique chemical industry S&amp;T information system. 
By 
the year 2000, China's chemical industry S&amp;T forces and 
technological innovation forces will attain relatively advanced 
levels and be capable of competing with the world's developed 
countries in technology development in several chemical industry 
realms. 
  Year 2020 
  During the early part of the next century, on the basis of 
completing modernization of traditional production, China's 
chemical industry S&amp;T will move toward achieving a 
transition to 
comprehensive development of emerging technology industry, and 
S&amp;T development in the chemical industry will mainly involve 
creation and competition with the economically developed 
countries. Its S&amp;T development strategies and objectives are: 
  1. Accelerate the application of modern S&amp;T 
achievements to 
upgrade the traditional chemical industry and establish emerging 
chemical industry clusters. 
  Make full use of the state's high-tech development 
conditions, propel the development of chemical industry emerging 
technology and products, occupy our rightful status in refined 
materials, space materials, biological preparations, marine 
technology, and other emerging industry clusters. Broadly apply 
microelectronics technology, greatly improve scientific 
research, design, and production levels and efficiency, improve 
product quality; accelerate the development of uses for coal and 
its organic matter, attain advanced levels in the petrochemical 
industry in primary technical economics indices, and achieve a 
development in the structure of chemical industry raw materials 
toward diversification and multiple uses; develop new closed 
cycle non-polluting technologies, reform production technologies 
that endanger safety, replace highly toxic products, achieve 
environmental protection and safe production. 
  2. Meet the needs of the state's high-tech development in 
the 
new century, provide vanguard new products and new materials. 
  Coordinate with the development foci for China's S&amp;T 
during 
the early part of the 21st Century, create and provide 
systematic and specialized new chemical industry materials and 
chemical products, mainly including polymer synthetic materials 
with superior performance; ultra-pure and highly pure refined 
chemical products; specialized chemical products, solvents, coal 
media, and high-energy fuels for unique uses; new types of 
functional materials and structural materials, materials with 
environmental diagnosis and self-restoration functions, targeted 
materials to satisfy special requirements, and so on. 
  3. Form the ability to do our own development and 
manufacturing of modern advanced, highly efficient, and 
large-scale equipment. 
  With the objective of achieving systemization, 
standardization, general purpose usage, and intelligence in 
chemical industry machinery, equipment, and instruments, raise 
levels and self-sufficiency rates for sets of equipment in the 
chemical industry as a whole, and place some products into a 
world vanguard status. Complete fully-automated workshops and 
plants that approach modern advanced levels, safe, convenient, 
highly efficient, and very flexible production facilities and 
intelligent self-moving reaction equipment, and so on. 
  4. Undertake guidance-type basic research, achieve new 
breakthroughs in chemical industry S&amp;T development. 
  In development of new technology in the chemical industry, 
apply new achievements in chemistry, physics, biology, 
materials, information, and other sciences to accelerate 
development of synthesis technology, catalysis technology, 
separation technology, processing technology, and comprehensive 
utilization technology, spur reform in chemical industry 
production processes, develop new production technologies, 
achieve design and production of new chemical industry products 
based on the required properties, attain maximum utilization of 
resources. 
  5. Further strengthen construction of the chemical industry 
S&amp;T development system. 
  On the foundation of basically completing construction of a 
highly efficient chemical industry S&amp;T development system, we 
must continue to readjust and extend S&amp;T development realms, 
strengthen S&amp;T forces and development capabilities, reinforce 
multidisciplinary and multidepartment research, focus on the 
development of highly efficient and flexible information 
systems, strengthen absorption of advanced technology, increase 
the proportion of technology outputs, and achieve a balance with 
technology imports. At that time, China's chemical industry 
S&amp;T 
in certain realms will be in a vanguard status in the world. 
<H5>  II. Focal Tasks and Key Technologies </H5>
  Each sector within the chemical industry has its own 
technological characteristics as well as many common aspects 
that form an integral chemical industry technology development 
system that is mutually promoting and mutually restricting in 
which each is both independent and closely related. To fully 
display the two aspects of the unique technologies and common 
technologies in each sector within the chemical industry, this 
program divides the two aspects of the S&amp;T tasks and 
preferential development for the key technologies in the major 
sectors to compile the key tasks for chemical industry S&amp;T 
development for the next 10-plus years. 
<H5>  S&amp;T Tasks in Key Sectors </H5>
  Based on product service targets, product performance 
characteristics, technological category, and so on, the S&amp;T 
development tasks are divided into six areas. 
<H5>  A. Agricultural chemical products. </H5>
  Production of agricultural chemical products is the most 
important task of the chemical industry. The primary tasks for 
S&amp;T development are to develop the complete sets of 
production 
technologies and equipment for large production facilities, 
develop new product varieties, and make the internal structure 
and proportion of all categories of products tend toward 
rationality. 
  1. Chemical fertilizer. On a foundation of digesting and 
absorbing imported technology and equipment, develop, design, 
manufacture, and construct all scales of production facilities 
based on domestic sources. Nitrogen fertilizer must further 
improve gasification technology for all types of raw materials, 
do research on a variety of high efficiency catalysts, develop 
highly efficient and low energy consumption purification 
technologies, develop gasification furnaces, synthesis towers, 
and other new types of equipment to make equipment with a yearly 
output of 300,000 tons of synthetic ammonia using natural gas, 
heavy oil, and coal as a raw material, and reduce energy 
consumption per ton of ammonia to, respectively, 29.3 million 
kilocalories, 37.6 million kilocalories, and 41.8 to 46.0 
million kilocalories. Use upgrading of medium-sized and small 
synthetic ammonia facilities to reduce energy consumption per 
ton of ammonia using coal as the raw material to, respectively, 
54.3 million kilocalories and less than 58.5 million 
kilocalories. Phosphorous fertilizer must be based on China's 
resource characteristics, focus on construction of production 
facilities for ammonium phosphate, heavy calcium, and so on with 
a yearly output of 120,000 tons of phosphorous dioxide and 
gypsum phosphate acid making facilities on a matching scale, 
upgrade wet method phosphoric acid production technologies, 
strengthen development of new types of extraction reactors, 
develop large filters, heat exchangers, and other key equipment, 
achieve a diphosphorous pentoxide recovery rate of greater than 
94 percent for production facilities, and improve production 
technologies for yellow phosphorous and hot method phosphorous 
fertilizer. Focus on standardization of basic fertilizer 
products and research on long-acting fertilizers, trace element 
fertilizers, and microogranic fertilizers. Continue 
strengthening research on scientific fertilizer application, 
gradually establish a perfect processing and application 
production technology system based on soils, climate, and crop 
mixes. Gradually make key production technologies for China's 
chemical fertilizers approach advanced levels in foreign 
countries. Make substantial readjustments in the proportions of 
the primary nutrients, make high nutrients and compound 
fertilizers account for more than 50 percent of total chemical 
fertilizer output. 
  2. Chemical minerals. Target resource characteristics and 
chemical fertilizer development requirements to undertake 
construction of large-scale chemical mines, focus on 
phosphorous, sulfur, and potassium and gradually expand other 
types of minerals, reinforce research on mineral prospecting 
theory and new mineral prospecting technologies to guide 
exploration for minerals in an effort to discover soluble 
sylvite mineral beds and expand north China's phosphorous and 
sulfur resources and boron ore resources. Further perfect ore 
extraction methods for inclined phosphorous ore, gently inclined 
moderately thick ore bodies, and coal system iron sulfide ore 
with complex extraction conditions, solve problems with natural 
soda and mirabilite water solution method underground extraction 
technology. While continuing to focus on research on flotation 
method agents and ore dressing technologies, improve collophane 
flotation equipment, reduce refined mineral costs, and achieve 
refined phosphorous mineral output that is greater than 50 
percent of total phosphorous mineral output by the end of this 
century. Continue doing research on development technology for 
Qinghai's Qarhan Salt Lake, provide complete sets of 
technologies and equipment for large-scale long-term stable 
extraction from brine extraction to processing. 
  3. Agricultural chemicals. Continuing strengthening 
development of highly effective, safe, and economical new 
products, study and create 20 to 30 new product varieties, focus 
on developing herbicides, increase germicides, readjust 
pesticide product varieties, strive to develop organic 
agricultural chemicals. Focusing on developing matching 
intermediates and improve the quality and production technology 
for intermediates. Develop new agriculture chemical preparations 
and new types of agents as well as processing and packaging 
equipment. Open up applications of agricultural chemicals in 
public health, storage, parks, communication, and other fields. 
We must solve problems in control technology for the ``three 
wastes [waste gas, waste liquid, and industrial residues]'' from 
the production of agricultural chemicals, strengthen safety 
assessments, and enable the agricultural chemical industry to 
have better economic benefits, social benefits, and ecological 
benefits. By the end of this century, we must make agricultural 
chemicals basically satisfy China's requirements in agricultural 
disease and pest prevention, weeds, and other areas in terms of 
quality, product varieties, and structures, and S&amp;T in the 
agricultural chemical industry must approach advanced world 
levels. 
<H5>  B. Basic organic and inorganic chemical industry raw </H5>
materials. 
  Basic chemical industry raw material production is an 
important sector in the chemical industry. Development of the 
petrochemical industry will further establish the organic 
chemical industry raw materials industry in a key status in the 
chemical industry. The primary tasks of S&amp;T development are 
to 
focus on larger sized equipment, make major efforts to do 
research on new technologies, develop highly efficient and 
energy conserving new equipment, and base ourselves on our own 
technology and equipment to build large scale complete sets of 
facilities and upgrade existing enterprises. 
  1. Organic chemical industry raw materials. For olefines, 
mainly ethylene and propylene, on a foundation of digesting and 
absorbing imported technology, make major efforts to develop 
production technologies and equipment centered on energy 
conservation. Strive to develop tube-type oven fragmentation 
technology, undertake research on heavy oil processing into 
olefines. Strengthen development of catalytic fragmentation 
technology, reduce reaction temperatures, increase product 
selectivity and recovery rates. Pay attention to research on 
low-carbon olefine catalytic dehydrogenization and expand 
sources of raw materials for olefine production. We must also 
strengthen research on olefine conversion and improve product 
flexibility. By the end of this century, be capable of 
independently designing and building large-scale olefine 
production facilities at advanced levels of the 1980's. 
  For aromatic hydrocarbons, we must strengthen digestion and 
absorption of imported technology, improve catalytic reforming 
production technology, and reduce energy consumption in aromatic 
hydrocarbon separation; strengthen technology development for 
fragmentation gasoline aromatization. Explore production 
technologies for synthesizing aromatic hydrocarbons from 
low-carbon olefines, separation of ethyl benzene and dimethyl 
benzene using chromatography, separation of ethyl benzene from 
octoethyl carbon and separation of phenylethylene from 
fragmentation gasoline and pyrolytic gasoline. 
  For amines, alcohol, acids, ketone, aldehyde, and other 
organic products, we must strengthen research on existing 
synthetic catalysts and improved new catalysts, do good 
development of matching purification catalysts, further improve 
selectivity, extend useful lifespans, do matching development of 
reactors and key equipment, and raise self-sufficiency rates for 
complete sets of production technology and equipment. We must 
continue reinforcing intensive processing of raw materials, make 
major efforts to develop all types of superior quality 
intermediates used in the production of refined chemical 
products, and rapidly throw off the passive situation of large 
amounts of imports. We also must further improve production 
technology levels for the production of organic chemical 
industry raw materials from coal, organic matter, and other raw 
materials. 
  2. Inorganic chemical industry raw materials. The sulfuric 
acid industry must mainly focus on the construction of 200,000 
ton and 500,000 ton production facilities that use pyrite as a 
raw material and create complete sets of technical facilities 
that have Chinese characteristics. Develop purification flow 
processes and acid contaminant processing technologies 
appropriate for our national conditions; make full use of heat 
sources, especially low-value heat energy, improve thermal 
efficiency in acid plants; adopt highly efficient high-strength 
towers and equipment; extend the utilization of new types of 
alloy materials and non-metallic corrosion-resistant materials 
and move toward domestic production of them; achieve 
comprehensive utilization of ore dregs. By the end of this 
century, base newly-constructed facilities on domestic sources, 
attain advanced levels of foreign countries in primary technical 
economic indices. 
  In the soda ash industry, on a foundation of gaining a basic 
understanding of larger-scale production technology and 
equipment, carry out digestion, absorption, and innovation for 
imported energy-saving technology and key equipment. Continue 
developing large-scale highly-efficient equipment, raise 
technical levels in production control; solve problems with 
technologies for making waste water and waste dregs innocuous, 
expand the scope of comprehensive utilization; develop ammonium 
chloride particle manufacturing technology and ammonium chloride 
series compound fertilizers; develop utilization technology for 
the abundant soda-making resources of the interior of China. By 
the end of this century, the production technology and equipment 
in China's soda ash industry must leap into the world's advanced 
ranks. 
  The focus in the caustic soda industry is digestion and 
absorption of imported ion membrane method production technology 
and equipment, overcoming technical problems with ion membrane 
manufacturing technology, and achieving a comprehensive shift to 
domestic production in ion membrane method caustic soda 
production. Continue perfecting diaphragm method metallic anode 
electrolysis tanks, improve evaporation technology, further 
perfect the associated techniques and equipment, and improve 
automatic control levels. Make major efforts to develop chlorine 
products, achieve a good balance between soda and chlorine. 
Develop new types of highly efficient electricity-saving tanks. 
Develop various types of new soda-resistant and 
chlorine-resistant materials. By the end of this century, we 
must reduce total energy consumption for diaphragm method 
caustic soda to 1.3 tons of standard per ton. 
  In the inorganic salt industry, we must focus on titanium 
white, chrome salt, and silicides, which are in short supply 
domestically, and on exports of barium salt, manganese salt, 
phosphates, carbonates, mirabilite, alkaline sulfides, and so 
on, and further reinforcement of China's abundant mineral 
resource development, utilization, and comprehensive processing; 
make major efforts to adopt new technologies including 
fluidized-beds, plasma, ion exchange, solvent extraction, 
electrodialysis, surface processing, granularity grading, and so 
on; develop high-strength energy-saving reactors and equipment 
required for primary industry processes, comprehensively improve 
equipment levels in the inorganic salt industry; make major 
efforts to develop new product varieties and develop product 
series, and pay particular attention to the development of new 
materials-type and functional-type inorganic salt products and 
do good readjustment of the industry structure. 
<H5>  C. Synthetic materials and processing. </H5>
  Synthetic materials and processing are usually called the 
polymer materials industry by people in the chemical industry, 
and they are a key industry that has grown rapidly in the past 
several years. The primary task of their S&amp;T development is 
to 
focus on primary synthetic materials product varieties, do 
research on new techniques, develop new catalysts and reactors, 
strengthen development of new types of shaping techniques, and 
strive to increase all new types of finished products. 
  For plastics, we must focus closely on the development of 
general-purpose resin and thermosetting resin technologies 
represented by polyvinyl, polypropylene, polyvinyl-chloride, 
polystyrene, and polyamino resin, digest and absorb imported 
technology and equipment, achieve a shift to domestic production 
of the associated raw materials, assistants, and catalysts, do 
good development of large-scale reactors and other important 
equipment, and basically achieve reliance on our own technology 
and equipment to construct large-scale production facilities and 
upgrade existing enterprises. We certainly must solve problems 
with larger-scale production technology and equipment for 
carbonic esters, polyoxymethylene, polyamides, thermoplastic 
polyesters, polyphenylether, and other engineering plastics and 
build 1,000 ton-grade and 10,000 ton-grade production facilities 
based on requirements. We must continue strengthening research 
work on polyimides, polyphenylylenethio-ether, and other special 
resins, resolve technical problems related to project 
enlargement, and meet the need to construct production 
facilities on a substantial scale. 
  In plastics processing, we must further perfect and improve 
injection molding, reaction injection motion, laminar resin mold 
shaping, large-scale blow molding shaping, thermosetting mold 
pressing shaping, and other new types of technologies and 
equipment, strengthen research on high-efficiency, high-speed, 
low energy consumption processing machinery and on equipment to 
meet special molding requirements, undertake research on 
computer applications in machine head and mold design and 
processing control, raise overall levels in plastic processing 
equipment, and do the associated development of all types of 
special-purpose resins and all types of assistants used in 
processing to satisfy processing technology and finished product 
development requirements; further improve production 
technologies for agricultural film, do research on technologies 
for recovery and utilization of waste plastic, pay attention to 
basic theoretical research in plastics processing, provide a 
foundation for developing new materials and new processing 
methods. 
  In synthetic rubber, we must further improve the production 
technology and equipment for cis-butyl rubber, styrene butadiene 
rubber, and neoprene, and use our own resources as a foundation 
for construction of large-scale production facilities at 
advanced world levels of the period. Focus on technology 
development for amyl rubber, ethylene-propylene rubber, butyl 
rubber, and acrylic ester rubber and achieve industrialized 
production. Strive to do research on new thermoplastic elastic 
bodies, low cis-polybutadiene, sol polybutyl, and synthetic 
latex product varieties. 
  In rubber processing, we must focus on product grade raising 
and replacement, move toward diversified and combination raw 
materials, strengthen technology development and digestion and 
absorption of imported technology and equipment, rapidly raise 
product design and technology levels, adopt highly efficient and 
energy-saving advanced equipment with a high degree of 
automation, raise equipment levels, substantially increase 
product specifications and product varieties, and improve 
product quality and production efficiency. We must accelerate 
the development of radial tire product series and attain a rate 
of shifting to radials of 30 percent for load-bearing tires and 
50 percent for passenger tires. Accelerate attacks on key 
problems related to huge engineering tires and make the 
corresponding developments for tubeless tires, flattened tires, 
and civil aviation tires. For belt and pipe products, we must 
further improve technical levels and product quality for new 
types of skeleton material conveyor belts and non-flammable 
conveyor belts, continually perfect rubber-plastic type and 
resin type high and moderate-pressure rubber tubing and braided 
rubber tubing production technologies. The colors and product 
varieties for rubber boots must be capable of meeting 
ever-growing export demand. Make major efforts at development of 
new types of rubber components for the automobile, structure, 
mining, electronic, space, maritime, and other realms and 
achieve intensive scale production. At the same time, actively 
promote the development of new types of skeleton materials, 
carbon black, new types of assistants, and other related 
industries. 
  In synthetic fibers, we must make major efforts to develop 
production technology and equipment for dacron, (mianlun) 
acrylic, polyvinyl alcohol fiber, polypropylene fiber, and other 
key product varieties, do research on new techniques and 
high-efficiency equipment, do research on new types of catalysts 
and matching assistants, and make the production technology in 
China's primary synthetic fiber products attain levels of the 
1980's in foreign countries by the end of this century. We must 
continue to strengthen development of new varieties of synthetic 
fiber products, achieve systemization and differentiation, and 
meet the development requirements of the textile industry. We 
must strive to expand applications based on the multi-functional 
properties of synthetic fibers in biological, chemical, 
physical, and other industrial departments. 
<H5>  D. Refined chemical products. </H5>
  Refined chemical products include roughly 30-plus 
categories, 
some of which have already developed into independent industries 
such as dyes, photosensitive materials, paints, chemical 
reagents, adhesives, and so on. Some are still in the process of 
growing, and are known as refined chemical products in new 
realms. The primary tasks of S&amp;T development are to develop 
high-grade, refined, special-purpose, and functionally distinct 
new products to meet the development requirements of all sectors 
of our national economy and the people's ever-rising living 
needs. 
  1. In the dye industry, to satisfy the development 
requirements of light and textile industry, we must continue 
focusing on doing research on new pure, high-strength dyes, 
high-grade organic pigments, and dye-fixing assistant products, 
develop commercialized technology, strengthen building 
technologies, and further improve product quality. By the end of 
this century we must develop 250 new dye or organic pigment 
product varieties and 300 dye-fixing assistant product varieties 
to increase the number of dye and organic pigment product 
varieties produced in China to more than 7000 and the number of 
dye-fixing assistant product varieties to more than 900 to meet 
90 percent of the product variety requirements in the textile 
printing and dyeing industry and attain advanced levels in 
foreign countries at the time for the quality of 90 percent of 
our product varieties. Pay attention to benzene series, 
naphthalene series, anthraquinone series, and heterocyclic 
series dye intermediate production technology, improve synthesis 
techniques and key equipment. We must make use of the coloring 
properties and multifunctional properties of dyes to expand 
applications of dyes and organic pigments in non-textile 
industries. We certainly must strengthen research on ``three 
wastes'' [waste water, waste gas, and industrial residues] 
treatment technology for dyes. 
  2. The paint industry must focus on meeting the development 
needs of the construction, automobile, and other industries and 
corrosion prevention requirements under horrible conditions, 
focus on developing low-pollution and energy-saving new product 
varieties, mainly water-based paints, high solid component 
paints, powdered paints, photofixing paints, and so on to make 
the output of new unique, low-pollution, and energy-saving paint 
products account for more than 15 percent of total output. We 
must focus on the development of using inorganic pigment in 
paints, improve product quality, and increase product variety. 
We must also further improve production technology and equipment 
levels for the matching resins, assistants, fillers, and 
solvents and ensure quality and performance. 
  3. Photosensitive materials and magnetic recording materials 
must take aim at advanced world levels, do good research on the 
associated product mixtures, techniques, equipment, and raw 
materials and, along with major efforts at research on new 
products, also focus on development of the matching engineering. 
Movie film must achieve high-temperature rapid color basing, 
color centering, and color correction and matching of relief 
film and blank film; for color photographic film, photographic 
paper, and developing agents, we must achieve a matching of all 
types of photosensitive speed products; for magnetic recording 
materials, we must achieve matching of digital magnetic 
recording product series. In addition, we must undertake 
technology development for new types of information materials 
and electronic photography. By the end of this century, we must 
attain 150 varieties of both photosensitive materials and 
magnetic recording materials and export over 20 percent of them. 
  4. For chemical reagents, we must transform the backward 
equipment situation and achieve sealing of production equipment; 
we must strive to improve product quality, reinforce research on 
separation and purification technology, upgrade packaging, and 
adopt international standards for effectiveness. Further develop 
new product varieties, achieve systemization of ultrapure 
reagents, reagents used for bioengineering purposes, clinical 
diagnosis reagents, and organic synthetic reagents. By the end 
of this century, we must increase the number of reagent 
varieties from the present 6,000 types to 10,000 types. 
  5. For synthetic adhesives, we must raise technical and 
equipment levels, improve product quality, and do good matching 
of raw materials. Strengthen applied research and packaging and 
construction tools research, actively develop low-toxicity, 
non-toxic moderate and low-temperature adhesives and aqueous 
emulsions, thermosols, and functional new products. By the end 
of this century, we must attain 1,000 types of adhesive product 
varieties and achieve systemization and standardization of 
primary products. 
  6. Refined chemical products in new realms mainly include 
food additives, feed additives, surface activators, water 
treatment agents, chemical products use in papermaking, chemical 
products used for leather, oil field chemical products, water 
soluble polymer series, starch derivative series, propenoic acid 
series, cellulose ether (ester) series, vinyl acetate series, 
and other product series. The primary tasks for S&amp;T 
development 
are to focus on technology development for the primary raw 
materials and intermediates that are required and quickly solve 
unavailability problems; on a foundation of guaranteeing product 
quality, make major efforts to develop new products, develop new 
product variety trademarks, and improve their performance in 
use; strengthen research on product applications, do good 
technical service and market opening, combine research, 
development, applications, and services into a single integrated 
entity, and meet the requirements for development of all sectors 
of our national economy, progress in S&amp;T activities, and 
gradually improvement in the people's living and consumption 
standards. By the end of this century, achieve in a preliminary 
product quality optimization, product variety systematization, 
commodity trademark specialization, and matching of applications 
and performance. 
<H5>  E. Chemical industry equipment. </H5>
  The primary task for chemical industry equipment S&amp;T 
development is to strengthen scientific research and development 
and product design. 
  The problems to solve with key technologies are the 
scientific research and design software for perfecting and 
optimizing the compressors, blowers, pumps, steam turbines, and 
valves used in the chemical industry; development of the 
manufacturing technology for the new types of furnaces, towers, 
cauldrons, waste heat boilers, heat exchangers, pressure 
containers, and burning nozzles used in the chemical industry; 
improvement of the capabilities of drying, pulverizing, 
filtering, separation, mixing, packaging, and other single-unit 
equipment; and gradual establishment of flexible manufacturing 
systems for chemical industry equipment and establishment of 
chemical industry equipment software packages and computer-aided 
design and manufacturing software packages. Strengthen research 
on applied technology for corrosion prevention, apply modern 
control theory and large systems theory in primary industrial 
applications to establish system dynamic mathematical models, 
achieve partial and full-process optimized control, and 
strengthen development of the special-purpose instruments and 
gauges used in the chemical industry. 
  By the end of this century, be capable of designing and 
manufacturing high-efficiency new types of machinery and 
equipment according to users' requirements, improve the matching 
capabilities of electromechanically integrated primary and 
auxiliary equipment, and make most of the equipment used in the 
primary sectors of the chemical industry attain advanced levels 
of the 1980's in foreign countries. 
<H5>  F. Emerging chemical industry technology. </H5>
  S&amp;T work in emerging chemical industry technology realms 
involves pioneering research work and using prominent foci as a 
foundation for first focusing on doing good laboratory research, 
converting scientific research achievements into industrial 
production as quickly as possible, and upgrading existing 
chemical industry production or establishing new production 
facilities. By the end of this century, emerging technology in 
the chemical industry must certainly make major technological 
breakthroughs and produce real economic benefits. 
  1. New chemical industry materials. Focus on making 
breakthroughs in manufacturing technology for all types of 
separation membranes. Actively develop conductive, magnetic 
conductive, thermoelectric, piezoelectric, and other polymer 
materials, photoconducting fibers, and optical disk materials. 
Along with further perfecting and improving organic silicon and 
organic fluorine production technology, actively develop organic 
silicon, organic fluorine, polyurethane, and polyacrylate 
materials and finished products for use in medicine. For carbon 
fiber, we must provide 100 ton-grade polyacrylonitrile-based 
carbon fiber and 1,000 ton-grade polyacrylonitrile raw filament 
industrialized technology and equipment and achieve 100 
ton-grade and above large-scale industrial production of 
asphalt-based carbon fiber, and for arylene we must achieve 
scale industrial production above the 100 ton grade. Reinforce 
applied research on carbon fiber, acrylene, and composites. 
Carry out development of other new types of ultrahigh strength 
fibers. Strengthen research on applications of photoetching 
colloids, special gases, enclosure materials, and baseplate 
materials in the electronics industry. Develop other types of 
new high-performance chemical industry materials required for 
the development of China's high-tech industry and national 
defense industry. 
  2. Biochemical industry technology. The primary tasks for 
development of biochemical industry technology are using 
microorganic methods to produce chemical industry products 
including the upgrading of existing biochemical industry 
production technology and equipment, improving product recovery 
rates and purity, and reducing raw materials and energy 
consumption; opening up new methods for microorganic method 
production of chemical industry products, and increasing the 
variety of biochemical industry products; focusing on 
development of key biochemical industry equipment, including all 
types of biochemical reactors, transducers, production 
separation and extraction equipment, and so on; exploring 
technology for producing chemical industry products from natural 
fibers and other organic matter resources. By the end of this 
century, we must develop several biochemical technologies and 
products at advanced international levels. 
  3. Coal-formed synthetic gas chemical industry. The 
coal-formed synthetic gas chemical industry must first of all 
focus on new types of coal gasification, synthetic gas 
purification, and large-scale methanol production technology and 
equipment development and use this as a foundation for 
undertaking R&amp;D on using synthetic gas or methanol to produce 
low-carbon alcohol, fuel methanol, acetic acid, acetoanhydride, 
formic acid, oxalic acid, and methyl chlorine compounds, 
complete intermediate testing and industrial experiments, and 
provide technology and equipment for the construction of 
large-scale facilities. We must also undertake research on the 
direct synthesis of gasoline, diesel, olefines, and 
methanol-formed olefines from synthetic gas and make 
achievements in intermediate testing. We must place research on 
the catalysts used in the coal-formed synthetic gas industry in 
a primary position and establish catalyst product variety 
structures, enlargement technology, and applied technology that 
conform to our national conditions. By the end of this century, 
we must complete technology development for primary synthetic 
gas chemical industry products and the technical economics 
indicators must attain advanced levels of foreign countries to 
create the conditions for achieving industrialization during the 
next century. 
<H5>  Key Technologies for Preferential Development </H5>
  Given chemical industry S&amp;T development in foreign 
countries 
and in integration with China's S&amp;T realities, we have 
selected 
engineering enlargement technology, new catalysis technology, 
polymer modification technology, new separation technology, 
computer applications technology, comprehensive improvement 
technology, product applications technology, and other things as 
the breakthrough points for common technology for chemical 
industry S&amp;T during the next 10-plus years. 
<H5>  A. Engineering enlargement technology. </H5>
  In chemical industry technology development, enlargement 
technology is a key problem. In research on engineering 
enlargement technology, we certainly must focus on small-scale 
experiments, model experiments, intermediate testing, and the 
required industrial experiments. We must strive to do good basic 
research, process research, and engineering research. We must 
gain an understanding of the enlargement laws for all categories 
of reaction processes and reactors, pay attention to 
accumulating experience in empirical enlargement, gradually 
expand the scope of mathematical model enlargement applications, 
and work properly on the relationship between experience 
enlargement and mathematical modeling enlargement. While we are 
doing good chemical engineering research, we must certainly 
reinforce research on machinery, equipment, gauges, instruments, 
and automatic control and do good optimum combination and 
selection of industrial facilities. 
<H5>  B. New catalysis technology. </H5>
  Some 80 percent of production techniques in the chemical 
industry are related to catalysis and 90 percent of 
newly-adopted techniques require catalysts. The focus on new 
catalysis technology is on the development of polymer metallic 
complex catalysts, rare earth complex catalysts, new types of 
carrier catalysts, clustered compound catalysts, zeolite 
selective catalysts, natural polymer catalysts (including 
organic enzymes), solid acid-alkali catalysts, photocatalysts, 
and others that can spur development of the petrochemical 
industry, coal-formed synthetic gas chemical industry, and 
inorganic chemical industry; reinforce research on phase 
transfer catalysts and biocatalysts, and we should also 
strengthen reactor enlargement, manufacturing, and other 
technology development associated with new types of catalysts; 
apply advanced instruments and equipment to develop new 
catalysis technologies; do further research on catalytic 
modification and applications technology. Strive to be able by 
the end of this century to design and develop highly effective 
catalysts that are highly active, highly selective, and 
three-dimensionally directional with good stability and long 
lifespans as well as the corresponding catalysis technology so 
as to satisfy domestic demand and strive to export and corner 
part of the market in foreign countries. 
<H5>  C. Polymer modification technology. </H5>
  Polymer alloyization and compounding have now become the 
primary development directions in polymer modification 
technology, and plastics alloyization has attracted the most 
attention. Their primary S&amp;T development tasks are to do 
research on a variety of modification methods including 
blending, copolymerization, cross-linking, interpenetrating 
networks, and so on, and perfecting technologies and equipment; 
based on different requirements of materials, sifting through 
optimum mixtures and optimum equipment parameter combinations to 
set appropriate alloy blending components and quality standards; 
developing reinforcing fibers, fillers, fire retardants, 
coupling agents, shock-resistant modifiers, antioxidants, 
processing technique improvement agents, and so on for use in 
modification, establishing the required testing methods, and 
doing good equipment matchups. 
<H5>  D. New separation technology. </H5>
  Separation technology is one of the keys in converting 
chemical, biological, and other laboratory research achievements 
into industrial production. The focus in new separation 
technology development is membrane separation technology, 
precision distillation, supercritical extraction, and other 
separation technologies. Prior to the year 2000, we must achieve 
ion exchange membranes, oxygen recovery and oxygen concentration 
gas separation membranes for use in producing high-purity 
alkalis, a shift to domestic production of the micropore filter 
membranes used to produce especially pure and ultrapure 
materials and rapid diagnostic reagents, and do additional 
exploration of knowledge regarding membrane transmission 
mechanisms, integrate with the needs of chemical industry 
production and high-tech development to develop new high 
functional membranes and solve problems with their application. 
At the same time, we must achieve industrialization of 
supercritical separation technology and further improve 
technical levels in chemical industry separation and extraction. 
<H5>  E. Computer applications technology. </H5>
  Computer applications technology is a part of emerging 
technology in the chemical industry. The focus of S&amp;T 
development is on developing from simple production process 
control in chemical industry automation to integrate process 
control with enterprise management, centralized optimized 
control, inspection rounds and monitoring, administration and 
management, and planning and decision making into an integrated 
network control system divided by levels and grades; development 
of chemical industry economic and S&amp;T information technology 
applications from single-item decentralization toward 
comprehensive intelligence, application of a variety of types of 
data transmission measures, formation of a variety of types of 
comprehensive information networks composed of microcomputers, 
mini, medium-sized, and large computers, terminals, and 
peripherals to gradually achieve a movement to networks, 
databases, and office automation; developing CAE, CAD, CAM, CAT, 
and CAR technology in engineering design, machinery 
manufacturing, scientific research, and information reports. 
Undertake research on intelligent instruments, chemical industry 
industrial robot software, breakdown diagnosis, chemical 
materials differentiation, molecular and materials design, 
selection of synthesis routes, and other expert systems and 
attain the level of applications. By the end of this century or 
the early part of the next century, make computer applications 
technology in the chemical industry in China attain advanced 
levels of the late 1980's in the developed countries, make 
several single item technology applications in large-scale 
synthetic ammonia and other production process control attain 
advanced levels of foreign countries at the time, and make the 
extent of popularization of microelectronics technology attain 
international levels of the 1980's. 
<H5>  F. Comprehensive improvement technology. </H5>
  Environmental pollution has now become of the three big 
``public hazards'' facing mankind. The primary tasks for its 
S&amp;T 
development are to actively develop low pollution and 
non-polluting production technology and fundamentally eliminate 
hazards from the ``three wastes''; actively study pollutant 
control and comprehensive utilization technology, especially for 
old and difficult pollution sources in the chemical fertilizer, 
agricultural chemicals, dyes, chloro-alkalies, inorganic salts, 
and other industries and solve them within a limited period of 
time. Make major efforts at comprehensive utilization and full 
utilization of resources; focus on developing new types of 
biochemical technologies, catalysis and oxidation technologies, 
ultrafiltering technologies, liquid membrane technologies, 
extraction technologies, and the matching equipment involved in 
control of the ``three wastes'' and on development and 
utilization of a series of waste water treatment agents and 
gradually achieve the conversion of waste materials into 
resources and treatment. By the end of this century, we must 
control pollution in the chemical industry and all large and 
medium-sized enterprises must be built into hazard-free clean 
and civilized plants. 
<H5>  G. Product applications technology. </H5>
  Product applications technology involves commercialization 
technology to fully foster the functions of products and expand 
their applications. Their S&amp;T development foci include 
research 
on the amount, mixtures, states, and utilization technology 
conditions of products that are used; product secondary 
processing methods and equipment research and product 
applications methods and applications equipment research; 
product utilization process research and solving all types of 
problems that exist in gradually enlarging the scale of their 
applications. We must pay full attention to feedback from users, 
strengthen market surveys and forecasts, provide good technical 
services, and guarantee the continual development of new 
products and continual expansion of the scope of their 
applications. 
<H5>  Construction Materials </H5>
  The construction materials industry includes the three areas 
of structural materials, non-metallic ores, and inorganic 
non-metallic new materials. It provides basic materials that are 
indispensable for national economic and national defense 
construction and development of incisive technologies and is one 
of the industries that has an important impact on China's 
achievement of modernization and it must undergo preferential 
development. 
<H5>  I. Development Strategies and Objectives </H5>
<H5>  A. Development strategies. </H5>
  Make improvement of economic results the center, improve the 
enterprise structure, product mix, and technology structure of 
the construction materials industry, raise overall enterprise 
technical levels and equipment levels, rationally utilize 
resources, substantially reduce energy resource construction, 
improve the quality of construction materials industry products, 
increase product output and product variety, fully satisfy the 
development requirements of national economic construction and 
national defense construction. Along with orienting toward both 
domestic urban and rural market demand, strive to increase 
exports and manage the construction materials industry as a 
pillar industry in our national economy. 
<H5>  B. Strategic objectives. </H5>
  By the year 2000, cement output must reach about 360 million 
tons and plate glass 180 million weight boxes, there must be 
substantial developments of inorganic non-metallic new 
materials, non-metallic ores, and their finished products, new 
types of structural materials, and so on, we must achieve 
matching supplies of high, medium, and low grades for all types 
of products, the output, product variety, and quality of the 
construction materials industry must basically meet the 
requirements of modernization and construction and satisfy the 
people's ever-growing daily needs, and industrial production 
technology levels of primary products must strive to approach 
levels of the economically developed nations in the late 1970's 
or early 1980's. In new materials and certain other high-tech 
realms, we must approach or catch up with advanced world levels. 
We must strive to reduce energy consumption per 10,000 yuan in 
value of output in the entire industry from 33.19 tons of 
standard coal in 1980 by 50 percent, achieve a 6-fold increase 
in the value of output from 18.1 billion yuan to about 140 
billion yuan, achieve semi-automated and specialized production 
for the primary products of the construction materials industry 
by 2020, approach levels of the economically develop nations at 
the time in the advanced levels of construction materials 
industry production technology, make the construction materials 
industry truly become an important pillar of the national 
economy and a large industry that accumulates capital, withdraws 
currency from circulation, and exports to earn foreign exchange. 
  To achieve the objectives outlined above, we must, in 
accordance with the principle that ``economic construction must 
rely on science and technology, S&amp;T work must be oriented 
toward 
economic construction'', formulate correct S&amp;T objectives for 
the construction materials industry. Their guiding ideology is: 
  1. Make major efforts to develop advanced and appropriate 
technology, resolutely serve development of the construction 
materials commodity economy, promote exports of construction 
materials to earn foreign exchange. 
  2. With improving product quality and labor productivity, 
reducing consumption, increasing styles and product variety, and 
developing intensively processed product as the primary goals, 
strengthen S&amp;T development and technical extension work. 
While 
accelerating the conversion of S&amp;T achievements into forces 
of 
production, achieve an improvement in technical levels in 
traditional industry, the formation of a new inorganic 
non-metallic industry, and commercialization of high-tech new 
materials to make S&amp;T play a guiding role in increasing gross 
value of output for improving economic results. 
  3. Scientific research units in the construction materials 
industry must have a rational division of labor and guidance by 
categories and comprehensively arrange development research, 
applied research, and basic research to have a deployment in 
depth in scientific research, open up new routes for further 
development of the construction materials industry, and increase 
new S&amp;T reserves. 
  4. Strengthen close integration of scientific research, 
design, production, and education; accelerate the establishment 
of an S&amp;T system with ``three entities in one body'' for 
training of skilled personnel, S&amp;T progress, and production 
management, raise management levels in scientific research, 
design, and production units, and spur development of the 
construction materials industry. 
  By the year 2000, construction materials industry S&amp;T 
must 
make contributions to national economic construction, national 
defense construction, and urban and rural housing construction 
and provide services for a 6-fold increase in the gross value of 
output in the construction materials industry, raising 
construction materials production technology levels, and 
comprehensive development of the construction materials 
commodity economy. 
  1. We must make major efforts to strengthen rational 
development and comprehensive utilization of resources, raise 
resource comprehensive utilization levels, increase the 
development of technology for rational utilization of mine 
extraction, raw materials extraction and purification, 
homogenization, intensive processing, and other resources and 
gradually achieve specialized production in construction 
industry raw materials. 
  2. Actively do R&amp;D on all types of new energy 
conservation 
technologies, adopt new technologies and new techniques to 
upgrade traditional technologies, substantially reduce 
consumption of energy resources and conserve water. 
  3. Digest and absorb advanced technologies from foreign 
countries, develop advanced and appropriate domestically 
produced construction materials technology and equipment, raise 
design, manufacturing, and matching levels of construction 
materials industry production technology and equipment, attain 
an 80 to 90 percent rate of domestic production of equipment. 
  4. Make major efforts to develop intensively processed 
products, actively develop new product varieties, improve the 
product quality and product variety matching levels of 
structural materials, non-metallic minerals, and inorganic 
non-metallic new materials, make major efforts to open up 
international markets, increase our capabilities for exports to 
earn foreign exchange. 
  5. Develop high temperature-resistant, ablation-resistant, 
high-strength, highly dielectric, low loss, and other types of 
inorganic non-metallic new types of functional materials and 
non-metallic mineral products used in new technologies, serve 
national defense industry and high-S&amp;T realms. 
  6. Strengthen development of product quality supervision, 
environmental protection, information management, 
standardization management, and other basic modernized 
management technologies, pay attention to basic research, 
increase S&amp;T reserves and development reserve strengths in 
the 
construction materials industry. 
  By the year 2020, S&amp;T in the construction materials 
industry 
must make contributions to achieving semi-automation in 
production of the primary organizations in the construction 
materials industry and automatic and intelligence in production 
of some products, serve the development of the inorganic 
non-metallic new materials industry, and approach the levels of 
that period in the world's developed nations in the advanced 
technology levels of the construction materials industry. 
<H5>  II. Focal Tasks and Key Technologies </H5>
<H5>  A. Strengthen research on resource development and </H5>
comprehensive utilization technology. 
  1. Do good exploration, analysis, and comprehensive 
evaluation of construction materials industry raw materials 
mines and non-metallic mines, do research on deep extraction and 
underground extraction technology and on development and 
comprehensive utilization of paragenetic minerals; do research 
on utilization of new types of minerals. 
  2. Do research on mineral properties testing, mining and 
dressing, purification, dehydration, grinding, mineral surface 
modification, and other new technologies, new techniques, and 
new equipment. 
  3. Undertake research on comprehensive utilization of 
industrial residues and utilization of low-quality raw 
materials. The focus is on research on the basic properties and 
useability of industrial residues, formulation of industrial 
residue technical standards for use in structural materials 
production, R&amp;D on new useful waste construction materials 
products, and coordination with residue dumping departments for 
R&amp;D on primary processing energy-saving useful wastes 
construction materials products. 
<H5>  B. Do R&amp;D on new energy conservation technologies, </H5>
substantially reduce energy consumption in construction 
materials production. 
  1. Do research on new gasification technologies and new 
equipment for local coal varieties, expand fuel sources, achieve 
optimization of fuels in construction materials industry 
production. 
  2. Develop a variety of new energy conservation technologies 
for structural materials production, focus on developing series 
of top-quality fire-resistant and insulating materials, kiln and 
oven insulation temperature and new surplus heat recovery and 
utilization technology, and new cement roasting technology; 
digest and absorb new large-scale flotation method glass melting 
kiln technology and gas-burning urn-less energy-saving ceramic 
roasting kilns; improve and perfect brick kiln surplus heat 
utilization systems and one-time stack roasting technology. 
  3. Develop products with low energy consumption that utilize 
new energy resources. Do R&amp;D on energy-saving new cement, 
glass, 
and ceramic product varieties and lightweight high-strength 
hollow-core concrete blocks, sintered micropore hollow-core 
finished products, and other low energy consumption new types of 
wall materials; utilize solar energy, wind energy, and 
geothermal energy, and the inorganic non-metallic new materials 
and their products required for infrared energy conservation. 
  4. Develop new products and new technologies for energy 
consumption that conserve structural materials to improve 
insulation function services for structures. Based on the 
characteristics of China's different regions, do research on 
energy-saving composite wall materials, energy-saving doors and 
windows, and energy-saving room models. 
  5. Do research on ``phase changing'' materials for automatic 
temperature adjustment in structures, utilize solar energy 
heating materials and applied systems. Strengthen applied 
research on structural insulating materials. 
  Strive to reduce energy consumption per 10,000 yuan in value 
of output by 50 percent from 1980 to 2000 and for another 
reduction of about 20 percent in energy consumption per 10,000 
yuan in value of output from 2000 to 2020. 
<H5>  C. Do R&amp;D on matching technologies for new techniques and </H5>
complete sets of equipment, gradually form domestically produced 
technical equipment that has Chinese characteristics and 
multiple levels. 
  1. The focus in the cement industry is on integration with 
digestion and absorption of imported technology in doing R&amp;D 
on 
the roasting, pulverizing, pre-homogenization, and packaging 
equipment and systems technology required for new types of dry 
method outside-the-kiln decomposition production technology and 
the associated formation of large-scale advanced technical 
equipment for 2,000 ton and 4,000 ton daily finished material 
output production lines. Attain an equipment self-sufficiency 
rate of 90 percent prior to the year 2000. Do research on 
mechanized vertical kiln production line new technologies and 
new equipment, form complete sets of technical facilities with 
yearly cement output at the 50,000 and 100,000 tons grade and 
stabilize finished material grades above 525*. Achieve new types 
of dry method outside-the-kiln decomposition with heat 
consumption of 750 to 800 kilocalories/kg of finished material 
and total electricity consumption of less than 100 kWh per ton 
of cement. 
  2. The focus in the glass industry is on digestion and 
absorption of technology from foreign countries, perfecting and 
gaining an understanding of key technologies for flotation 
method techniques, including mixing, melting, shaping, 
annealing, cold junction, and automation systems technology and 
equipment, improving the quality of glass raw sheets, and 
attaining advanced international levels; doing R&amp;D on glass 
intensive processing technology and equipment; digestion and 
absorption of glass fiber tank kiln filament drawing, 
non-spinning, and special-purpose textile finished product 
processing technology and equipment. Do R&amp;D on all types of 
new 
composite superior-quality reinforcing base materials and 
electronics, appliance, and other top-quality insulting and 
textile finished product processing and treatment technology and 
equipment, and gradually achieve a shift to domestic production. 
  3. The focus of the structural and public health ceramics 
industry is on digesting and absorbing imported wall foundation 
bricks and public health ceramic technical equipment sets, doing 
R&amp;D on dry method powder making techniques, rapid driers, 
high-pressure and moderate-pressure grout injection technology 
and equipment, energy-saving fast roasting kilns and automatic 
control system technology. 
  4. The focus in the building materials industry is on reform 
of product mixes, continual perfection and improvement of 
structural bricks, gas-added cement, gypsum products, 
lightweight aggregate finished products, and asbestos composite 
wall material technology and equipment; development of 
hollow-core brick technology and equipment appropriate for 
medium-sized and small brick and tile plant product; research on 
technical equipment appropriate for China's national conditions 
that is capable of producing a wide variety of high-quality 
hollow-core finished products; integration with digestion and 
absorption of imported technology to develop production 
technologies and equipment for waterproofing materials and for 
decorative and refurbishing materials. 
  5. For non-metallic mineral extraction, do research on 
technologies and equipment for underground extraction of soft 
rock layers, phased natural collapse extraction, fill method 
mechanized extraction, and so on based on different mineral 
types, and on pulverizing, ore dressing, narrow grading, 
extraction, dehydration and drying, recovery, and other 
technologies and equipment for all varieties of minerals that 
are suitable for exporting to earn foreign exchange. Do research 
on non-metallic mineral intensive processing technology, develop 
high purity, ultrafine, and modified raw material preparation 
technologies and sets of equipment. Develop impulse-type 
centrifugal self-grinding machines, rolling machines, ultrasonic 
air flow pulverizers, and other energy-saving pulverizing 
equipment. 
  6. The focus for inorganic non-metallic materials is on 
digestion and absorption of imported electrical arc centrifuge 
methods, molded continuous fiber thermoplastic composites, large 
diamond presses and tools, and other production and equipment, 
and on achieving a shift to domestic production. 
<H5>  D. Develop intensively processed products, develop new </H5>
product varieties, improve matching capabilities, meet the 
development needs of all aspects of the national economy. 
  1. Match up with maritime development and special project 
construction, do research on high strength, early strength, 
highly corrosion resistant, and radiation resistant special 
cement varieties, do research on improvement of highly effective 
concrete composite external additives, explore fiber 
reinforcement, immersion processing, high temperature and high 
pressure heat treatment, and other technical routes, develop 
high strength, high ductility, corrosion resistant, and leak 
resistant special concretes. Develop large tonnage marine 
drilling platforms, floating piers, floating docks, marine 
airports, seawater desalination ships, and other large concrete 
floating structures, and do the associated R&amp;D on 
lightweight, 
high strength, insulated, and weather resistant building 
structures and enclosure materials for use in structures atop 
marine floating structures. 
  2. Match up with the development of all types of maritime, 
land, and air communications and transportation tools and the 
development requirements of the construction industry, make 
major efforts to strengthen research on intensively processed 
glass, highly effective friction materials, lightweight and 
high-strength fiberglass reinforced plastic structural materials 
and on engineering concrete products for use in modern 
transportation. The focus is on development of laminated, 
hollow-core, film plated, and steel-reinforced glass 
applications technology and research on the associated 
materials. While improving the performance of asbestos friction 
materials, develop non-asbestos high temperature resistant, high 
strength, and low wear automobile friction sheets, high 
performance composite friction materials, and so on, and 
gradually achieve a shift to domestic production for the 
friction materials used in automobiles and aviation. Do R&amp;D 
on 
high-speed railway concrete ties, high pressure resistant large 
curvature power transmission prestressed concrete towers, large 
diameter concrete pipes for the transmission of solid materials, 
and so on. 
  3. Do R&amp;D on lightweight, high strength, multifunctional 
building structural materials, reinforce research on materials 
durability, improve the use functions of building structures, 
satisfy the people's living needs. The focus is on development 
of decorated surface weight-bearing porous bricks, high strength 
porous concrete products, hollow core lime sand products and 
reinforcing components, and composite multifunction wall 
materials; highly effective durable waterproof sealing 
materials, high, medium, and low-grade decorative and 
refurbishing and sanitation tools and their components, slanted 
layer surface lightweight tiles and building framework 
components, fiber-reinforced organic structural composites, and 
the matching applications technology for new types of structural 
and enclosure materials. 
<H5>  E. Make major efforts to develop inorganic non-metallic new </H5>
materials and non-metallic mineral finished products. 
  The focus is on developing high-performance fiber-reinforced 
composites, non-metallic--metallic composite high-tech 
materials, high temperature structural ceramics and functional 
ceramics, ablation resistant heat-proofing materials, high 
purity high temperature resistant quartz glass, functional 
optical fiber materials, infrared laser and new artificial 
crystal materials, inorganic non-crystalline materials, membrane 
materials, superconducting materials, new types of irradiation 
resistant materials, solid ion conductor materials, 
photosensitive materials, bioengineering materials, sealing 
materials, mineral fillers, and other R&amp;D. Form a production 
substantial capacity on a substantial scale for some products by 
the year 2000. 
<H5>  F. Promote applications of microelectronics technology in </H5>
the construction materials industry, raise automation levels. 
  Prior to 2000, gradually extend and apply electronic 
computers in construction materials enterprises at the county 
level and above to reduce energy consumption, improve and 
stabilize product quality, improve working conditions, achieve 
modernized management, and integration in some single machines 
or operating single unit electromechanical instruments. Prior to 
2020, develop applications of intelligent technology, achieve 
semi-automated and automated production in some large cement, 
glass, and ceramics plants, non-metallic mineral mines, and 
high-tech inorganic non-metallic new materials enterprises. 
<H5>  G. Research on environmental protection and safety and </H5>
protection technology. 
  1. Do research on underground safe extraction production 
technologies for kaolinite, talc, asbestos, and other soft raw 
ore bodies; 
  2. Do research on dust prevention technology for asbestos 
dressing enterprises and on treatment and applications 
technology for the waste gas, waste water, and industrial 
residues produced in the construction materials industry; 
  3. Strengthen research on labor protection technology and 
special-purpose labor protection products for the construction 
materials industry. 
<H5>  H. Comprehensive development and research of associated </H5>
technologies. 
  1. Strengthen research on resource comprehensive 
utilization, 
extension of bulk cement and commercial concrete, reform of wall 
materials, coordination of the development of the construction 
materials industry with the national economy, and other 
comprehensive soft topics. 
  2. Do R&amp;D on chemical industry raw materials for use in 
construction materials production, achieve a matching of 
products. Strengthen research on applied technology for chemical 
industry construction materials, metallic construction 
materials, and other production products. 
  3. Do R&amp;D on construction materials product performance 
testing and on information collection, analysis, and 
transmission technology. Do good standardization work, 
comprehensively adopt advanced international standards, promote 
a movement of construction materials product quality toward 
international levels. 
<H5>  I. Track world S&amp;T development, strengthen basic </H5>
 scientific 
research in the construction materials industry. 
  The focus is on development of heat, motion, and mass 
transfer and reaction theory in the silicate materials formation 
process, on new silicate materials mineral structures and 
mineral raw material purification, ultrafine pulverizing, rapid 
drying and roasting, materials compounding and ductility and 
strengthen reinforcement, crystal growth and surface technology, 
limiting technology, membrane technology, testing technology, 
and other basic research to open up new materials realms. 
<H5>  Minerals </H5>
  Resources and the environment are the basic prerequisites 
for 
human existence. They also are the primary constraints on 
economic and social development. Geological work is both the 
base and precondition of industrial development and permeates 
various sectors of the national economy, including industry, 
agriculture, construction, and transportation. In terms of 
resources, 95 percent of the world's energy resources and 75 to 
80 percent of its industrial raw materials come from mineral 
resources. In terms of the environment, the geological periods 
in history were witness to global events which led to the 
extinction of certain species. There has been no extinction on a 
global scale of any species in the history of the human race, 
but because of changes in the geological environment and a host 
of other factors, many species have died out on a small scale, 
endangering mankind. Changes in the natural geological 
environment and man-made geological environment directly shape 
and control the growth, maturation, reproduction, and extinction 
of all living things, including man, and directly determine 
whether or not a nation's economic development strategic goals 
will be achieved as well as the rate of social development. When 
it comes to mineral products (including groundwater) and the 
geological environment (including geological disasters), 
research, evaluation, forecasting, along with the formulation of 
policies, are the principal tasks in geological prospecting and 
geological scientific and technical work in the future. The 
success of geological prospecting hinges upon the level of 
S&amp;T 
development in geology. The efficacy of the evaluation of the 
geological environment as well as the effectiveness of the 
monitoring and prevention of geological disasters also depend on 
the depth of our understanding of certain geological principles 
and the level of S&amp;T. Accelerating the development of 
geological 
S&amp;T, therefore, has profound strategic significance. 
  1. Development Strategy and Goals 
  1) S&amp;T Development Strategy 
  In the main, research in geological S&amp;T must revolve 
around 
the achievement of the magnificent objectives put forward by the 
Party and the State by the end of this century and the objective 
demands made by sustained economic development on geological 
work in the 21st century. We must never stop enhancing our 
ability to solve the major S&amp;T problems encountered in the 
prospecting of mineral resources and in environmental geological 
studies. We must nurture an army of scientific researchers and 
managerial personnel; lay the foundation for the development of 
the discipline; develop new theories, new methods, new 
technology, new equipment, and new processes; make a great 
effort to solve a string of critical S&amp;T problems and come 
up to 
or close in on advanced world standards in a number of fields 
where we are on solid ground, such as stratigraphy, prospecting 
geochemistry, isotope dating, sedimentology, regional 
composition and ore-field composition, certain mineralization 
theories, and crustal stress. 
  2) S&amp;T Development Goals 
  Year 2000 
  a) Concentrate our resources on examining and solving a 
number of mineral geological issues, with the emphasis on 
energy, precious metals, and copper; solving a number of 
environmental ecological problems, focusing on the proper 
extraction and utilization of groundwater resources, geological 
disaster forecasting, and the formulation of policies and 
measures in response to the disasters; solving problems relating 
to methods, technology, and equipment, focusing on the 
effectiveness of the search for complex oil fields and gas 
fields, deep mines, minerals that are hard to identify, and 
low-grade ores; furthering the geological study of important 
mining areas and geological units and solving major basic 
geological problems; continuously raising the level of 
geological science in theory and technology; enhancing the 
effectiveness and environmental benefits of mineral prospecting 
work; and increasing the staying power of mineral prospecting 
work. 
  b) Nurture a group of academically accomplished geologists 
who are influential in the international geological community 
and an army of young and middle-aged academic leaders who have 
mastered the theories and are skilled in technology. Together 
they will form a high-caliber and academically excellent corps 
that has a balanced mix. 
  c) Create an environment conducive to the proportionate and 
balanced development of basic research, applied research, and 
research and development [R&amp;D]. Solidify and develop a 
number of 
national-level research institutions and laboratories of an 
international standard. Create a new dynamic mechanism in 
several areas that will start in motion a sequence of 
activities, from achievements to application and production to 
commodity sales. 
  d) In light of the reality in China's geology, we shall 
absorb from overseas advanced academic thought in order to 
reinforce and develop our own geological theories. Keep up with 
the march of S&amp;T progress in geology. Utilize the latest 
achievements in modern natural sciences. Introduce and develop 
high-technology. Diligently develop new peripheral disciplines. 
Open up new territory for geological science. Gradually narrow 
the gap with advanced nations, with a view toward approaching or 
matching advanced world standards and even becoming a leader in 
those areas where we have a strong foundation. 
  By the Year 2020 
  Building on the progress in geological S&amp;T in this 
century, 
we should continue to raise the level of geological S&amp;T, 
enhance 
our capacity for solving geological problems so as to better 
meet the demands made by socialist development on geological 
work. Further develop the theory and technological methods of 
geological science and come up with a host of pioneering S&amp;T 
achievements, make fresh contributions in an ever-growing number 
of areas, approaching or reaching advanced world standards and 
even becoming a leader in the world, thus making even greater 
contributions to geological science. 
  2. Major Tasks and Key Technologies 
  The major tasks in the development of geological S&amp;T 
are: 
establish a mechanism for integrating geological S&amp;T, on the 
one 
hand, with the search for minerals and the national economy, on 
the other, by revolving around the general goal of quadrupling 
the gross value of industrial and agricultural output; vastly 
step up research on conditions for mineralization in key areas 
and for key minerals, further examine geological theories and 
mineralization theories, and work hard to develop and utilize 
properly all manner of advanced methods and technology to bring 
about major breakthroughs in the search for minerals; intensify 
research on the comprehensive utilization of mineral products, 
promote the sound development and utilization of mineral 
resources, and seek major progress in the research on several 
key minerals whose dressing and smelting present problems; 
further research on groundwater resources, the environmental 
ecology, and major geological disasters to provide a basis for 
optimizing the geological environment and the prevention and 
control of geological disasters. 
  1) Intensify Research on Mining Geology and Solve Critical 
S&amp;T Problems in the Search for Minerals 
  To ensure that the goals outlined in the 12-year mineral 
search plan relating to the increase in reserves will be 
achieved and to lay the groundwork for the bases for mineral 
prospecting by the beginning of the next century, we must first 
further geological research and then make better use of 
geological theory as a guide to geological prospecting. 
  About mineralization theory. On the one hand, we must learn 
from advanced foreign experience in light of geological 
practices in China, study mineralization mechanism in depth, and 
establish a variety of mineral deposit models and mineralization 
series models. On the other hand, in the long haul we must 
utilize the existing data accumulated over the past 4 decades 
and, combining it with field studies and global crustal 
evolution, study geology and the conditions for the formation 
and development of various deposits comprehensively. Using 
computer technology, we should build four-dimensional geological 
and mineralization models on various scales, all the way from 
the national level to key mineralization areas and deposits at 
the provincial and prefectural levels. Develop mineralization 
theories and conduct mineral forecasting to guide geological and 
mineral prospecting work. 
  Before the year 2000: Concentrate on pilot projects in key 
mining areas and important mineralization areas. 
  Methods for looking for minerals. Proceed from regional 
geological background and the conditions for mineralization. 
Integrate it with the appropriate mineralization theory, 
geochemistry (including deposit geochemistry), geophysics 
(including deep-layer geophysics,) and the comprehensive 
research of remote-sensing geological engineering and other 
forms of engineering. Establish an effective geological 
engineering science that can locate minerals. Design a 
comprehensive mineral-location methods that achieve the best 
allocation. 
  Regarding the different kinds of minerals, we must step up 
comprehensive mineral research, comprehensive mineral 
forecasting, make energy our top priority, step up the search 
for liquefied gas, precious metals, copper, and other minerals 
that we are acutely short of. Redouble our effort to discover 
new ore types and new mines and provide an S&amp;T basis for the 
location of large and extra-large mineral resources. Also, step 
up mineral location in the peripheral areas of mines. Intensify 
geological research on mines. Increase the recovery rate of 
minerals. Prolong the life-span of a mine. 
  a) Energy source minerals. Achieve S&amp;T breakthroughs 
and put 
equal emphasis on petroleum, coal, and natural gas. With the 
requirements for mineralization as a starting point, we should 
emphasize petroleum, coal, and natural gas equally. Increase the 
share of natural gas in overall energy consumption. Further 
research on uranothorite, geothermal heat, and energy sources in 
groundwater-bearing crust. 
  -- Intensify the exploration, forecasting, and assessment of 
petroleum reserves in eastern and western China (particularly 
the Tarim Basin) and along the coast. Open up new oil-bearing 
strata, areas, depths. Pay attention to the origins, principles 
of distribution, resource evaluation, and development and 
utilization of non-anticlinal and complex oil and gas deposits, 
particularly natural gas (including coal gas) to provide a 
scientific basis for the discovery of new large oil fields and 
gas fields and increase the share of natural gas in the mix of 
energy sources in China. 
  -- Conduct in-depth research into the mineralization 
principles of the major uranium deposits, as well as mineral 
deposits of the granite, volcanic rock, moissanite, and 
sand-pile types. Establish comprehensive mineral location 
models. Launch intensive research on new pre-Cambrian deposits. 
Select our search areas strategically. Do a good job in the 
evaluation of major uranium-bearing areas and the mineralization 
projections of large-scale uranium-rich deposits to build up a 
reserve for the development of nuclear energy beyond the year 
2000. 
  -- Improve coal prospecting and step up mine geological 
studies to contribute to the doubling of coal output. In 
addition to the on-going research on coal formation, we must 
develop methods to locate hidden coal fields and to identify 
different kinds of coal and their distribution and study ways of 
developing and utilizing coal properly to pave the way for the 
comprehensive utilization of coal in the next century. 
  b) Non-ferrous metals. Emphasize copper. Examine 
mineralization conditions for deposits and conduct mineral 
geological studies. Improve mineral forecasting of the deep and 
peripheral areas of old mines and other areas favorable to 
mineralization to guide the location of large-scale copper 
mines. Give priority to research on material composition and 
comprehensive utilization of large and mid-sized multi-metal 
deposits that occur with copper deposits and that of 
copper-nickel deposits to provide a basis for comprehensive 
development and comprehensive utilization. Continue research on 
the mineralization environment for aluminum, lead, zinc, nickel, 
antimony, tin, bismuth, mercury, and other minerals, and make 
reserve projections to better ensure the availability of mineral 
resources. 
  c) Precious metals. Step up research on mineralization 
geological background, mineralization theories, new technology, 
and new methods. Improve the mineralization theory for gold and 
silver. Strive for breakthroughs in new types of metals and new 
areas to bring about a substantial increase in reserves. 
  d) Ferrous metals. Intensify research on mineralization 
theories. Launch research on the Anshan and Panxi types of iron 
ores to guide the search for minerals. Using paleogeographic 
sedimentary methods, we should research the law of distribution 
of low-sulfur good-quality manganese in the areas surrounding 
the Yangtze plateau and the geological requirements for 
mineralization of small but rich oxidized manganese to provide 
long-term iron and manganese prospecting areas and meet the 
requirements of the metallurgical industry after the year 2000. 
  e) Potassium, chromium, platinum, diamond. Long-term 
reserves 
uncertain. Prospecting difficult. Focusing on the in-depth 
analysis of the geological requirements for mineralization for 
key minerals at home and abroad, we should analyze and project 
the prospects and direction of the search for these minerals in 
the future and provide a scientific basis for planning the 
search for minerals. Continue research on the exploitation of 
the modern potassium-bearing salt lakes in Qinghai and the 
comprehensive utilization of potassium-bearing water in 
northeastern Sichuan. Conduct research on potassium-bearing 
rocks and the extraction of potassium from sea water. 
  f) Tungsten, molybdenum, rare-earths, and other rare metals. 
Allocate a substantial amount of resources to continue research 
on mineralization theories and the law of distribution to 
preserve our resource edge, step up geological research on 
mines. Increase the recovery rate and raise the standard of ore 
dressing. Vigorously pursue research on the multiple processing 
of mineral products and their utilization. Widen the area of 
application and enhance China's ability to export and earn 
foreign exchange. 
  g) Non-metallic minerals. There are 85 non-metallic minerals 
in China with proven reserves, but research on their development 
and utilization is very limited. There should be more testing 
and research on the minerals, rock quality, material properties, 
and special properties. There should be feasibility studies on 
successor industries following the multiple processing of 
mineral products to extend geological work. Accelerate the 
commercialization of geological achievements and spur economic 
development. 
  h) New mineral raw materials, new resources, and new 
materials. The discovery of a certain mineral (rock) property or 
special property often leads to changes in resource demand and 
resource structure. So we should continue to participate in and 
develop research on new performance materials such as 
superconducting materials and industrial ceramics and new 
structural materials in order to find new sources and new 
materials for what the national economy demands: superconducting 
materials, permanent magnet materials, industrial ceramics, and 
new building materials. Conduct tests and experiments to find 
new uses for minerals (rocks). Develop research on substitute 
materials. 
  2) Launch Comprehensive Utilization Research. Promote the 
Sound Development of Mineral Resources 
  Comprehensive utilization research is a prerequisite for 
distinguishing what is mineral from what is not, and deciding 
how to develop and whether or not to invest in geological work. 
It also is a key basis for deposit appraisal and sound 
development and utilization. In the past this area of work was 
overlooked. In the case of some mines, the proven reserves might 
be considerable, but so far we have not been able to exploit 
them because they are lean ores or complex ores, or because 
mineral separation is difficult. Once ore dressing and 
comprehensive utilization technology are mastered, idle mines 
will become active ones and single minerals will become multiple 
minerals, significantly increasing the degree of resource 
assurance and the extent of resource self-sufficiency. Thus we 
must step up basic theoretical research on the comprehensive 
utilization of minerals and ore-dressing or smelting technology, 
and use the latest achievements in modern natural sciences to 
overcome the barriers to the utilization of new, impure, or 
minute mineral species. Intensify the testing and research of 
the material composition and dressing and smelting of mineral 
ores which are found in large quantities in many areas but which 
are hard to dress by developing new technology, new methods, and 
new processes. Launch research on floatation mechanisms, 
floatation agents and the phase-change mechanism in the course 
of ore dressing and smelting. Expand the scope of resource 
utilization and provide resource reserve bases. 
  Before the year 2000, we should concentrate research on the 
comprehensive utilization of tin and iron ores, ludwigite, 
manganese carbonate, salt lakes and water resources, sedimentary 
phosphorite, micrometals, precious metals, non-metals, liquefied 
minerals, and other resources. Study ore dressing and smelting 
processes, including non-polluting gold extraction. Conduct 
experiments in red iron ore dressing and smelting. Develop ore 
dressing theories and methods. 
  Before the year 2020, we should further research on the 
comprehensive utilization of certain large and mid-sized mineral 
products that are desperately needed; new, complex, fine mineral 
products; low-grade iron, phosphorus, precious metals, 
non-metals, liquefied mineral products, and other resources. 
Intensify the comprehensive utilization research of tailings and 
slag. Open up new territory for reconnaissance mineral surveys 
and the comprehensive utilization of mineral products. Conduct 
systematic research on the comprehensive utilization of 
underwater mineral resources. 
  3) Intensify Environmental Geological Research To Ensure 
Smooth Progress in Economic Construction. 
  The environmental issue is an important task in geological 
S&amp;T. In the wake of industrial and agricultural development 
and 
rapid social development, the geological environmental problem 
will become increasingly prominent. An essential part of 
geological S&amp;T research will be geological environmental 
evaluation, interactions between the geological environment and 
human activities, measures to protect and judiciously utilize 
the geological environment, and geological disasters and 
prevention and treatment. 
  Pre-2000 geological environmental research will focus on 
major economic regions, land restoration areas (agricultural and 
animal husbandry areas), key cities, major projects, important 
transportation arteries, and leading mines. 
  a) groundwater resources research. Groundwater is an 
essential part of mineral resources. In arid and semi-arid areas 
in northern China and the karst areas in the south which are dry 
on a seasonal basis, in particular, groundwater often serves as 
the principal source of drinking water for both humans and 
livestock as well as water for industrial and agricultural uses. 
Within this century, we must ascertain the total magnitude of 
China's groundwater resources and draw up a regional profile of 
these resources. With that as a basis, we can then focus on 
research that would ensure the availability of groundwater 
resources in the north (especially northern China) the karst 
region in the south, and agricultural development areas, and on 
principles regulating the recharge of groundwater, runoff, and 
drainage and their development and utilization. Conduct 
feasibility studies on the conversion and joint storage of 
atmospheric precipitation, surface water, and (epigenetic) 
groundwater, thereby contributing to the sound development, 
utilization, and protection of water resources and help develop 
water-efficient agriculture and industry. 
  Step up research on ensuring the volume and availability of 
groundwater resources in energy bases. Work out an optimal 
development plan so that energy recovery and the exploitation of 
groundwater can proceed in a coordinated manner. 
  Launch research on groundwater resource surveying in 
important cities, coastal economic development areas, key 
projects, and key mines. Conduct studies on water resource 
management models. 
  b) Geological engineering research. Conduct geological 
engineering studies diligently in coastal economic development 
areas, in major cities, in key engineering projects, and in 
leading mines; prepare the appropriate diagram series; study 
crustal stability, rock structure, and its dynamic properties; 
study the impact of the recharge, runoff, and discharge of 
groundwater on engineering geology; study the geological 
engineering characteristics of rock formation and changes in 
properties under different conditions as well as new technology 
and new methods for geological engineering testing. Review and 
develop China's geohydrological and geological engineering 
theories and methods. 
  c) Monitor geological disasters and work out prevention and 
control measures. Do a preliminary study on the classification, 
causes, distribution, and evolving trends of geological 
disasters. Conduct an economic appraisal of geological 
disasters. Put forward measures to alleviate or prevent 
geological disasters. 
  Continue our active structural monitoring and current 
crustal 
movement research to spur the development of seismogeology. 
Focus on research on changes in ground surface along the coast 
of the Chang Jiang mainstream, along important transportation 
arteries in major cities, in areas where major engineering and 
construction projects are under way, and in economic development 
areas; focus on research on the monitoring of the formation and 
development of mud-slides, landslides, mud rock flow, and other 
geological disasters as well as their forecasting. Pay attention 
to the geological environmental changes that occur in major 
mining belts in the mining process, the laws governing the 
gushing of water in pits, and subsidences and collapses caused 
by the tapping of groundwater; put forward solutions and methods 
of dealing with them. 
  d) Research on geological environmental changes, pollution, 
and policies. Conduct feasibility studies on water diversion 
between the basins of large rivers. Conduct research on the 
natural and man-made changes (such as the geological disposal of 
nuclear waste) in the geological environment in energy 
development zones, large and mid-sized mining zones, industrial 
areas, major cities, and coastal economic development zones, and 
their impact on the ecology. Study pollution sources. Put 
forward treatment measures for national policy-making. 
  4) Develop Agricultural Geology and Spur Agricultural Output 
  Practice proves that agricultural geology is of profound 
practical significance for the sound distribution of crops and 
increase in output. It is proposed that the state invest in it 
as appropriate and support the development of agricultural 
geology. 
  Initiate research on the relations between agrogeology and 
superior crops within this century, improve the division of the 
nation into agricultural regions and give a boost to sound 
planting; disseminate scientific research achievements that 
would promote the scientific and sound use of water, the 
transformation of land and soil that is excessively wet or dry 
as well as saline-alkali soil and the increase in output over a 
large area; use geothermy to develop cash crops; study ways of 
broadening the application of non-traditional mineral 
agricultural fertilizers to fuel rising crop output; investigate 
the relations between soil and the five elements, on the one 
hand, and crop growth, on the other, and guide the research and 
development of compound fertilizers and the application of such 
fertilizers; research and develop mineral fodder additives, 
conserve grain, and develop aquaculture and animal husbandry. 
  5) Step Up Basic Geological and Regional Geological Studies. 
Strengthen the Staying Power of Geological Work 
  Basic geology and regional geology are the foundation of 
mineral geology and provide a scientific basis for strategic 
planning for reconnaissance survey and mineral search, 
comprehensive environmental evaluation, comprehensive treatment, 
and national land renewal. Deepening our understanding of basic 
geological issues is the cornerstone of our effort to further 
regional geological studies and a precondition for achieving 
major breakthroughs in the search for minerals. Accordingly we 
must assimilate the latest achievements in modern geological 
science, adopt advanced methods and technology, and learn from 
and cooperate with a variety of disciplines. Conduct 
multiple-objective comprehensive research and comprehensive 
evaluation to enhance the efficacy of our search for minerals 
and raise the standard of environmental evaluation. Launch 
studies on the lithosphere, hydrosphere, biosphere, and 
atmosphere, and their interactions. The development of the 
theory of geological science is a long-term strategic task in 
geological S&amp;T work. 
  a) Comprehensive research on major minerogenetic areas 
(belts) and structural units favorable to mineralization. 
Building on the basic research outlined in the Seventh Five-Year 
Plan, we should continue in-depth studies on the 
Aer-tai-Xizhunge'er-Tianshan-Kunlun-Qinling mountain ranges, the 
three-river fold in the southwest, the lower and middle reaches 
of Chang Jiang, and the northern edge of the Zhongchao platform. 
Initiate studies on new areas like the Yangzi platform, the 
Daxingan Ling and Qilian folds. Compile the appropriate diagrams 
and maps. Develop regional geological and regional 
mineralization theories. Conduct minerogenetic forecasting. Step 
up comparative geological studies on an inter-continental and 
even global scale. 
  Before 2020, launch a number of new regional studies. Deepen 
our understanding of the areas mentioned above and participate 
extensively in comparative studies on an inter-continental and 
global basis. Expand regional geological studies into global 
geology, then use global geological concepts to deepen our 
understanding of regional geological characteristics, thereby 
contributing to global geological studies. 
  b) Compile a new generation of maps, atlases, and books 
dealing with the geology, geophysics, geochemistry, and remote 
sensing of major regions and the entire nation. Compile special 
diagrams to meet the needs of national land restoration and 
development planning. Compile or participate in the compilation 
of inter-continental (including oceanic) geological maps. Study 
new map-making methods and theories. Further automation in 
map-making. 
  c) Integrate China's major minerogenetic geotectonic 
elements. Conduct comprehensive research on the lithosphere, 
deep-lying geology, geophysics, and geochemistry. Within this 
century, through multi-disciplinary comprehensive studies and 
research on Class I geoscientific fractures, structural tectonic 
belts, and important basins, we should determine the basic 
framework of the structure of the lithosphere within China and 
the crustal structure of important structural zones and basins 
and establish a classification of crustal structures. Use 
satellite location technology to study the new structural 
movement. Ascertain the gravitational stress in key areas. 
Accumulate data and gradually develop a crustal movement and 
dynamic model. After these tasks are accomplished, explore their 
impact on ore formation and spatial distribution, on crustal 
stability and on major geological disasters. Pave the way 
geologically for extra-deep geological well-drilling projects. 
  Participate in international cooperation on an extensive 
scale before the year 2020. Monitor developments at the 
forefront of earth science. Solve more theoretical and practical 
problems. Carry out extra-deep well-drilling projects. 
  d) Conduct basic geological research. Study major basic 
geological issues: crust, rocks, minerals, major geological 
events, and major geological properties and structural activity. 
Expedite the development of such disciplines as geotectology, 
experimental geology, rock science, applied mineralogy, regional 
and deep geophysics, geochemistry, and organic geochemistry. 
  e) Marine geological resources research. Conduct geological 
resources survey to scale on China's continental shelf, 
continental slope, and deep-sea basins to produce a clear 
profile of the geological structure of China's territorial 
waters by the end of this century. Research and develop advanced 
technology for exploring deep-sea marine geological resources. 
  Investigate oceanic sedimentation, the law of ore formation, 
and the structure of the ocean crust. Develop oceanic geological 
theories to provide a scientific basis for the exploitation of 
minerals in international waters. 
  Systematically exploit mineral resources in both shallow 
coastal waters and the oceans before 2020. 
  f) Geological mineral surveys in Antarctica. Conduct surveys 
in Antarctica. Compile geological and mineral products maps for 
Antarctica. Complete preliminary evaluation of the geological 
and mineral resources of Antarctica and project its exploitation 
prospects to provide the data necessary for China's drive to 
develop Antarctica resources. 
  6) Develop Prospecting Technology. Expedite Major 
Breakthroughs in the Search for Mineral Ores. Increase the 
Returns on Investment in Geological Prospecting. 
  In a certain sense, geological science is an information 
science. It follows that prospecting methods, technology, and 
equipment are the tools and means for securing such information, 
an important guarantee of enhancing the economic and social 
returns of geological work. 
  The basic methods of geological prospecting today are 
physical prospecting, chemical prospecting, and remote-sensing 
prospecting. On the other hand, drilling is the most essential 
means for uncovering ores and other geological matter, 
collecting a variety of test samples, examining and verifying a 
range of abnormalities, and laying our hands on mineral 
deposits. Up to the end of this century we should concentrate on 
researching and developing new methods, new technology, and new 
apparatus in geophysics, geochemistry, and remote-sensing for 
use in mineral prospecting, environmental geological surveying, 
and the study of complex of geological issues, as well as new 
processes and equipment for mineral prospecting. At the same 
time, continue to develop advanced rock analysis and testing 
techniques and methods and look for ways to broaden the 
application of computer technology. Make our methods more 
comprehensive and our equipment better related. Enhance our 
ability to locate deep-seated ores and others that are hard to 
identify and to solve complex environmental geological problems. 
  a) Intensify research on geophysical and geochemical methods 
and technology. Develop high-resolution three-dimensional 
seismic prospecting and integrated digital and numerical control 
logging technology. Develop physical and chemical prospecting 
technologies for directly locating oil, gas, and geothermal 
heat. Develop technology that can effectively probe deeply 
buried minerals and others that are hard to identify, as well as 
technology to be used in environmental geological surveying. 
Improve physical and chemical prospecting technologies for use 
inside a pit, follower logging, and other pit locating 
technology. Explore setting up a system for drilling for solid 
mineral products without coring. Step up research on the 
application of regional geophysical and regional geochemical 
data. Give priority to theoretical research on geophysical 
prospecting and geochemical prospecting to lay the foundation 
for the development of new methods and new technology. 
  b) Promote the application of remote-sensing technology. 
Make 
good use of new satellite pictures, develop new aerial 
remote-sensing methods, raise the standard of digital processing 
technology and the level of theory of remote-sensing technology, 
and launch research on the application of resource prospecting, 
environmental monitoring, land restoration, and urban-rural 
planning. 
  c) Extra-deep well drilling is a large-scale comprehensive 
piece of engineering that represents advances in multiple 
disciplines. Not only can it directly shed light on matter in 
the inner depths of the crust and its structure, but it can also 
spawn a string of new theories and new technology. However, it 
embraces a broad area, involves complex technology, and requires 
a substantial investment. We should go about drawing up an 
extra-deep well drilling plans before the year 2000, select well 
sites and conduct studies, formulate a technological plan, lay 
down the task in its entirety as well as the measures that need 
to be taken, and conduct research on the technology of 
extra-deep well drilling as well as its basic theory. Meanwhile, 
we also need to train qualified personnel to set the stage for 
implementing the extra-deep well drilling plan at the beginning 
of the next century. 
  d) Raise the standard of experimental testing technology. 
Closely integrate geological prospecting with scientific 
research. Give priority to the R&amp;D of an analytical system 
for 
multi-trace-elements and super multi-trace-elements. Improve the 
technology for geological dating and stabilize the level of the 
technology of isotope analysis. Develop organic geochemical 
testing technology. Research and develop petrological minerals 
and geochemical samples. Build up China's body of geochemical 
samples systematically. Intensify research on the geochemical 
properties and application of new mineral and rock materials. 
  e) Research, develop, and popularize new special-purpose 
equipment. Over time, equipment that is widely used all over 
China should become part of a set and most of it should be 
manufactured at home. Research and develop multi-parameter and 
multi-media intelligent prospecting equipment and apparatus to 
be used in the air, on land, or underground. Research special 
physical prospecting equipment and apparatus for use in on-site 
analysis. Promote real-time surveying in chemical prospecting. 
Develop and popularize a host of new equipment for use in 
mineral and rock testing and sample analysis. 
  f) Vigorously popularize computer technology with a view 
toward using the computer widely in the collection of geological 
information, data processing, image processing, machine 
map-making, composition, and printing. Explore setting up a 
geological information system based on a data base, model base, 
and method base and a system with all kinds of interpretation 
systems. Set up an automatic evaluation system for solid mineral 
products, a network of artificial intelligence experts, and a 
data network. 
  By the year 2020, the latest S&amp;T achievements, including 
stratification analysis, holography, high-temperature 
superconductivity, and the smart computer, should be used to 
develop new prospecting methods, technology, and equipment and 
open up new areas of application. 
  7) Soft Science Research 
  a) Research on geological economics and management. 
Concentrate on global mineral resources demand forecasting and 
their development strategy, the prices of mineral products on 
the world market, China's import-export policy, the resource 
economics of China's leading minerals, the economic evaluation 
of regional mineral resources and industrial development 
distribution, coastal mineral resources and economic 
development, the technical and economic evaluation of mineral 
deposits and the optimal degree of mineral deposit prospecting, 
geological work and geological economic management model, 
payment for the use of geological achievements, and other issues 
that arise in the reform of geological work. 
  b) Provide scientific support for macro policy-making by the 
state. Using mineral resources and the geological environment as 
the base, conduct comprehensive scientific studies revolving 
around the major engineering projects undertaken by the state, 
national land planning, and economic development zones so as to 
provide scientific base for the state as it formulates major 
policies. 
  c) Systems research on geological work, geological S&amp;T 
development strategy, policy, and management. 
  d) Effective ways of integrating geological work with 
economic development. 
  e) Methodological studies on the soft science of mining. 
<H5>  Recycled Resources </H5>
  Today even as man enjoys the material civilization created 
by 
the Industrial Revolution, he discharges into a living space 
none too big to begin with a variety of waste materials in huge 
quantities. Each year tens of billions of tons of waste 
materials in solid, liquid, or gaseous form are released, not 
only taking up an enormous amount of land but also polluting the 
environment extensively and damaging the ecological balance. 
  At the beginning of this century, many people of vision 
foresaw the resource crisis and deterioration in the living 
environment that would accompany an industrial society. They 
spread their message loud and clear and over time came to 
command widespread public interest. In the second half of this 
century, industrialized nations were driven by the mounting 
pressure of a resource crisis to deal with the urgent need to 
clean up the environment. This spawned the rise of an industry 
that develops and utilizes recycled resources. 
  So-called recycled resources is an umbrella term for all 
materials that are created in a multi-stage process in society, 
including production, circulation, and consumption, that may 
exist in any one of a variety of forms, that no longer have the 
original use value but that may regain use value through 
different processing procedures. 
  Unlike the exploitation of natural resources, the 
utilization 
of recycled resources does away with the complicated extraction 
and resource-concentrating process. Not only are natural 
resources effectively protected, saving a lot of investment 
dollars and lowering production costs and energy consumption 
significantly, but the environment is also improved markedly and 
a unity and balance are achieved between short-term demand and 
long-term development. 
  At present all developed nations have come to regard the 
development and utilization of recycled resources as the second 
mining industry and take it most seriously. The recycling 
industry has become an up-and-coming enterprise. 
  China is a developing nation with a huge population and a 
weak industrial base. It suffers from energy shortages and is 
sorely strapped for funds. This being the reality in China, 
fully tapping the potential of recycled resources and finding 
new ways to utilize them is no doubt an effective and important 
means to achieve economic development with Chinese 
characteristics by securing greater economic benefits and 
widespread social results in return for relatively low 
consumption. Recycling provides society with more basic 
materials to strengthen the nation's economic muscle in a hurry 
while satisfying a burgeoning demand on the part of consumers. 
  1. Development Strategy and Goals 
  1) Development Strategy Provide the nation with a full 
line-up of important materials on an on-going basis in view of 
the massive requirements of economic development and the severe 
shortfall in resource supplies, and given the need to economize 
on investment, lower production costs and energy consumption, 
cut back on the exploitation of natural resources, and maintain 
the ecological balance. 
  2) Strategic Goals 
  Year 2000 
  a) Produce 1.1 million tons of recycled non-ferrous metals 
each year, 25 percent of the total output of non-ferrous metals, 
up from the current 20 percent. The production of a similar 
amount of original primary minerals would mean an additional 
8.68 billion yuan in investment. Besides saving investment 
dollars, the use of recycled non-ferrous metals would cut energy 
consumption by an equivalent of 6.7 million tons of standard 
coal, reduce the amount of assorted wastes emitted by 6.7 
million tons, and reduce the amount of hazardous substances like 
sulfur emitted by more than 200,000 tons. 
  b) Recover 22 million tons of scrap iron nationwide each 
year. Provide iron and steel mills with 16 million tons of 
furnace materials, thus saving 16 million tons of pig iron, 
which translates into savings of 20 million tons of standard 
coal and 12.8 billion yuan in investment. 
  c) Recover 500,000 tons of used chemical fibers, including 
200,000 to 300,000 tons which have been mechanically loosened 
and 100,000 tons which have been chemically treated. 
  d) Recycle 4 million tons of paper each year, constituting 
30 
percent of the total volume of scrap paper, up from the current 
20 percent. This can be made into 3.2 million tons of paper, 
saving 16 million cubic meters of timber, 1.6 million tons of 
sodium hydroxide, 1.6 million tons of standard coal, 200,000 
kilowatt-hours [kWh] of electricity, and 80 million yuan in 
production costs. 
  e) Recycle 300,000 tons of used rubber, 46 percent of used 
rubber resources. Recycle 7.5 to 8 million used tires, 16 to 18 
percent of total tire output. 
  f) Recycle 1.25 million tons of waste plastics, raising the 
recycling rate (the amount of plastics recycled as a percentage 
of all waste plastics) from the current 21 percent to 40 percent. 
  g) Recover 4.8 million tons of used or old glass, 20 percent 
of total glass output for the same period, saving 480,000 tons 
of standard coal, 285,000 tons of quartz, and 1 million tons of 
soda ash compared to the traditional glass production process, 
and lowering production costs by 20 percent. 
  h) Utilize 80 million tons of powdered coal, 40 percent of 
the total amount of ash discharged for the period in question, 
including 20 million tons for mixing with cement or building 
materials, 10 percent of the total amount of ash discharged in 
the period; and 40 million tons for use in road construction, in 
fill in development zones, in the construction of road 
embankments, and in land surfacing, 20 percent of the total 
amount of ash discharged. Another 20 million tons, 10 percent of 
the total amount of ash discharged, are used for other purposes. 
  By the year 2020 
  Recycle 2.2 million to 2.5 millon tons of nonferrous metals 
each year. Recycle 40 million tons of scrap iron. Provide iron 
and steel mills with 30 million tons of standard furnace 
materials, 75 percent of the amount recovered; recover 1 million 
tons of waste chemical fibers, including 700,000 tons that are 
mechanically loosened and 300,000 tons that are chemically 
treated. Recover 7 million tons of waste paper, achieving a 
recovery rate of 45 percent. Recycle 2.93 million tons of waste 
plastic materials, raising the recycling rate to 50 percent. 
Utilize old and used glass at a rate of 40 percent of total 
glass output for the period concerned. Utilize powdered coal ash 
at a rate of 60 percent of all powdered coal ash discharged in 
that period. The major ash-discharging areas should make it a 
priority to achieve the full recovery of all ash discharged. 
  To achieve the above strategic objectives, S&amp;T must 
orient 
itself to the reality in production, scientific research must be 
guided by what the commodity market needs, and production must 
closely rely on S&amp;T progress, fully utilizing the important 
S&amp;T 
contributions in the area in question. 
  Based on this guiding thought, we decide on the following 
S&amp;T 
strategic objective as far as the utilization of recycled 
resources is concerned: Providing the key technology for 
furthering the comprehensive utilization of recycled materials, 
lowering production costs and energy consumption, improving 
product quality, and raising the added value of resources. 
Create the necessary technical conditions for the achievement of 
the general strategic objective. 
  -- Give priority to the R&amp;D of new technology and new 
equipment for sorting and preprocessing. 
  When it comes to the development and utilization of recycled 
materials, the gap between China and the leading nations in the 
world is most striking in the sorting and preprocessing stages. 
Accordingly, the R&amp;D and dissemination of sorting and 
preprocessing technology is a vital yet common part of the 
technology in this field. We should develop methods for the 
recovery of recycled resources of all sorts by group as well as 
means of containerized transportation and storage; adopt, 
absorb, and assimilate foreign sorting and preprocessing 
technology, learning from the experience of the advanced; study 
ways of diffusing mechanized sorting and preprocessing 
techniques and equipment that are suited to China's 
characteristics, and raise the direct utilization rate of 
recycled resources. Specifically, the direct utilization rate of 
mixed non-ferrous metals should exceed 50 percent compared with 
the current 30 percent. The sorting and preprocessing technology 
for mixed used plastics should match the prevailing advanced 
standard in the world. 
  -- Develop new technology for processing and utilizing scrap 
iron. Continue to research and popularize double-filings steel 
smelting technology. Study and popularize technology for the 
comprehensive utilization of low-alloy scrap steel to make the 
most of alloying elements. Adopt new scrap iron processing 
technology to enhance our scrap iron processing capacity 
effectively. Provide iron and steel works with clearly 
classified standard furnace charges in sufficient quantities. 
  --Introduce new recycling technology for waste and impure 
nonferrous metals. Research the specific processes and key 
technology for recycling lead, aluminum, copper, and other 
traditional metals. Widely adopt new processes and equipment 
that result in high recovery rates and low energy consumption, 
are non-polluting, and achieve a high level of comprehensive 
utilization. Aim for a metal recovery rare of 95 percent and 
more. Develop and popularize recycling technology for used 
batteries, used toothpaste tubes, scrap aluminum alloys, and 
other resources waiting for exploitation. Expand the production 
capacity of existing enterprises. Effectively increase the 
output of recycled non-ferrous metals. 
  -- Research recycling technology for waste organic 
high-molecular materials. Introduce methods to improve the 
existing recycling processes for scrap plastics. After mastering 
the preprocessing technology, we should learn from the 
experience of other advanced nations and research and popularize 
the use of waste plastics recycling machinery suited to China's 
national conditions in order to improve the product's 
performance and quality. Use new technology and advanced 
equipment to replace in due course outdated technology and 
equipment currently used in rubber recycling. Research new 
technology and equipment to make a variety of products using 
used rubber, thereby creating new uses for recycled rubber. 
Develop a whole new set of technology and flaw detection 
equipment for retreading used tires. Improve the performance of 
retreaded tires. 
  -- Introduce new ways to utilize powdered coal ash and waste 
glass comprehensively. In light of the reality in China's 
economy today, we should introduce a way to process and utilize 
powdered coal ash in large quantity so as to solve the current 
problems of pollution and land being taken up, two problems that 
demand immediate attention. Research the use of powdered coal 
ash in providing a variety of building materials as well as 
sorting technology and technology for sound utilization. Study 
ways of using used glass, including the technology and equipment 
for making several value-added products using used glass, so as 
to increase the economic value of used glass. 
  By the year 2000, recycling in China must be as advanced as 
the best in the world in the 1980's in terms of S&amp;T, while 
the 
recycling technology of some precious metals and high-molecular 
materials should approach the prevailing advanced standard in 
the world. Microelectronics technology will begin to be applied 
in some areas in this field. Speed up the application of 
scientific research achievements to production extensively. The 
rudiments of an inter-industry scientific research, design, and 
dissemination system will have taken shape. The quality of 
workers will have improved to varying extents. Professional and 
technical staff will account for 4 to 5 percent of all workers, 
up from the current 1 percent. 
  In the year 2020 we must continue to tackle the 
comprehensive 
development of recycled materials as a priority and work to 
increase the output of recycled materials. We must continue to 
concentrate on the high-standard comprehensive utilization of 
recycled materials and the dissemination of multiple processing 
technology. Take into consideration the social, environmental, 
and economic benefits of recycling even as recycled materials 
increase in value substantially. 
  Building on what has been accomplished by the year 2000, we 
should continue to make improvements in the several areas 
mentioned above. In addition, we should pay attention to basic 
scientific research, weaving basic theoretical research, the 
development of applied technology, and the high-efficiency 
development, comprehensive utilization, and multiple processing 
of resources into a coherent and integrated industrial system 
that begins with resource development and culminates in 
providing society with all sorts of mature products. By and 
large the R&amp;D of recycled materials in China should approach 
the 
advanced standard in the world. In some fields, China should 
even set the pace globally. Set up a more complete scientific 
research, dissemination, and information feedback system. There 
should be marked improvements in the caliber of the workers, 
with professional and technical staff accounting for 10 to 15 
percent of all workers. Build up a professional and technical 
corps that combines scientific research, design, and trial 
manufacturing with actual production. 
  2. Major Tasks and Key Technology 
  1) Soft Science Research in the Development and Utilization 
of Recycled Resources 
  a) Survey on the basic conditions of recycling enterprises. 
Conduct a survey on recycling enterprises in China, followed by 
dynamic and static analyses. Then draw an accurate statistical 
profile of their resources and make scientific projections and 
appraisal of the development potential and trends for the entire 
industry. This will form a scientific basis for macro study and 
long-term planning by the state. 
  b) Work out resource classification standards and product 
quality standards suited to the characteristics of China's 
recycling enterprises. Primarily quality classification 
standards for used non-ferrous metals, used glass, and used 
plastic materials and classification standards for recycled 
plastics. 
  c) Economic and technical policy studies in the field of 
recycling. In the light of the characteristics of China's 
economy, we should formulate an economic and technical policy 
for each different sector of the economy. Such a policy should 
mainly include the following: prices, taxation, investment, 
examination and approval of scientific research projects, the 
transfer of and rewards for S&amp;T achievements, as well as 
technical standards for enterprises. Through the implementation 
of the appropriate economic and technological policies, we hope 
to expedite enterprise technical progress and a close union 
between technology and the economy. 
  2) Research on Scrap Iron and Steel Recycling Technology 
  a) Research and diffuse scrap iron and steel processing 
technology. Research and develop a new heating furnace to 
drastically improve baling density and cleanliness and 
performance. By the year 2000 1 million tons of steel filings 
should be baled using this method, increasing to 2 million tons 
by the year 2020. Research and popularize plasma scrap iron 
cutting technology so that it will gradually replace the 
traditional oxygen cutting technology. In 2000, plasma scrap 
steel cutting technology should be used in the processing of 2.5 
million tons of scrap steel. By the year 2020 such technology 
should be applied universally. 
  b) Find new ways to recover and comprehensively utilize iron 
and steel filings. Continue to popularize the double-filing 
steel smelting technology, raising the average proportion from 
the current 20 to 25 percent. Research new technology to make a 
variety of new products out of unclassifiable high-alloy steel 
filings using chemical metallurgical technology. Research and 
popularize new technology to make a variety of value-added 
products, using low-alloy scrap steel such as bearing steel 
filings. Aim to recover and comprehensively utilize over 200,000 
tons of low-alloy steel filings by the year 2000. 
  3) Waste Paper Recycling Technology 
  Research new specialized processing technology and special 
equipment to sort, remove the dust and ink from, and bale waste 
paper using mechanized and semi-mechanized equipment. 
  4) Study New Recycling Technology for Mixed Scrap 
Non-Ferrous 
Metals 
  a) Research new technology for the comprehensive utilization 
of waste impure copper. Learning from the experiences of 
advanced nations like Britain and the United States, we should 
successfully develop by the end of this century the technology 
for the comprehensive utilization of mixed scrap copper that is 
suited to China's national conditions, and work hard to diffuse 
such technology. Essentially the technology would entail sorting 
mixed scrap copper into clearly marked alloys waste and then 
directly producing alloys close to the original designation in 
order to achieve the goal of direct utilization. The key here is 
the R&amp;D of sorting and preprocessing technology. 
  b) Research and develop new technology and equipment for the 
recycling and utilization of mixed scrap aluminum and several 
kinds of aluminum alloys. 
  In view of the fragmented and small-scale nature of recycled 
aluminum enterprises, our focus up to the year 2000 should be 
the technological transformation of small and mid-sized 
enterprises, the development of technology and equipment that 
come close to matching the best in the world, and the 
popularization of new smelting equipment such as the vertical 
furnace and double-chamber reverberating furnace. Unit energy 
consumption should drop to between 100 and 150 kilograms of 
standard coal and the metal recovery rate should exceed 95 
percent. 
  Research recovery technology for used pull-to-open cans and 
toothpaste tubes. Focus on problems in preprocessing technology. 
The successful development of such technology and its all-out 
diffusion should result in the recovery of 20,000 to 30,000 tons 
of aluminum each year by the year 2000. Study ways of recycling 
and utilizing aluminum alloys recovered from aircraft retired 
from service. End the current poor utilization or 
under-utilization of good materials. Increase the value-added 
level of recycled aluminum alloys. 
  Modernize the backward technology and equipment used in the 
smelting and processing of several kinds of lead-based alloys, 
including used lead-based batteries and the lead coverings of 
used cables. Research and popularize new technology and 
equipment that would raise the recovery rate, entail low energy 
consumption, cause no pollution, and achieve high comprehensive 
utilization rate. Focus on the pollution problem. Aim for a 
recovery rate over 95 percent. Lower the unit energy consumption 
to between 200 and 250 kilograms of standard coal. The amount of 
hazardous substances in the gases, fumes, and waste residues 
discharged should meet national emission standards. Alloys in 
the waste residues such as antimony should be recovered and 
utilized. By the year 2000, lead recycling technology should be 
fully diffused. 
  d) Comprehensive utilization of used dry batteries 
  Dry batteries contain zinc, manganese, ammonium salt, 
copper, 
and mercury and can supply over 350,000 tons of resources each 
year. By the year 2000, we must come up with recycling 
technology that is non-polluting and low-cost. Essentially this 
would include utilizing manganese, zinc, and ammonium salt 
soundly; raising the recovery rate for zinc and eliminating 
mercury pollution; directly utilizing manganese oxides if at all 
possible; and building two to four demonstration plants. Every 
effort should be made to diffuse the technology to every major 
city after the turn of the century, which would provide 60,000 
tons of zinc and over 100,000 tons of manganese dioxides each 
year. 
  e) Adopt from overseas, research, and develop new technology 
and new assembly lines for sorting and preprocessing mixed scrap 
metals. 
  Study and make use of the advanced and mature technology and 
key equipment overseas. Combine the importation of prototypes 
with R&amp;D on our own. Essentially this will involve developing 
equipment for crush sieving, wind sorting, magnet sorting, 
high-pressure electrostatic sorting, eddy-current sorting, and 
low-temperature freeze separation, and solving some of the more 
severe problems existing today: scrap metals being excessively 
mixed, cumbersome post-treatment technology, high energy 
consumption and production costs, and modest increases in added 
value. By 2000, we must successfully come up with sorting 
technology and equipment for used electronic parts and 
components and a variety of mixed waste materials as well as 
sorting and preprocessing technology for mixed wastes containing 
copper, aluminum and lead, thus creating the conditions for the 
large-scale recycling and utilization of mixed scrap metals and 
the drive to boost the utilization rate directly. 
  f) The comprehensive recovery and utilization of a variety 
of 
used catalysts. Used catalysts contain copper, nickel, zinc, 
vanadium, tungsten, molybdenum, bismuth, cobalt, and precious 
metals. At present we typically use the wet method for recovery 
purposes. By the year 2000 we should have introduced technology 
to process all kinds of used catalysts. It is proposed that a 
process combining the heating method with the wet method be used 
to process catalysts in the vanadium family and the family of 
precious metals and that ore separation and extraction or 
electrochemistry be used to process used catalysts in the 
copper, nickel, and cobalt families. Aim to boost the metal 
recovery rate beyond 95 percent. Carriers and other components 
that are valuable should be put to proper use. 
  g) Research new technology and equipment for the recycling 
of 
rare precious scrap metals. By 2000 we must have largely worked 
out the problems encountered in the recycling of various kinds 
of waste hard alloys and high smelting scrap metals which are of 
a complex make-up by introducing into this field special 
smelting processing technology and studying plasma smelting 
technology and applying it to solve the problems in the 
recycling of the above-mentioned waste materials. The 
development of new technology for the recycling and utilization 
of the platinum family of metals will remain an important 
scientific research topic in the future. Economically rational 
technological processes should be developed for different kinds 
of metal wastes such as used catalysts, used electronic parts, 
and the waste residues and waste liquid resulting from the 
metallurgical process. Concentrate on the research of techniques 
like flux extraction, ion exchange, and the heating method-wet 
method combination process which yield a high recovery rate. 
Solve the separation and purification problems among precious 
metals and between precious metals and base metals. By the year 
2000 we should come close to being the best in the world in some 
technologies. 
  h) Continue research on basic science in the recycling of 
nonferrous metals. Launch research on the mechanism of 
hydro-metallurgy in processing mixed scrap non-ferrous metals 
for comprehensive utilization as well as the use of special 
smelting technology in processing a variety of waste residues. 
Study the mechanism of various extraction processes and the 
screening of several new extracting agents. Research the 
thermodynamics and dynamics of the recycling of scrap mixed 
metals. 
  5) Recycling Waste Plastics 
  a) Study new technology and equipment for preprocessing 
waste 
plastics. This includes technology and equipment for sorting 
miscellaneous waste plastic materials, technology and equipment 
for crushing, cleaning, and drying waste plastics, and 
developing key technology and equipment for preprocessing and 
gradually diffusing such technology and equipment. 
  b) Develop a complete set of equipment for recovery, 
recycling, and utilization. Evaluate, select, and redesign 
recycling machinery, both domestic and foreign. By the year 2000 
we must come up with a complete set of recycling equipment and 
recycling unit for mixed plastics suited to China's conditions. 
  c) Study the chemical thermal decomposition method and other 
recycling methods. Popularize the polystyrene and organic glass 
thermal decomposition reduction method. Other methods should be 
developed for plastics not suited to the chemical thermal 
decomposition reduction method, such as incineration. Treat them 
as a fuel and hence a source of thermal energy. 
  6) Technology for Recycling Used Rubber and Retreading Old 
Tires 
  a) Research on and application of rubber recycling 
technology 
By the year 2000 we should have developed new technology to 
replace the water-oil method and oil method. At present rubber 
recycling is dependent on backward technology and causes serious 
pollution. That must be changed. Continue research on a new oil 
method, mechanization method, compression method, and 
plasticization at low temperatures or room temperatures, and 
complete their industry-wide application. Complete research on 
and popularize recycling technology for butadiene-styrene 
rubber, maleic rubber, and chloroprene rubber in used synthetic 
rubber. By the year 2020 the microwave method, dephasing method, 
and other directional jiaoliu techniques should be put into 
industrial use and popularized. Complete research on and 
popularization of the recycling technique for used rubber 
plastics products. 
  b) Research on the production of waste rubber powder and 
utilization methods By the year 2000 we should have completed 
research on rubber powder, the transformation of rubber powder, 
rubber powder surface treatment, and the production of 
extra-fine rubber powder. Increase the uses of rubber powder, 
for example, as a full substitute for recycled rubber and in 
conjunction with plastics, asphalt, or other materials. Complete 
research on the production and uses of extra-fine rubber powder 
by the year 2020. 
  c) Technology for processing used rubber using chemical 
thermal decomposition method. Used rubber is broken down into 
monomers, then polymerized into recycled rubber. The gases and 
liquids produced can be used as fuel and as a source of chemical 
industrial raw materials. 
  d) Develop a complete set of technology to make the kinds of 
recycled tires China is not making at present. Develop a 
complete technology to recycle heavy-duty construction tires, 
radial tires, and airplane tires. Conduct research on new 
technology and new equipment for tire recycling, including the 
quantitative pressurized tire surface recycling method and 
flexible mold recycling technology. 
  e) Research non-destructive testing equipment Learning from 
advanced foreign technology and prototypes, we should develop 
the balancing machine, far-infrared ray tester, reflectoscope, 
and tire roller tester to replace the current testing methods, 
which rely on eye observation and experience exclusively. 
  7) Research Recycling Technology for Used Chemical Fibers 
  Before and after 2000 we should import from nations like 
Germany and France large-scale mechanized loosening equipment 
and technology for processing used chemical fibers. Learning 
from their advanced experiences and assimilating their 
technology and equipment, we should then develop large, 
mid-sized, and small loosening equipment and the accompanying 
technology that is suited to China's specific conditions and 
highly automated, gives a steady performance, and produces 
good-quality chemical fibers. The technology should be 
popularized. Research new comprehensive utilization technology 
for waste chemical fibers and study ways of using different 
grades of loosened fibers to make adhesive-bonded fabrics, 
adhesive bonded blankets, double-knits, and a variety of 
fillings. Develop multiple processing technology for waste 
chemical fibers. Use chemical processing methods and adopt 
different chemical de-polymerization methods. Use production 
units like waste nylon and waste dylon (polyester fiber). Make 
every effort to complete industrial testing and gradually 
diffuse the technology by the end of this century. 
  8) Recycling Technology for Used and Old Glass 
  a) Research on special equipment and technology for 
recovering and recycling old and used glass. Includes: sorting 
technology for old and used glass. Methods of collection, 
storage, and transportation. Special instruments and equpment. 
  b) Explore new ways of using old and used glass. Research 
and 
popularize new technology for utilizing crushed glass directly 
in road construction and the manufacturing of building 
materials. New technology and corresponding equipment for using 
crushed glass to make glass fibers, wall tiles, cellular glass, 
floating beads and other value-added products. Study the various 
mechanisms involved in the recycling of crushed glass. 
  9) Research on the Comprehensive Utilization Technology of 
Powdered Coal Ash Focus before the year 2000: R&amp;D of the 
methods 
of processing and utilizing powdered coal ash, notably the 
following: road construction, mine backfilling, development zone 
backfilling, and the manufacturing of agricultural fertilizers. 
Pay special attention to the pollution threat posed by powdered 
coal ash to groundwater in the backfilling process and research 
its bearing capacity. Explore ways of using high-penetration 
powdered coal ash in cement and concrete. Research powdered coal 
ash sorting technology and utilization-by-grade technology. Sort 
powdered coal ash into floating beads, glass micro-beads, 
magnetic powder, and good-quality fine ash. By the year 2020 we 
should have developed new technology for the comprehensive 
utilization of powdered coal ash and valuable metals recovered 
from powdered coal ash. 
<H5>  Oceans </H5>
  The ocean has immense impact on human existence and 
development. Every country in the world is scrambling to study 
the ocean from the political, economic, military, and ecological 
perspectives, adjusting its strategy, boosting its maritime 
power, and pressing ahead with oceanic exploration in order to 
consolidate its maritime stature and secure maximum maritime 
rights and interests. 
  In the wake of S&amp;T advances, our growing appreciation 
of the 
ocean, and the endless discoveries of its strategic resources 
since the end of World War II, man's perception of the value of 
the ocean and its strategic position has changed profoundly. 
There has been an on-going struggle over maritime rights and 
interests and oceanic resources. On the other hand, the 
exploitation of the ocean has made rapid strides since the 
1960's. The maritime economy assumes growing importance in the 
world economy, fueling the all-round development of 
oceanography. Oceanographic engineering has become an important 
field in the new technological revolution. 
  China ranks among the world's leading maritime nations. 
Under 
the United Nations Maritime Convention, the maritime space over 
which China exercises jurisdiction (including its territorial 
waters, the continental shelf, and exclusive economic zone) is 
equivalent to one-third of the nation's land area. China's 
maritime space is superb in both geographical location and 
climatic conditions. It also teems with abundant biological 
resources, oil, natural gas, and other resources. 
  China faces a glorious but arduous task in safeguarding its 
maritime rights and interests, exploiting its oceanic resources, 
and protecting the maritime ecology. We must rouse ourselves and 
enhance our marine consciousness; rely on S&amp;T progress to 
increase our overall ability to exploit and utilize the ocean, 
to monitor, to forecast, to manage, and to protect; increase the 
economic and social benefits derived from the ocean; and improve 
the marine ecology, thereby strengthening China's standing and 
role in international maritime affairs. 
  1. Development Strategy and Goals 
  Development Strategy. For many years to come China's 
maritime 
development and management should focus on the coast and the 
maritime space over which it exercises jurisdiction, while 
developing the open sea beyond the littoral zone as appropriate. 
Give priority to the development of aquaculture, maritime 
transportation, and the off-shore oil and natural gas industry. 
Develop high-tech oceanic industries selectively. This being our 
strategic concept, we have arrived at the following guiding 
thought for the development of our marine S&amp;T: Plan 
comprehensively, develop the priorities, achieve breakthroughs 
where they count, enhance our power. Development goals: 
Intensify and deepen our investigation of the environment in the 
maritime space under China's jurisdiction and our search for 
resources there, complete a number of applied research projects, 
and prepare basic maps drawn to small and medium scale on the 
maritime space under China's jurisdiction. Develop oceanic 
technology in common use as well as technology essential to the 
exploitation of the ocean; establish a number of high-tech 
marine industries. Complete the stereo-marine monitoring network 
and a host of technical systems. Enhance our ability to monitor 
and protect the marine environment, to make forecasts about it, 
and to prevent maritime disasters. That way China may find 
itself among the leaders in the world in terms of the overall 
standard of marine S&amp;T. 
  Before the year 2000 we need to modernize our methods of 
marine surveying, monitoring, and experimentation. We need to 
improve across the board the technology for the comprehensive 
development of the coast and major estuaries. Complete the 
making of basic maps and the compilation of other data 
indispensable to delimiting the boundaries of the maritime space 
under Chinese jurisdiction, its continental shelf, and its 
exclusive economic zone, to exploiting the ocean, and to 
protecting and managing comprehensively the marine environment. 
The overall maritime power of the nation should match the best 
in the world as of the late 1980's, and in some areas even 
approaching or reaching advanced world standards prevailing at 
the time. 
  By the year 2020, we must have set up and perfected a stereo 
oceanic monitoring network and miscellaneous technological 
systems and become part of the international network, met the 
various technical requirements laid down in the general 
objectives, and enhanced our capacity for oceanic development 
and oceanographic engineering design, being able to produce the 
equipment that we need. We must further close our gap with the 
advanced nations in the world and become a global leader in yet 
more areas. 
  2. Major Tasks and Key Technology 
  To achieve the above strategic goals, we must concentrate 
our 
resources on achieving some breakthroughs based on the reality 
in China. Accordingly the following major S&amp;T tasks have been 
planned: 
  -- Acquire a thoroughly clear idea of the environment of 
China's maritime space and the magnitude of its resources. 
  -- Complete the development of various marine maps and the 
compilation of other marine data essential to delimiting the 
boundaries of the maritime space, the continental shelf, and the 
exclusive economic zone under China's jurisdiction, and ensuring 
maritime safety. Further the exploitation of marine resources. 
  -- Establish the infrastructure and assorted technical 
systems indispensable to marine monitoring, forecasting, 
protection, and management. 
  -- Develop the technology needed for oceanic exploitation, 
underwater engineering technology, and other important basic 
technologies. 
  These major tasks include the following research topics and 
principal technological targets: 
  1) Surveying China's Maritime Space and Ocean Map-Making 
  Disasters strike frequently in China's territorial waters 
and 
the neighboring oceans. They also are a hotbed of rivalry for 
maritime rights and interests as well as a focus of China's push 
for oceanic development. At present it is a scarcely researched 
area as far as China is concerned. There are no systematic, 
coherent, and reliable basic data, maps, or diagrams. 
Accordingly, we must: 
  a) Conduct a comprehensive study on the continental shelf 
and 
exclusive economic zone (including the maritime space under 
China's jurisdiction and outlying seas). 
  b) Conduct a comprehensive survey on the islands and launch 
a 
detailed study on the coast, the estuaries of major rivers, 
gulfs and bays. 
  c) Prepare maps on the maritime space under the nation's 
jurisdiction. 
  d) Conduct special surveys on designated oceanic zones and 
the two poles. 
  Launch a detailed study on the continental shelf and 
exclusive economic zone and begin prospecting for resources 
before 2000. Complete the study on coastal islands. Complete 
mapping the key parts of the oceans and develop a host of basic 
oceanic maps and a body of data that is urgently needed (scale: 
continental shelf, 1:500,000; outlying seas, 1:1,000,000) to 
meet the basic requirements of resource exploitation and 
management in the continental shelf and exclusive economic zone. 
Before the year 2020 we should continue to step up and deepen 
marine surveys and map-making, produce all the necessary basic 
maps and compile all the basic data on the maritime space under 
China's jurisdiction. Systematize the publication of all basic 
maps and data pertaining to the neighboring seas. 
  2) Technologies for Monitoring the Ocean and Forecasting 
Oceanic Disasters 
  a) Develop marine remote-sensing technology. Establish a 
stereo oceanic monitoring and disaster surveillance system based 
on oceanic, space, and aerial remote-sensing and underwater 
acoustic detection. Complete the network of coastal and island 
observation stations, realize the automation of the observation 
of major elements and data processing before the year 2000, with 
unmanned auxiliary vessels performing observations 
automatically. Put together the rudiments of a near-shore buoy 
observation network. Research maritime satellite remote-sensing 
systems, including the satellite-carried sensor, the 
transmission and reception system for remote-sensing data, and 
applied satellite technical system. Increase the number of 
remote-sensing aircraft and land-based remote-sensing 
observation stations. Put together the rudiments of a stereo 
oceanic surveillance and monitoring system to track marine 
disasters effectively. Perfect the forecasting and forewarning 
system for the marine environment and marine disasters as well 
as an ocean information and data service system in order to 
bring China's overall capacity for analysis, forecasting, and 
services to the advanced level in the world at the time. After 
the year 2000, expand the underwater buoy system and increase 
the number of underwater acoustic detection installations to 
achieve on-going underwater surveillance. Establish a stereo 
ocean monitoring system that combines underwater observation 
with sea-level and land-based remote sensing observation and 
space remote-sensing. China's oceanic environment and disaster 
forewarning and forecasting technology should match the best in 
the world and the country should develop the ability to provide 
high-standard services for the western Pacific and in oceans 
around the world. 
  b) Technology to forecast and forewarn disastrous weather on 
the sea and poor oceanic conditions. Develop and perfect before 
the year 2000 a long- , mid-, and short-range forecasting model 
based on numerical value diagnosis and analysis and numerical 
value forecasting, supplemented by a host of other forewarning 
methods. Develop a range of forewarning products to meet the 
requirements of disaster warning and oceanic development. 
Develop a forewarning service network and put together a marine 
disaster forewarning system that should be uniform all over the 
nation. Develop technology and equipment for rescue operations, 
disaster prevention, and disaster relief at sea and near shore. 
Before the year 2020 continue to improve forewarning technology. 
Step up long-range weather forecasting research and conduct such 
forecasting. Establish a real-time response-type marine 
monitoring, forecasting, and forewarning information 
transmission system. Establish a disaster prevention and 
disaster relief technical system. 
  c) Develop marine data and information technology. Create an 
automated marine information processing and service system. 
Create a marine environmental and rescue data base before 2000. 
Develop marine data service products. Develop a body of marine 
information methods and models. Nurture a pool of experts. We 
should put all marine data under one roof before the year 2020, 
creating a data storage, processing, and service system, a 
user-friendly modern information system. 
  3) Technology for Prevention and Treatment of Oceanic 
Pollution and Ecological Protection Technology 
  a) Technology to monitor oceanic pollution. Improve the 
existing pollution monitoring technology before the year 2000. 
Research and develop new technology and new methods to monitor 
pollution. Work hard to develop aerial remote-sensing monitoring 
and buoy monitoring technology. Automate pollution monitoring in 
particular. Put together the basic framework of a stereo oceanic 
pollution monitoring system. 
  b) Technology to prevent and tackle oceanic pollution 
disasters. Before 2000 we should concentrate on the research of 
technology and equipment for preventing and controlling oil 
spills and restoring the environment that is suited to China's 
coastal waters. Develop highly effective new methods for 
preventing and treating organic pollutants. Launch studies on 
the prevention and control of nutrients in near-shore waters. 
Develop red tide forecasting, control, and eradication 
technology. Make a major effort before the year 2000 to research 
and develop the theory, method, and technology pertaining to the 
preservation of the ecological balance in the oceans, 
tentatively realizing a ``benign circle'' in the ecology in the 
maritime space under China's jurisdiction. 
  c) Establish a management model and standards for the marine 
environment. Before 2000 develop a model which balances the 
environmental capacity of China's coastal waters with the 
quantity and quality of pollutants discharged into the sea. 
Establish a water-quality management model for each body of 
water; take the first steps toward quantifying environmental 
management in coastal waters. Perfect marine environmental 
qualitative and quantitative standards. Study oceanic dumping 
technology. Examine the comprehensive functions of China's 
territorial waters. Complete the regionalization of China's 
territorial waters by function. Continue to improve the 
above-mentioned models and standards before the year 2020 so 
that Chinese oceanic environmental management can keep up with 
the demands of oceanic development at the time. 
  d) Nature protection in the oceans. Before 2000 we must 
equip 
ourselves with a clear, if preliminary, idea of the species of 
rare and endangered plants and animals in China's territorial 
waters, their population size, as well as their biological and 
environmental characteristics. We must formulate laws and 
regulations to save and protect marine life on the verge of 
extinction and come up with the technical measures to bring 
about resource restoration. We must restore endangered marine 
resources back to a level capable of supporting appropriate 
exploitation before the year 2020. 
  4) Technology To Exploit Marine Biological Resource 
  a) Develop aquaculture technology. Includes: new breeds and 
varieties. High-efficiency and low-cost mixed feeds. Prevention 
and treatment of plant diseases. The agriculture- and animal 
husbandry-oriented experiment in Bohai. The comprehensive 
development and utilization of biological energy resources and 
nutrients. Before 2000 aquaculture technology must on the whole 
have advanced enough to meet the technical requirements of 
increase-in-yield targets, even approaching or matching the best 
in the world in the case of some varieties. Before 2020 
biotechnology must be used to improve a host of fine varieties 
of fish, shrimp, shellfish, and aquatic plants. Establish 
automated factory-style aquatic production systems. Fishing in 
Bohai should begin to be operated like agriculture or animal 
husbandry. 
  b) Offshore fishery resources protection technology and 
deep-sea fishery development technology. Includes: variety 
breeding technology and artificial release technology. Study and 
evaluate deep-sea fishery resources and the environment of the 
fishing grounds. Technology for preserving offshore fishery 
resources, increasing their value, and managing them. Check the 
trend of declining offshore fishery resources before 2000, 
gradually restoring the amount of some aquatic resources to back 
to their previous levels. Deep-sea fishing technology must meet 
the requirements of increase-in-yield targets by and large. The 
technology for preserving, increasing the value of, and managing 
offshore fishery resources must reach or approach advanced world 
standards, accompanied by considerable progress in deep-sea 
fishing technology. 
  c) Technology to tap natural medicinal resources in the 
oceans. Conduct research on anti-cancer and anti-cardiovascular 
disease drugs and their extraction technology. Develop 
technology to extract toxin from marine organisms. Develop a 
host of new drugs derived from the ocean before the year 2000. 
Before 2020, develop more efficient drugs based on existing 
technology. 
  5) Marine Mineral Resources Prospecting and Extraction 
Technology 
  a) Develop off-shore petroleum and natural gas prospecting 
and recovery technology. Before 2020, import, absorb, and 
assimilate advanced foreign technology and make innovations on 
it to come up with China's own offshore petroleum and natural 
gas prospecting and recovery technology and equipment. Broaden 
the area of application of domestic equipment. Step up 
theoretical studies on the search for petroleum. Raise oil field 
comprehensive development level. Provide basic data on off-shore 
petroleum and natural gas reserves and preliminary services in 
order to increase oil and natural gas output. Before 2020, 
establish a system of offshore petroleum and gas prospecting and 
recovery technology that is practical and has Chinese 
characteristics. 
  b) Develop coastal placer mining technology. Modernize 
coastal placer mining technology and equipment before the year 
2000 by transforming the collection method and taking the first 
steps toward mechanized production. Further the extent of 
automation. Press on with technological transformation before 
2020 and provide the necessary technology to meet increase in 
output targets. Step up the search for and mining of ore 
urgently needed in China. 
  c) Examine deep-sea mineral resources and develop technology 
for the preliminary phase of prospecting. Before 2000 we should 
survey deep-sea mineral resources in the more important areas of 
the oceans. Improve prospecting technology and equipment. 
Research and develop deep-sea mining equipment. Intensify 
research on environmental disasters in oceanic development zones 
and work extra hard to come up with solutions. Experimental 
mining should be launched before 2020 provided we are fully 
prepared. 
  6) Sea Water Resources Exploitation and Utilization 
Technology 
  a) Technology for the direct utilization of sea water. Study 
technology for the direct cooling of sea water and related 
technology. Popularize sea water cooling technology in power 
plants and chemical industrial enterprises along the coast. 
Diffuse such technology widely along the coast before 2020. 
Develop other technologies for the direct utilization of sea 
water. 
  b) Sea water (salt water) desalination technology and 
applied 
basic research. Focus on the development of reverse osmosis 
desalination technology. Improve the electrodialysis 
desalination technology. Develop distillation desalination as 
appropriate. Research and develop high-performance 
electrodialysis ion exchange membrane and reverse osmosis 
membrane. Develop 10,000-ton reverse osmosis desalination 
equipment and 1,000-ton distillation desalination equipment; we 
should aim to be able to design and manufacture an entire 
100,000-ton electrodialysis water-making plant and 10,000-ton 
distillation desalination equipment before the year 2000. 
Develop high-efficiency and energy-efficient sea water 
desalination technology before 2020, thus lowering the costs of 
water-manufacturing and basically creating a desalination 
industry. 
  c) Sea water chemical resources extraction technology and 
applied basic research. Before 2000: Conduct experiments in the 
comprehensive utilization of sea water technology and common 
element extraction continuing production technology. Launch 
research on trace element extraction. Before 2000 (as 
published): Lower extraction costs, further expand the scale of 
production, and establish demonstration factories for sea water 
common element extraction. 
  7) Oceanographic Engineering and Technology 
  a) Oceanographic engineering. Before 2000: Concentrate on 
the 
development of gulfs and bays and that of coastal and offshore 
engineering technology essential to the recovery of petroleum 
and natural gas in coastal waters; on studies on the oceanic 
environment in the early stages of a project and the 
environmental impact of a project. Before 2020: Initiate 
research on deep-sea engineering and technology and conduct 
exploratory research on such engineering projects as the 
construction of underwater tunnels and ocean-floor dumping 
grounds. 
  b) Research and develop the bathyscaphe. Before 2000: 
Research and develop the 600-meter close-observation and 
professional bathyscaphe. Research 600-meter-deep bathyscaphe 
and related technology and theories. Research underwater 
robotics. Before 2020: Research 600-meter deep observation type 
bathyscaphe and professional-grade bathyscaphe. 
  c) Underwater detection technology. Before 2000: Concentrate 
our resources on developing underwater power positioning 
systems, underwater buoy systems, underwater data base and image 
transmission systems, remote control systems, high-precision 
multi-beam acoustic depth finder, Doppler cross-section current 
measuring systems, and a variety of sample tools in an all-out 
effort to reach or surpass the international standard of the 
1980's, even matching the best the world can offer at the time. 
Before 2020: Strive for breakthroughs in underwater remote 
measurement technology, remote control technology, and acoustic 
bedding analysis technology. 
  d) Develop saturated diving technology. Before 2000: Make 
300-meter saturated diving technology usable. Improve simulated 
testing equipment and create a coherent system including the 
diving vehicle, surface support system, and underwater life 
maintenance system. Develop a multi-function power positioning 
type of saturated aqua-nautical diving vessel. Step up research 
on diving physiology and medicine. 
  e) Develop tools and equipment for working underwater and 
power source technology. Before 2000: Develop sea water 
hydraulic technology. Research and develop sea water hydraulic 
power equipment. Research and develop underwater engineering 
tools for such processes as welding and cutting. Research and 
develop sea-floor pipe-laying technology. Before 2020: Further 
improve and develop underwater engineering tools and power 
sources. 
  8) Basic Research 
  a) Research on marine hydro-physics and sea water dynamics 
measured by every scale. Conduct oceanographic studies on 
China's neighboring seas. Research the impact of the kuroshio on 
China's climatic conditions in coastal waters and near shore. 
Research on ocean-atmosphere interactions, marine disasters, sea 
level changes and comprehensive studies on the North Pole, South 
Pole, and surrounding waters. 
  b) Marine biology research. Research on marine productive 
forces and nutritional physiology in coastal and near-shore 
waters. Research on ways of using the ocean for agriculture or 
animal husbandry. Marine ecosystem research and marine 
biotechnology. 
  c) Marine geology research. Research on the principles of 
evolution governing the geologic structure in coastal near-shore 
waters and petroleum- and natural-gas-bearing basin. Research on 
the theories of sea floor expansion and plate movements. 
Oceanographic engineering geology research. 
  d) Marine chemistry research. Studies on the laws of 
migration and changes of pollutants in the oceanic environment. 
Studies on various surface chemical fluxes. Basic theoretical 
research on the extraction of marine chemical resources. 
  e) Oceanographic engineering research. Research on the 
mechanisms of oceanographic engineering dynamic factors, 
research on interactions between oceanographic engineering and 
the oceanic environment, diving physiology research, satellite 
oceanography, deep-sea oceanography, and military oceanography. 
<H5>  Ecological Environmental Protection and Prevention of </H5>
Natural Disasters 
  Protecting the environment, preserving the ecological 
balance, preventing pollution from endangering human health, and 
reducing natural disasters are vital matters impacting all 
economic and social development. They are basic work essential 
to achieving the mid- and long-term economic and social 
development strategy. The Chinese government attaches a good 
deal of importance to this and considers it a basic national 
policy. Continuing the remarkably effective work that has been 
done is an important guarantee of realizing the strategic 
objectives of China's economic and social development. 
  1. Development Strategy and Goals 
  Ecological Environmental Protection 
  To keep China's ecological environment in harmony with 
sustained economic and social development, we must make a mighty 
effort to develop S&amp;T in the field of ecology and 
environmental 
protection, rally and attract even more S&amp;T workers to 
contribute to the cause of environmental protection, work hard 
to create the conditions, enhance our research capability and 
technical standard, provide even more S&amp;T support for the 
achievement of the short-range goal, which basically involves 
bringing China's environmental pollution under control, 
improving the environmental quality in key cities, and slowing 
the trend toward the degradation of the natural environment 
before the year 2000, and ultimately realize the long-term goal, 
namely, a benign cycle of a clean, attractive, and tranquil 
urban and rural environment. 
  1) Development Strategy 
  a) Rely on policy guidelines and legal management. Work hard 
to develop production technologies and processes that are 
energy- and resource-efficient and that cause little or no 
pollution in order to meet the requirements of the 
transformation of agricultural and industrial technology taking 
place in China right now and to expedite that transformation. As 
far as production technology and processes that confer 
environmental and economic benefits are concerned, we must step 
up their R&amp;D and do everything we could to bring them to 
fruition and popularize them by the year 2000. Select another 
batch of such technologies for further development before the 
year 2020, combining our own research with international 
cooperation, our own manufactured products with imports. 
  b) Actively research technology for turning refuse into 
resources. Maximize China's level of energy and resource 
utilization, ease the burden of resource shortages, and take 
advantage of the conversion of what is bad into what is good, 
waste into treasure. Before 2000: Our research priorities should 
be industrial water reutilization and making resources out of 
waste waster and solid wastes discharged during the industrial 
production process, striving for notable gains by 2000. 
  c) Actively launch research on individual pieces of 
pollution 
control technology that are highly-efficient, low-consumption, 
and widely applicable as well as technology for the prevention 
and treatment of pollution on a regional scale to provide a 
technical support system for the drive to quickly improve 
China's environmental quality. Before 2000: Focus on industries 
that still lack coordinated pollution treatment technology, 
particularly those that cause serious pollution, so as to fill 
the gap in the lineup of technologies. Continue to develop 
high-efficiency, low-consumption technology that can solve a 
large number of widespread pollution problems. When it comes to 
tackling regional pollution, we should emphasize the development 
and judicious utilization of transitional technology that 
integrates natural purification processes. The idea is to get 
the best result for the least cost. As our economic strength 
increases after 2000, we will seek to raise the level of 
man-made treatment gradually. 
  d) Vigorously develop technology to help restore areas that 
have been ecologically damaged as well as technology that would 
bring about a good benign cycle in agriculture. Choose 
representative areas properly. Apply multiple technological 
approaches depending on the natural conditions and ecological 
requirements at any one particular locality, thereby providing 
effective technical support for ecological construction in China. 
  e) Initiate research on the relations between natural 
climatic changes, on the one hand, and the greenhouse effect and 
deforestation, on the other. Study the impact on climate of the 
construction of large dams and the diversion of river water from 
the south to the north. Further study the effects of climatic 
changes on the ecological environment and social development. 
Investigate the consequences of ozone depletion. 
  f) Step up R&amp;D on ecological and environmental 
monitoring 
technology and equipment. Work hard to raise China's monitoring 
standard so that environmental monitoring can play an expanded 
role in reflecting China's environmental quality and supervisory 
and managerial functions. 
  g) Redouble efforts to foster environmental protection 
industries. Work hard to make environmental protection equipment 
more coordinated and more standardized, forming part of a set. 
Improve product quality as well as the quality of technical 
services. Strive to improve technological design and equipment 
manufacturing in environmental protection industries and their 
technological standards. 
  h) Intensify basic environmental research and strengthen its 
ties with related disciplines, gradually perfecting a body of 
Chinese environmental sciences. 
  i) Strengthen soft science research. Raise the standard of 
ecological and environmental management in China. Make 
environmental management policy-making more scientific and 
democratic. Deepen public appreciation of the environment and 
enhance its ability to transform the environment and participate 
in environmental protection. 
  j) Expedite the conversion of S&amp;T achievements into 
production. Raise the conversion rate of the achievements of 
environmental science and technology into productive forces. 
Shorten the conversion cycle. 
  2) Strategic Objectives 
  a) By the year 2000: Agriculture and industry in China must 
go all out to match the production technology of their 
counterparts in developed nations typical of the late 1970's and 
early 1980's by the following yardsticks: yield per unit energy, 
resource consumption per unit output, and the amount of their 
pollutants, which would mean cutting by more than half the real 
consumption of energy and resources as well as the amount of 
pollutants discharged today. 
  b) Comprehensive utilization technology for wastes should 
reach or match world standards, as should pollution treatment 
technology. The amount of solid waste, waste water, and waste 
gases--the ``three wastes''--discharged by large and mid-sized 
enterprises should meet emission standards set by the locality 
in question. 
  c) Establish a specified number of specialized 
national-level 
laboratories that are open to the whole nation and meet the 
standards of comparable laboratories in developed nations in the 
1980's. Also set up a number of representative ecological 
improvement and pollution control laboratories or experimental 
points in a host of localities in accordance with the long-term 
requirements of China's ecological environment. 
  d) Set up a national-level dynamic climate laboratory 
without 
delay to build a climate forecasting model and conduct 
greenhouse effect research. These undertakings should form the 
basis of a weather forecasting system. Establish a climate and 
pollution baseline monitoring network, stations that monitor the 
effects of climate on the ecology, and an ecological monitoring 
network. 
  e) As far as basic research is concerned, we should double 
our ability to track cutting-edge research in the world. We 
should enhance our ability to develop environmental S&amp;T 
substantially on a sustained basis. There should be broad 
improvements in the caliber of S&amp;T personnel, with some of 
them 
achieving world-class standards in research ability. 
  By the year 2020, we must have done everything possible to 
push agricultural and industrial production technology to a new 
level as far as lowering resource and energy consumption and 
cutting the amount of pollutants discharged are concerned. Large 
and mid-sized enterprises shall reach international standards. 
Further improvements shall have been made in the technology for 
turning wastes into resources and disposing of such wastes. We 
should have established several ecological and environmental 
laboratories oriented toward opening to the outside world. We 
should be significantly more adept at absorbing advanced foreign 
S&amp;T. The standard of the construction of the model ecological 
and environmental and pollution control zones will improve 
steadily even as such zones are gradually replicated nationwide. 
By the year 2020 we should basically have paved the way 
scientifically and technologically for the creation of a benign 
cycle in China's ecological environment. 
<H5>  Prevention of Natural Disasters </H5>
  1) Development Strategy 
  a) Push for all-round S&amp;T advances in the three links of 
disaster forecasting, disaster prevention, and disaster relief. 
In accordance with the operational principles of ``prevention 
first'' and ``combining prevention with relief,'' we should 
focus on intensifying research on natural disaster forecasting 
and prevention theories, methods, and technology, particularly 
major and sudden disasters, while we master disaster relief 
technology and policies. 
  b) Strengthen the monitoring system. Monitoring is the 
cornerstone of the scientific study of natural disasters, 
particularly the study of forecasting and forewarning. 
Accordingly, we must set up in prime natural disaster monitoring 
areas a monitoring, information, and feedback system that is 
guided by scientific theories and based on high tech. This is 
the starting point of improving natural disaster forecasting. 
  c) Tackle new methods and new technologies in forecasting 
and 
forewarning as the most urgent topics in disaster prevention 
science. Continuously deepen our research. They are critical to 
advances in the development of disaster prevention science. 
Moreover, apply new technologies and new achievements in related 
fields to disaster prevention science research, refining and 
innovating on them constantly. 
  d) Launch multi-disciplinary comprehensive research. Tackle 
research jointly with cooperation between industries and 
sectors. Expand the scope of research of disaster prevention 
science regularly. Strengthen research on disaster forecasting, 
relief operations, and disaster sociology both vertically and 
horizontally and heighten our ability to prevent and ameliorate 
natural disasters across the board. 
  2) Strategic Goals 
  By the year 2000 we should have basically completed the 
technological transformation and modernization of the major 
natural disaster monitoring, information, and experimentation 
systems and markedly heightened our ability to monitor and 
respond promptly to major natural disasters. We should have 
gained fresh and ground-breaking understanding of their origins 
and their developmental process, improved the theory and method 
of forecasting and forewarning noticeably, and raised the rate 
of accurate forecasting significantly. The idea is to research 
and develop practical disaster prevention and relief technology 
and enhance China's disaster prevention capabilities overall so 
that there will be a significant drop in the magnitude of human 
and economic losses that any major natural disaster can inflict 
upon China. 
  By the year 2020 there should have been substantial 
breakthroughs in monitoring methods and technology, with an 
advanced experimentation system based on high-tech and 
consisting of world-class monitoring, information, and feedback 
systems already in place. We should have set up some objective 
quantified forewarning systems for certain natural disasters, 
which will clearly enhance our forewarning ability. A mighty 
effort will have been made to develop China's capability to 
forecast certain major and sudden natural disasters effectively. 
There should be remarkable or ground-breaking progress in our 
understanding of the causes of certain major natural disasters. 
Advanced disaster prevention and disaster relief technology will 
be diffused and adopted to minimize the human casualties and 
economic losses that China may sustain from a major natural 
disaster. 
  2. Major Tasks and Key Technology 
  Ecological and Environmental Protection 
  1) Intensify Research on Technology To Prevent and Treat 
Environmental Pollution Occurring during Urbanization 
  Step up research on industrial production processes and 
technology that are energy- and resource-efficient and discharge 
few or no pollutants. Drastically reduce the amount of solid 
waste, waste water, and waste gases, otherwise known as the 
``three wastes,'' discharged by large and mid-sized enterprises 
per unit of output. 
  Step up research on technology to turn industrial wastes 
into 
resources and utilize them comprehensively. Work hard to raise 
the recycling rate of industrial wastes and the percentage of 
waste water and garbage that are turned into resources. 
  Intensify research on industrial waste water treatment 
technology, taking extra care to develop technology to treat 
industrial waste water (such as that produced by paper mills, 
textile printing factories, and pharmaceutical enterprises) 
currently being discharged in large quantities in numerous 
places. Since there is presently no mature treatment technology 
for industrial waste water, we must come up with new methods to 
fill this void in the line-up of industrial pollution treatment 
technologies. Develop high-efficiency and energy-efficient waste 
water treatment technology in a way that takes into account 
local conditions. Develop technologies for recovering 
bio-energetic waste water and processing mud. 
  Intensify research on China's urban drainage system 
planning. 
Resolve the problem relating to the use of the sewer system in a 
confluence system. Further improve and popularize the urban 
sewage system. Develop technology that would combine industrial 
waste water with urban domestic sewage for treatment purposes. 
Promote the centralized biological treatment of industrial waste 
water which is pre-treated in the plant, and domestic sewage. In 
water-deficient areas, step up the research of technology that 
would recycle urban waste water for use in industry, 
agriculture, irrigation, and urban landscaping, thereby opening 
up a second water source. Where the necessary conditions are in 
place, we should continue to research bio-stabilizing pond 
treatment and land treatment technology for waste water as well 
as the technology for discharging waste water into seas and 
rivers. Utilize the environment's own self-cleansing ability 
properly. 
  Step up research on technology to treat industrial gases and 
auto exhaust fumes, urban centralized heating technology, molded 
coal technology and technology to render industrial wastes 
harmless. Launch research on technology for the comprehensive 
utilization of urban garbage and technology for rendering it 
harmless. Develop and disseminate technology to prevent urban 
noise pollution. 
  2) Step Up Research on Rural Environmental Pollution 
Prevention and Treatment Technology and Technology on 
Agricultural Ecological Improvement 
  Initiate research on technology to prevent and treat 
environmental pollution caused by township enterprises. In light 
of their economic conditions, develop a host of simple, easily 
applicable technologies for those industrial enterprises (such 
as small paper mills and small chemical industrial enterprises) 
that exist in large numbers and are geographically widespread 
and that cause serious pollution to solve the current rapid 
degradation of the rural environment. 
  Step up R&amp;D of pesticides that are low in toxicity, 
highly 
effective, and harmless as well as research on biological 
control technology to solve one of the problems facing the 
countryside today--the pollution of the agricultural ecological 
environment caused by the widespread use of chemical pesticides. 
To prevent chemical pesticide pollution, our urgent priority now 
is to set standards for pesticide use and strictly limit the 
usage per unit area. Establish a system for the safe use of 
chemical pesticides to ensure the safety of both humans and 
animals. 
  Launch research on waste water irrigation technology. 
Develop 
scientific methods, quantitative limits, and standards for waste 
water irrigation. Strictly control water quality. Step up the 
tracking and monitoring of waste water irrigation. Prevent 
farmland pollution. 
  Launch research on the technology for the treatment and 
comprehensive utilization of waste water and waste residues 
discharged by large-scale aquatic farms under intensive 
management. 
  Develop a range of technologies to facilitate diversified 
operations in agriculture, forestry, animal husbandry, sideline 
production, and fishery that would fully utilize bio-energy, 
solar energy, and wind energy, and popularize them. Explore new 
ways to modernize agriculture. 
  Conduct research diligently on ways to irrigate different 
varieties of crops properly and scientifically. Develop 
water-saving agriculture and new agricultural irrigation 
technologies, constantly boosting the irrigation water 
coefficient. 
  3) Step Up Research on Ecological and Environmental 
Improvement Technology for Different Types of Ecological Zones 
and Nature Preserves 
  Launch research on ecological improvement technology in arid 
and semi-arid areas in order to curb the spreading 
desertification in the ``three north'' region and provide a 
support system for the drive to restore life to some desertified 
areas. 
  Conduct research on rebuilding the ecosystem in areas 
severely affected by soil erosion so as to reduce the land lost 
to soil erosion progressively year after year. 
  Conduct research on technology to protect, improve, and 
restore key economic zones and water conservation zones. 
  Conduct research on the technology for scientifically 
delimiting, effectively protecting, and soundly utilizing nature 
preserves as well as research on the artificial reproduction and 
breeding of rare endangered species, along with gene 
preservation technology. 
  Consider setting up an ecological and environmental 
indicator 
system. Research ecological monitoring, surveillance, and 
management. Complete the transition of ecological management 
from qualitative management to quantitative management over time. 
  4) Launch Research on the Impact of Environment Pollution on 
Human Health 
  In conjunction with life sciences, we should study the 
effects of trace biological elements in the environment on human 
health. 
  Examine the relationship between air pollution, particularly 
indoor air pollution, and diseases of the respiratory system, 
between drinking water contaminated by toxic chemical pollutants 
and biological pollutants and cancer of the digestive tract and 
cardiovascular diseases. 
  Launch studies to monitor the concentration levels of 
environmental pollutants inside the human body, paying close 
attention to the accumulation levels of harmful elements and 
organic pollutants inside the human body. Research the total 
amount of pollutants absorbed. Establish a human body material 
specimen pool. 
  Launch research on the forecasting and forewarning of 
diseases caused by environmental pollution. Monitor the outbreak 
of such diseases closely. Pay attention to the sudden outbreak 
and spreading of diseases caused by biological environmental 
pollution. Speed up research on measures to prevent poisoning 
incidents caused by environmental pollutants and procedures to 
rescue the victims of such emergencies. 
  Intensify research on the ecological effects and potential 
hazards of synthetic chemicals. 
  Develop a human health environmental sensitivity indicator 
to 
gauge the effects of environmental pollutants on human health at 
various levels, including biological monitoring, immunology, and 
genetics, at an early stage. 
  Step up research on environmental monitoring systems and 
quality assurance. Work hard to raise the level of environmental 
monitoring. 
  5) Increase Research on Soft Sciences Such as Ecological 
Planning and Environmental Standards. Work Hard To Raise the 
Standard of Ecological and Environmental Policy-Making and 
Management 
  Map out an ecological strategic plan for sustained economic 
and social development in China. Clearly lay out the path that 
would take us from the current gross imbalance between 
environment and economic development to balanced development. 
Decide upon a sound industrial structure and scale of operation 
as well as sensible methods of resource utilization, depending 
on a particular region's ecological environment and resource 
availability. 
  Examine ways of incorporating the environment and resources 
into the national economic statistical indicator system so that 
environmental and resource factors would be fully taken into 
consideration when major economic decisions or economic 
adjustments are being made. 
  Fully utilize modern S&amp;T to do an inventory of the 
nation's 
land resources, water resources, forest resources, and energy 
resources to obtain a clear idea of the current status of 
China's natural resources and how they are being utilized. 
Create a resource data base. Examine the macro regulatory and 
control mechanism of the aggregate demand placed by social and 
economic development on the aggregate supply of land, water, 
forestry, energy resources so as to develop an optimal model to 
provide a scientific basis for the proper utilization of natural 
resources. 
  Launch research on comprehensive land use planning. 
Establish 
a comprehensive land use planning system at each level. Set 
standards limiting the amount of land that can be devoted to 
non-agricultural uses. Effectively prevent non-agricultural 
projects from taking up land, especially farmland. 
  Step up research on the comprehensive treatment, planning, 
and management of drainage area (region) environments. Draw up a 
management plan for the rational development, comprehensive 
utilization, and fair distribution of water resources in 
drainage areas (regions). Work on drainage area (regional) water 
quality management planning, draw up district boundaries based 
on functions, and consider the factors of water quantity and 
water quality in their overall context. Develop a management 
plan for the comprehensive prevention and treatment of drainage 
area (regional) water pollution. In light of the functions of 
the body of water and the grade of its water quality, we should 
decide on a permissible load of pollutants, set overall emission 
standards for each major pollutant, and draw up a general 
pollution reduction plan. 
  Intensify research on developing a management model for 
major 
cities and large-scale groundwater sources. Develop the water 
resources properly while protecting water quality. Prevent the 
exhaustion of water resources, water pollution, water quality 
degradation, and other geological environmental problems caused 
by the improper exploitation of groundwater (such as subsidence, 
infiltration of sea water, and karst collapse). Step up research 
on the joint regulation of groundwater and surface water. 
  Launch research on function-based oceanic zoning. Customize 
management in light of the functions of a zone. Perfect oceanic 
environmental quality standards. Investigate the self-cleansing 
ability and environmental capacity of coastal waters. Research 
technology to control oceanic pollution and biological resource 
degradation. 
  Broaden research on the use of remote-sensing technology in 
environmental planning and resource surveying. Raise its 
application level. 
  Examine the natural resource utilization system and the 
prices of resources, with emphasis on the prices of water, land, 
and energy resources, and the issue of adjusting the prices of 
resources. Mobilize the enthusiasm of enterprises for energy and 
resource conservation and for reducing the amount of the three 
wastes discharged. 
  Launch research on environmental pollution control planning 
for cities, key economic zones, mining development areas, areas 
with developed township and town enterprises, and important 
river basins so as to bring a greater measure of rationality to 
the mix of industry, to the distribution of industry, and to 
ecological and environmental improvement. 
  Continue research on improving environmental quality 
standards and pollutant emission standards. Create a system of 
environmental standards based on restrictions on the total 
volume. Continue research on standards for resource consumption 
and emissions per unit of output. Tighten the management of 
resource consumption and emissions in industrial production. 
  Work out incentives and penalties as well as management 
regulations for the comprehensive treatment of the ``three 
wastes'' discharged by the industries. Formulate management 
regulations to protect land resources and vegetation in the 
extraction of mineral resources and the comprehensive 
utilization of wastes and discarded materials. 
  Launch research on the control of toxic wastes and toxic 
chemicals. The aim is to set up a registration and licensing 
system for toxic hazardous industrial wastes and toxic chemicals 
in the course of time that will regulate the entire process 
effectively from production and utilization to cleaning, 
transportation, and disposal. 
<H5>  Preventing Natural Disasters </H5>
  1. Step Up Research on Natural Disaster Monitoring 
Technology, Particularly Technology That Has Many Applications 
and Is Multi-Functional 
  Establish or improve an appropriate monitoring system to 
generate accurate and timely information about the origins and 
occurrence of a natural disaster. Improve the seismographic 
observation and experimentation system. We should research new 
observation and experimentation methods; research and develop 
new apparatus and equipment that would monitor the seismically 
active environment and collect seismic information more 
effectively; improve the monitoring system in leading seismic 
monitoring areas; apply high-tech and new technology to 
gradually achieve high-precision, high-density, digital and 
three-dimensional real time monitoring, and build a 
comprehensive laboratory to demonstrate simulated complex 
seismically active structure, dynamic conditions, and pre-quake 
signs. 
  Optimize the monitoring system for disaster-causing weather, 
climate, and flood. Research and develop a new generation of 
ground and air monitoring equipment, paying special attention to 
meteorological satellite remote-sensing and ground detection 
technology. The Doppler radar system, surface remote-sensing 
sounding system, surface laser radar, wind sound testing radar 
system, and other remote-sensing technologies should teach 
advanced world levels as of the 1980's. Accelerate the 
construction of a comprehensive remote-sensing detection system 
that is internationally advanced and a nation-wide network 
comprising numerous automated meteorological stations. Also 
create a network of rainstorm and flooding monitoring station 
network for key areas and a system for using planes to detect 
disastrous weather. 
  Develop oceanic remote sensing technology. Research and 
develop an oceanic satellite remote sensing technological 
system. Increase the number of remote-sensing planes for 
detailed observation in coastal waters and land-based remote 
sensing observation points. Gradually expand submerged buoy 
measuring technology and underwater acoustic detection equipment 
to achieve continuous underwater observation. Improve unmanned 
automated observation by monitoring stations along the coast and 
on islands and by auxiliary ships. Establish a three-dimensional 
oceanic disaster surveillance system based primarily on oceanic, 
space, and air remote-sensing, as well as underwater acoustic 
detection. 
  Armed with a preliminary understanding of the 
classification, 
causes, laws of distribution, and development trends of 
geological disasters, we should then begin active monitoring of 
the formation and development of sudden surface changes and 
other geologic disasters such as landslides, land-slips, and 
mud-rock flow affecting the mainstream of Chang Jiang, key 
arteries of transportation, major cities, major engineering 
projects, and economic development areas. 
  Step up the construction of a nationwide monitoring network 
against sudden major outbreaks of plant diseases and insect 
pests affecting crops and a grass-roots vegetation service 
system. Standardize the dynamic reporting and investigation of 
major outbreaks of plant diseases and insect pests nationwide. 
Launch research on the applied technology of using radar to 
detect and monitor major sudden pest disaster outbreaks. Raise 
the standard of monitoring. 
  Use meteorological satellite information to monitor forest 
fires and major plant diseases and insect pests in forests over 
a wide area. In the short haul, the pine moth, small pine moth, 
and other insect pests that affect a broad area and cause 
obvious damages as well as forest fires should be our primary 
monitoring targets. 
  2. Step Up Research on Natural Disaster Information 
Processing Technology and Create the Rudiments of a Natural 
Disaster Information System for the Nation. 
  Using the satellite, microwave, ultra-short wave, a national 
communications network, and other channels as well as advanced 
computer technology, we shall set up a national meteorological 
data base communications and processing network system and a 
two-level--national and provincial--seismic information network 
that combines fixed sites with mobility, thus achieving the 
speedy collection and processing of meteorological, oceanic, and 
seismic data and facilitating a prompt feedback. 
  Develop oceanic data and information technology. Establish 
an 
automated data processing, storage, and management system, a 
modern and user-oriented system for the automatic processing, 
storage, and management of data and information. Step up 
research on flood control monitoring technology and technology 
to ensure the speedy handling of forewarning information. 
Improve the system for processing flood control warnings. 
Intensify research on technology to transmit and process 
information pertaining to plant diseases affecting crops and 
forests, rodent infestation, forest fires, and natural 
geological agricultural disasters. Create a corresponding system 
for the speedy transmission and real-time processing of 
information, along with a mechanism for feedback. 
  Step up research on a range of technologies to assess the 
damage caused by natural disasters and to retrieve and process 
information, tentatively putting together a natural disaster 
damage assessment system and information transmission and 
processing system in China. 
  3. Step Up Research on the Principles Governing the 
Occurrence of Various Major Natural Disasters and Theories and 
Methods of Forecasting 
  Develop or propose an even more practical and effective 
system for forecasting a major natural disaster. Intensify 
research on the method of numerical disaster-causing weather and 
climate forecasting. Establish a medium-term numerical 
forecasting system that is internationally advanced, focusing on 
the forecasting of disastrous weather and climatic conditions 
that have a serious impact on national economic development and 
social development, such as prolonged rainstorms and high 
temperatures, persistent cool temperatures and rain in the south 
in the spring, hot dry wind, and cold dew wind. Step up research 
on long- and medium-range forecasting methods. Establish a 
forecasting and forewarning system that matches the most 
advanced in the world. Intensify research on the environmental 
conditions for rainstorm and flood and create a pool of experts 
in flood control. 
  As of to date earthquake prediction remains a scientific 
problem for which no nation has found a solution. We must probe 
new theories and new methods to predict and forecast an 
earthquake. By examining ever more closely certain major 
seismically active areas, through laboratory simulation, by 
adopting the latest research achievements of related disciplines 
from overseas, and through laboratory simulation, we should 
study in depth the structural environment and dynamic conditions 
for the occurrence of earthquake, the relations between 
non-elastic deformities in the medium of the epicentral area and 
structural movements of the surrounding areas, the 
characteristics of the various stages of the quake-formation 
process and warning signs, a physics model for quake formation, 
and the mechanism of its warning signs. Build a mathematical 
physics model for forecasting and develop a deterministic 
forecasting method. 
  Perfect a forecasting and forewarning system for oceanic 
disasters. Develop and perfect short-, medium-, and long-range 
forecasting models based primarily on numerical diagnostic 
analysis and numerical forecasting and combining a variety of 
forecasting methods. Develop a host of disaster forewarning 
products. Equip China with the ability to provide services at 
sea in the western Pacific and in any ocean all over the world. 
  Step up research on dynamic simulation technology on plant 
diseases affecting crops and trees and on rodent infestation. 
Intensify research on a numerical predicting method. Make better 
use of systematic analytic predictions and the pool of experts. 
Intensify research on the conditions of formation and 
forecasting methods for geological disasters like landslides, 
mud-slides, mud-rock flow, and other sudden natural disasters. 
  Study in depth the laws of distribution, both spatial and 
temporal, of a whole range of natural disasters. Using the 
insight derived therefrom we can then conduct in-depth 
comprehensive analysis and comparisons, studying the 
interactions between the various kinds of natural disasters, 
particularly the demonstrated regional and clustering 
characteristics, and exploring the causes of all natural 
disasters and possible common regulatory and control mechanism 
and factors. 
  4. Strengthen Research on Methods and Technology of Disaster 
Forecasting, Disaster Prevention, and Disaster Relief, and 
Enhance Our All-Round Ability to Withstand Natural Disasters 
  Conduct comprehensive research on the methods and technology 
for predicting and assessing the losses caused by a natural 
disaster as well as disaster prevention and disaster relief 
measures. Formulate a comprehensive plan for each type of 
location, depending on the situation it is in and its 
conditions. Focus on the technology and methods for predicting 
the losses caused by a major sudden disaster and secondary 
disasters in the area as well as methods and technology for 
disaster prevention and relief. 
  Research earthquake prediction and the theory, methods, and 
technology of earthquake prevention, earthquake-proofing, and 
disaster relief. This will include: special characteristics of 
surface movements in nearby areas, reactions of buildings to the 
tremor of the foundation, the division of seismically active 
areas into small zones and forecasting the damages caused by 
earthquake, regional and township risk analysis, standards and 
new technology for quake-proofing buildings, building damage 
detection technology, and life-saving technology suited to 
China's conditions. Research major technical problems relating 
to combating massive flooding: engineering and non-engineering 
measures in flood control; changes in the waters, silt, and 
courses of major rivers and lakes; new technological measures to 
reinforce such works as dams, embankments, and floodgates; 
engineering and technical measures to prevent and control flood 
damage in hilly and mountainous areas and for flood management 
in cities; and technical measures to control storm surges in 
coastal cities. Of particular importance are effective methods 
and technology to prevent massive flooding in key rivers. 
Develop technology and equipment for disaster prevention at sea 
and along the coast. Create a disaster prevention technical 
system. 
  Step up research on artificial weather control. Establish a 
number of man-made experimental zones and demonstrational zones 
where efforts will be made to prevent hail and increase 
rainfall. Step up basic research on rain-making and 
hail-prevention. Perfect practical application and scientific 
targets. Establish an effective scientific artificial weather 
control system and search for other new scientific ways to 
influence climatic conditions such as typhoons. 
  Master technology for the comprehensive prevention and 
treatment of plant diseases, weeds, and rodent infestation. 
Master biological control methods. Do a good job in the research 
and demonstration of high-efficiency, low-toxicity, and 
low-residue pesticides. Step up research on the prevention of 
plant diseases and rodent infestation that occur suddenly. 
  Assess the safety of engineering projects (including the 
lifeline system and other important projects) in view of the 
amount of damages inflicted by natural disasters on a particular 
region in the past or the projected damages in long- and 
medium-term forecasts and bearing in mind China's social and 
economic conditions. Conduct an economic assessment of 
geological disasters and put forward measures to mitigate, 
prevent, and control geological disasters. 
<H5>  Production Safety </H5>
  Production safety is an essential part of the protection of 
worker safety and the development of productive forces. It is a 
basic precondition for ensuring sustained, steady, and 
successful economic construction and social stability and unity, 
an important hallmark of social civilization. 
  Production safety includes, among other things, the personal 
safety of workers during the production process or work process 
in enterprises and other institutions, equipment and product 
safety, and transportation safety. It covers a variety of areas, 
including economics, politics, society, environmental 
management, S&amp;T, and publishing and education. We must put 
forward a S&amp;T safety policy suited to China's conditions in 
accordance with its social and economic development situation in 
the medium and long run even as we step up safe management and 
develop modern safe S&amp;T. This is the only way to solve major 
S&amp;T 
problems in production safety and bring about safe and civilized 
production. 
  1. Development Strategy and Objectives 
  1) Development Strategy The development strategy in 
production safety is to enforce the principle of ``safety first, 
prevention first'' across the board; insist that safe production 
be planned, developed, and implemented in tandem with economic 
construction, the deepening of reform in enterprises, and 
technological transformation; adhere to the principle of 
marrying the development of production with the protection of 
productive forces; and abide by the principle of combining the 
full utilization of existing practical and safe S&amp;T with the 
development of modern and safe S&amp;T. Guided by policies, 
technological progress, and scientific management, we should 
shift the focus of safe productive work to the notion of 
prevention first by systematizing safety rules, regulations, and 
standards, making safety management scientific, regularizing 
education, and making equipment safe. 
  -- When it comes to the technological transformation of 
traditional industry, proceed from reality and make full use of 
domestic and foreign advanced S&amp;T to carry out safe 
technological transformation. 
  -- Even as we develop modern industry, we should develop 
essentially safe products in light of the reality in production, 
adopt automatic control technology and computer technology, and 
put together a robot with artificial intelligence, thereby 
improving working conditions and ensuring safe production 
fundamentally. 
  -- Make energy and transportation safety the focus of the 
development of safe S&amp;T. Launch research on the technology of 
preventing, forecasting, and controlling major serious accidents. 
  -- Step up applied basic research on safety to lay the 
theoretical foundation for the development of the S&amp;T of safe 
production. 
  -- Step up research on safety engineering and public health 
engineering to resolve effectively and quickly the new problems 
relating to technological safety that keep popping up in the 
course of economic construction and enterprise production. 
  -- Intensify research on safety management science. Develop 
safety assessment, reliability analysis, and safety testing and 
inspection technology. Raise the S&amp;T standard of the 
supervision 
of production safety. Establish a safe production assurance 
system. 
  -- Strengthen international cooperation. Adopt, emulate, and 
assimilate foreign advanced safety technology to enhance 
significantly China's capacity to develop safety and sanitation 
technology. 
  2) Strategic Goals 
  The strategic goals of production safety are: fully rely on 
technological progress to vigorously transform the working 
conditions in traditional industries, establish a scientific 
management system, and perfect safety technology and equipment 
as well as means of monitoring so that there will be a sharp 
drop in accidents causing deaths and injuries by the end of this 
century, thus basically checking the trend toward increasing 
major serious accidents and rising incidence of pneumoconiosis, 
and striking improvements on the production safety front, 
essentially ending the state of backwardness characteristic of 
safety and public health in production, transportation, and 
communications. When that comes to pass, we shall have put in 
place a safe production environment commensurate with both 
national economic development and the fairly comfortable 
standard of living achieved by the people then. 
  By the year 2000 the standard of production safety S&amp;T 
will 
match that of advanced nations as of the late 1970's and early 
1980's. 
  -- In production safety, large and medium-sized enterprises 
shall be the equal of advanced nations in the 1980's, with the 
death rate per thousand workers dropping 50 percent and the rate 
of serious injury per thousand workers also falling 50 percent. 
The number of enterprise workers killed on the job should fall 
below 0.05 per thousand, while the number of workers seriously 
injured on the job should be less than 0.15 per thousand. 
  -- Systematically improve the working environment in 
accordance with a plan. Raise the standard of technology to 
prevent dust poisoning. Gradually increase dust poisoning pass 
rate for work sites so that the incidence of pneumoconiosis 
among factory workers will have dropped 60 percent in the 20 
years between 1980 and 2000. 
  -- Production safety targets in the key economic sectors 
will 
go up markedly. The fatality rate for 1 million tons of unified 
distribution standard coal will drop 60 percent, or under 1 
fatality per thousand workers. In key iron and steel mills, the 
death rate for 1 million tons of steel should drop 60 percent, 
or under one fatality per thousand workers. The incidence of 
explosion per 10,000 boilers should drop 75 percent, or under 
0.3 explosion per 10,000 boilers annually. In construction 
projects, the death rate will be held below 0.12 workers per 
thousand workers. 
  -- Popularize among township and town enterprises existing 
managerial technology and safety measures suited to safe 
production in those enterprises. Incorporate those technologies 
and measures into the ``Spark Plan'' and implement them at the 
same pace as the plan. 
  -- Suiting measures to local conditions, speed up the 
diffusion and application of safety S&amp;T, gradually forming a 
group of enterprises providing key safety and protective 
products and expediting the commercialization of production 
safety technologies and products. 
  -- Intensify research on production safety science so that 
the field will essentially equal the best in the developed 
nations as of the 1980's. Perfect our scientific research system 
and safety monitoring and inspection system. Never stop 
improving the caliber of the S&amp;T corps. 
  By the year 2020 we shall have achieved a major breakthrough 
in the standard of our production safety S&amp;T. We shall have 
gone 
all out to create safe, sanitary, and good working conditions 
for Chinese workers in the first half of the next century, 
steering the development of safety S&amp;T in the direction of 
ensuring a high degree of physical and mental health for workers 
even as it lays a solid S&amp;T basis for the ``inherent 
safety'' of 
production equipment, technology, and products. 
  2. Major Tasks and Key Technology 
  To accomplish the above objectives, we have decided upon the 
following as the major tasks in the development of the S&amp;T of 
production safety: 
  1) Research and Application of Safety Technology 
  Concentrate on the research of technology to prevent and 
control major serious accidents and recurrent accidents: 
  Research the prevention and control of gas and dust 
explosions in mines and coal and gas outbreaks. Research the 
forecasting and control of mine cave-ins and landslides. 
  Develop technology to prevent major fires and explosions, 
including the likelihood of dust explosions in industry, 
technology to prevent dust explosions in factories and at 
harbors, the prevention of boiler explosions, and the 
forecasting of such accidents, technology to prevent fires and 
explosions caused by hazardous substances in the manufacturing 
process, in transit, and in storage, and technology to prevent 
and forecast the variety of explosions and accidents caused by 
static electricity. 
  Research technology to prevent highway, railroad, and 
maritime accidents. 
  Research technology to prevent serious accidents caused by 
the extensive leaking of highly toxic radioactive materials in 
the production, transportation, and storage processes. 
  Research technology to prevent the damage and collapse of 
buildings and other structures and construction accidents, 
including the testing and control of dilapidated industrial 
buildings, and safety monitoring of reservoirs, dams, and 
embankments, and technology to prevent falls and collapses that 
occur in the construction process. 
  Research ways to enhance disaster-prevention capacity. 
Research rescue technology to prevent accidents from getting 
worse, technology to achieve swift accident investigation, and 
emergency rescue technology. 
  Research technology to prevent recurrent injury-causing 
mechanical accidents, including technology to prevent injuries 
caused by all kinds of metallic blank rollings, and technology 
to prevent injuries caused by punching and metal-cutting machine 
tools, lifting and transportation equipment, woodworking 
machinery, and other equipment. 
  Research the built-in safety technology of mechanical and 
electronic equipment, the safety technology for the R&amp;D, 
production, and use of new composite materials, as well as 
electrical safety and technology for safe electricity generation 
and supply. 
  Research and develop a variety of sensitive safety testing 
instruments and multi-function, remote-control, 
remote-measuring, automatic alarm systems and automatic testing 
systems. 
  2) Research and Application of Sanitation Engineering 
  Concentrate on the research of technology to prevent 
occupational diseases like pneumoconiosis which seriously 
jeopardize workers' health. 
  Research dust control technology, including dust-preventing 
ventilation and purification technology for use in mining and 
tunnel excavation, new highly effective dust-removal technology 
and equipment, dust-source removal technology, dust-removal 
technology for ship compartments, and harbors and dust-removal 
technology for high altitudes with cool temperatures and arid 
areas. 
  Research technology to control toxic substances and 
carcinogens, particularly technology for the purification, 
absorption, centralized recovery and treatment of toxic 
substances, technology using non-toxic or low-toxicity 
substitutes, and all sorts of protective sealing technology. 
  Research technology to control physically hazardous 
substances, including the danger posed to the human body by high 
temperatures, noise, vibration, electro-magnetic radiation, and 
electromagnetic rays, and technology to protect against such 
hazards. 
  3) Research and Application of Safety Management 
  Investigate the causes of accidents that occur in the 
production processes in factories and mines and in transit and 
consider corresponding preventive measures. Research management 
technology centered upon equipment safety and operational 
safety. Research the technology of plant and mine management 
safety whose aim is to create a system of safety and assurance. 
Research the scientific management of production safety in 
township and town enterprises. 
  Launch research on systems safety engineering, modern safety 
management, safety economics, safety psychology, and safety 
human engineering, among other things. Research systems safety 
analysis, safety assessment, accident information management 
system, risk analysis technology, accident comprehensive 
analysis technology, and its forecasting technology. 
  Examine the scientific basis for production safety 
legislation, monitoring system, safety management system, paid 
leave system, and accidental compensation system. Establish and 
perfect an accident and production safety S&amp;T information 
system, and create a data base for accidents causing deaths and 
injuries as well as a predicting system. Establish ties with all 
labor departments and all industrial sectors across the nation 
and become part of the international occupational and health 
information network under the International Labor Organization. 
  4) High-Tech Applications and the Research and Application 
of 
Safety Technology in Special Environments 
  Study the technology to protect against hazards brought 
about 
by high tech. Research the application and development of the 
computer in the realm of production safety. 
  Research and develop technologies for condition monitoring, 
fault diagnosis, and accident recall for use during the 
operation of a piece of equipment. 
  Develop an economic robot which can operate normally in a 
toxic, hazardous, inflammable or explosion-prone environment and 
a robot with artificial intelligence which can withstand danger 
in an emergency situation. 
  Research the use of laser, microwave, infrared technology, 
and other safety technologies to measure distance, guide 
navigation, and prevent collision. 
  Research safe production and management technology with 
regard to nuclear power stations, nuclear fuels, and radioactive 
isotope, including nuclear safety simulation, inherent safety, 
radiation protection, the prevention of accidents like nuclear 
meltdown, and the disposal of nuclear wastes. 
<H5>  Social Public Security </H5>
  Social public security is a basic guarantee of economic 
development and social development in China. 
  A comprehensive approach is essential to safeguarding social 
public security. Increasingly social public security is 
dependent on S&amp;T development. The S&amp;T of social public 
security 
is an effective weapon in preventing, controlling, and managing 
a variety of criminal activities and other incidents disruptive 
to social order, in preserving social order, in ensuring that 
members of society can live and work in a normal orderly 
fashion, and in protecting the lives and properties of the 
people and the nation. 
  The S&amp;T of social public security embraces multiple 
disciplines and is a comprehensive applied S&amp;T. It includes 
preventive security, computer security, surveillance, road and 
traffic management, material evidence identification, fire 
prevention, social public security information management, 
police communications and command, and police-use weapons and 
protective gear. The S&amp;T of social public security not only 
serves the cause of social public security, but it also 
contributes to national economic and social development. 
  We must utilize modern S&amp;T to solve the problems in the 
S&amp;T 
of social public security, step up applied basic research and 
basic technical development so as to end the backwardness 
characteristic of the S&amp;T of social public security and its 
equipment gradually, and meet the needs of preventing, 
controlling, and managing promptly and accurately all sorts of 
criminal activities in violation of the law and other incidents 
harmful to social law and order, as well as the needs of legal 
development. 
  1. Development Strategy and Goals 
  1) Development Strategy 
  The development strategy of the S&amp;T of social public 
security 
is to enforce the principle of ``prevention first, combine 
prevention with treatment;'' steadfastly stay the course of 
serving social public security; end the traditional ``small but 
complete'' practice and the old way of doing things in 
isolation; rely on the state, orient oneself to society, and 
join forces with other pertinent agencies to expand and 
reinforce the forces of the S&amp;T of social public security; 
strengthen specialized S&amp;T organizations to handle highly 
specialized technology, and establish a corps of S&amp;T workers 
who 
are of a high caliber and represent a full lineup of skills, 
making it an organic part of the national S&amp;T contingent and 
enabling the S&amp;T of social public security to develop 
effectively and swiftly; and gradually standardize social public 
security facilities, modernize technology and equipment, 
regularize technical laws and standards, and professionalize 
education and training. 
  The detailed guiding thought is as follows: 
  -- Proceeding from reality, we shall firmly abide by the 
principle of combining the full utilization of the existing 
achievements of the S&amp;T of social public security with 
developing modern S&amp;T, of combining popularization with 
improvement. 
  Apply to social public security all advanced S&amp;T 
achievements 
in China either directly or with modifications in order to 
produce better and faster results. 
  -- Keep track of advances in the new technology of social 
public security in the world. Adopt them and assimilate them. 
Strengthen international technical exchange and cooperation and 
research major topics jointly to expedite the development of the 
S&amp;T of social public security in China. 
  -- Intensify the notion of social public security as a piece 
of systems engineering. Plan and develop the S&amp;T of social 
public security comprehensively. Create security assurance 
technological systems of different kinds and covering different 
areas. 
  -- Step up research on applied basic theory to provide a 
theoretical base for the S&amp;T of social public security. 
  -- Intensify research on the applied technology of social 
public security and effectively and promptly solve the endless 
technical problems relating to security assurance that pop up in 
the course of social development. 
  -- Intensify research on the management science of social 
public security. Conduct safety assessment and reliability 
analyses of social public security standards, and engineering 
and technical systems. Perfect security testing and monitoring 
technology. Raise the S&amp;T standards of social security 
inspection and supervision. 
  -- Launch research on the soft science of social public 
security. 
  2) Strategic Goal in light of the evolving trends and 
characteristics of each kind of social law and order problem, 
criminal activity, and incident injurious to social order, we 
must proceed from reality, make full use of high-tech like 
microelectronics technology, computer technology, weak signal 
processing, ultra micro-analysis, biotechnology, and systems 
engineering. Create and improve the technical methods and 
equipment of social public security as well as a scientific 
management system, putting an end to the backwardness in the 
S&amp;T 
of social public security. At present China trails developed 
nations by 10 to 25 years in terms of the S&amp;T of social 
public 
security. By the year 2000, we shall have gradually closed the 
gap and steadily broadened the role of S&amp;T in the 
preservation 
of social public security. 
  -- Modern security systems shall be widely installed in key 
protection areas in large and mid-sized cities and some 
residents shall be practicing new security preventive measures 
so that they can call police expeditiously in a special 
emergency situation. As a result, there will be a heightened 
security and sense of security. In urban areas, the police shall 
be able to respond to a call and arrive at the scene within 10 
to 15 minutes, down from the present average of 30 minutes. 
  -- Improve the undercover investigation technological 
system. 
Establish and perfect a national three-level technical network 
for material evidence identification. Standardize material 
evidence identification technology. Make full use of technology 
in every stage of the investigation and solution of a case. 
  -- Make full use of high-tech. Overcome the technical 
problems in weak signal (voice, image) processing. Develop 
ultra-micro analysis and new DNA technology to significantly 
improve our ability to solve major difficult cases. 
  -- Promptly initiate research on technology to prevent and 
solve computer crime. Track the development of new technology 
overseas to provide effective measures in our effort to prevent 
computer crime. Research and develop computer security standards 
and security assessment and testing tools to provide a 
scientific basis for policy making by the government. 
  -- Establish a social public security integrated information 
system that is multi-level, multi-function, multi-purpose, that 
can respond quickly and that is sophisticated and essentially 
computer-based and information-oriented to improve information 
management and raise the level of operations and command in 
social public security. 
  -- Reverse the trend toward more serious traffic accidents. 
Traffic fatalities will decrease 8 to 10 percent per thousand 
vehicles every 5 years. Major intersections in cities with a 
population over 1 million should mostly be regulated by traffic 
lights. 
  -- Establish the framework of fire-fighting S&amp;T 
developing in 
tandem with national economic development. We should be better 
able to control the frequency with which major fires occur and 
markedly enhance the fire-fighting capacity of towns and large 
industrial areas. The number of fires annually should be limited 
to less than 5,000 per 100 million people, at the same time 
holding the line at direct economic losses below 0.025 percent 
of GNP. 
  By 2020, there will have been a new quantum leap in the 
S&amp;T 
of social public security, making it more intelligent and 
information-oriented. We will have initiated research on public 
social security science in the urban environment and developed a 
soft science in social public security combining the natural 
sciences with social sciences and forming an advanced integrated 
S&amp;T system in social public security commensurate with the 
personal and property security of the people, with civil rights, 
with economic development, and with social progress. 
  2. Major Tasks and Key Technologies 
  Concentrate on the development of technology to collect, 
transmit, and process special information closely related to the 
maintenance of modern social public security as well as 
technical tools of controlling and managing factors that 
endanger social public security. Accordingly the major tasks are: 
  1) Security and Preventive Technology 
  In preventive security, we must make full use of the 
achievements of modern S&amp;T in signal processing and computer 
science and overcome the difficulties presented by the 
suddenness of criminal behavior in terms of time, its 
uncertainty in terms of space, and the confrontational nature of 
its tactics. 
  -- Develop the technology of modern integrated protection 
systems engineering with major security protection areas such as 
key departments and important sites as our principal service 
targets. 
  -- Develop an integrated anti-burglary, anti-intrusion 
detection technology that is all-weather and highly reliable, 
has a low false alarm rate, and is low-consumption. Such 
technology should also come with a police-reporting network 
which could form the basis of an intelligent police reporting 
technology. 
  -- Research and apply new technology using fingerprints, 
acoustics, and eye prints as means of identification, forming a 
new entry control system. 
  -- Research anti-smuggling and anti-hijacking technology. 
  -- Research and apply detection technology against hidden 
instruments of crime (explosives of all sorts, weapons, etc.) 
and corresponding families of equipment to meet the needs of 
different occasions. 
  -- Develop processing technology for use at the scene of an 
explosion and an intelligent robot for detonating explosives. 
  -- Develop protective security technology and equipment and 
its corresponding standards and testing technology. Set up 
security and protective equipment quality supervision and 
monitoring agency at the national level. 
  -- Establish an anti-explosion anti-violence technological 
training center. 
  By the year 2000 key units and vital organs of the state 
shall have a multi-function multi-level integrated security and 
police-reporting system. Enhance the anti-intrusion, 
anti-burglary, anti-sabotage capabilities of these units and 
organs. By the year 2020 we shall have put together a 
comprehensive and intelligent social protective security system, 
foreseeing and tracking newly emergent dangerous and covert ways 
of committing crime, and developing corresponding detection 
methods, and perfecting the necessary equipment. 
  2) Computer Security Technology 
  The existence or otherwise of computer security technology 
is 
a crucial matter with a direct impact on state security and 
social security. Our war with this intelligent criminal is a new 
challenge facing us today. Computer crime perpetrators typically 
alter data, receive computer information, or use other high-tech 
means to steal money, properties, and information, which 
explains why computer crimes are hard to discover and 
investigate. Accordingly we must waste no time in marshalling 
public security and social forces to research and develop 
appropriate preventive and crime-solving technologies to fill 
the void in computer security technology and ensure computer 
security in China. 
  -- Formulate computer systems security assessment standards, 
including security assessment standards for operating systems, 
data bases, network, media, information leakage, software, 
hardware, and applications environment. 
  -- Develop computer systems security technology and 
equipment. 
  -- Develop the technology for solving computer crime. 
Develop 
corresponding investigative technology and equipment. 
  -- Launch soft science research in the field of computer 
security in order to provide scientific a basis for drawing up 
laws and regulations for computer monitoring and security. 
  -- Establish a computer security research and testing 
center. 
  By 2000 the research tasks mentioned above will begin to 
bear 
fruit in the form of computer security technical standards, 
security assessment and testing tools, and the ability to 
provide a scientific basis for policy-making by the state. By 
2020, we will have the ability to prevent or solve the kinds of 
computer crime most common at the time: 
  3) Investigative Technology 
  Investigative technology is a vital component of the 
investigative work of public security organs, an important tool 
and a powerful weapon at our disposal as we struggle with 
serious criminal offenders, hostile forces at home and abroad, 
spies, and agents. Among the most important tasks of 
investigative technology is research on decoding, intercepting, 
surveillance, searching, shadowing, monitoring, 
anti-investigation and anti-eavesdropping technologies and the 
development of corresponding tools and devices. 
  The subjects of investigative work are complex and variable, 
as are its environments. And then there is the strict need for 
covertness. This means there is a host of technically complex 
and difficult issues awaiting our solution before we can raise 
the level of investigative technology, 
  -- Develop mobile voice pick-up technology. 
  -- Develop investigative technology compatible with modern 
communications technology. 
  -- Research the technology to pick up a voice under adverse 
investigative conditions and make it intelligible. Establish a 
voice signal processing laboratory that would provide services 
to the entire nation. 
  -- Develop a high-sensitivity, low-consumption, and compact 
video camera and photographic equipment that work in poor 
illumination and low contrast. Develop processing technology for 
low-contrast poor-illumination faint image signals. Enhance the 
efficacy and mobility of image and evidence gathering work. 
  -- Research anti-surveillance, anti-evidence-gathering 
technology. Ensure the security of investigative work itself. 
  -- Research and master ultra low-concentration and complex 
coding technology. 
  -- Stay abreast with and analyze every new way in which 
criminals commit crime as well as new investigative technology. 
Improve the effectiveness of investigative devices. 
  -- Set up a center for simulated testing of investigative 
technology, devices, and methods and the popularization and 
application of new technology to bridge the gap between research 
and application and to popularize and diffuse new technology and 
new products. 
  By 2000 we should have largely completed the research tasks 
with the exception of faint voice signal and image signal 
processing technology, markedly boosting the standard of 
investigation. By 2020 we shall have continued to improve and 
further the above-mentioned research priorities, at the same 
time working to master faint voice and image signal processing 
technology. We must also try to keep up with advanced technology 
overseas and never cease to heighten the adaptability and 
manageability of high-tech investigation. 
  4) Material Evidence Identification Technology 
  The goal of material evidence identification is to crack 
down 
on criminals and solve cases and provide iron-clad evidence for 
trial purposes. 
  -- Develop new technology for inspecting and gathering 
evidence at the scene of a major crime, such as a murder, 
robbery, or explosion. 
  -- Study ways of applying cytology and enzyme kinetics in 
examining injuries on a corpse and determining time of death. 
  -- Develop high-tech to identify fingerprints, voice, 
handwriting, and for skull restoration. 
  -- Examine the comprehensive evaluation of footprint 
characteristics and the relations between the physical 
attributes of an individual and the principles of walking. 
  -- Put the high-tech of DNA to use for personal 
identification. 
  -- Research new technology and equipment to solve cases 
involving the counterfeiting of currency, certificates, 
documents, and seals. 
  -- Research systems identification technology for use in 
collecting, analyzing, and separating the structural components 
of micro material evidence. 
  -- Study drugs and the rapid and sensitive testing of drugs 
and their human metabolins. 
  -- Create a computer inquiry system containing data on 
criminals and samples of material evidence. 
  -- Gradually standardize and regularize the technology for 
crime site inspection and material evidence identification. Step 
up the diffusion and widespread adoption of such technology. 
  -- Set up and perfect a material evidence identification 
laboratory at the national level. It shall conduct 
ground-breaking research to identify and verify problematic 
material evidence in major crimes across the nation. 
  By the year 2000 we should have gradually increased the 
discovery rate and utilization rate of material evidence and we 
shall have been able to predict trends of crime and formulated a 
correct policy. By 2020 China shall have caught up with the most 
advanced nations in the world at the time. 
  5) Traffic and Transportation Management Technology 
  The traffic pattern in China today is a mixed one where 
automobiles compete for space on the road with a large number of 
non-motorized vehicles and pedestrians, a pattern that would be 
hard to change for a long time to come. Thus research on traffic 
and transportation management in China must proceed from this 
reality and seek to solve the practical problems in the nation. 
  -- Research the applied basic theories of traffic management 
science. focusing on the characteristics of mixed traffic, the 
characteristics of vehicular traffic, and the management S&amp;T 
appropriate to each. 
  -- Develop traffic management and safety systems engineering 
to provide a comprehensive traffic management model for urban 
renewal and transportation planning. 
  -- Promptly research and develop technology for highway 
traffic safety management, technology for the prompt 
investigation of accidents, and emergency rescue. 
  -- Research testing and monitoring technology that would 
improve automobile safety and the safety of traffic 
installations and facilities. 
  -- Study traffic safety psychology, traffic safety 
physiology, and human engineering. Identify the principles 
governing the relations between the caliber of drivers and 
traffic accidents. Develop technology to control and correct 
dangerous factors. 
  -- Establish a road and traffic safety assessment and 
accident predicting system and a traffic management 
policy-making support system. Also provide a scientific basis 
for legislation on traffic management. 
  -- Establish a traffic safety testing center where traffic 
accidents of all types are simulated for testing and analytical 
study. 
  -- Research and develop a traffic management and traffic 
accident data base and a vehicular management, driver training 
and examination, traffic communication, and traffic guidance 
integrated information system. 
  By the year 2000 we should have essentially applied the 
S&amp;T 
achievements mentioned above to the metropolises and large 
cities of all types, tentatively forming a mixed traffic 
management system that can direct and guide traffic effectively, 
thus raising the average speed of urban vehicular traffic by 10 
percent or so. (For traffic accident fatalities, see above.) By 
the year 2020, a modern road and traffic management and safety 
technical system with Chinese characteristics shall have been 
put in place, with signal control technology and vehicular 
safety testing technology being widely adopted. This should be 
accompanied by a further decline in traffic accident fatalities 
per thousand vehicles. 
  6) Fire-Fighting S&amp;T 
  The purpose of the fire-fighting S&amp;T is to enhance our 
ability to avert and combat disasters and heighten the ability 
of fire-fighting forces to put out fires, thus contributing even 
more effectively to safeguarding economic development and 
protecting the people's lives and properties. In the past 10 
years or so, fire fighting facilities have fallen woefully 
behind the needs of urban development. The potential danger of 
fire breaking out is high, so there is an urgent need to take 
every appropriate fire-fighting measure. Even more acute is the 
need for fire prevention and fire-resistance technology in 
high-rise buildings and underground works. In addition, there 
are new issues to be tackled regarding the causes of fires, the 
theory of fire spreading, rescue technology, and fire-fighting 
standards, rules, and equipment. 
  -- Consider setting up a system for dividing a city into 
zones according to its level of fire hazard. Establish a 
comprehensive technical system to prevent and fight urban fires. 
  -- Increase the ability of key protection points which 
present special fire hazards and technical problems to prevent 
and control fires. Targeting sites and locations (such as 
high-rise buildings, underground projects, petroleum 
enterprises, transportation hubs, nuclear power facilities, and 
new cutting-edge industries) in national economic production and 
in cities which present exceptional fire risks and complex 
rescue problems, we shall consider setting up a system for 
preventing and reporting fires and explosions, for extinguishing 
the fire or stopping the explosion, and for delivering emergency 
services. We should also develop a coordinated, intelligent 
remote-control, auto-control execution system as well as rescue 
equipment suitable for use in dangerous areas. 
  -- Develop new fire-fighting technology and equipment 
suitable for use at all types of fire scenes. 
  -- Launch research on rescue technology and equipment to be 
used in putting out extra-large fires and handling earthquakes, 
storms, and war. 
  -- In the wake of the development of fire-fighting S&amp;T 
and 
advances in building technology, we shall formulate or revise 
fire-fighting technical rules and criteria and improve the fire 
fighting product quality control technical system. 
  -- Conduct research on fire and explosion theories. 
  -- Conduct research on the psychology and physiology of fire 
and fire fighting. Shed light on the psychological state of a 
human being trapped in a fire. Study the hazard posed by high 
temperatures, lack of oxygen, and the products of combustion to 
the human body, the injury caused, time of death, and 
appropriate preventive measures. 
  By the year 2000, there should have been set up an 
appropriate fire prevention and fire-fighting technical system 
in every city with a population over 1 million and every major 
fire protection target. We should have reached the standard of 
developed nations as of the late 1980's in fire detection, 
automatic fire extinguishing, anti-explosion, explosion 
suppression, and all types of fire-fighting technology and 
equipment, fire-resistant building materials, and parts and 
components. There should be 100 fire-fighting technical rules, 
up from the current 20, and 500 or so fire-fighting standards, 
both national and professional, up from the current 70. The 
rudiments of a fire-fighting testing and research center shall 
be in place, along with a fire cause identification and 
fire-fighting forces technical equipment testing and research 
center. There should also be a complete fire-fighting product 
quality control and inspection network centered upon a national 
quality inspection center. 
  By the year 2020 we should have basically established a 
multi-function national urban fire-fighting technical 
comprehensive protection system, a fire-fighting scientific 
research and education system, and a body of fire-fighting 
technical laws, regulations, and standards. In terms of 
fire-fighting technical facilities and the technical equipment 
of fire-fighting forces, China should equal the best in the 
industrialized world at the end of the century. 
  7) Social Public Security: Information Management Technology 
and Command System Technology 
  Since China embarked on reform and introduced the open 
policy, people, goods, materials, and money have been on the 
move on a massive scale. To ensure social public security, an 
all-out effort must be made to develop social public security 
information technology, create a social public security 
information system, a national multi-level, multi-function, 
multi-purpose, rapid-response, and high-standard system based on 
the computer and communications to raise the standard of 
information management and command. 
  -- Study the theory, characteristics, model, method of 
design, and assessment criteria of a social public security 
information system for a mass society; create a large-scale 
population movement information management system that extends 
all the way from the grass-roots police substation to the 
national level to provide social law and order organs and other 
departments with demographic information services. 
  -- Establish a foreign population information management 
system and a computer network linked to the appropriate 
international body. 
  -- Develop a crime information management system and become 
part of the information network of Interpol. 
  -- Examine the social public security command, the dial-110 
police-reporting system, and technical approaches and results 
model of different cities. 
  -- Develop information technologies essential to social 
public security, such as those relating to voice, writing, or 
imagery. 
  -- Establish a social public security auxiliary 
policy-making 
system, a social public security intelligence system, and a 
social public security statistical and information system. 
  By the year 2000 the social public security information 
management and command system should cover all major cities in 
the nation and, by the year 2020, a majority of cities in China. 
  8) Police Weapons and Protective Gear 
  The primary task here is to develop weapons and protective 
gear for use by police in self-defense or to bring the criminal 
under control in an emergency or dangerous situation, such as 
plane and boat hijacking, or in situations where the police are 
trying to prevent an explosion or quell violence. Proceed from 
the current situation in China and bring about the 
standardization and automation of police weapons and protective 
gear, also making them compact and multi-function. 
  -- Research and develop a light-weight, compact automatic 
pistol, weighing no more than 1 kilogram, with an effective 
range of 30 to 50 meters. The pistol should be easy to draw, 
have a high percentage of hits among first shots, and fire both 
military and non-lethal rounds. 
  -- Research and develop a reliable, multi-purpose revolver 
with a high percentage of first-shot hits. Develop ammunition 
(including lethal and non-lethal ammunition and special 
ammunition). 
  -- Research and develop semi-automatic anesthetic rifle, 
anti-riot guns, multi-purpose signal pistols, hand grenades, and 
rifle grenades. 
  -- Research and develop protective gear and simulation 
training equipment. 
  By 2000, police weapons and protective gear in China shall 
be 
as advanced as those in developed nations in the late 1980's 
and, by the year 2020, equal the best in developed nations at 
the end of the 20th century. 
<H5>  Surveying and Mapping </H5>
  Surveying and mapping is a pace-setting and basic industry 
that deals with geographical information. It is 
technology-intensive and has an extremely broad range of 
services. To meet the surveying and mapping needs in every 
field--national management, economic development, defense 
build-up, scientific research, culture and education, daily 
life, it must devote itself to obtaining, processing, and 
supplying information relating to the shape, size, and 
gravitational fields of the planet Earth, as well as basic 
information relating to natural and man-made land forms, the 
characteristics and distribution of surface features, the plane 
position and elevation of surface points, geographical names and 
geographical factors. Such information is used in various ways: 
to determine the position and orientation of a place, to 
investigate and analyze, to forecast and assess, in planning and 
policy-making, in supervision, in operations and command, and in 
diffusing knowledge. 
  In the next 2 to 3 decades, Chinese surveying must not only 
effect the transition from the old to the new management 
systems, but also help the new technology replace the old by 
adopting new technology to refine geodetic surveying references, 
totally revamping China's basic land surveying information 
products and launching basic surveying and special-topic 
surveying in China's territorial waters, thus filling the void 
in China's cadastral surveying and mapping and opening up a new 
field of surveying and mapping services, both domestic and 
foreign. 
  1. Development Strategy and Goals 
  1) Development Strategy Follow the strategy of ``first, 
guarantee; second, rely; third, efficiency; fourth, market. In 
other words, it should be the goal of the surveying and mapping 
profession to ensure that the surveying and mapping requirements 
of national economic and social development are met to the 
greatest extent possible. It should rely on modern S&amp;T, 
scientific management, and improvements in the caliber of the 
producers to mobilize the forces of the entire surveying and 
mapping industry. It should raise surveying productivity, 
increase the returns on funds and the efficiency with which 
resources are utilized, and prolong the effective use of 
surveying products. It should open up and perfect the surveying 
information market, product market, technical market, and labor 
market to develop China's surveying and mapping industry with a 
strategy that is centered on S&amp;T, seeks survival through 
services, and pursues development by being efficient. 
  2) Strategic Goals 
  -- Establish uniform land and sea geodetic surveying 
standards. Refine the geodetic control system and gravitational 
fields. Specifically, the point to point density and precision 
of the horizontal control net and elevated control net must 
reach a scale between 1:500 and 1:1,000 for urban maps, and 
between 1:2,000 and 1:5,000 for rural maps to meet the 
requirements of research on crustal movement, etc. The density 
and precision of priority areas and points targeted by the state 
must be such that the requirements of spatial science and 
resource prospecting are met. 
  -- To preserve our present situation, we shall maintain the 
comprehensive coverage of both land and sea topographic maps 
used in national land development. As far as land is concerned, 
coverage by topographic maps at a scale between 1:500 and 
1:10,000 shall exceed 80 percent. Specifically in the case of 
urban areas, coverage by topographic maps at a scale between 
1:500 and 1:2,000 shall exceed 90 percent. Turning to China's 
territorial waters, the coverage by water depth maps at a scale 
between 1:50,000 and 1:100,000 shall reach 100 percent. As for 
China's exclusive economic zone outside its territorial waters, 
there should be full coverage by water depth maps at a scale 
between 1:250,000 and 1:500,000. Ocean-floor topographic maps 
should also be developed for priority areas. 
  -- The quantity and diversity of simulated and digital 
surveying information products on the domestic market must be 
such that they can satisfy at least 70 percent of social demand. 
  -- Mapping products that are small-scale, that is, 
1:1,000,000 and below, and national in scope shall enter the 
international surveying and mapping market. The exports of 
mapping products shall increase 3 to 4 times over that in 1985. 
Also, steadily expand the range of mapping and surveying 
services offered by this nation overseas. 
  -- Over 70 percent of the surveying and mapping instruments 
used by the entire industry should be domestically made. 
  -- Fifty percent of the surveying and mapping units in the 
industry shall basically have completed their transition from 
simulated mapping technology to analytic and digital mapping 
technology, fundamentally forming a practical industry that 
provides basic information on China's national territory. 
  -- Develop a contingent of surveyors and cartographers that 
is first-rate in the world. 
  By the year 2020, we should have gone a long way toward 
meeting the above-mentioned objectives, made substantial 
progress in the digitization and automation of mapping and 
surveying technology, making it more intelligent, and basically 
brought about the modernization of China's traditional surveying 
and mapping system, pushing it into the forefront of the world. 
  To achieve its development objectives, the surveying and 
mapping industry must: 
  a) Transform traditional surveying and mapping technology. 
  -- Apply the latest technical achievements comprehensively 
to 
form new technical plans and operating processes in order to 
improve and overhaul plane surface control net and complex 
vertical precision net, and update topographic maps. 
  -- Building on large-scale mapping technology, we shall use 
low-attitude photography, internal/external electronic infrared 
technology, and microcomputer data base to create a 
multi-purpose cadastral surveying and mapping technology. 
  -- Use the microcomputer, digitization, and other new 
technologies to transform the traditional simulated mapping 
technology into a new technical system that includes a digital 
information acquisition and processing technical system as well 
as a simulated mapping system, becoming also an information 
system data collection work station. 
  -- Organically combine aerial photographic surveying with 
space remote-sensing technology, forming a specialized applied 
industry. 
  -- Use image recombination, map-making printing, and other 
new technology to develop shadowgraph and other forms of new 
cartographic products. 
  b) Develop modern surveying and mapping technology. 
  -- Use aerial surveying and locational technology to 
establish a uniform land and sea geodetic control net and 
super-precision aerial geodetic surveying control net to satisfy 
the needs of resource prospecting and construction in the oceans 
and geodynamics. 
  -- Establish and improve the commercialization of national 
land basic information system as a support system, a 
three-dimensional information vehicle, for national economic 
information system and the information system of various 
specialties. Modernize the management of surveying and mapping 
data. 
  -- Make more extensive practical use of remote sensing 
digital image processing, fully digitized automatic map-making, 
and machine-aided map-making. Building on that, we can develop 
new aerial surveying, remote-sensing map making, data base and a 
surveying and mapping experts system linked to artificial 
intelligence to track advanced technology in surveying and 
mapping in the world. Create a modern surveying and mapping 
technical system with Chinese characteristics. 
  -- Utilize new materials and the achievements of computer 
hardware and software technology in conjunction with one another 
to design and manufacture innovative high-quality Chinese-made 
surveying and mapping instruments. Build a production base for 
high-tech surveying and mapping instruments. 
  c) Develop special applied surveying and mapping technology 
  -- Provide dynamic mapping and real-time monitoring 
technology to prevent rivers and streams from flooding; support 
agriculture, forestry, and transportation; protect against 
natural disasters; protect the environment; and deal with 
deteriorations in buildings and engineering works, ground 
subsidence, crustal deformations, and landslides. 
  -- Provide real-time locational and specialized map-making 
and data base technology in the interest of ecological 
equilibrium, population control, resource surveying, and social 
and economic management. 
  -- Provide basic information systems technology to help the 
central government and local authorities at all levels with 
their management and policy-making. 
  -- Provide electronic mapping technology for all means of 
transportation, including land, sea, and air. 
  -- Provide non-topographic photographic and surveying 
technology to such fields as archaeology, investigation, 
medicine, biology, chemistry, industrial production control, and 
robotic vision. 
  2. Major Tasks and Key Technologies 
  To achieve the developmental objectives of the surveying and 
mapping industry, improve the precision of information 
acquisition and processing in surveying and mapping production, 
reduce its field labor-intensity, enhance external and internal 
productivity, diversify the industry's product lineup, broaden 
its scope of application and services, and effectively and 
promptly meet the need of both domestic and foreign users at 
various levels, those in the S&amp;T of surveying and mapping 
shall 
make it their overarching mission in the next 2 to 3 decades to 
realize the preliminary digitization and automation of the 
surveying and mapping production system, the diversification of 
surveying and mapping products, and the systematization of 
surveying and mapping equipment and processes so that the 
technical capability of the surveying and mapping industry and 
the quality of its products will be such that the position of a 
topographical or spatial surface can be determined promptly and 
precisely and that changes in major topographical or spatial 
features will be reflected accurately. 
  By the end of this century, these will be the principal 
tasks 
of the S&amp;T of surveying and mapping: 
  1) Applied Research of Modern Spatial Geodetic Surveying 
Technology 
  Adopt spatial surveying technologies such as VLBI, SLR, and 
GPS, unify land and sea geodetic surveying bench marks, refine 
the static geodetic control net, and create an ultra-high 
precise dynamic geodetic control net; link together all 
surveying observation stations in the nation, establish a 
satellite trading net and satellite observation and data 
processing center, and determine the orbital parameters of 
satellite GNP and other satellites accurately; go about 
providing the use of satellite locational technology 
extensively, use GNP locating in conjunction with aerial 
photography, and significantly reduce field surveying workload 
and labor intensity. 
  2) Experimental Research Relating to National Land Basic 
Information System and Specialized Geographical Information 
System 
  Design a hierarchical model and commercialized structure for 
the national land basic information system. Set national 
technical standards for the national land basic information 
system. Develop a family of intelligent software and computer 
map-making technologies. Using systems engineering methods, 
conduct kuti development and typical experimentation as well as 
applied research at different levels. 
  3) Technology on Map Applications, Map Variety, and Map 
Making and Printing 
  Develop electronic maps, dynamic maps, and tactile maps and 
an atlas of the nation's land and resources. 
  4) Overhaul Traditional Mapping Technology To Make It 
Analytical, Digital, and Intelligent 
  Research the creation of an production system integrating 
photographic surveying with remote sensing so that Chinese-made 
analytical mapping and orthographic projection technology and 
equipment will by and large meet the needs of space remote 
sensing image geometric processing. Explore ways of combining 
photographic surveying, remote sensing, map-making, and the 
geographical information system into an integrated practical 
system. Create a pool of experts in aerial and space 
photographic imaging auto-interpretation and a multi-function 
graphic image mini work station. 
  5) Research on New Technology in Oceanic Surveying and 
Mapping 
  Research and set technical standards for surveying and 
mapping territorial waters. Use space technology to establish an 
oceanic geodetic control net. Determine with precision the 
geographical position of islands in China's territorial waters, 
the datum line of the nation's territorial waters, and the 
geographical coordinates of the contiguous zones, exclusive 
economic zone, and the continental shelf's point of inflection. 
Study the average sea surface of China's territorial waters and 
its oceanic geoidal surface and unify the land and sea datum 
elevation datum planes. Develop new technology to survey the sea 
floor topography and oceanic gravity magnet force. Establish an 
oceanic surveying and mapping data base and create a basic 
oceanic map. 
  6) Research on New Industrial Surveying Technology 
  Focus on the development of precision industrial surveying 
technology and large-scale automated map-making technology. 
Research and develop special instruments and equipment for use 
in industrial surveying. 
  7) Research Multi-Purpose New Cadastral Surveying Technology 
  Concentrate on the development of light-weight low-altitude 
large-scale machine-aided cadastral surveying technology and 
multi-function urban cadastral information systems. 
  8) Research the Real-Time Surveying Technology of Industrial 
Control and Engineering Dynamic Monitoring and Testing 
  Concentrate on the development of CCD planar array 
synchronized solid digital photographic systems and robotic 
vision systems. 
  9) Research the Basic Technical Parameters of China's 
Surveying Satellites, High-Resolution Multi-Band Intelligent 
Sensor, and Cultural Spectrum. 
  10) Research on Basic Surveying and Mapping Theory 
  Examine such theories as global geodesy, relativistic 
geodesy, geographic terminology, theoretical cartography, 
remote-sensing imaging theory, atmospheric refraction, image 
reproduction, recent adjustment, and other theories and methods. 
  11) Research on Soft Science in Surveying and Mapping 
  Concentrate on the research of surveying and mapping 
industrial policy, development strategy, industrial management, 
technology and equipment policy, commercialization of production 
units, the use of surveying and mapping achievements in return 
for payment, and other theories, rules, and regulations. 
<H5>  Standardization and Metrology </H5>
  Standardization and metrology are the technical base of 
national economic and social development. 
  Standardization involves every area of the national economy 
and S&amp;T. It should develop at the same pace and in 
coordination 
with all branches of S&amp;T in order to close the gap between 
itself and that of S&amp;T overall. That way the application of 
S&amp;T 
achievements in production would be accelerated and S&amp;T 
would be 
more closely linked to all the important elements of modernized 
mass production, developing organic ties and producing optimal 
results. 
  Metrology is an advanced basic discipline that serves all 
quarters of society. People in metrology study all theoretical 
and practical matters relating to measurement, including 
physical quantity unit and the theory of quantitative value; the 
physical quantitative unit and the establishment, duplication, 
and transmission of its bench-marks and standards; the method 
and execution of measurement and estimation of its accuracy; and 
the measuring of physical constant quantities, materials, and 
material characteristics. 
  In the next 2 to 3 decades, not only must we solve the 
problems relating to measurement standards and testing 
technology in order to improve labor productivity and product 
quality, lower consumption, and improve social security, but we 
must also develop new measurement theories and methods and work 
out major measurement standards and testing technology in 
scientific research and high-tech industry. 
  1. Development Strategy and Goals 
  1) Development Strategy Standardization and the development 
of the science of measurement should be guided by the strategic 
focus of national economic development. Adhere to the strategic 
thinking of combining service with improvement, with the former 
driving the latter. Provide social and economic development and 
S&amp;T development with an effective guarantee of 
standardization 
and measurement technology. 
  In the past S&amp;T work in standardization emphasized 
setting or 
revising standards. Now the emphasis should shift from 
increasing the number of standards to adjusting the structure of 
standards and setting up a sound standardized system; from the 
standardization of traditional industries to a push for the 
standardization of high-tech and high-tech industries, so that 
standardization proceed in tandem with high-tech development as 
much as possible; and from simple technical standardization to 
paying equal attention to technical standardization and 
managerial standardization. Double research on the 
standardization of modern management to provide a standardized 
managerial system and a set of standards uniform across the 
nation to every sector of the national economy to help them 
modernize the management of social and economic information, 
automate the office, and formulate macro supplementary policies. 
At the same time, every effort should be made to begin research 
on the standardization of technology common to both civilian and 
military users in order to lay a unified technical foundation 
for the joint use of technology by both the military and 
civilians and making technology interchangeable between war-time 
uses and peace-time uses. 
  The S&amp;T of measurement is a broad and 
technology-intensive 
discipline. Since the requirements of each field are different, 
we must differentiate between the various levels and adopt 
different development policies and strategic focus. As far as 
industrial and agricultural production, energy, transportation 
and communications, foreign trade, public security, and the 
people's living are concerned, we should marshall the resources 
of all regions, trades, and professions with a view toward 
raising labor productivity, improving quality, and lowering 
consumption and, given unified values of measurement, work 
mighty hard to develop testing technology, perfect legal 
measuring techniques, and solve practical problems by delving 
deep into reality. As far as key national projects, Sino-foreign 
joint ventures, environmental protection, and medicine and 
public health are concerned, the measurement testing center of 
the region or industry involved should take the lead in ensuring 
coherent measurement and testing. Measurement scientific 
research organs at the national levels shall expand research on 
the basic and commonly-used technology of the science of 
measurement, identifying key areas for scientific probing, and 
work on resolving the major measurement issues in energy, new 
materials, and high-tech industries. We must develop and improve 
China's scientific measurement system. While making sure that 
quantitative values in every sector in China are consistent with 
their international counterparts and contribute to national 
economic, social, and S&amp;T development, we must work to keep 
measurement technology developing slightly ahead of S&amp;T to 
build 
up the necessary measurement base for sustained economic, social 
and S&amp;T development in the next century. 
  2) Strategic Goals 
  Standardization 
  a) Speed up the adoption of international standards and 
advanced international standards by the various industries and 
sectors. Raise the level of production technology in China. 
Expedite technical progress in enterprises and improve their 
product quality and international competitiveness. Goal: by the 
end of the Eighth Five-Year Plan, 80 percent of national 
standards and industrial standards will be international 
standards and advanced international standards; by the year 2000 
all national standards and industrial standards will basically 
be international standards and advanced international standards; 
by the year 2020 national standards will have reached the 
international level, with some of them being incorporated into 
the body of international standards. 
  Formulate and enforce a series of energy-saving standards 
and 
pursue enterprise energy balance standardization. By the year 
2000 the efficacy of some energy-saving and energy-consuming 
equipment should come up to advanced world standards at the time. 
  b) Build up a technological basis for standardization before 
the year 2000 in such high-tech fields and high-tech industries 
as microelectronics, information, automation, biology, new 
materials, energy, space technology, laser, oceanography, and 
human engineering, going all out to set up a standardized system 
in pacesetting fields such as spaceflight, information, and 
human engineering. By 2020, a coherent standardized system that 
is suited to China's national conditions and meets the 
requirements of the international marketplace should be in place. 
  In accordance with the interlinked standards of the open 
international system, we should draw up and perfect a computer 
data information and network standards agreement. Complete the 
OSI high-level agreement and CIMS model system programming and 
launch system uniform standards testing. Put together the basics 
of a Chinese language information processing standardized 
system; some standards relating to Chinese character coding and 
Chinese character parameters shall be incorporated into the body 
of international standards. 
  c) Set up a system of agricultural standards by 2000 in 
order 
to lay a technological foundation for the transformation of 
agriculture into a modern sustained agriculture based on modern 
S&amp;T and management. By the year 2020, there should be a 
coherent 
system of agricultural standards with Chinese characteristics. 
  d) Accelerate research on the standardization of modern 
social management. Before the year 2000 we should have in place 
a standardization system for national economic information 
management and statistics, banking, wages and labor, archives, 
and intelligence and indexing. Bring about computer-aided 
management and equipment computerization. Establish a unified 
coding system for enterprises, institutions, and social organs 
across the nation. Create a bar code standardized system as a 
new data management technology for economic management and 
international trade. By the year 2020 such technology should 
come up to advanced world standards at the time. 
  e) Step up theoretical and applied research on 
standardization to technically ensure balanced development 
between the economy, on the one hand, and S&amp;T, on the other. 
By 
2000 there should be in place a standardization system which is 
based on national standards and is structurally sound and of a 
high standard. By 2020 China's standardization system should be 
as good as any in the world. 
  Measurement 
  a) Keep up with developments in measurement science and 
catch 
up with the rest of the world. 
  -- Establish our position on research on units of 
measurement. Fight for the place and voice that is due us in the 
process of forming a new international system of units. Enhance 
China's international reputation and protect its legitimate 
rights and interests. 
  -- As the international measurement standards system is 
being 
overhauled, we should master new developments, both theoretical 
and technological, in the natural standard system so that we 
basically keep pace with the establishment of an international 
natural standards system, at the same time struggling to take 
the lead in some areas of research work. 
  -- Reform the traditional value quantity transmission 
method. 
Reduce the number of transmission levels and ensure the quality 
of transmission. Introduce and implement the measurement 
assurance plan in the transmission of the major quantity values 
in several key areas before the year 2000. The plan should 
largely be introduced across the board before 2020 to advance 
the quality of quantity value transmission in China to a level 
approaching or matching the international standard. 
  -- By 2020 we should have come up with a host of major 
original achievements in the field of measurement that are of a 
breakthrough nature and are influential in the international 
measurement science community. 
  b) The development of engineering measurement and testing 
technology should basically meet the urgent need of ensuring 
product quality and increasing productivity. As far as the 
quality parameters of China's key products are concerned, we 
should have completed a majority of the necessary engineering 
measurement standards before 2000 and, by the year 2020, 
essentially put together an engineering measurement standards 
system. As for imported or Chinese-made automotive production 
lines, by 2000 we should basically be able to meet the need for 
on-line measurement and on-line calibration in major projects. 
By 2020 we shall have mastered a number of on-line measurement 
and calibration technologies. 
  c) Provide technical support for the development of key 
sectors in the national economy. 
  -- Agriculture. Before 2000 complete the reform of the unit 
of measurement for land area, putting an end to the present 
confusion in land area units and laying the most essential base 
for unifying the measurement of farmland area and calculating 
crop output. By 2000, the basics of an agricultural measurement 
system shall be in place, including soil analysis, 
meteorological and ecological observation, biochemical analysis, 
related (biochemical, nutritional) standard materials, and 
agricultural radiation dosages. This system shall be expanded 
and improved through 2020 to provide the modernization of 
Chinese agriculture with advanced measuring services. 
  -- Energy. Develop measuring and testing technology for 
energy transportation, energy consumption, and equipment 
efficacy. By 2000 we should have created an energy measuring 
system centered upon the energy measuring station and buttressed 
by large enterprises. Meanwhile, we should have resolved the 
measuring and testing problems that have appeared in the 
extraction of new energy. Continue to substantiate many 
standards for new energy sources and the appropriate advanced 
testing methods through 2020, forming a fairly complete energy 
measurement system. 
  -- Transportation and communications. Before 2000 complete 
the standards for harbor measuring equipment. Develop the 
technical means for automatic, rapid, and continuous weighing. 
Increase loading efficiency and catch up with advanced world 
standards by 2020. Ensure an increase in transport capacity and 
traffic volume as well as improvements in transportation safety 
in a measurement sense. (Unify measuring standards, enhance 
measurement precision, and inspect measuring instruments and 
tools on a mandatory basis.) 
  -- Materials. Provide a complete range of basic services for 
the improvement of the quality of major raw materials and the 
development of new ones (for instance, by analyzing and testing 
the various characteristics of the material, standard materials, 
and standard data). Use the technical base of measurement 
research institutions to set up a material performance testing 
service center. By 2020 our testing capability shall come up to 
advanced world standards. 
  d) To ensure and improve the quality and standards of 
measurement tools in the nation, there shall be testing 
equipment to gauge the performance of measurement instruments 
before the year 2000, with some equipment matching world 
standards. By 2020 the equipment should match world standards, 
with a measuring instrument quantity assessment system that can 
evaluate a complete range of tools. This will provide reliable 
technical support for the commercialization and 
industrialization of China's achievements in the field of 
measurement research and the drive by measurement instrument 
makers to send their products into the international marketplace 
in volume. 
  e) The state shall impose mandatory inspection on measuring 
tools in environmental monitoring, security and protection, and 
public health and medicine, with the standardization of 
measuring instruments in those fields being completed by 2000. 
By 2020 not only must such mandatory inspection be commonly 
practiced in China, but new measuring tools must also have been 
brought under similar inspection to provide an internally 
unified testing basis for global cooperation in environmental 
protection, public health and medicine, and the prevention of 
natural disasters. 
  2. Major Tasks and Priority Projects 
  Standardization 
  To achieve the development objectives in the field of 
standardization, we must promote the coordinated development 
between the national economy and S&amp;T. The following major 
research projects shall be completed in the next 2 to 3 decades: 
  a) Research on Standardization Technology in Agriculture 
(Including Forestry, Animal Husbandry, and Fishery) 
  Launch the standardization of the comprehensive development, 
comprehensive utilization, and protection of agricultural 
resources. Establish an agricultural comprehensive 
standardization system. Step up research on agricultural 
mechanization and agricultural engineering standardization, on 
setting standards on seeds, improved breeds and pesticides, and 
on the standardization of the sound use of grain. 
  b) Research on Standardization in High-Tech and High-Tech 
Industries 
  Formulate standards for microelectronics, biotechnology, 
automation technology, new materials, and new energy. Create 
standardization systems for nuclear power safety, spacecraft 
reliability engineering, and software engineering reliability 
management. Research and develop a series of standards for 
marine technology. Set up a standardization system for the 
production of high-tech products and the production evaluation 
of new drugs. Research and develop series standards for human 
engineering. 
  c) Research on Information Technology Standardization 
  -- research data communication and networking standards and 
agreement for the interlinked seven-tier open system. Conduct 
standardization testing on OSI high-level agreement. Press ahead 
with the research and application of standards for the open 
miyuejiani system. 
  -- Research and develop a Chinese-language information 
technology standards series revolving around Chinese-character 
information processing. Set standards for the word codes and 
word patterns of the languages of minority nationalities as well 
as their imprint technology. 
  -- Create a standardization system for computer integrated 
manufacturing system (CIMS). Complete standard formulation for 
the business decision-making system (BDMS), computer-aided 
design and manufacturing (CAD/ CAM), flexible manufacturing 
system (FMS), and other models for reference. 
  d) Research on the Standardization of Social Modernized 
Management. 
  Establish a standardization system for national economic 
information and statistics, electronic banking, and personnel 
and wage management. Establish a national uniform code 
identification system for enterprises, institutions, and social 
organizations. Establish a bar code standardization system, a 
standardization system for office automation, standardization in 
the service industry and environmental protection, an 
standardization system for the comprehensive utilization of 
natural resources, standardization of the criteria of fixed 
assets investment projects, and code standardization for the 
criteria system of land and resources information system. 
Establish a national economic information analysis, statistical, 
and accounting standardization system. 
  e) Standardization of Energy-Conserving Technology 
  Develop optimal matching standards for wind machines and 
water pump systems, and standards series for the economical 
operation of speed-regulating alternate current machines. Study 
new wall-building materials standards. Standardize enterprise 
energy balance and energy auditing criteria. Standardize 
energy-conserving equipment, energy-saving materials, and energy 
products. 
  f) Research on Basic and Applied Standardization Research on 
standardization theory and scientific and rational 
standardization system. 
  Standardization of terminology and graphic symbols. 
Enterprise standardization. The standardization of new product 
R&amp;D. Integration of electrical machinery and tools. 
Standardization of industrial goods stable batch process 
technology. Standardization of entire life-span equipment. Set 
up a work place safety standards system and electrical appliance 
safety standards system. Work on standards for textile products 
for either decorative or industrial uses. Research performance 
standards for textiles and apparel. Intensify standardization 
research on key national projects. 
  Measurement 
  To achieve the strategic objectives in measurement, we must 
ensure that quantitative values in all areas of society attain 
accuracy and consistency both at home and internationally, 
revolving around measurement science and testing technology. 
Taking into consideration both the systems nature of the science 
of measurement and the wide-ranging scope and diversity of its 
development and application, the key tasks fall into two groups. 
One group has to do with the development of the discipline 
itself, while the other is oriented to the national economy. 
  a) Development of the Science of Measurement and Testing 
Technology -- Research the creation of a system of measuring 
units based on the theory of relativity and quantum mechanics. 
Study the relations between fundamental physical constant and 
physical dimension when it comes to unit formation. Increase the 
measurement accuracy of the speed of light, electrical charge, 
Planck constant, gravitational constant, AVOGADRO constant, and 
other physical constants. Study the effects of the new unit 
system on S&amp;T and national economy and methods of effecting 
the 
transition from the current unit system to the new one. 
  -- Study ways of using the Josephson effect to establish 
voltage standards and using the quantized Hall effect to set up 
an electric resistance standard. Develop a new atomic clock 
using the ion trap mode-selecting method, raising the precision 
of frequency standard by an additional 2 to 3 numerical levels. 
Study optical frequency measuring method. Use the gas 
thermometer to conduct absolute temperature measurements. Use 
the low-temperature radiometer to enhance the sensitivity of the 
photometer. Conduct experiments in which natural bench marks are 
used to monitor mass object bench marks. Explore ways of 
establishing the molar bench mark. Study the technology of 
making natural bench marks instruments and ease the concern that 
state bench marks may be destroyed by war or natural disasters. 
Research and develop second-level natural bench marks. Broaden 
the application of natural bench mark technology in precision 
measurement in all areas. Alternately, set up a new national 
measurement bench mark system based on natural bench marks. 
  -- Develop measurement error theories. Put forward new 
criteria for assessing measuring capability and the quality of 
measurement work. Investigate the origins and propagation 
principles of measuring error. Probe the alternate theoretical 
limit of measurement precision. 
  -- Develop a calibration echelon theory based on a 
measurement guarantee concept. Research a new way to unify 
calibration. Study ways of making physical quantity convertible 
into frequency quantity and vice versa. Experiment with the 
communication pairing method of calibration. Study the 
conversion of ground domain and space domain into frequency 
domain and methods of the frequency domain processing of 
measuring information. By 2020 a new calibration echelon system 
should be in place. 
  -- Conduct an extensive study on setting measurement 
standards for engineering parameters. Establish an engineering 
measurement standards system for major industrial products such 
as large precision instruments, major technical equipment, 
microelectronic parts and components, space and aviation 
products, basic industrial materials and durable consumer goods. 
Establish wide-ranging international conversion channels and 
enter into a number of bilateral or multilateral international 
agreements, recognizing the results of an inspection or test. 
  -- Use new technology like laser, superconductivity, 
computer, fiber optics, and networking to develop new 
measurement principles and measuring methods. Research and 
develop new instruments and facilities for precision 
measurement. Study automation of the measuring process. Research 
expert systems in the main specialties in measurement and the 
artificial intelligence of measuring instruments. Establish an 
experimental base for measuring sensors and an integrated 
performance assessment system for such sensors. 
  -- Broaden the field of measurement. Study the measuring 
methods for biomass, chem-mass, psycho-mass, and physio-mass. 
Push back quantitative limitations. Closely revolving around the 
development of key sectors like agriculture, energy, materials, 
and information, we should study the measuring issues of such 
measuring ranges as super high, super-large, micro, and very low. 
  2) When it comes to application, we should target the 
requirements of the national development priority areas and the 
new industries and concentrate on tackling the following major 
issues: 
  -- Plan the development of agricultural measuring technology 
comprehensively. Develop measuring standards for agricultural 
metallurgical parameters. Unify meteorological observation 
magnitude. Develop a soil testing method and comprehensive 
assessment system that can be readily popularized. Provide 
accurate measuring tools for seed selection and preservation. 
Ensure the enforcement of food processing standards. The 
ultimate goal: the establishment of agricultural measuring 
systems required by modern agriculture. 
  -- Study calorific value testing methods and measuring 
standards for energy sources like petroleum and coal. Develop 
calibration methods for the appropriate standard material and 
analytical and testing equipment. Develop accurate measuring and 
testing methods for the conversion and comprehensive utilization 
of petroleum and coal. Develop technology for the manufacture 
and installation of large power generation equipment in order to 
improve the quality of its processing and operations. Develop 
nuclear power safety monitoring methods to ensure safety. 
Consider popularizing the use of boiler heat efficiency testing 
methods and electrical machinery power factor monitoring 
methods. Establish efficiency assessment methods and a quality 
control index for energy-saving products. Develop a complete set 
of energy-saving technology. 
  -- Provide solar spectral energy distribution and the 
geographical distribution of solar energy in China. Determine 
the spectral efficacy of solar energy conversion materials. Set 
standards for testing solar energy conversion materials. Study 
testing methods or nuclear fusion experimentation to provide 
testing data determining the conditions and efficacy for nuclear 
fusion. Develop sample testing technology for wind energy and 
renewable energy sources to increase the utilization rate of 
wind energy and the conversion rate of renewable energy sources. 
  -- Develop methods to analyze and test the composition and 
structure of semiconductors, metals, polymers, and ceramics. 
Develop techniques to test the dynamic, magnetic, and chemical 
properties of materials. Create a data base containing 
information on the physical and chemical properties of the major 
materials used in China. Develop calibration methods for the 
standard materials and material testing equipment. 
  -- Research and develop large harbor measuring equipment, 
including track scales, vehicle scales, and electronic crane. 
Unify the calibration of harbor connections. Improve measurement 
precision to reduce errors and losses. Research the accurate 
measurement of the carrying capacity of railroads, automobiles, 
and bridges. Tap carrying capacity potential. Develop testing 
technology for the operating parameters of automobiles and ships 
to provide data to increase operating efficiency. Study both the 
real-time and the external measuring technology for pipe transit 
parameters to provide a testing basis for operations control. 
Improve the calibration precision of aviation safety inspection 
to provide maximum measuring guarantee for aviation safety. 
  -- Unify the reliability testing and assessment methods for 
the computer and its terminal equipment. Develop assessment 
methods for the quality of computer software. Raise the time 
synchronized precision in communications. Establish standards 
for testing submicron integrated circuit, single-membrane 
optional fiber technology parameters, and finished products. 
  -- Master the on-site calibration of the monitoring 
instruments for environmental pollution, earthquakes, and other 
natural disasters. Unify quantitative measurements and increase 
the consistency between the results of different monitoring 
methods and between one stratum and the next. Establish special 
measuring standards for items under mandatory inspection in the 
field of medicine and public health. Develop assessment methods 
for the parameter calibration and comprehensive reliability of 
complex diagnostic and therapeutic equipment, ultrasound, 
radiation, biomagnetism, and bio-electric detection equipment in 
order to ensure diagnostic accuracy and the safety and 
effectiveness of the treatment. Establish a calibration system 
for all sorts of high-sensitivity safety testing instruments. 
  -- Centralize planning but distribute across the nation 
testing bases with a man-made simulated environment for a 
variety of measuring instruments. The responsibility of the 
testing bases is to conduct research on the reliability of 
measuring tools and assessment methods. First and foremost, they 
shall ensure the quality of measuring tools used in regular 
inspection as well as those in mandatory inspection. At the same 
time, the bases should provide testing services for the 
development of new measuring tools. Develop calibration devices 
for environmental testing equipment. Standardize the criteria 
for the environmental testing of measuring tools. 
  -- Participate in experiments and research in physics. 
Examine and verify the general theory of relativity and study 
the method of gravitational waves. Research a testing technology 
for the manufacturing and experimental research of the 
high-energy accelerator and other large experimentation 
equipment. Examine plasma diagnostic technology and the methods 
used to test material properties in the vicinity of the 
high-temperature superconducting transition point. Develop 
tunable lasers and master spectral analysis technology. Conduct 
research on opto-electronic switches. Master spectral analytical 
technology. Master the methods for testing the performance of 
optoelectronic switches. Enhance the performance of high Tc 
SQUID and use it in detecting weak electric current and magnetic 
fields. 
<H5>  The Ten-Year Plan of Scientific and Technological </H5>
Development of the PRC and Outline of the Eighth Five-Year Plan 
(1991-1995-2000) 
  Introduction 
  Modern S&amp;T has been developing by leaps and bounds. Its 
conversion into real productive forces has been just as rapid, 
fully validating the scientific thesis that ``S&amp;T are the 
foremost productive forces.'' Faced with fierce competition in 
global S&amp;T, we must go all out to further China's S&amp;T, 
taking 
special pains to develop high-tech and its industries. There is 
no other way to revitalize the economy, fuel all-round social 
development, and make our way into the ranks of advanced nations 
in the world. The next decade will be a critical period in the 
development of China's economy and society. Only by relying on 
S&amp;T unwaveringly can we achieve the magnificent goals of 
economic construction and social development and realize our 
long-cherished wish of vitalizing a people and bringing 
prosperity to a nation. 
  Since the 3d Plenum of the 11th CPC Central Committee, 
S&amp;T in 
China has scored great achievements that have caught world 
attention. The party and the state have formulated a string of 
policies that are consistent with the trend of global S&amp;T 
development as well a the conditions in China, approved and 
implemented a host of S&amp;T plans, including projects to tackle 
key S&amp;T problems, the ``Spark Plan,'' ``863,'', the ``Torch 
Plan,'' industrial experimentation, and the popularization and 
diffusion of S&amp;T achievements and new technology. In all, 
China 
has come up with more than 120,000 S&amp;T achievements, solving 
technical problems important to economic development, defense 
build-up, and social development, generating over 280 billion 
yuan in profits, several times the total for the preceding 30 
years. Today China boasts a national S&amp;T army of over 10 
million 
people and an S&amp;T system with a complete lineup of 
disciplines, 
constituting a formidable S&amp;T force that can attack difficult 
S&amp;T projects. S&amp;T reform has established a place for the 
commercialization of technical achievements in all society. 
S&amp;T 
work is now characterized by in-depth planning and organic ties. 
S&amp;T organs in the development mode orient themselves to the 
economy and are in the process of being transformed. A new 
S&amp;T 
planning system that combines planned management with market 
regulation is taking shape. The mechanism of S&amp;T work as 
well as 
its framework and look have undergone profound and historic 
changes. All of that has laid a solid foundation for S&amp;T 
development in the 1990's. 
  Even as it has proved remarkably beneficial economically and 
socially, S&amp;T work has also run into some problems and 
difficulties, notably the following: the lack of overall 
planning and coordination in economic reform, S&amp;T reform, and 
other reforms; the absence of pressure and drive to rely on 
S&amp;T 
progress for economic development; under-investment in S&amp;t by 
the state, while the channels of investment by the financial 
community and enterprises have yet to be widened; most S&amp;T 
personnel are underpaid, and S&amp;T workers in old liberated 
areas, 
areas inhabited by minorities, border regions, impoverished 
areas, and three-front areas have many problems that must be 
resolved urgently. The S&amp;T management system must be 
straightened out. 
  The ``Ten-Year Plan of S&amp;T Development'' and ``Outline 
of the 
Eighth Five-Year Plan'' have been formulated in a spirit of 
pragmatism and striving for progress and in accordance with the 
spirit of the 7th Plenum of the 13th CPC Central Committee, the 
magnificent goals laid down in the ``Ten-Year National Economic 
and Social Development Plan and an Outline of the Eighth 
Five-Year Plan,'' and the development blueprint set forth in the 
``Medium- and Long-Term National S&amp;T Development Plan.'' They 
were formulated after we comprehensively analyzed the demands 
placed on S&amp;T progress by economic and social development and 
global economic and scientific development trends, taking into 
account the S&amp;T forces and solid work foundation already in 
existence as well as the problems and difficulties facing us. 
  To realize the objectives of struggle and accomplish the 
priority tasks in the outline, all sectors and all localities 
must work out an appropriate S&amp;T development plan in 
accordance 
with the demands of this ``outline'' and the reality in their 
own sector or locality. 
<H5>  1. The Goals and Guiding Principles of S&amp;T Development </H5>
1991-2000 
  1) Development Goals 
  S&amp;T work in China in the next 10 years must base itself 
on 
the goals and plans of economic and social development, abide by 
the principles of S&amp;T development itself, and orient itself 
to 
the main battleground of economic development, namely, 
contributing to the redoubling of the national economy. We must 
go all out to develop high-tech and high-tech industries, 
conduct basic research steadily and endlessly, centralize 
planning, and allocate resources rationally so that we can 
develop in depth and spur S&amp;T development in China across the 
board. 
  -- Organize forces and tackle key technical problems in the 
production technology of industry and agriculture, the 
modernization of equipment, and social development. Work hard to 
spread S&amp;T achievements, expedite the technological 
transformation of traditional enterprises, raise the technical 
and managerial standards, and make every effort to increase the 
contribution rate of S&amp;T progress to economic growth from the 
current 30 percent or so to about 50 percent. 
  -- Develop high-tech vigorously. Speed up the 
commercialization, industrialization, and internationalization 
of high-tech achievements. Strive to make high-tech industrial 
development zones a success. Work hard to increase annual 
high-tech output value to more than 400 billion yuan within a 
decade, accounting for 8 percent or so of the nation's total 
exports, up from the current 4 percent. 
  -- Step up basic research. Given China's actual needs and 
its 
S&amp;T edge and economic strength, we should go all out to 
approach 
or match advanced international standards in some areas of basic 
research. Develop a host of world-class basic research 
institutions. 
  -- Give top priority to the nurturing and utilization of 
qualified personnel to develop an outstanding S&amp;T corps that 
can 
compete globally. 
  -- Gradually establish a new S&amp;T system that meets the 
basic 
requirements of the development of a socialist planned commodity 
economy, that can take advantage of the combined strengths of 
both planned management and market regulation, that is 
consistent with S&amp;T development principles, and that is 
closely 
related to the economy, giving each other mutual support. 
  -- Adhere to the principle of combining the absorption and 
assimilation of imported technology with self-development so 
that major equipment and whole sets of technology in the leading 
sectors of the economy can basically hold their own within the 
country and match foreign standards of the mid-1980's. 
  2) Guiding Principles 
  -- Implement unwaveringly the strategic policy: ``Economic 
development must depend on S&amp;T, S&amp;T work must orient 
itself to 
economic development.'' Insist that S&amp;T be the foremost 
productive forces. Promote a close union between S&amp;T and the 
economy, making the most of S&amp;T as a guide and engine of the 
economy and society. 
  -- Firmly implement the strategic concept of ``develop 
high-tech and industrialize.'' Concentrate forces on a few major 
high-tech fields and work vigorously to come up to the 
international standard and narrow the gap with the rest of the 
world. In a small number of areas where China has an edge, we 
should innovate diligently and try hard to catch up, scrambling 
to make significant breakthroughs. Take strong measures to speed 
up the creation of high-tech industries. 
  -- Implement the party's policy of ``value knowledge and 
respect qualified personnel'' firmly. Fully mobilize the 
initiative, enthusiasm, and creativity of vast numbers of S&amp;T 
personnel. 
  -- Persevere in deepening S&amp;T reform steadfastly. 
Establish a 
new mechanism that would help bring about S&amp;T progress, 
economic 
prosperity, and social development, and is full of vitality and 
energy. 
  -- Adhere to the principle of combining self-development 
with 
technical import unwaveringly and put China's traditional 
industry on a new technological base. 
  -- Promote international S&amp;T cooperation and exchange 
firmly. 
Formulate and improve a S&amp;T cooperation policy in accordance 
with the principle of equality and mutual benefit. Create an 
environment conducive to international cooperation and globalize 
Chinese S&amp;T. 
  Implementing the above-mentioned principles across the board 
is the basic guarantee that Chinese S&amp;T would advance in the 
right direction, that our S&amp;T development goals would be 
achieved by the end of the century, and a new phase in S&amp;T 
work 
would be ushered in in the next century. 
<H5>  2. Major Tasks in S&amp;T 1991-2000 </H5>
  The mission of S&amp;T in the 1990's, first of all, is to 
orient 
itself to the main battlefield of economic development, use 
S&amp;T, 
particularly electronic information and automation technology, 
to transform traditional industries, thereby modernizing the 
production technology and equipment of traditional industries, 
make management and operations scientific, and establish a 
resource-saving economy that conserves both energy and land and 
is low on consumption. A second mission is to develop high-tech 
selectively and bring about its industrialization. A third 
mission of S&amp;T is to score significant achievements in 
adjusting 
the relations between man and nature, particularly in such areas 
as population control, environmental protection, and the sound 
development and utilization of resources and energy. Fourth, 
S&amp;T 
must make progress on basic research. 
  Even as we carry out the above-mentioned tasks, we must take 
great care to popularize and apply the achievements of S&amp;T so 
that potential wealth is translated into real material wealth. 
An all-out effort must be mounted to develop electronic 
technology to generate enormous economic benefits and turn it 
into a pillar of the national economy. 
  1) Agricultural and Rural S&amp;T 
  Agriculture is the cornerstone of the national economy. A 
sustained growth in agricultural output is critical to steady 
national economic development and will determine the success or 
failure of socialism in China. China's enormous population 
pressure and relative resource shortages, particularly the 
shortage of arable land and water, determine that it has no 
choice but to stay the course of using S&amp;T to vitalize 
agriculture. 
  The development goals of agricultural S&amp;T in the next 
decade 
are: 
  -- Develop and popularize S&amp;T achievements and advanced 
and 
suitable production technology assiduously. Boost the 
contribution rate of S&amp;T progress to agricultural growth from 
the present 35 percent to about 50 percent within this century. 
  -- Raise the S&amp;T standard in principal sectors of 
agriculture, including farming, forestry, animal husbandry, and 
fishery to match advanced world standards of the early 1980's. 
Continue our leadership in the world in a few selected areas 
where we have an edge, such as soil improvement, 
multi-resistance crop breeding, and crossbreeding. 
  -- Raise the technical and managerial standards of township 
and town enterprises and state-run farms, increasing the 
contribution by S&amp;T progress to the growth in the gross 
output 
value of township and town enterprises and state farms to 40-50 
percent. 
  -- Form a fairly coherent organizational structure and work 
system for agricultural S&amp;T R&amp;D. Put together the 
rudiments of a 
rural S&amp;T service system suited to the requirements of the 
development of a rural commodity economy. 
  Major Tasks: Stepping up the development and diffusion of 
S&amp;T 
achievements is the foremost task of agricultural workers in the 
next decade, particularly during the Eighth Five-Year Plan. By 
implementing the ``Spark Plan,'' ``Bumper Harvest Plan,'' 
``Torch Plan,'' achievement diffusion plans and other 
development and diffusion activities in all shapes and forms, 
the government shall boost the existing agricultural S&amp;T 
achievement popularization rate (including forestry and water 
conservancy) to 60 percent and above. 
  -- Concentrate our efforts on solving a number of major 
technical problems to promote agricultural development. 
  Breeding of good strains in agriculture, forestry, animal 
husbandry, and aquaculture. During the Eighth Five-Year Plan: 
About 250 new crop strains will be bred, increasing output by 
over 10 percent, and the varieties of major crops shall be 
changed once. In forestry, 120 new fine varieties of trees will 
be developed, increasing timber volume 10 to 20 percent. The 
popularization of improved breeds of livestock and aquatic 
products shall reach 30 percent. The focus of crop breeding is 
to increase output and resistance without sacrificing quality. 
The emphasis is on the development of grains, cotton, and 
oil-bearing crops. 
  Developing and tackling the problems of agricultural regions 
comprehensively: During the Eighth Five-Year Plan, we shall 
concentrate on five low- and medium-yield regions, namely Huang 
Hai-Huai Hai, the Song-Nen-Yi three-river plain, northern arid 
region, loess plateau, and red and yellow earth in the south, 
and set up 50 agricultural development demonstration areas of 
different types where problems are to be tackled 
comprehensively. The intensive production of crops, timber, 
livestock, and aquatic products will be provided with 
cultivation and livestock-raising technology. This will 
scientifically and technically guarantee high yields in the five 
regions mentioned above with a combined area of about 800 
million mu of low- and medium-yield farmland. 
  The rational development, utilization, and protection of 
agricultural natural resources: In the next decade, we must 
develop and utilize agricultural natural resources rationally, 
limit the destruction of agricultural natural resources and the 
agricultural ecological environment, and step up the monitoring 
and evaluation of farmland, pasture, forests, beaches, and 
bodies of waters in earnest. Put forward rational development 
and comprehensive utilization plans. 
  Agricultural engineering and technology and the 
transportation, storage, processing, and comprehensive 
utilization of agricultural products: Develop agricultural 
technical installations. Research and develop mechanized 
equipment necessary for farming and aquaculture on an 
appropriate scale as well as the storage, transportation, and 
processing of agricultural products. Study comprehensive 
utilization technology for crop straw, rice cakes, waste 
residues, and waste liquids, which would increase fodder 
resources. 
  -- Stimulate S&amp;T progress in township and town 
enterprises 
and state farms. To guide township and town enterprises to rely 
on S&amp;T progress and follow the intensive development road, 
300 
pillar industries and 100 regional development zones are to be 
built during the Eighth Five-Year Plan, 100 sets of advanced and 
suitable equipment will be provided, and 2 million qualified 
S&amp;T 
workers in a variety of fields will be trained so that township 
and town enterprises and major industries like construction and 
building materials, textiles and apparel, light industry, and 
the fodder industry will gradually form themselves into groups 
and become progressively more professionalized and modernized. 
Select a number of state farms and collective farms as 
demonstration sites for intensive operation and scale 
management; work on transforming them into agricultural 
factories. 
  2) Energy 
  Energy is a key engine of national economic development. It 
is the mission of China's energy S&amp;T to provide the technical 
support for developing and conserving energy. 
  Development goals of energy S&amp;T in the next decade: 
  -- Fifty percent of the principal technical equipment in the 
energy industry should match advanced world standards of the 
late 1980's. Plants that exist in large numbers in many places 
should basically be able to hold their own within the nation. In 
the major energy-consuming industries, 20 percent of their 
equipment should be of the energy-efficient type. 
  The tasks in the Eighth Five-Year Plan are: 
  -- Solve the technical problems relating to large open-cut 
coal mines, coal layers which are hard to exploit, and deep coal 
seams. The emphasis is on comprehensive mechanized tunneling and 
support plants. Develop comprehensive mining technology and 
equipment for providing 10,000 tons of coal a day. Provide 
technical assurance against serious coal mine accidents. 
  -- To tap the resource potential of old coal fields in the 
east and exploit low-permeability oil deposits and oil and gas 
reserves in complex block oil-fields. We should perfect thick 
oil steam removal technology. Speed up the experiment involving 
the industrialization of polymer oil removal. Achieve major 
breakthroughs in three-time oil-recovery and horizontal well 
drilling technology. Develop technology for prospecting, 
recovering, and transporting oil and gas in deserts, on beaches, 
and offshore. 
  -- Develop advanced technology for building high-dam power 
stations and for navigation in conjunction with the development 
of hydro-electric resources in the upper reaches of the Huang 
He, the upper and middle reaches of the Chang Jiang and its 
tributaries, as well as the drainage area of the Hong Shui He. 
Develop large capacity high-parameter power generation 
technology and long-range power transmission technology. 
  -- Master the technology for building pressurized-water 
reactor nuclear power plants, with emphasis on the 600,000-kW 
power plant. Develop advanced nuclear fuel recycling technology. 
Complete the development of technology for building 200-megawatt 
low-temperature nuclear heat supply reactors. 
  -- Develop a variety of coal-burning and gasification 
technologies to suit different purposes. Develop technologies 
for the circulating fluidized-bed, pressurized fluidized-bed, 
and coal gasification combined power generation. 
  -- Develop a high-power wind generator, high-efficiency 
low-cost solar energy, and non-mineral energy sources such as 
hydrogen. 
  3) Transportation 
  Transportation is the artery of the national economy, 
indispensable to developing the economy and society and 
improving people's livelihood. 
  The goals and tasks of the development of transportation 
S&amp;T 
in the next decade are: 
  Provide S&amp;T guarantee that transportation capacity and 
transportation efficiency will increase significantly, with an 
increase in benefits; that Chinese transportation will gradually 
be based on modern infrastructural facilities, technology, 
equipment, and management; and that an integrated transportation 
system will be created. 
  -- Rail transport. Use advanced and appropriate technology 
to 
speed up new line construction and the overhauling of old 
railroad tracks. Gradually bring about motive power 
electrification, the popularization of the diesel engine, the 
modernization of transportation management, and the automation 
of transportation control. Further improve and diffuse 
heavy-duty transportation technology. Research and develop the 
second-generation heavy-duty unit train, MAGLEV train, and new 
locomotives. Develop a coherent high-speed train technology. 
During the Eighth Five-Year Plan, we should increase the 
operating capacity of the heavy-duty unit train on the 
Dalian-Qinghuangdao line to 10,000 tons, and put the 160 
km-per-hour high-speed passenger and freight train into service. 
Also, we should launch research to develop the technology for 
building a special line for a 200 km-per-hour high-speed freight 
and passenger train. 
  -- Highway transportation. Gradually put together a system 
of 
national arterial roads made up of high-grade roads and highways 
to bring about high-speed high-efficiency motorized 
transportation, at the same time making possible the use of 
large trucks. Efforts should be made to achieve the 
modernization of road design, construction, repair and 
maintenance, management, and transportation services while 
continuing to perfect the technology for building high-grade 
asphalt highways. During the Eighth Five-Year Plan, we should 
concentrate on the development of technology to build cement or 
concrete road surfaces and the R&amp;D of road construction 
(maintenance) machinery, testing equipment, safety control 
systems, new highway passenger vehicles, and special trailers. 
  -- Waterborne transportation. Build an ocean-going fleet 
fitted with advanced technology and equipment. Form a 
high-efficiency north-south waterborne transportation system 
with large-tonnage vessels as its backbone. Work hard to develop 
shipping on the main tributaries of the river systems of the 
Chang Jiang, Zhu Jiang, and Heilong Jiang. Develop and 
popularize container transportation, the transportation of large 
quantities of bulk cargo, mixed passenger-cargo transportation, 
and barge transportation on inland waterways. During the Eighth 
Five-Year Plan, we should concentrate on the development of 
technology for dredging the waterways in the estuaries and a 
host of essential dredging equipment. Research and develop 
high-speed passenger vessels for inland rivers, large 
shallow-water vessels, and self-loading vessels. Develop 
high-efficiency, low-energy consumption harbor loading and 
unloading equipment and maritime transportation control systems. 
  -- Civil aviation. Achieve breakthroughs in the design and 
manufacture of trunk carriers and helicopters. By the end of 
this century, China should have the basic capacity to design and 
manufacture 150- to 200-seat trunk carriers and light 
helicopters. Continue to develop and refine technology to ensure 
aviation safety and operating management technology. 
  -- Pipeline transportation. Master the technology for 
transporting a range of petroleum products through pipelines 
under adverse conditions or special conditions. Achieve hermetic 
transportation and optimal transportation. Build a system of 
pipelines capable of transporting a substantial volume of coal 
each year. Research focuses in the Eighth Five-Year Plan: 
Long-distance large-diameter pipeline transportation technology 
and equipment to carry oil from the deserts of Xinjiang. 
  4) Raw Materials 
  Raw materials are the cornerstone of national economic 
development. The goals of the development of the S&amp;T of raw 
materials in the next decades are: 
  -- Increase varieties. Improve quality. Adjust the mix of 
varieties. As far as raw materials are concerned, their variety 
and quality must come up to advanced world standards of the 
early 1980's in order to meet the requirements of the 
development of all industries and trades in the national economy. 
  -- Expedite the absorption and assimilation of imported 
technology and innovation. More and more petroleum equipment 
must be made in China. The production technology and whole 
plants of large raw material enterprises shall match the most 
advanced in the world in the 1980's. 
  -- Use microelectronics technology to overhaul raw materials 
traditional production technology. Electronics technology shall 
be widely adopted in the next decade in product design, 
production automatic control, and management in large and 
mid-sized enterprises in such industries as iron and steel, 
nonferrous metals, chemical industry, petrochemicals, and 
building materials. 
  -- Develop technology for the comprehensive utilization of 
resources and other technology that can save energy and lower 
consumption, thus providing technical support for the 
transformation of the traditional technologies of the raw 
materials industry. 
  Missions in the Eighth Five-Year Plan: 
  -- Iron and steel industry. Concentrate on solving the 
S&amp;T 
problems related to ore mining, smelting, and rolling. Create 
breakthroughs in new mining technology, blast furnace oxygen 
intensified iron making, direct current and plasma steel-making, 
and medium-width continuous casting rolling technology. The 
variety and quality of steel products should be such that they 
can meet the requirements of the development of industries like 
energy, transportation, machinery, electronics, light and 
textile industries. 
  -- Nonferrous metals. Develop energy-saving comprehensive 
technology focusing on aluminum and technology for the 
comprehensive utilization of multiple inter-grown metals to 
provide technical support for the development of lead, zinc, and 
copper. Study multiple processing technology for resources like 
tungsten which are found in abundance in China. 
  -- Chemical industry. Make the development of advanced 
large-scale production technology the top priority, focusing on 
the domestication of the production technology and equipment of 
such industries as petrochemical, chemical fertilizer, plastics, 
and agricultural plastic film. Speed up innovation in industries 
turning out chemical industrial products like agricultural 
pesticides and dyes and go all out to develop high-grade, 
precision, and fine products, so that about 70 percent of 
chemical industrial products reach international and advanced 
foreign standards. 
  -- Building materials. Concentrate on the R&amp;D and 
vigorous 
diffusion of energy-saving technology and residual heat 
utilization technology. Reduce energy consumption in the 
building materials industry significantly. Develop multiple 
processing technology for non-metallic materials. 
  5) Machinery 
  The machine industry provides equipment to the national 
economy, a key gauge of a nation's S&amp;T level and economic 
strength. 
  The S&amp;T development goals of the machine industry in 
the next 
decade and its missions in the Eighth Five-Year Plan are as 
follows: 
  --Concentrate on the development of whole sets of technical 
equipment and plants in such key areas as agriculture, energy, 
transportation, and raw materials. Accelerate the absorption and 
assimilation of imported technology and equipment. Enhance our 
capacity for self-development, self-design, and 
self-manufacturing so as to achieve the commercialized 
production of large hydropower stations, thermal power plants, 
power transmission and transformation facilities, and other 
equipment in metallurgy, mining, and chemical industry, with the 
overall technical standard catching up with the world standards 
of the late 1980's. Focus in the Eighth Five-Year Plan: Master 
and develop 300,000- and 600,000-kW sub-critical thermal power 
plants, 600,000-kW nuclear power generating plants, 
500,000-voltage alternating current and direct current power 
transmission and transforming equipment, large continuous 
rolling and large mining equipment, large chemical fertilizer 
manufacturing plants, and equipment capable of producing 300,000 
tons of ethylene each year. 
  -- Research and develop basic machinery and related basic 
parts. During the Eighth Five-Year Plan, concentrate on 
mastering the technology essential to the design and manufacture 
of basic machinery and parts and components. Improve product 
quality and the technical standard to meet the requirements of 
the development of the machinery and equipment industry. 
  -- Develop technology for the integration of electrical 
machinery as well as advanced design and manufacturing 
technology and testing and sensing technology. Make a 
breakthrough in key simulating technology in the integration of 
electrical machinery during the Eighth Five-Year Plan. Develop 
and popularize numerical control machines, number-displaying 
measuring instruments, and automatic instruments, etc., where 
electronic information technology meets precision machinery, 
thus significantly lifting the technical standard and quality of 
mechanical products. By 2000, 30 to 40 percent of the major 
electrical mechanical products shall reach advanced world 
standards of the 1990's, integrated electrical mechanical 
products shall account for about 15 percent of all electrical 
mechanical products, and enterprises having adopted CAM 
technology shall account for 5 to 10 percent of all large and 
mid-sized enterprises. 
  -- Raise the design and manufacturing standards in the 
automobile and shipbuilding industries. By the end of the Eighth 
Five-Year Plan, the automobile industry shall be using mostly 
Chinese-made parts and components. The principal types of 
civilian-use ships such as tankers and off-shore oil platforms 
shall be performing on a par with those in the rest of the world. 
  6) Light and Textile Industries 
  Light and textile industries are an important component of 
the national economy, a key source of state accumulation funds 
and foreign exchange. 
  The development goals of the light and textile industries in 
the next 10 years are: 
  Intensify the research and development of new technology, 
new 
processes, and new products. Increase the added value of 
products. Accelerate the technical transformation of small and 
mid-sized enterprises and lower their consumption of energy and 
materials. By the year 2000, the technical equipment of key 
sectors of the light and textile industries should be as 
advanced as the best in the world in the 1980's, while a major 
effort should be made to approach or match standards of the 
early 1990's in the case of some key pieces of equipment. New 
products and new varieties under research and development shall 
increase from the current 100,000 to 300,000. About 40 percent 
of the products shall be as good as their foreign counterparts 
in the late 1980's and early 1990's in terms of quality. S&amp;T 
progress shall account for 40 to 50 percent of the increase in 
the gross output value of the light and textile industries. 
  The major tasks of the S&amp;T of the light and textile 
industries during the Eighth Five-Year Plan are: 
  Improve the overall standard of light industrial and textile 
products. Develop die design, manufacturing, decorating, and 
packaging technologies common to both light and textile 
industries. 
  -- Develop new technology and new equipment for the salt, 
paper making, and ceramics industries. 
  -- Develop large-scale production technology for the 
chemical 
fiber raw materials industry. Improve post-printing fabric 
processing and surface finishing technology and the standard of 
cotton spinning equipment. 
  -- Study and popularize the use of electronic technology in 
the design, processing, and testing stages of the production 
process in the light and textile industries. 
  7) High-Tech Research and High-Tech Industries 
  High-tech and high-tech industries will be our tower of 
strength as we compete globally in the 21st century. China must 
develop its own high-tech and high-tech industries, vastly raise 
its labor productivity, and find its place in the international 
high-tech field. 
  The development goals of high-tech and high-tech industries 
in China in the next 10 years are: 
  In some high-tech areas where China has an edge, it shall 
keep up with developments in the world, make significant 
advances in the major technologies, step up applied research and 
engineering development, and diffuse high-tech achievements to 
form high-tech industries. High-tech research and 
industrialization shall be incorporated into the ``863'' 
high-tech national research plan as well as the plan to attack 
key technical problems and the ``Torch Plan,'' respectively. 
Concentrate on the development of electronic information, 
computers and computer software, communications, biotechnology, 
automation, new-generation energy sources and new materials, 
superconductivity, laser, and other high-technologies. 
  -- Biotechnology. Score new breakthroughs on three levels: 
keeping up with high-tech developments, applied research, and 
the establishment of a high-tech industry. During the Eighth 
Five-Year Plan, the industry shall provide technical support for 
new developments in traditional industries like agriculture, 
medicine, and light and textile industries. Continue to research 
hybrid rice and popularize it on a large scale to boost output 
10 to 15 percent. Study new resistant strains of wheat, rice, 
and other major grains. Cut back on the use of pesticides 
significantly while ensuring increases in grain output. Launch 
gene-mapping plant research and make every effort to score 
research successes. Protein engineering: Keep up with 
international developments in protein structural evaluation, 
molecular design, and orientation transformation; develop one to 
two kinds of genetically engineered vaccines and new drugs and 
develop the capacity to export them. Launch 12 to 13 high-tech 
products with major economic and social benefits and put them on 
the market, gradually giving rise to the industry of 
biotechnology. 
  -- Microelectronics. The emphasis here is on silicon. During 
the Eighth Five-Year Plan, integrated circuitry shall be 
upgraded from the current 3 microns to 0.5 microns, production 
technology from the present 5 microns to 0.8 microns. Intensify 
research on gallium-arsenide large-scale integrated circuitry 
and master the production technology of small and medium-sized 
gallium arsenide integrated circuits. By the year 2000, 60 
percent of the domestic demand for large-scale integrated 
circuits shall be met by Chinese products. The R&amp;D of special 
equipment, testing instruments, and special materials shall also 
be a priority if we are to build a microelectronics industry 
that is rooted in China and has a capacity for self-development. 
  -- Photoelectronics technology. Develop a range of new 
electronic instruments and systems integrated technology to be 
used in remote sensing, calculation, and communications. Focus 
on the development of high-fiber-optical communications and 
optical calculation systems target products. Seek breakthroughs 
in the R&amp;D of key parts and components and in unit 
technology. 
  -- Space applied technology. Launch research on information 
acquisition and real-time signal processing technology revolving 
around space-to-ground observation and the monitoring of aerial 
targets. Conduct research on space materials and life sciences 
in conjunction with the development application of space 
microgravity. During the Eighth Five-Year Plan, we should focus 
on the R&amp;D of satellite-carried synthetic aperture radar, 
imaging spectroscope, and other new remote sensors. Make 
breakthroughs in the real-time satellite-to-ground transmission 
and processing technology of remotely sensed dynamic images and 
information as well as the applied technology of global spatial 
orientation systems. 
  -- Computer technology. The major missions are to build up 
China's own computer industry and increase the computer 
industry's share of the GNP from 3 to 4 percent and the market 
share of Chinese-made computers from the present 60 to 80 
percent. During the Eighth Five-Year Plan, we must make 
breakthroughs in the production technology of top-of-the-line 
microcomputers, work station systems, 32-bit minicomputer, large 
computer systems (the fourth generation), and key peripherals. 
Research and develop a computer system that behaves with basic 
intelligence and is geared toward intelligent applications. 
  -- Software technology. Concentrate on intelligent software 
development methods and tools. Create a software engineering 
development environment. Make breakthroughs in automated 
technology for software products production. Introduce a series 
of self-copyrighted software products and gradually form a 
software industry. 
  -- Communications technology. Press ahead in the direction 
of 
digitization, Use advanced communications technology to 
transform existing communications networks and monitor 
developments in communications technology in the world. During 
the Eighth Five-Year Plan, concentrate on the research of DS5 
fiber optic communications system, establish the experimental 
phase of DS5 fiber optic cable communications system, and 
conduct research on the 900 megahertz digital moving 
communications system. Make breakthroughs in the ATM technology 
of integrated wide-band digital network, satellite 
communication, digital microwave, block exchange, and fiber 
optical communications technology, and high-compressibility 
information sources processing technology. 
  -- Automation technology. We shall be geared toward 
application and go about working on four levels--tracking 
research, tackling difficult technical problems, developing 
target products, and applied engineering. During the Eighth 
Five-Year Plan, a CIMS experimenting and research center is to 
be set up, along with seven unit laboratories. Four CIMS applied 
factories are to be designed and built and a host of target 
products involving key technologies are to be developed. The 
robot demonstration and experimentation assembly line is to be 
completed. Research and develop five types of robots: a 
remote-controlled mobile working robot for use in the nuclear 
power industry, a wall-climbing inspection robot, a robot which 
can work under adverse conditions, an underwater wireless robot, 
and a robot fitted with precision instruments. 
  -- A new generation of energy sources. Complete the design 
of 
the 10,000-kW coal-fired MHD-steam combined cycle intermediate 
demonstration power plant and the construction of some of the 
facilities. Complete the design of 60,000-kW experimental fast 
breeder reactor and the first-phase of construction. Complete in 
part the construction of 10,000-kW high-temperature gas-cooled 
reactor. Complete the preliminary design of the hybrid reactor. 
  -- New materials technology. Focus on applied research and 
industrialization. Keep up with the technology of a new 
generation of materials and innovate on it. Develop a host of 
essential materials for national defense build-up, high-tech 
development, and the technological transformation of traditional 
industries, and create a new materials industry. By the year 
2000 the annual output value of China's new materials industry 
should reach 30 billion yuan. During the Eighth Five-Year Plan, 
we should concentrate on the development of electronic 
information materials, high-performance compound materials, new 
metallic materials, new high-polymer materials, superconducting 
materials, new ceramic materials, and biological functional 
materials. Establish about 20 development and testing bases for 
new material engineering and technology. 
  -- Superconducting technology. The emphasis here is on the 
research of practical and mature technology for high-temperature 
superconducting materials, high-temperature superconducting 
films, and high-temperature superconducting devices, going all 
out to make substantive breakthroughs. Also, explore the 
practical applications of low-temperature superconductivity. 
  -- Laser technology. The emphasis here is to conduct 
research 
on laser processing, laser testing, and new high-power laser 
devices. Develop a flexible laser processing system as well as 
laser devices and equipment for use in medicine so as to create 
a new laser industry. 
  8) High-Tech and New Tech Industrial Development Zones 
  The establishment of high-tech and new-tech industrial 
development zones is an essential part of China's strategy to 
develop high and new-tech industries. It will have enormous 
significance for converting high-tech achievements into direct 
productive forces without delay, speeding up the transition of 
China's high-tech industries, accelerating he transformation of 
traditional industries, enhancing the standing and 
competitiveness of Chinese commodities on the world market, and 
spurring economic, social, and S&amp;T developments in China. 
  The goals of high and new-tech development zones and their 
major tasks in the next decade are: 
  -- Commercialize, industrialize, and internationalize 
high-tech achievements. Launch a host of ``Torch Plan'' 
projects, of which 70 percent will be manufactured on a large 
scale and 30 percent will be exported to earn foreign exchange. 
Build a number of large-scale modern enterprises and enterprise 
groups each with hundreds of millions of yuan worth of output to 
take part in international competition. 
  -- The development zones will become bases of high-tech 
industries, from which the transformation of traditional 
industries using high-tech will spread far and wide; they will 
become the laboratories of the drive to deepen S&amp;T reform and 
the windows to the world. 
  -- Support and encourage S&amp;T personnel from scientific 
research organizations, colleges and universities, and large and 
mid-sized enterprises to enter development zones to found high- 
and new-tech enterprises of all forms and shapes, dominated by 
collective ownership. Nurture a host of S&amp;T entrepreneurs who 
are professionally skilled but also adept at management. 
  -- Develop high-tech industries, focusing primarily on 
electronic information, biotechnology, new materials, space and 
aviation, new energy sources and high-efficiency 
fuel-conservation, ecological science, oceanic engineering, 
laser technology, biomedical engineering, and radiation 
technology. Develop the various development zones selectively. 
  -- Develop high-tech industries, with the enterprises 
adopting an operating mechanism that gives them decision-making 
authority in their operations but requires them to be 
responsible for their own profits and losses and to achieve 
self-development and self-discipline. 
  9) Development of Enterprise Technology 
  Enterprises are the key players in the national economy, the 
meeting point between S&amp;T and the economy. The development of 
technology by enterprises and the application of the 
achievements are the fountainhead of enterprise progress. 
  The tasks of enterprise technological development in the 
next 
10 years are: 
  -- The development of basic products and their advanced 
technology. Focus on basic mechanical devices, electric parts, 
moulds, and related raw materials. Expedite the drive to improve 
the technical performance of finished industrial products and 
quicken their turnover. 
  -- Development of product design technology. The priorities 
are to develop design technology for advanced products, master 
CAD, and work hard to use it in conjunction with CAM in order to 
enhance China's capacity for industrial product design and 
development. 
  -- Development of key production technology and testing 
technology. Revolving around energy conservation, consumption 
reduction, and product quality improvement, we shall work to 
enhance the efficiency of modern enterprise management and 
overall enterprise quality. 
  During the Eighth Five-Year Plan, 251 large and mid-sized 
mainstay enterprises from among all industrial and 
transportation enterprises in the nation are to be selected for 
technological transformation, depending on the direction of 
product mix adjustment and industrial structure adjustment and 
the requirements of enterprise S&amp;T progress. The products of 
these enterprises should reach advanced world standards, thus 
working their way into the ranks of the best in the world and 
becoming the main force to compete with their international 
counterparts in the same industry. Seventeen good-quality 
products should be developed; they shall be widely used, boast 
advanced technical performance, be strongly competitive, and 
enjoy an international reputation. They shall change the look of 
industrial production in China notably. Select 20 pieces of key 
technology that are advanced, practical and commonly used for 
dissemination in enterprise technological transformation so as 
to raise to a new level the equipment and materials used in 
traditional industries. 
  10) Social Development 
  A rapidly growing population, relative resource shortages, 
and a deteriorating ecological environment are exerting 
tremendous pressure on China socially and economically. 
  The S&amp;T goals of social development in China in the next 
decade are: 
  Through R&amp;D, we must come up with a host of S&amp;T 
achievements 
to control population growth, improve the quality and health of 
the people, develop and utilize resources properly, protect the 
ecology, and prevent natural disasters. That way the state of 
society would be improved. 
  To achieve the above mentioned objectives, the S&amp;T work 
of 
social development will tackle the following major tasks in the 
next 10 years, including the implementation of the ``Man and 
Nature Research Project:'' 
  -- Population. Focus on population control technology. 
Develop advanced S&amp;T to improve the quality of the 
population. 
During the Eighth Five-Year Plan, we shall concentrate on 
improving the existing birth control technologies and developing 
new birth control devices and drugs. Step up research on 
eugenics and good parenting. Put together the rudiments of a 
computer information system on demographic statistics and 
demographic trends management. 
  -- Medicine and public health. Step up research on the 
prevention and treatment of malignant tumors, heart diseases, 
brain diseases, vascular diseases, major infectious diseases, 
endemic diseases, and occupational diseases, using both Chinese 
medicine and Western medicine. Intensify clinical studies on 
Chinese medicine and herbal medicine as well as research on new 
drugs and new medical equipment and devices. 
  -- Geological prospecting. Work out a number of key 
technological problems relating to the search for mineral 
deposits. During the Eighth Five-Year Plan, we must concentrate 
on the prospecting and assessment of mineral resources that are 
in short supply. Prospect and conduct studies on large mineral 
bases in Xinjiang with their precious and non-ferrous metals to 
provide a resource basis for the establishment of large mineral 
bases. 
  -- Water resources. Establish a water resources management 
science and take the first steps toward ameliorating the water 
shortage problem in northern China and leading cities. During 
the Eighth Five-Year Plan, we must put forward a strategic plan 
to harness the Huang He and Chang Jiang and develop their 
basins. Select areas to experiment with rapid river harnessing. 
Put forward a water resources supply-demand analysis and an 
optimal regulation plan and formulate management methods. 
  -- Oceanic development. Launch research on the quantitative 
forecasting of disastrous maritime environments and key 
technologies for the coastal environment. Select the continental 
shelf and certain sensitive areas in the exclusive economic zone 
for experiments in comprehensive prospecting and resource 
assessment. Acquire a clear knowledge of the natural 
environmental elements in Chinese islands and surrounding 
waters. Propose a comprehensive development and utilization plan. 
  -- Environmental protection and the prevention of natural 
disasters. Concentrate on the prevention and treatment of 
urban-rural environmental pollution and the prevention of major 
natural disasters. Provide S&amp;T guarantee for the protection 
of 
all ecological systems and nature preserves and soil and land 
restoration and improvement. Pay attention to and step up 
research on global environmental problems. During the Eighth 
Five-Year Plan, we shall give priority to the research on 
technology to prevent disastrous climatic conditions, 
earthquakes, and geological disasters as well as research on 
urban disaster reduction. 
  -- Social public security. Step up research on technology to 
prevent law and order disasters and new technology to 
investigate and manage such disasters. During the Eighth 
Five-Year Plan, concentrate on research on public order 
protective technology, intelligence-gathering technology, and 
material evidence identification technology. 
  -- Use of electronics in tertiary industry. Gradually set up 
an information network for the tertiary industry. Speed up 
computerization of banking, finance, and tax collection. 
Research and develop commercial commodity circulation technology 
and equipment. 
  -- Comprehensive experiments and pilot projects in social 
development. Work hard to set up about 30 testing sites during 
the Eighth Five-Year Plan and replicate them across the nation 
to enable S&amp;T to guide steady social development. 
  11) Basic Research 
  Basic research is the back-up force for both S&amp;T 
development 
and social development. It is the precursor and fountainhead of 
new tech and new inventions, the cradle of qualified personnel. 
  The goals of basic research in the next 10 years are: Launch 
multi-disciplinary comprehensive studies closely revolving 
around the strategic focuses of national economic 
development--agriculture, energy, materials, and 
information--and such major issues as population, medicine, 
resources, the ecology, and natural disasters. Provide the 
theoretical foundation and technical base for problem-solving 
and produce a host of major achievements that meet advanced 
world standards. 
  -- Nurture scientists who are highly accomplished 
academically and have significant influence on the international 
scientific community. Gradually form a corps of basic 
researchers with a balanced mix. It should be headed by 
outstanding young and middle-aged academic leaders. 
  -- Take solid steps to make a success out of key national 
laboratories and research institutes and centers that conduct 
basic research, gradually forming a number of integrated 
scientific research centers. Create an environment conducive to 
basic research. Create a new system favorable to mobility, 
cooperation, and competition. 
  The main substance and direction of basic research during 
the 
Eight Five-Year Plan: 
  -- Continue to support free project selection by scientists, 
keeping the total at about 20,000. 
  -- Building on the achievements of free selection of 
research 
topics by scientists, we should select 200-300 major topics in 
basic research in basic disciplines and applied basic 
disciplines that impact national economic and social development 
significantly and promise to have widespread applications. 
  For cutting-edge disciplines in which major breakthroughs 
are 
expected within this century and where China has an edge and is 
a leader in the world, and for major basic research which has 
important future applications and can put to use China's 
geographical and resource advantages, the state will treat them 
individually as separate major research projects. 
  12) Military S&amp;T [omitted in original] 
  13) Qualified S&amp;T Personnel 
  Qualified personnel are a prerequisite for the development 
of 
S&amp;T and economic revitalization. The acceleration of the 
build-up of a S&amp;T corps for China must be a top priority in 
national development. 
  The goals and missions in the next decade are: Steadily 
increase the size of the S&amp;T corps. Rationalize its structure 
and levels. Raise the level of scientific research notably. 
Nurture and develop an outstanding S&amp;T corps that meets the 
requirements of the four modernizations and can compete globally 
at a S&amp;T level: 
  -- Over time we should aim to achieve national 
self-sufficiency as far as the training of high-level S&amp;T 
personnel is concerned by working hard to put together several 
successful mainstay institutions of higher education. 
Institutions of higher education are the bases for training 
S&amp;T 
personnel. Also important as an incubator of S&amp;T personnel 
are 
scientific research institutions and large enterprises above the 
provincial, autonomous regional, and municipal levels. Economic 
development, scientific research, technical development, and the 
development of qualified personnel must be organically 
integrated. 
  Make the most of institutions of higher education. Identify 
a 
number of colleges and universities for special assistance, 
building them up as both educational centers and scientific 
research centers which can turn out high-level S&amp;T personnel 
even as they help solve major national S&amp;T problems. 
  Put key national laboratories and open departmental 
laboratories to the best possible use by conducting basic 
research and high-tech research there and turning out 
academically accomplished S&amp;T personnel. 
  Attach importance to the role senior experts in the 
industrial sector can play in training application-oriented 
high-level personnel. Conduct pilot programs in which 
institutions of higher education train graduate students jointly 
with large enterprises and scientific research institutions. 
Insist that people on the job be allowed to pursue an academic 
degree. Gradually expand part-time graduate programs for working 
people. Intensify continuing education for S&amp;T personnel. 
  -- Reform higher education. Turn out the necessary personnel 
schooled in basic disciplines and a substantial number of 
managerial experts. All specialties at the undergraduate level 
shall emphasize developing their students' comprehensive 
analytical abilities and practical problem-solving skills and 
enhance their graduates' adaptability to future work. Vocational 
education must highlight theoretical and practical training and 
intensify the development of practical abilities. 
  -- Make the most of S&amp;T personnel. Leaders at all levels 
should be adept at identifying talent and utilizing it, tapping 
qualified personnel in a variety of ways. Create an environment 
that helps young S&amp;T personnel demonstrate their talents. 
Solve 
the problem of talent under-utilization both institutionally and 
mechanically by changing the system and mechanism gradually. 
  Intensify ideological and political work aimed at S&amp;T 
personnel. Encourage them to work hard to scale new heights and 
make even greater contributions to the modernization of the 
nation. 
  -- Take practical steps to improve the working conditions of 
S&amp;T personnel and to raise their pay. During the Eighth 
Five-Year Plan, the wage level of S&amp;T personnel must 
basically 
be on a par with that of similar personnel in enterprises owned 
by the people. Subsidies should be paid at regular intervals to 
10,000 experts who have made important contributions. As far as 
S&amp;T personnel who undertake national scientific tasks are 
concerned, the state shall offer them a subsidy tied to their 
positions. Preferential remuneration should be paid to S&amp;T 
personnel working in the countryside, in remote border areas, 
underground, in the field, or under hazardous conditions. 
Research institutions making a profit should link their total 
payroll to the size of their profits. 
  Abolish the life tenure of technical positions and establish 
a regular promotion system so that more outstanding personnel 
have a chance to demonstrate their talents. 
  Priority should be given to solving the housing problems of 
young and middle-aged S&amp;T personnel who have made outstanding 
contributions, people who have returned to China upon completing 
their studies overseas, and senior S&amp;T personnel. Housing 
construction for scientific research units and institutions of 
higher education shall be one of the top recipients of capital 
construction investments during the Eighth Five-Year Plan and 
will be given funding priority. 
  14) Soft Science Research 
  A new area in modern S&amp;T development, soft science has 
become 
an important component of China's S&amp;T enterprise. Developing 
soft science research is a reliable guarantee that policy-making 
will become scientific and democratic. 
  The principal goals of soft science research in China in the 
next 10 years are: 
  -- Conduct multi-discipline multi-level comprehensive 
research by revolving closely around the major policy matters 
relating to the use of S&amp;T to promote economic and social 
development. Put forward problem-solving plans, measures, and 
policies. 
  -- Use modern scientific theories, methods, and tools to 
track soft science developments in certain fields overseas. Work 
hard to obtain a number of major breakthroughs. Train a host of 
soft science researchers who wield international influence. 
Raise soft science research to a new level. 
  -- Establish and perfect a soft science research network and 
foster the development of an S&amp;T consulting industry into an 
important industry in the tertiary sector by making full use of 
present human and material resources and taking proper measures. 
  The major missions of soft science research during the 
Eighth 
Five-Year Plan are: 
  -- Conduct research on long- and medium-range S&amp;T 
development 
strategy, major S&amp;T policies, S&amp;T areas slated for 
priority 
development, international development trends, and China's 
response in order to provide a scientific basis for national 
macro policy-making. 
  -- Formulate a medium- and long-range S&amp;T reform plan 
for the 
nation, including the goals, missions, and direction for each 
stage. Explore ways of combining S&amp;T planned management with 
market regulation and the forms such a union can take. 
  -- Study and assess the way in which major economic and 
S&amp;T 
policies, whether national, departmental, or local, have been 
implemented. Set up a system of assessment, a body of criteria, 
an assessment model, and methods of assessment. 
  -- Continue research on the theories and methods of soft 
science. Expedite the development and application of soft 
science. 
<H5>  3. Basic Goals and Major Tasks of Deepening S&amp;T Reform </H5>
  In the spirit of the ``Decision of the CPC Central Committee 
on S&amp;T Reform,'' S&amp;T reform in the 1980's has scored 
striking 
successes, tentatively creating a new operating mechanism that 
combines S&amp;T with the economy. The self-development capacity 
of 
S&amp;T work as well as its ability to serve economic development 
has been enhanced. The organizational framework of a 
multi-player, multi-form, and multi-function system dominated by 
public ownership but featuring a multitude of coexisting 
ownership systems is now in place. The S&amp;T personnel 
management 
system is off to a good start. S&amp;T work is set to develop in 
depth. Be that as it may, whatever reform that has been 
introduced has not fundamentally replaced the traditional 
system, so reform must be deepened by building on and improving 
the existing policies and measures. Every effort should be made 
to tentatively put together a new system favorable to economic 
development and S&amp;T progress by the end of this century, spur 
S&amp;T work to serve the planned commodity economy even better, 
shift economic development onto a new course of relying on 
S&amp;T 
progress and improving the workers' caliber, and further tap and 
liberate the foremost productive forces, S&amp;T. 
  The major tasks of deepening S&amp;T reform are: 
  1) Reform Planned Management and Strengthen the Market 
Regulatory Mechanism. 
  Major S&amp;T tasks that have an impact on the nation's 
economy 
and people's livelihood shall be organized and put together by 
government departments in accordance with the plan. In addition, 
introduce the competitive mechanism and abide by the law of 
value. As for the many S&amp;T projects under way all over China 
that are highly volatile and opportunistic, we should let the 
market regulate them on its own, while stepping up planned 
guidance and macro-management at the same time to make the most 
of the integration between the two. 
  -- Improve planned management and gradually reduce the reach 
of command planning while and broadening the scope of guidance 
planning. End fragmentation over time. Introduce the bidding 
system, the contract system, the responsibility system, and 
other project management tools. 
  -- Implement the policy of ``decontrol, vitalize, nurture, 
and guide.'' Open up the market vigorously. Formulate technical 
market management regulations and set up technical market 
management organs at all levels. Establish market support 
systems such as those for funds, materials, qualified personnel, 
and information that are suited to the market economy. Stimulate 
and develop the rural economy. Stimulate and develop the rural 
technical market even as we continue to develop the urban 
technical market. Make use of large and mid-sized enterprises 
and enterprise groups in a dual capacity, as recipients and 
users of technology and as developers and disseminators of 
technology. Successfully organize large nation-wide technical 
trade fairs, which can be comprehensive or specialized, at 
regular intervals and at permanent sites. Step up foreign trade 
in technology and open wider the window to foreign export trade. 
Go all out to increase foreign technology trade to 15 billion 
yuan by the latter half of the Eighth Five-Year Plan and 30 
billion yuan by the end of the century. 
  2) Reform of Scientific Research Institutions 
  By deepening the reform of the operating mechanism and 
searching for a new management system, we shall press ahead with 
the organizational adjustment of S&amp;T institutions during the 
Eighth Five-Year Plan, gradually forming a vital research force, 
small in size but energetic and well trained. 
  -- Deepen the reform of the funding system. Scientific 
research organs oriented to the development of technology: cuts 
in operating expenses funding for these organizations in 1991 
were about right. We should keep their institutional nature 
while continuing to guide and support their change in mode in a 
variety of ways. Social or public-interest-oriented social 
research organizations: Here the unitary funding system should 
be put to an end. Depending on the nature of their research and 
the extent to which their research achievements are 
commercialized, they should introduce the fund system and 
contract system. The government should increase assistance to 
them and encourage them to generate income diligently. As for 
basic research, we should continue to improve and strengthen the 
science foundation system. At the same time the government 
should select a number of major projects based on the 
requirements of long-term national economic development and 
organize their implementation directly by command. 
  -- Push on with the structural adjustment of S&amp;T 
organizations. Independent scientific research organizations 
owned by the whole people and oriented toward technological 
development should move in the direction of integrating 
scientific research with production and business under one roof, 
bringing about the union between S&amp;T and the economy in 
multiple 
ways. Public-interest oriented scientific research organizations 
should reorganize and streamline themselves in the midst of 
competition, networking with one another and socializing their 
functions. Basic research organs should take advantage of the 
strengths of institutions of higher education and the Chinese 
Academy of Science and gradually build up a high-standard 
research force. The development of private S&amp;T organizations 
should be nurtured and guided. Formulate and implement 
management regulations for private S&amp;T organizations. 
Stabilize 
and strengthen a policy of fostering them to develop them into a 
useful supplement to and organic part of the S&amp;T enterprise 
in 
China. Encourage and support individuals to set up scientific 
research organs and S&amp;T enterprises be they wholly funded 
undertakings, joint ventures, or cooperative ventures, either at 
home or overseas. 
  Select a number of key national scientific research 
organizations from among all types of scientific research 
organizations for extra assistance. To be selected, the 
organizations must go through a rigorous screening, using 
contribution to society as the criterion. 
  -- Reform the management system of scientific research 
organizations. Uphold and improve the institute (center) 
director responsibility system and technological 
development-oriented research organization contract 
responsibility system. Formulate appropriate implementation 
regulations. Support major research centers and institutes in 
exploring new management styles. Select a number of 
technological development-oriented scientific research 
organizations and S&amp;T enterprises (groups) to experiment with 
the shareholding system. Select basic research and public 
interest-oriented scientific research organizations to 
experiment with a management system featuring a board of 
directors or supervisors composed of unit leaders, leaders from 
the department in charge at the higher level, and authoritative 
figures from academe. 
  3) Promoting S&amp;T Progress in Enterprises 
  The priority mission here is to establish a mechanism 
whereby 
enterprises rely on S&amp;T progress and to enhance their 
ability to 
assimilate and develop technology. 
  -- Adopt policies and measures conducive to enterprises 
relying on S&amp;T progress. Establish a system of evaluation 
criteria to assess S&amp;T progress in enterprises in accordance 
with the characteristics of the industry in question and 
incorporate such a system into the enterprise contract 
management contract and director term-of-office objectives. Use 
a mix of economic, policy, legal, and the necessary 
administrative tools to reward the good performers and penalize 
the poor performers and expedite enterprise product turnover. 
  -- Accelerate the development of a S&amp;T progress 
assurance 
system within the enterprise. Large and mid-sized enterprises 
and enterprise groups must each put together a technical 
development organ by absorbing an independent scientific 
research institute or creating their own. Small and mid-sized 
enterprises and township and town enterprises should have their 
own sources of technological support. Popularize the 
engineer-in-chief technological responsibility system under the 
leadership of the factory director. 
  -- Step up the macro management of enterprise technological 
transformation. In accordance with the requirements of adjusting 
the national industrial structure and the product mix, and the 
industrial policy, the economic departments shall formulate a 
technological transformation plan and an annual plan in 
conjunction with the S&amp;T departments and carry out project 
verification and evaluation. 
  4) Deepen the Reform of Rural S&amp;T System 
  The core mission is to establish and perfect a coherent 
S&amp;T 
service system and S&amp;T management system revolving around the 
improvement and development of a dual-level operating system in 
the countryside combining centralization with separation, giving 
rise to a situation in which big S&amp;T supports big 
agriculture. 
  -- Develop a full S&amp;T service system. Encourage S&amp;T 
organs at 
the county level and below to develop into economic and 
technical entities bringing technology, agriculture, and trade 
under one roof and to play a leading role in rural S&amp;T work. 
Develop specialized technological associations and research 
societies in which peasants are the leading players and make the 
most of them as a link. Expedite the development of enterprises 
which enjoy an edge in technology, funding, materials, 
information, or market. Launch all kinds of economic and 
technical contract activities. Guide the development of 
contracting organizations in such a way that they form groups 
and become comprehensive and tangible entities. Adhere firmly to 
and improve the work of selecting the deputy county chief 
(mayor) for S&amp;T and deputy township (town) chief for S&amp;T. 
Perfect the rural S&amp;T management system. 
  -- Go all out to promote S&amp;T progress in township and 
town 
enterprises. Formulate a policy to encourage township and town 
enterprises to rely on S&amp;T progress. Step up technological 
guidance to such enterprises. Mobilize scientific research 
organizations and institutions of higher education and, in 
particular, large and mid-sized enterprises to provide them with 
a diverse range of services, including qualified personnel, 
technology, information, and products. Steer township and town 
enterprises onto the path of merger, cooperation, and 
specialization. Go for scale development and production. 
  5) Deepen the Reform of the Management System for S&amp;T 
Personnel 
  -- Step up macro regulation and control by the state over 
the 
distribution of S&amp;T qualified personnel. In accordance with 
the 
requirements of the adjustment of the state industrial 
structure, we should reinforce the S&amp;T forces in key 
industries 
and key projects through planned allocation and, with policies 
as a lever, support the development of small and mid-sized 
enterprises, township and town enterprises, and in the vast 
countryside. 
  -- Strengthen the market regulatory mechanism for S&amp;T 
qualified personnel management. Reform the S&amp;T personnel 
appointment system. Enterprises and institutional units should 
gradually introduce the appointment contract system. Safeguard 
the hiring freedom of enterprises and the job-selection freedom 
of individuals. Open up a market for qualified personnel. 
Gradually develop a qualified personnel movement service system 
centered upon intermediate organizations and a social security 
system at the heart of which is unemployment insurance. 
Formulate and improve regulations pertaining to the appointment 
contract system, resignation, dismissal, unemployment insurance, 
part-time employment, unpaid leave of absence, and the 
management of a record system on the floating population. 
  6) Intensify the Development of a Macro Regulation and 
Control System for S&amp;T Progress 
  -- Government at all levels must give top priority to 
S&amp;T 
work as part of the economic development strategy. Step up 
leadership and support in earnest. Formulate a uniform S&amp;T 
development strategy, policies, principles, and plans, and 
toughen the regulatory and control tools of S&amp;T departments 
in 
charge. Establish a system of indicators to measure S&amp;T 
progress 
in the national economy and throughout society and a 
corresponding supervision and assurance system. Accelerate the 
transition of economic development to reliance on S&amp;T. 
  -- Launch comprehensive pilot projects in S&amp;T reform. 
Introduce comprehensive coordinated reforms in the shareholding 
system, personnel system, wage system, housing system, and 
social security system in national high-tech and new-tech 
industrial development zones. Hammer out a new operating 
mechanism, organizational structure, and management method. 
Explore new ways to vigorously integrate planning with the 
market, reform with development, in order to provide the 
deepening of S&amp;T reform nationwide with successful examples. 
  -- Step up S&amp;T law-making. Enforce even more thoroughly 
the 
laws, rules, and regulations pertaining to S&amp;T and the 
economy. 
Do a good job in related work. Establish sound technical 
contract arbitration bodies. Waste no time in formulating laws, 
rules, and regulations, including ``S&amp;T Progress Law,'' 
``S&amp;T 
Reward Law,'' and ``Law for Research Institutes.'' Go all out to 
establish a fairly complete S&amp;T legal system by the year 
2000. 
<H5>  4. Adhere to the Open Policy and Reform. Vigorously Promote </H5>
International S&amp;T Cooperation 
  The reform and open policy of the party and the state have 
created the right conditions for absorbing advanced foreign 
technology extensively and exporting China's own superior 
technology and a favorable climate for technology transfer by 
other nations to China and cooperation and exchange. In a 
rapidly developing and changing world, the full utilization of 
every favorable condition to promote international S&amp;T 
cooperation and exchange vigorously should be an important 
long-term policy for the development of S&amp;T in China. 
  S&amp;T cooperation with foreign nations should serve 
economic 
and social development and S&amp;T progress. We should go about 
promoting such cooperation through multiple channels in a 
variety of ways based on the nation's S&amp;T development 
strategy 
and development plans. 
  1) Launch International S&amp;T Cooperation Across the Board 
Based on Needs and Possibilities 
  Even as we promote and perfect inter-governmental S&amp;T 
cooperation, we should expand the scope and scale of private 
S&amp;T 
cooperation by increasing the exchanges between enterprises, 
scientific research institutions, institutions of higher 
education, and private S&amp;T organizations, on the one hand, 
and 
foreign nations, on the other, and by encouraging interactions 
among scientists and entrepreneurs. There is more to 
international S&amp;T cooperation than bilateral cooperation, 
however; we should also fully utilize international 
organizations to carry out multilateral cooperation. Even as we 
widen S&amp;T interaction with developed nations, we should take 
care to strengthen and develop S&amp;T cooperation with 
developing 
nations. 
  Select a number of S&amp;T fields where China desperately 
has to 
gain an edge or already has an edge and participate in 
large-scale international S&amp;T research projects in those 
fields. 
Work out an international S&amp;T cooperation plan in the light 
of 
the projects set forth in the S&amp;T plans of all types at home. 
After doing studies, we should then enter into joint research, 
development, design, production, and information services with 
international S&amp;T institutions and international 
organizations 
selectively and purposefully. 
  2) Take Practical Steps To Absorb, Assimilate, and Improve 
Upon Imported Technology 
  The importation of technology must be coordinated with 
S&amp;T 
work at home and with technology trade. Give priority to the 
importation of software and key production technology. Do a good 
job in balancing technology, funds, equipment, management, 
qualified personnel, and the market. 
  Formulate laws and regulations on technological importation. 
Step up macro regulation and control and management to prevent 
unplanned and fragmented importation as well as duplication. 
Take practical steps to do a good job in the absorption and 
assimilation of technology. Explore new channels to find the 
funds needed to assimilate and improve upon imported technology. 
Make sure that scientific research organizations are involved in 
the entire process of importing, absorbing, assimilating, 
developing, and innovating upon technology. 
  Formulate laws and regulations to regulate technological 
exports. Tap the international technical market diligently. 
Develop an international cooperation medium bringing together 
technology and the economy and technology and trade. Make the 
most of high-tech and new-tech development zones. Attract 
foreign technology, funds, and qualified personnel to come to 
China to set up scientific research organizations or 
S&amp;T-oriented enterprises, including wholly foreign-funded 
concerns, joint ventures, or cooperative ventures. 
  3) Continue to Formulate and Perfect Policies Relating to 
the 
Promotion of the Foreign Contacts of S&amp;T Personnel, Academic 
Exchanges, and the Export of Intelligence 
  Create a liberal international S&amp;T cooperation 
environment. 
Allow more S&amp;T personnel to come in touch with the world 
directly and indirectly and orient themselves to the world. Make 
things easier for &amp;T personnel who want to attend 
international 
conferences, go overseas on an academic visit or as a visiting 
researcher, take a concurrent position overseas, or work in an 
international organization. We must work hard to host more 
international conferences in China and steer them to a wider 
spread of cities to energize the local academic world and enable 
even more S&amp;T personnel to take part in international 
academic 
activities. 
  Actively create the conditions to woo outstanding Chinese 
S&amp;T 
personnel overseas to return home to work. Invite foreign 
experts to come to China to engage in scientific research and 
teach or as production, business, or management advisers and 
consultants. 
  4) Create Conditions Favorable to International S&amp;T 
Cooperation 
  Intensify the collection and exchange of domestic and 
foreign 
S&amp;T information. Launch research on the state of S&amp;T in 
the 
various nations as well as their S&amp;T policies. Work out a 
S&amp;T 
cooperation strategy and policy with a country, bearing in mind 
its characteristics and strengths in different fields of S&amp;T. 
Open up new funding channels for foreign S&amp;T cooperation. 
Raise 
funds at home and abroad in multiple ways to give the necessary 
support to international S&amp;T cooperation. 
<H5>  5. Conditions and Measures of Support </H5>
  1) Increase S&amp;T Input To ensure the implementation of 
this 
``outline,'' the entire society must increase investment in 
S&amp;T, 
forming a funding triumvirate: state grants, funds raised by 
enterprises on their own, and loans from financial institutions. 
Work hard to attract private and overseas funds and establish a 
multi-level and multi-channel S&amp;T investment system. 
  In the next decade, S&amp;T investment must grow at a 
higher rate 
than the GNP so that R&amp;D spending in China will account for 
1.35 
percent of the GNP in the year 2000, about the same level as the 
middle-range developed nations, up from the 0.7 percent or so in 
1990. 
  -- The central government and local governments at all 
levels 
should take practical and effective steps to ensure that 
government spending on S&amp;T increase faster than both revenue 
and 
the GNP. Gradually adjust the share of the government budget 
that goes to S&amp;T. 
  Allocate S&amp;T spending rationally. Adjust the 
distribution of 
funds among basic research, applied research, high-tech 
research, and R&amp;D gradually so that over time an appropriate 
ratio is achieved. Increase the investment in intermediate 
testing and industrialization. 
  Increase investment in basic research. Continue to support 
basic research by allocating funds to defray its operating 
expenses, making grants to finance special projects, and through 
other channels. By the end of this century, spending on basic 
research should account for over 10 percent of the total R&amp;D 
budget. 
  Increase and protect investment in the national high-tech 
research development program (``863'' plan) and the plan to 
tackle key S&amp;T problems. Increase spending on recurrent 
operating expenses gradually. Intensify investment in the 
projects of industrial departments and major research 
institutions. Tap new funding sources to finance the 
modernization of equipment in scientific research units. Support 
industrial departments in building applied technology testing 
bases in order of priority. 
  Scientific research units are plagued by woefully obsolete 
facilities and equipment and insufficient investment in capital 
construction; these problems should be solved by increasing 
scientific research capital construction investment. Set aside a 
specified portion of the departmental capital construction 
investment budget as production-oriented capital construction 
investment. Allocate money, the amount of which should be 
increased over the years, for that purpose on a priority basis. 
Gradually expand the scale of capital construction investment in 
high-tech industrial development zones to speed up their 
development. Within 10 years high-tech industrial development 
zones shall have been created and operating on a fairly large 
scale. 
  Gradually increase the amount of foreign exchange allocated 
to import apparatus, equipment, technology, books, and other 
materials for use in scientific research. 
  -- Adjust the mix of loans. Increase the scale of S&amp;T 
lending 
by a wide margin. Take practical steps to end the funding 
shortages affecting the conversion of S&amp;T achievements into 
real 
productive forces. Promote the formation and development of 
high-tech industries. 
  -- Enterprises must increase S&amp;T development investment 
in 
earnest. Typically enterprises must set aside not less than 1 
percent of sales revenue, or 5 percent in the case of high-tech 
enterprises, to be used for technological development either 
within the enterprise itself or in the industry in question. In 
addition, an industrial (or departmental) S&amp;T development 
fund 
should be set up. 
  2) Improve S&amp;T Conditions 
  -- The build-up of the scientific research infrastructure. 
As 
part of the drive to promote in-depth S&amp;T development and 
deepen 
S&amp;T reform in the next decade, we must select, based on the 
requirements of the national economy and social development, a 
host of high-standard the scientific research institutes and 
institutions of higher education which have made major 
contributions for special support. Step up the build-up of 
scientific research infrastructure consisting of 
industry-oriented testing bases, engineering and technology 
research centers, and key national scientific laboratories, 
among other things. 
  During the Eighth Five-Year Plan, even as we continue to put 
the national industry-oriented testing bases on a sound footing, 
a host of national engineering and technical research centers 
must be set up in order of priority and in stages so as to make 
S&amp;T achievements more mature, more coordinated and more 
engineering-oriented. Strengthen the intermediate stages leading 
to the translation of S&amp;T achievements into productive 
forces. 
There will be 75 newly established key engineering laboratories, 
forming new S&amp;T bases for academic research and the training 
of 
qualified personnel. 
  Continue to improve the management of large-scale precision 
equipment. It should be distributed fairly. Promote the sharing 
and joint use of such equipment and increase the efficiency with 
which it is used. Give priority to the development of apparatus 
in common use in many areas. Increase the percentage of 
equipment made in China. 
  -- Ensuring the availability of S&amp;T materials. The 
three S&amp;T 
expenses and the materials required under the high-tech 
development plan should be itemized separately in the 
centralized material allocation and supply plan at both the 
national and the local levels. They should be made available on 
a priority basis. Develop new supply channels of materials on 
which there is a state monopoly of allocation and which are 
needed in scientific research, such as capital goods for the 
petrochemical and chemical industries and agriculture. 
  -- Strengthen and perfect the management and service system 
for raw materials, parts, components, chemical reagents, and 
special materials for use in scientific research. As for 
materials outside the plan needed for scientific research, 
materials departments and agricultural materials departments at 
all levels should make a great effort to secure their 
availability. 
  -- S&amp;T information assurance. Give priority to the 
establishment of a number of archives of Chinese documents and 
data bases, forming a national S&amp;T information on-line 
network 
based on data bases, resource centers, and service centers, 
which should cover all major cities in the nation and offer 
access to every major data base in the entire world. 
  Step up the gathering, processing, and reporting of 
information and intelligence needed for national S&amp;T and 
economic development. Intensify the tracking and study of S&amp;T 
achievements in the world. Complete a number of important 
information-gathering studies and reports to provide the 
information for scientific research and management policy-making. 
  3) Perfect the S&amp;T Finance and Taxation System -- 
Create a 
unified S&amp;T spending item in the government budget to ensure 
effective investment by the government in S&amp;T development. 
Enhance macro regulatory and control ability. 
  -- Financial and tax policies should continue to be biased 
in 
favor of the scientific research and technological development 
activities of scientific research units. Keep in place all 
existing financial and tax policies favorable to S&amp;T 
development. Scientific research units should continue to enjoy 
preferential tax treatment in such areas as technical income and 
incomes derived from new products and intermediate-testing 
products. 
  Encourage scientific research units to export technology and 
products and increase such exports. Gradually broaden the 
channels through which entities combining science with industry 
and trade can export their products. Foreign exchange derived 
from exports should continue to be retained in full by the 
scientific research unit concerned. Furthermore, a foreign 
exchange use target should be set. 
  Continue to offer scientific research units such 
preferential 
treatment as allowing them to import without paying tariffs or 
value-added-taxes apparatus and equipment needed in scientific 
research, parts and components necessary for repair and 
maintenance, and chemical reagents. 
  -- Formulate and perfect a financial policy that will spur 
S&amp;T progress in enterprises. Create a mechanism to encourage 
enterprises to increase S&amp;T investment.Funds spent by an 
enterprise on S&amp;T development may be counted as part of the 
total costs; alternately, the enterprise may be allowed to use 
the investment to offset its income tax payment in accordance 
with a set ratio. Introduce a policy that discriminates in favor 
of new products and against old. Apparatus and equipment used by 
an enterprise for S&amp;T development shall enjoy accelerated 
depreciation. 
  -- Formulate policies to promote integration between 
S&amp;T and 
banking. Create a S&amp;T risk investment mechanism for combining 
S&amp;T with banking. Actively nurture the establishment of 
S&amp;T-oriented financial institutions. Develop the leasing 
business in S&amp;T development. Gradually set up a socially 
conscious S&amp;T development guarantee body. Issue bonds and 
shares 
on a trial basis in high-tech and new tech development zones as 
a means of expanding the channels for the raising of short-term 
funds for high-tech development. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>
